(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Write to Gina Martinez at gina.martinez@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Ripert, the co-owner and executive chef of Le Bernardin in New York City, found Bourdain dead in his hotel room in France just hours earlier, CNN reported.”
“Authorities said the beloved chef, author and TV presenter committed suicide.”
“He was 61.”
“Ripert was in France to film an episode of Bourdain’s CNN show Parts Unknown.”
““Anthony was my best friend.”
“An exceptional human being, so inspiring & generous.”
“One of the great storytellers who connected w so many.”
“I pray he is at peace from the bottom of my heart.”


"To Gina Martinez Gina Martinez @ time.com."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
Ripert, CO owner and executive chef of the Le Bernardin hotel in New York City, found bourdin's body in a hotel room in France a few hours ago, CNN reported
Authorities say the beloved chef, writer and TV host committed suicide
"He's 61."
"Lipper was in France filming an episode of bourdin's CNN show the unknown."
"Anthony is my best friend."
"An extraordinary person, so inspiring and generous."
"A great storyteller who connects a lot of us."
"I pray from the bottom of my heart for his safety."



**Something goes wrong**
“As for the assault charge, “Todd was the victim.” Asked if Todd, who suffered life-threatening injuries in a serious snow machine crash last winter, was okay, the source replied: “He will be.”The insider added, “A lot of other families have gone through worse.””
“Image zoom Credit EMMANUEL DUNAND AFP Getty Images According to documents obtained by The Blast Track s ex wife Britta Hanson got a protective order against him and created a safeword for their 6 year old daughter Kyla to use if she felt in danger while with him during visits...”
“...the weekend...”
“Judge Tara Logsdon approved house arrest with electronic monitoring for Track, according to the Anchorage Daily News.”
“The judge also ordered that the 28-year-old seek a mental health evaluation within two weeks of release.Sarah Palin’s parents were present in court, according to KTUU, while Todd said via telephone that the family was prepared to reestablish contact with Track if he was released.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“However, the Associated Press reports that the judge denied Track’s attorney requested his bail be lowered from $5,000.”
“As of Wednesday afternoon, Palin was still in custody, reports the Anchorage Daily News.”
“...at his home...”
“A source close to the Palin family tells PEOPLE that the burglary charge came from allegedly breaking and entering at Sarah and Todd’s home.”


"As for the assault charges," Todd is the victim. " When asked if Todd was OK after he was fatally injured in a serious snow machine crash last winter, the source replied, "he'll be OK." "A lot of other families have experienced worse," the person added
"Image zooming credit Emmanuel Dunn and AFP Getty Images obtained a protection order against Britta Hansen, the ex-wife of the explosion trace, based on the documents obtained, and created a safety word for their 6-year-old daughter, Kayla, if she feels dangerous with him during the visit..."
“… Weekend... "
Judge Tara logsden granted house arrest and electronically monitored the orbit, according to the Anchorage Daily
The judge also ordered the 28 year old man to seek mental health assessment for release within two weeks of his birth. Sarah according to ketuy, Palin's parents were in court at the time, and Todd said by telephone that if Palin is released, the family is ready to reestablish contact with trek. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"However, the Associated Press reported that the judge denied that Drake's lawyer had asked to reduce his bail from $5000."
As of Wednesday afternoon, Palin was still in custody, according to the Anchorage Daily
“… In his home... "
"A source close to the Palin family told people that the burglary charges came from the alleged intrusion into Sarah and Todd's home."



**Something goes wrong**
“Barnum to Life in Epic First Trailer for 'The Greatest Showman' - Watch!”
“RELATED CONTENT:Zac Efron on Why His ‘Electric’ Kiss With Zendaya Is His Favorite Screen Smooch (Exclusive)WATCH: Zac Efron, Zendaya, and Hugh Jackman Join James Corden in a Hilarious ‘Crosswalk Musical’Hugh Jackman Brings P.T.”
“In a live commercial that aired during Fox's musical A Christmas Story Live!on Sunday night, star HughJackman was joined by Zac Efron, Zendaya, and an enormous cast to perform the song "Come Alive" from the upcoming film.”
“Beginning with a few kids leaving the Christmas Story set and following Jackman -- in his P.T.”
“Barnum ringmaster costume -- towards the back lot containing a large historical set, the performance kicked off with Jackman singing a quieter verse, before going big and tossing his cane to another performer.”
“As soon as Jackman finished his verse, the camera swung to Efron, with an unexpected mustache, and Zendaya, wearing her character's pink wig, dancing and singing on the steps of a building.”
“Keala Settle, who plays the Bearded Lady in the film, joined the rest of the cast next as the camera revealed just how many dancers filled the streets of the set.”
“Jackman then nailed a tricky top hat flip, as more and more dancers in colorful turn of the century costumes joined for the big finale, featuring more circus performers alongside the main cast.”
“For the big finish, Settle hit a high note and snow fell from the sky over the rightfully triumphant Jackman and his co-stars.”
“The whole performance took about three minutes, but as revealed on social media, required a lot of rehearsal.”


"Barnum's life in the epic first trailer 'the greatest performer' - look!"
Related content: Zac Efron why his "electric" kiss with zendaya is his favorite screen kiss (exclusive) watch: Zac Efron, zendaya and Hugh Jackman play a funny "crosswalk musical" with James Corden, and Hugh Jackman brings P.T
In the live advertisement of fox's musical "live Christmas Story"! On Sunday night, star Hugh Jackman joined Zac Efron, cendaya and many other actors in singing songs from the upcoming movie "to live."
"Starting with a couple of kids leaving the Christmas Story group and following Jackman - dressed in P.T."
"Barnum lingermaster's costume - there's a large historical scene in the back, where Jackman starts the show by singing a quieter poem and then swaggering his cane to another performer."
"As soon as Jackman finished writing the poem, the camera turned to Efron with an unexpected beard and cendaya with her character's pink wig, singing and dancing on the steps of a building."
"Keala Sette, who plays the bearded woman in the film, joined the next cast because the camera showed how many dancers were packed in the street."
"Jackman then nailed a tricky top hat flip as more and more dancers at the turn of the century added colorful costumes to the finale, and there were more circus actors next to the main actors."
"In the finale, Anton played a high note, snowflakes falling from the sky, covering the elated Jackman and his partner."
"The whole show took about three minutes, but as social media revealed, it required a lot of rehearsals."



**Something goes wrong**
“...the guys for who they are...”
“People are entitled to their own beliefs She continued That being said I want to go through that entire journey with people open to me and open to all the 28 men I hope that after watching the entire season play out they can stay open and get to know...”
“Warning: Spoilers AheadAfter months of rumors, Becca gave her final rose to controversial contestant Garrett.”
“As the show unfolded, Becca was conflicted over who to choose.”
“She introduced the suitors to her family, but they weren't much help.”
“Her sister told her Garrett was “incredible,” adding, “I felt like I had known him for years.”After meeting Blake, her sister liked him, too, saying, “I feel like Blake would challenge you and he would be more of a teammate.”
“You just need to decide what you want.”From there, it was time for the romantic final dates in the Maldives.”
“At the end of their date, Garrett gushed, “I know that you're the person that I need in my life to make me be a better version of myself every day, but I want to make sure that I'm the person that does that to you as well.”
“So when you make that decision, I'm willing to be absolutely crushed at the end of this, even if it isn't me, just as long as you're happy.”After Becca's date with Blake, it seemed she might choose him instead.”
“She said, “For a while, I've been in love with Blake.”


“… Who are they... "
"People have the right to have their own beliefs, she went on. Some people say that I want to go through the whole journey with people who open their hearts to me, open their hearts to all 28 people, and I hope that after watching the whole season, they can keep open and understand..."
Warning: after months of rumor, Becca gave her last rose to controversial player Garrett
"As the performance unfolds, Becca has a contradiction in who to choose."
"She introduced the suitors to her family, but they couldn't help much."
Her sister told her Garrett was "incredible," and she added, "I think I've known him for many years." After meeting black, her sister also liked him and said, "I think black will challenge you and he will be more like a teammate."
"You just have to decide what you want." Since then, it's time for a romantic last date in the Maldives
At the end of their date, Garrett gushed, "I know you're the one I need in my life to make me a better person every day, but I want to make sure I treat you the same way."
"So when you make this decision, I'm willing to collapse at the end of this, if not me, as long as you're happy." After Becca and black date, it seems that she may choose him instead
"There was a time when I fell in love with black," she said



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...living our best life A post shared by Larsa Pippen (@larsapippen) on Aug 9, 2018 at 12:59am PDT Aug 9, 2018 at 12:59am PDTFor more great stories, head to INSIDER's homepage.”
“The group of friends went on to dine at celebrity-favorite Madeo Restaurant.”
“"Living our best life," she wrote in the caption.”
“In an Instagram post, Pippen shared a photo of the nighttime crew.”
“She paired the hero pieces with a sheer tank top and contrasting high-waist pants, accessorizing with a multicolored Louis Vuitton mini handbag.”
“The Yeezy Season 7 offering comes in a trendy PVC upper and rises a soaring 4.5 inches, made even sexier with a high vamp and ultrapointed toe.”
“During a girls’ night in Beverly Hills, California, with Larsa Pippen, Kardashian looked confident wearing a sultry neon bralette and matching yellow transparent pumps designed by brother-in-law Kanye West.”
“Splash NewsBut it appears the 39-year-old is doing just fine (at least on the outside).”
“The neon pumps were designed by Kanye West.”
“She also reportedly ended her nearly two-year relationship with Younes Bendjima following their romantic getaway in Italy.”


“… Live our best life. Larsa Pippen (@ larsapippen) shared a post at 12:59 a.m. PDT on August 9, 2018. For more wonderful stories, please visit the inside homepage. "
"This group of friends went on to dine at the celebrity's favorite Madio restaurant."
"Living our best life," she wrote in the title
"On instagram, Pippen shared a photo of a night worker."
"She matches her heroic work with a transparent vest and contrasting high waisted pants, and a colorful Louis Vuitton Mini handbag."
"Yeezy's seventh season products use fashionable PVC uppers, up to 4.5 inches. The upper is tall and the toe is super sharp, which makes it more sexy."
"On a girl's night in Beverly Hills, California, with Lassa Pippen, Kardashian looks confident in her stuffy neon light and yellow transparent water pump designed by her brother-in-law Kanye West."
"But it looks like the 39 year old is doing well (at least outwardly)
"The neon pump was designed by Kanye West."
"It is reported that after younes bendjima left Italy, she also ended her relationship with them for nearly two years."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Also Read: Julia Louis-Dreyfus Says She Has Breast Cancer, Calls for Universal Health CareSee Louis-Dreyfus’ Instagram post below.”
“The award was her sixth in a row for playing Selena Meyers on the HBO comedy “Veep,” setting a new record for the most awards by a performer for a single role.”
“Louis-Dreyfus revealed her diagnosis just after winning her 11th Emmy award last month.”
“Today, I’m the one.”Also Read: 'Seinfeld' Co-Stars Offer Support to Julia Louis-Dreyfus Following Breast Cancer DiagnosisIn the message, the “Veep” actress also called for health care reform to help other women who don’t have the same resources that she does.”
“1 in 8 women get breast cancer...”
“The Fighter dancing through the fire cuz I am a champion and your re sic going to hear me ROAR Thanks to mrtonyhale timothycsimons katyperry for their hilarious and loving inspiration The Emmy winner announced last month that she had been diagnosed with breast cancer taking to Twitter to share...”
““‘I’ve got the eye of the tiger.”
“We are NOT f—ing around here,” she wrote on Thursday.”
““Chemo #2: finito.”
“Julia Louis-Dreyfus just wrapped her second round of chemotherapy and took to Instagram to thank “Veep” co-stars Timothy Simons and Tony Hale — as well as Katy Perry.”


"Read also: Julia Louis Dreyfus says she has breast cancer and calls for universal health care. Here's Louis Dreyfus's post on instagram."
"This is the sixth time in a row that she has won the most awards for her role as Selena Meyers in HBO comedy veep, setting a new record for single role performers."
"Louis Dreyfus just won the 11th Emmy last month and revealed her diagnosis."
"Today, I am the man." "The co star of Seinfeld is Julia Louis Dreyfus, who provides support after the diagnosis of breast cancer. In the news, veep also called for health care reform to help other women without her resources
"One in eight women has breast cancer..."
"The fighter is dancing in the fire, because I am the champion, you will hear my roar. Thank you to Mr. Tony Hale Timothy Simons katyperry for his laughter and Inspiration of love. The Emmy winner announced last month that she was diagnosed with breast cancer and shared it on twitter..."
"I have tiger eyes."
"We're not playing around here," she wrote on Thursday
"Chemotherapy 2: finitol."
Julia Lewis Dreyfus has just finished her second round of chemotherapy and is on instagram thanking veep co stars Timothy Simmons and Tony Hale - and Katie Perry



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It felt both emotionally manipulative and like low stakes, and the suspension of disbelief could not be sustained.”
“Similarly, it became hard to watch, let alone root for, shows that constantly put its core characters in life or death situations that it was obvious they would get out of due to contract statuses.”
“Still, after deliberately and painstakingly laying out its warring Iron Throne aspirants over six seasons, the HBO show’s creators are rushing to wrap things up with dizzying speed.”
“— Alex Stedman“Game of Thrones” (HBO)Endings are tough, and with a sprawling cast and a story spread out over several different mythical worlds, “Game of Thrones” faces a unique challenge.”
“As producers mull killing off Frank Underwood in its sixth and final season, the promise of Claire Underwood leading a (kind of) grieving nation may just yet pull me back in.”
“But who am I kidding?”
“Robin Wright’s electric charisma could only keep me hanging on for so long.”
“As the show killed off more characters — and tainted the rest — who was left to root for?”
“Even before the Kevin Spacey allegations dropped, the Frank Underwood shtick was starting to feel old.”
“— Debra BirnbaumMaybe “House of Cards,” like your typical presidential term, should have ended after four years.”


"It's emotional manipulation, and it's like a low stakes, unsustainable pause."
"Similarly, it's becoming very difficult to watch, let alone rooted in programs that constantly put its core characters at stake, and it's clear that they'll quit because of their contract status."
"Nevertheless, after six seasons of careful planning and careful planning, the creators of HBO finished the show in a dizzying speed."
——Alex Stedman's game of Thrones (HBO) has a tough ending, a huge cast, and stories all over several different mythological worlds. The game of Thrones is facing unique challenges
"When the producers think about killing Frank Underwood in season 6 and the final season, Claire Underwood's commitment to lead a (somewhat) sad country may pull me back."
"But who am I joking with?"
"Robin Wright's electronic charm can only keep me going for so long."
"As the show kills more characters and tarnishes others, who is left to support him?"
"Even before Kevin Spacey's charges were dropped, Frank Underwood Stryker began to feel old."
——Debra bienbaummebe's house of cards, like your typical presidential term, should end in four years



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s the one who brings in all the people who break rules in other houses and keeps them around until they can move on or whatever.””
“In Season 3 June will get Hannah back or die trying Miller said adding You and I are both worried she s gonna die she s not The writers room has adopted a mantra for this next phase of the story Blessed be the fight And while Seasons 1 and...”
“If the closing moments of The Handmaid’s Tale’s Season 2 finale felt like a battle cry, that’s because they were.”
“As Elisabeth Moss put that red hood up, she declared herself a woman on a mission: to save her daughter, and do as much damage as she can to Gilead in the process.”
“But there are plenty of questions left up in the air as we march toward next season—not the least of which is how, exactly, she’ll pull that off.”
“While show-runner Bruce Miller wasn’t handing out exact details during his finale postmortem phone calls—a conference call with reporters and, later, a solo chat with V.F.—he did drop plenty of details and a few helpful hints as to what fans can expect next.”
“The short version: June is on a war path; Aunt Lydia is not dead, and she could come back more brutal than ever; and Bradley Whitford’s character, Commander Lawrence, will be back next season, where he and June will meet anew.”
“For a more in-depth preview, read on.”
“Can June rescue Hannah?”
“She’s damn sure going to try.”


"It was he who brought in all the people who broke the rules in other houses and left them at home until they could move or something."
"In season 3, June will bring Hannah back or die," Miller said. "You and I are worried that she will die. She is not in the writing room. She has adopted a mantra for the next stage of the story, blessing the fight, while Season 1 and..."
"If the last moments of the ending of season 2 of maidservant's story feel like a battle cry, it's because they are."
Elizabeth moss put on the red hat and declared that she was a woman on a mission: to save her daughter and hurt Gilead as much as possible in the process
"But as we move towards the next season, there are still a lot of questions to ask, the most important of which is how she will do it."
"Although presenter Bruce Miller didn't reveal the exact details in his last conference call after his death - a conference call with a reporter, and then a private chat with V.F. - he did reveal a lot of details and some useful tips to tell fans what would happen next."
"Short version: June is on the road to war; Aunt Lydia is not dead, and she may come back more cruelly than ever; Bradley Whitford's character, commander Lawrence, will come back next season, where he and June will meet again."
For a deeper preview, read on
"Can Joan save Hannah?"
"She will certainly try."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Deadline’s sister site TVLine was first to report the recastings.”
“Last Man Standing, from 20th Century Fox TV, is slated to return to its longtime Friday 8 PM slot in the fall.”
“He will be joined by three other veteran Last Man Standing writer/executive producers: Matt Berry — who also served as showrunner on the original — Kevin Hench and Ed Yeager.”
“Kevin Abbott, who served as an executive producer on the original series for most of its six seasons on ABC, with stints as showrunner in Season 1 and the second half of Season 6, is back as executive producer/showrunner for Season 7.”
“The options on the cast recently lapsed, rendering everyone, including Elizondo, available to take other series jobs.”
“That pilot was not picked up by the network and was shopped unsuccessfully.”
“Also back is co-star Hector Elizondo whose deal to return — made last month — was originally in second position to his NBC comedy pilot Guess Who Died.”
“The rest of the show’s core cast is back including Allen, Nancy Travis, Jonathan Adams, Amanda Fuller, Christoph Sanders and Jordan Masterson.”
“Created by Jack Burditt, Last Man Standing stars Allen as a married father of three girls who tries to maintain his manliness in a world increasingly dominated by women.”
“Both roles are in the process of being recast, Deadline has confirmed.”


"Deadline's sister website tvline is the first report recast website."
"The last person to stand, from 20th century fox, is planning to return to Friday's 8 p.m. slot in the fall."
"He's joined by three other senior" last man "writers / Executive Producers: Matt berry, who also served as the original's" leaders "- Kevin Hench and ED Yeager."
"Kevin Abbott was executive producer of the original series for most of ABC's six seasons, showrunner for both the first and second half of season six, and now executive producer / showrunner for season seven."
"The actor's right of choice has recently lapsed, allowing everyone, including elizonto, to engage in other series of work."
"The pilot wasn't picked up by the Internet, and it didn't work."
"Also coming back is co star Hector Elizondo, whose return deal reached last month was originally second in the NBC comedy" guess who died. "
"The rest of the core actors are back, including Allen, Nancy Travis, Jonathan Adams, Amanda Fuller, Christopher sanders and Jordan Masterson."
"The last man" is written by Jack Birditt, starring Allen, who is the married father of three girls. In a world increasingly dominated by women, he tries to maintain his masculinity
"Both characters are in the process of being reshaped, and the deadline has been confirmed."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ADVERTISEMENT”
“Do with it what you will Silas, you’ve been blessed with a rock star mane.”
“If a commenter tells a celebrity (or a friend) not to do something that might hurt their kid, well, that’s useful.”
“However, the comments section of many celebrity fathers’ accounts are full of deeply unhelpful advice.”
“Take, for instance, Justin Timberlake’s account, which now features a photo of his son, Silas Timberlake, kissing his mom, Jessica Biel, followed by a mass of comments about the length of his son’s hair.”
“According to internet busybodies — mostly male and mostly very certain of their views — having long hair is going to somehow damage the kid long-term.”
“The picture was taken in Paris and shows the three-year-old with shoulder length hair and a very loud and boat-themed romper kissing his mom on the lips.”
“The caption reads, “If that pic doesn’t say ‘City Of Love’ then I’m out….” Privileged?”
“Yes.”
“Charming?”


"Advertising"
"Do what you want, Silas. You're lucky to have the mane of a rock star."
"It's useful if commentators tell celebrities (or friends) not to do anything that might harm their children."
"However, the comments section of many celebrity fathers' accounts is full of unhelpful suggestions."
"Take Justin Timberlake's account, which now has a picture of his son Silas Timberlake kissing his mother, Jessica Biel, followed by a lot of comments about his son's hair length."
"According to the nosy people on the Internet - most of them men, most of them are very positive - long hair can damage children's long-term health to some extent."
"This is a picture taken in Paris of a three-year-old with shoulder length hair, wearing a very noisy boat themed jumpsuit and kissing his mother on the lips."
The title says, "if that photo doesn't say 'love city', then I'm out..."
"Yes."
"Charming?"



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Christina has also signed on with HGTV for a new show that will feature her design business and her new home.”
“Tarek officially filed for divorce in January of 2017.”
“The couple asked that the financials of their settlement be kept private, but the custody agreement the pair hammered out is public record.”
“While Tarek and Christina originally separated in 2016 after 7 years of marriage, their divorce was not finalized until January of 2018.”
“What is the custody agreement between Christina and Tarek El Moussa ?”
“Tarek and Christina quickly sold their marital home in Yorba Linda, California, before the final divorce decree.”
“Tarek now resides in a home in Costa Mesa, California, while Christina has since purchased a home in Newport Beach, California.”
“The couple’s divorce was finalized in May of 2018, and a custody agreement is currently in place for the couple’s two children.”
“They split in 2016 after police were called to the couple’s home after an argument.”
“Additionally, they share a construction business and still have shared real estate ventures.”


"Christina has also signed up with HGTV to launch a new show to showcase her design business and new home."
"Tariq formally filed for divorce in January 2017."
"The couple asked to keep their property secret, but the guardianship agreement they reached was open."
"Although Tariq and Christina initially separated in 2016 after seven years of marriage, their divorce was not finalized until January 2018."
"What is the guardianship agreement between Christina and Tariq Moussa?"
"Tariq and Christina quickly sold their marriage home in yobalinda, California, and they finally got divorced."
Tariq now lives in a house in Costa Mesa, California, and Christina later bought a house in Newport Beach, California
"The couple's divorce agreement was finalized in May 2018, and the custody agreement for their two children has come into effect."
"In 2016, the police were called to the couple's home after a quarrel, and they broke up."
"In addition, they share a construction enterprise, but they still have a common real estate enterprise."



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Selena Gomez Wore Her Pajamas Out, Is a HeroCheck this out:”
“The perfect outfit for a night in with your besties.”
“Unlike lots of celeb-endorsed clothing, these are neither sold out nor expensive, retailing at $19.99.”
“The pajama sets in question are the "Women's Pajama Set Total Comfort" by Gilligan & O'Malley in "Pom Pom Pink."”
“They are so comfy."”
“In the Instagram comments, she wrote, "target!!!”
“For those of us wondering where we can snag those adorable PJ sets for throwing a Selena-esque sleepover of our own, luckily, Paige came through with the answer.”
“(It's unclear if they ended up replicating the "New Rules" hair-brushing train like they did in Riverdale.)”
“Selena, whose new Puma collection will be released on Friday, even accessorizes with a pair of thigh-high ballet pink stockings by the brand.”
“Theresa defies gravity on the top of the headboard, as Paige, Rebeka, and Selena all strike sisterly poses on the mattress.”


"Related report: Selena Gomez went out in her pajamas. Did a hero come to see this?"
"Have a perfect night with your friends."
"Unlike many celebrity endorsements, they are neither sold out nor expensive and retail for $19.99."
The pajama suit in question is Gilligan & O'Malley's "women's Pajama suit total comfort" in "POM POM pink"
"They are so comfortable."
In instagram's comments, she wrote: "goals!!"
"For those of you who want to know where to find those lovely pajamas for our own Serena style overnight party, fortunately page has the answer."
(it's not clear whether they copied the shampoo train of the "new rules" as they did in Riverdale.)
Serena's new Panther collection, due to be released on Friday, even comes with a pair of thigh high ballet pink stockings
"Theresa is not affected by gravity at the top of the headboard because page, Rebecca and Serena are all in sisterly positions on the mattress."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#LSSC ,” The Late Show with Stephen Colbert tweeted Thursday, sharing a GIF from Teigen’s 2016 appearance on the show — which was taped shortly before she gave birth to Luna.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“The Lip Sync Battle host — who announced she welcomed baby No.”
“2, a son whose name has not yet been revealed, with husband John Legend on Wednesday — hinted that childbirth was a little easier this time around.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I can confirm postpartum life is 90% better when you don’t rip to your butthole,” she wrote on Twitter Saturday night.”
“Teigen then joked that the difference meant that her newborn already had an advantage over big sister Luna Simone, 2.”
“She added, “Baby boy: 1 point.”
“Luna: 0.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Image zoom Credit: Jamie McCarthy/GettyChrissy Teigen and John LegendThe couple announced the arrival of their second child on social media late Wednesday, with the 32-year-old model tweeting, “Somebody’s herrrrrrre!” along with baby bottle and high-five smiley emojis.”


"LSSC," Stephen Colbert's evening show tweeted on Thursday, sharing a GIF photo of tygan appearing on the show in 2016, which was recorded shortly before tygan gave birth to Luna
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Mouth fight host - she announced that she would not welcome the baby."
"2, the name of a son has not been revealed, with husband John Legend on Wednesday - suggesting that childbirth is a little easier this time."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'm sure postpartum life will be 90% better if you don't work hard," she wrote on twitter on Saturday night
"Tegan went on to joke that this difference means her newborn has an advantage over her two-year-old sister, Luna Simona."
She added: "baby boy: 1 point."
"Luna: 0." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, and celebrity mom blogs? "
Photo zooming credit: Jamie McCarthy / Getty tegan and John Legan announced the arrival of their second child on social media late Wednesday, and the 32 year old model tweeted, "someone's daughter! "And baby bottles and high five smiley emoticons."



**Something goes wrong**
“Wilkinson Threatens to Cut Mom Off From Her Kids Over Exposé: ‘There’s No Coming Back’Last summer, Kendra shared about how she and Hank were keeping their marriage strong while temporarily living long-distance.”
“I hope to get back to the fun Kendra you all know.”
“The Kendra on Top star took to Instagram Wednesday, when she admitted that she and her husband, Hank Baskett, “are having issues” and denied that their “marital problems” are made up for cameras.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““1.”
“...how do u fake marital problems?”
“...makes absolutely no sense,” Kendra, 32, began the post, which accompanied a screenshot of an article titled, “Made-Up Marriage Problems?!”
“Kendra’s Faking It for TV.”“2.”
“Yes we are having issues,” she continued.”
““3.”


"Wilkinson threatened to cut off the connection between the mother and the children because she said: 'never come back.' last summer, Kendra shared how she and Hank kept their marriage strong and lived far away for a while."
"I want to go back to the interesting Kendra you all know."
The star Kendra actress, who appeared on instagram on Wednesday, admitted that she and her husband Hank Basquet had "problems" and denied that their "marital problems" were made up by cameras
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
““1.”
“… How do you pretend to have marital problems? "
Kendra, 32, wrote at the beginning of the article: "it's totally meaningless." the article was accompanied by an article entitled "fictional marital problems?" A screenshot of your article
"Kendra is pretending to watch TV." “2。”
"Yes, we have a problem," she continued
““3.”



**Something goes wrong**
“...apart from John and I should be growing closer to him...”
“Nikki later referenced her breakup again when discussing the difficulties of watching her relationship end on the E!”
“Nikki Bella joked about her split from John Cena on TV, and audience members had a surprising reaction.”
“The 34-year-old Total Bellas star appeared on the Wednesday, July 25, episode of The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon with sister Brie Bella, during which they explained what’s different about growing up with a twin.”
““Well, when we were young, we would breakup with boyfriends for each other.”
“That was a plus,” Nikki told Jimmy Fallon.”
“Brie, also 34, added: “We never had to go through like the emotions of a breakup because I was like, ‘You wanna dump the guy?”
“Cool.’ I’d be like, ‘Hello?”
“Yeah, not into you.”
“Sorry And then I would just go on with my day no hurt feelings and she d be like Did you do it and I m like Yeah you re good That s when Nikki quipped Where were you a few months ago The Tonight Show audience appeared to not...”


“… Except John and I should be getting closer to him... "
"Nicky later mentioned that when she broke up, she discussed the difficulty again and watched her relationship end in E!"
"Nicky Bella joked on TV that she broke up with John senna, and the audience's reaction was amazing."
"The 34 year old Bellas complete star appeared on Wednesday, July 25, in an episode of the tonight show starring Jimmy Fallon and sister Bree Bella, during which they explained the differences in growing up with twins."
"Well, when we were young, we would break up for each other and our boyfriends."
"That's good news," Nicky told Jimmy Fallon
Bree, also 34, added: "we've never been in the mood of breaking up because I thought, 'do you want to dump that guy
"Cool." I would say, "hello?"
"Yes, I don't like you."
"I'm sorry, then I'll continue my day without hurt feeling, she'll do it like you do, I'm like you're fine, this is when Nicky teases where you are a few months ago, the audience of tonight's show didn't seem to have..."



**Something goes wrong**
“This time he had managed to get a key.”
“[Then], one night, I think it was when we were at a hotel in Sicily and my costar wasn’t there, he told me he was coming to my room.”
“But I just knew I wasn’t safe.”
“He was in his sixties at the time, and you’d think I’d be safe in that situation.”
“Franco is incredibly charming.”
“I could tell he wanted something from me beyond just being his leading man.”
“He would tell me how wonderful and beautiful I was, told me incredible stories and what I needed to do to really be a real artist.”
“Franco would fly in and out to see what the progress was — and almost immediately he began trying to seduce me with words.”
“I didn’t know it at the time but I’m dyslexic and mastering the words and dialect was difficult for me so I already felt vulnerable.”
“They flew me to England to work on the English dialect at the Royal Academy of Dramatic Arts, and it was brutal.”


"This time he managed to get the key."
"One night, I think we were in a hotel in Sicily, and my partner wasn't there, and he told me he was coming to my room."
"But I know I'm not safe."
"He was in his sixties, and you would think I was safe in that situation."
"Franco is very charming."
"I can see that what he wants is not just to be his protagonist."
"He will tell me how wonderful and beautiful I am, the incredible stories and what I need to do to become a real artist."
"Franco will fly in and out and see how it goes - almost immediately he starts to seduce me with words."
"I didn't know at that time, but I had dyslexia, and it was difficult for me to master words and dialects, so I already felt very vulnerable."
"They let me fly to England and study English dialects at the Royal Academy of Dramatic Arts. It's cruel."



**Something goes wrong**
“You will forever be in my heart.””
“I just can’t fathom that it would end so suddenly.”
“The rapper told E!”
“News at OK!”
“Magazine’s summer kick-off party that she’s still processing the reality star’s death.”
“As previously reported, Big Black died of a heart attack on May 9 at the age of 45.”
““We’re all very sad that he’s gone.”
“It’s super tragic,” Chanel said.”
““He was so young and he has a little girl, which makes it even sadder.” (Boykin shares a 9-year-old daughter with ex-wife Shannon Turley.)”
““I think everyone is going to remember him as such a funny guy,” she added of her former MTV costar.”


"You will always be in my heart."
"I don't understand the sudden ending."
"The rapper told me!"
"Good news!"
"At the magazine's summer party, she said she was still dealing with the death of a reality star."
"As mentioned earlier, Dahei died of a heart attack on May 9 at the age of 45."
"We're all sad that he's gone."
"It's tragic," Chanel said
"He's too young, and there's a little girl, which makes him even more sad." (bokin shares a 9-year-old daughter with his ex-wife Shannon Terri.)
"I think everyone will remember him as such an interesting guy," she added, her former MTV partner



**Something goes wrong**
“In her autobiography Unfiltered, Lily touches on her eating disorder that plagued her teenage years.”
“I never wanted her to feel responsible; she's like my best friend.'”
“And Lily Collins, 28, made sure to soak-up the sun in between promoting her new Netflix drama To The Bone at the Ischia Film Festival on Monday alongside Jason Vahn.”
“According to Just Jared, the two have known each other for a long time and attended high school at Harvard Westlake in Los Angeles together.”
“Abs-olutely: Lily Collins, 28, made sure to soak-up the sun inbetween promoting her new Netflix drama To The Bone at the Ischia Film Festival on MondayLily was seen getting close to her investment analyst beau on a dock outside their hotel, although neither have confirmed the relationship.”
“They both graduated together in 2007 and Jared went on to attend the University of Pennsylvania before getting into investment banking at Canyon Capital Advisors.”
“The British-born actress looked sensational as exited the idyllic sea in her mixed print bikini.”
“The alabaster-skinned beauty put her best fashion foot forward as she worked a multi-coloured two-piece that featured eye-catching cutaway detailing in the midst of her bust.”
“Striking: The British-born actress looked sensational as exited the idyllic sea in her mixed print bikiniHer halterneck bikini top was sure to make a statement while her handsome mystery man followed swiftly behind as they walked up a wooden ramp to their sun loungers.”
“The Golden Globe nominated star's slinky bikini bottoms highlighted her petite frame while she navigated her way back to her sun spot barefoot.”


In her autobiography unfiltered, Lily talks about the eating disorders that afflict her teens
"I never want her to feel responsible. She's like my best friend."
Lily Collins, 28, must enjoy the sunshine while promoting her new play to the bone with Jason vahn at the Ischia Film Festival on Monday
"According to Jared, they've known each other for a long time, studying high school together at Harvard West Lake in Los Angeles."
"It's absolutely like this: Lily Collins, 28, promoted her new Netease drama to the bone at Monday's Ischia Film Festival "You have to enjoy the sunshine when Lily is seen approaching her investment analyst beau on the dock outside the hotel, although neither of them has confirmed the relationship."
"They all graduated together in 2007, and Jared went to the University of Pennsylvania and then to Canyon capital advisors investment banking."
"The British born actress came out of the idyllic sea in a hybrid printed bikini and looked like a sensation."
"This white beauty shows her most fashionable side when designing a multicolor two-piece bra, with eye-catching hollowed out details in the middle of the bust."
"What's striking is that the British born actress looks sensational as she walks out of the idyllic sea in a mixed Print Bikini. Her backless bikini top is sure to become a saying, while her handsome mystery man follows her up a wooden ramp to their sun chair
"The Golden Globe nominated star's tight bikini pants highlight her petite body, but she has returned to her sun spot barefoot."



**Something goes wrong**
“She wanted us to tell people."”
““This isn't a secret.”
“A month after breaking up with Hiddleston, Swift went to a Kings of Leon show with her friends.”
“Oct. 12, 2016: Swift and Alwyn attend the same Kings of Leon concert.”
“It was an eventful night for Tay.”
“This Met Gala is also the night she met Tom Hiddleston and danced goofily with him in a video that went viral, and later sparked the rebound heard ‘round the world .”
“Neilson Barnard Getty ImagesSwift was still dating Calvin Harris.”
“The lyrics in question: “Flashback to when you met me, your buzzed cut and my hair bleached.” Swift’s hair was, indeed, bleached at the Met Gala, and Alwyn’s hair was buzzed.”
“But sleuths have determined that the song “Dress” on her 2017 album Reputation might refer to their first meeting.”
“Nobody knows for sure when Taylor and Joe first met.”


"She wants us to tell people."
"It's not a secret."
A month after swift and sidleston broke up, she and her friends went to see a performance of King Leon
"October 12, 2016: swift and Alvin attend the same King Leon concert."
"For Tai, it's an eventful time."
"This blind date party was also the night when she met Tom sidleston. She danced with Tom sidleston in a video, which became popular and later triggered the rebound" around the world "heard by people."
"Nelson Barnard Getty swift is still dating Calvin Harris."
The lyrics in question are: "when you met me, your hair and mine turned white." Swift's hair did turn white at the met, and Alvin's did
"But detectives have determined that the song 'dress' in her 2017 album reputation may refer to their first meeting."
"No one knows exactly when Taylor and Joe first met."



**Something goes wrong**
“Read Adele’s entire note to fans below:”
“The cancelled Wembley dates come just a day after Adele hinted that she may not tour again following the 25 jaunt.”
““To not be able to finish it, is something I’m really struggling to come to terms with.”Adele, who previously underwent vocal cord surgery in October 2011, added that she hopes to reschedule the two shows in the future, but if she can’t, refunds will be available.”
““I have changed my life drastically in every way to make sure I got through this tour that started at the beginning of last year,” Adele wrote.”
“...told not to perform this weekend although she even considered miming in order to keep her obligations...”
“However following the first two shows which Adele called the biggest and best shows of my life the singer struggled vocally and had to push a lot harder than I normally do Adele visited a throat doctor who found damage to her vocal cords on medical advice the singer was...”
“2015 LP 25 was set to conclude with a four night stand at Wembley Stadium...”
“I ve considered doing Saturday night s show but it s highly unlikely I d even make it through the set and I simply can t crumble in front of you all and walk out on you in that way The singer s 123 date tour in support of her...”
““I’m already maxed out on steroids and aids for my voice.”
““To say I’m heartbroken would be a complete understatement,” Adele wrote in a Twitter statement Friday.”


"Please read all Adele's messages to fans below:
"The day before the cancellation of Wembley, Adele hinted that she might not tour again after the 25th."
"It's really hard for me to accept that I can't finish these two programs." Adele, who had undergone vocal cord surgery in October 2011, added that she hopes to reschedule the two shows in the future, but if not, she can get a refund
"I've changed my life completely in every way to make sure that I can finish the trip I started early last year," Adele wrote
“…… She was told not to perform this weekend, even though she even considered imitating to fulfill her obligations... "
"However, after the first two performances that Adele called the biggest and best in my life, the singer struggled in singing and had to push harder than I usually do. Adele went to see a laryngologist and the doctor told her that her vocal cords were damaged. The singer was..."
"LP 25 will finish four nights at Wembley in 2015..."
"I thought about doing a show on Saturday night, but I'm not even likely to finish shooting. I can't collapse in front of you and leave your singer's 123 date tour in that way to support her..."
"My throat is exhausted with steroids and adjuvants."
"To say I'm heartbroken is a total understatement," Adele wrote in a twitter statement on Friday



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“"It's so good to see famous people again," David Letterman declared as he took the stage as a guest on Tuesday's Jimmy Kimmel Live.”
“The 70-year-old comedian's appearance on JKL -- which is filming all week in Brooklyn, New York -- marked the first time he's been on late-night TV since he retired over two years ago as the host of CBS' The Late Show.”
“"It feels so good to be out of the house, ladies and gentlemen!"”
“Letterman joked before calling out Paul Shaffer, the former band leader of The Late Show, for also making an appearance on Kimmel's program.”
“"Paul, you work here now?"”
“MORE: David Letterman Returning to TV With New Netflix SeriesLetterman sarcastically revealed what he misses most about being on TV every night.”
“"I miss wearing makeup," he mused, later adding, "I'm profiling through, 'Was I fired or did I retire?'"”
“Kimmel -- who wore a tie that Letterman gifted him when he left The Late Show -- insisted, "You retired!”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"It's great to see celebrities again," David Letterman said as a guest on Tuesday's Jimmy Kimmel live show
The 70 year old comedian made his debut on the JKL show in Brooklyn, New York, for a full week, marking his first night on CBS's "evening show" after retiring two years ago
"Ladies and gentlemen, it's a great feeling to go out!"
"It's a joke," Letterman joked before naming former band leader Paul Shaffer for Kimmel's show
"Paul, do you work here now?"
"More: David Letterman returns to TV with the new Netflix series, revealing ironically what he misses most about every night's TV."
"I miss make-up," he mused, adding later, "I'm analyzing, 'am I fired or retired?'"
Kimmel - wearing the tie that Letterman gave him when he left the post show - insisted, "you're retired!"



**Something goes wrong**
““I got very lucky,” he said.”
“Another character Baldwin reflected on was that of Jack Donaghy of NBC’s critically acclaimed sitcom 30 Rock.”
““I knew of certain things, that there were rumors of things happening to people, but I didn’t necessarily know the scope, when you hear the hundreds and hundreds of women who are complaining about this,” the actor admitted while accepting the honor.”
“It’s making it less productive," Baldwin asserted.”
“I think a lot of what we’re dealing with within this issue is hurting our business.”
““I think it’s important for us to try to make the workplace and beyond not only comfortable and right and fair and appropriate but as productive, as well.”
“I really would like that to change.”The Emmy Award-winning actor said that the way individuals function in the workplace needs to change, not just in Hollywood but everywhere.”
“I’m from a generation where you really don’t and I’d like that to change.”
“You don’t.”
““From time to time, I’ve done what a lot of men do, which is … when you don’t treat women the same way you treat men.”


"I'm lucky," he said
"Another part of Baldwin is Jack Donaghy in NBC's popular sitcom rock 30."
"I know something, there's a rumor that it's happening to people, but I don't necessarily know the scope, when you hear hundreds of women complaining about it," the actor admitted in accepting the honor
"It will reduce productivity," Baldwin asserted
"I think a lot of the things we deal with on this issue are damaging our business."
"I think it's important that we try to make the workplace and beyond comfortable, correct, fair, appropriate and productive."
"I really want to change that." The Emmy winner said the way individuals work in the workplace needs to change, not just in Hollywood, but everywhere
"I come from a time you really don't like, and I hope that will change."
"You didn't."
"I do a lot of things that men do from time to time, and that's When you treat women differently than you treat men. "



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The montage includes sweet mother and daughter moments from the reality star's Snapchat.”
“Kardashian wrote a message to the 4-year-old on her website along with the video, "HAPPY BIRTHDAY TO MY MINI ME!”
“I CAN'T BELIEVE YOU ARE 4 ALREADY.”
“I LOVE YOU SO MUCH, NORTHIE!"”
“"Even when you're big, you're going to be so nice to me?"”
“Kim asks North in the video.”
“"Yeah," the birthday girl adorably promises.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Montage includes the sweet mother daughter moment of reality TV star snapchat."
Kardashian wrote a message to the 4-year-old on her website, along with a video, "Happy Birthday to my mini!"
"I can't believe you're four years old."
"I love you so much, nosy!"
"Even if you are old, you should be so kind to me?"
"Kim asked the north in the video."
"Yes," the birthday girl promised lovingly
"This content was imported from YouTube."



**Something goes wrong**
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week, a group of people found out on reddit that Gamestop's share price had soared, leading to the ban of a multi billion dollar hedge fund. Read more, peloton's Cody Rigsby explains that his recent absence shows him
"The 24-year-old social star revealed in the latest podcast that he has invested about $50000 in Gamestop stock."
"Today, yellowfin tuna chews 200 hooks at the losunoso resort," Connor wrote in the photo
"Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman's 26 year old son recently shared a rare picture on instagram of him holding a big fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
“… Life... "
"A very famous actor and director in this industry gave me very bad advice, which helped me a lot, because I just read more about Tom Cruise's son, Connor, who posted his own rare photos on instagram. Connor Kidman cruise rarely saw him..."
"Now, the 36 year old actress and director is explaining the policy and revealing to the outside world what prompted her to adopt it in her film set."
“… There was no policy he violated... "
"A few hours ago, Haley Hyde read more and Olivia Wilde explained her ban policy on the set. As you may remember, Olivia Wilde fired Shiite rabov from the movie "don't worry, honey" last year, when there were several reports that she had a... "
"When Haley arrived at the restaurant, she was wearing a black mask and was safe."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Which is exactly how Spider-Man would feel.”
“The young actor joins more than two-dozen other Marvel heroes in the third Avengers movie, which brings the entire Marvel Cinematic Universe together to battle the otherworldly warlord Thanos (Josh Brolin).”
“Jesse Grant Getty ImagesSpeaking to E!”
“News earlier in the week, Tom admitted that being together on set with Hollywood titans like Scarlett Johansson, Robert Downey Jr., Benedict Cumberbatch and Chris Pratt left him with sensory overload at times.”
“"To be 21 and to get the chance to work with people like this is amazing," he beamed.”
“"It was just a real whirlwind to walk on set and see 30 of your favourite actors dressed up like superheroes, just having a coffee and hanging out.”
“It was so bizarre."”
“Tom also joked that the superstar cast bonded mostly over their shared misery at being trapped in super-suits for most of the day.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"That's how Spiderman feels."
In the third film "Avenger", the young actor and more than 20 other Marvel heroes play in the film, bringing the whole Marvel movie world together to fight against the extraordinary warlord tanos (Josh Brolin)
"Jesse grant Getty's picture told me!"
"In the news earlier this week, Tom admitted that being on set with Hollywood stars like Scarlett Johnson, Robert Downey, Benedict Cumberbatch and Chris Platt can sometimes overload him."
"At 21, it's great to have the opportunity to work with people like this," he said with a smile
"It's a whirlwind to walk around the set and see 30 of your favorite actors dressed up as superheroes, just having a cup of coffee and hanging out."
"It's weird."
"Tom also joked that superstars are trapped in super suits most of the time, which is their common pain."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Once again, I sincerely apologize for my actions.””
“I intend to turn this unfortunate incident into a positive life changing event.”
“Nearly two months after the Real Housewives of New York City star was arrested on Christmas Eve in Palm Beach, Florida, the Florida State Attorney has released new evidence in court documents — obtained by The Blast —that will be used in de Lesseps’ criminal case.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The documents, filed Jan. 24, include an image of the Palm Beach Police officer, whom she allegedly kicked.”
“The photo showcases the injuries on the officer’s head.”
“Image zoom Credit: Circuit Court for Palm Beach CountyShe had been discovered trespassing in a hotel room with an unidentified man, according to a police report.”
“The pair had entered the wrong room at the Colony Hotel in Palm Beach and refused to leave.”
“Police say Lesseps, 52, slammed a door and kicked at least one officer.”
““Officer O’Leary then attempted to detain De Lesseps and remove her from the bathroom, at which time De Lesseps shoved Officer O’Leary with an open palm to the chest, then slammed the door on Officer O’Leary face, striking him in the forehead.”


"Once again, I sincerely apologize for my behavior."
"I intend to turn this unfortunate event into a positive life changing event."
"Nearly two months after the arrest of the real housewife of the New York star in Palm Beach, Florida on Christmas Eve, Florida prosecutors released new evidence from court documents obtained by the explosion, which will be used in the criminal case of dreiseps."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Among the documents submitted on 24 January was a picture of a Palm Beach police officer who she was alleged to have kicked
"The picture shows the officer's head injury."
Photo source: Palm Beach County Circuit Court he was found breaking into a hotel room with an unidentified man, according to police reports
"They went into the wrong room at the Colony Hotel in Palm Beach and refused to leave."
"The 52 year old Lesseps slammed a door and kicked at least one police officer," police said
"Later, officer O'Leary tried to detain dreceps and take her away from the bathroom, when dreceps pushed officer O'Leary's chest open with his palm, then slammed the door on officer O'Leary's face and hit him on the forehead."



**Something goes wrong**
“To complete the look, according to the press release, he pulled Kardashian's hair into a high pony, softening the look by pulling out the edges and wrapping hair around the ponytail's base.”
“The curling iron in question is the ghd Curve Classic Curl Iron, which Appleton used to curl random sections of hair for even more defined waves.”
“The final steps involve a $200 curling iron and a hair band or ponytail holder.”
“After that, he applied the Color Wow Pop & Lock Gloss Treatment to make things shiny.”
“To achieve the look, he first prepped Kardashian's hair with Color Wow Brass Banned Correct & Perfect Mousse for Dark Hair for texture and definition, which he further added by blowing the hair with a diffuser.”
“According to a press release, the uncharacteristic hairdo was the brainchild of Color Wow Global Creative Director Chris Appleton.”
“And not just any waves: these were seriously dense waves that are apparently just her natural hair texture, but enhanced.”
“Kim Kardashian typically keeps her hair sleek and straight, either down or in an Ariana-adjacent ponytail, but on Monday night, she showed up to the 2018 CFDA Fashion Awards wearing — gasp — waves.”


"In order to complete the styling, according to the press release, he pulled Kardashian's hair into a tall pony, pulled out the edge and wrapped it around the base of the horse's tail to soften the styling."
"The curler we're talking about is the classic GHD curler, which Appleton uses to curl any part of his hair to create clearer waves."
"The final steps include a $200 curling iron and a hairband or ponytail clip."
"After that, he used the wow pop & Lock gloss treatment to make things shiny."
"To achieve this effect, he first prepared Kardashian's hair with the right perfect mousse of color for the texture and clarity of dark hair, and then blew it with a diffuser."
"According to a press release, this unusual hairstyle is the creation of Chris Appleton, global creative director of color wow."
"And it's not just any waves: These are very dense waves, obviously just her natural hair, but it's enhanced."
"Kim Kardashian's hair is usually straight, either drooping or wearing Ariana's ponytail, but on Monday night, she attended the CFDA Fashion Awards 2018 and wore - gasp - waves on her head."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Visit our YouTube and Ustream Channels for our contemporary and classic productions.”
“It was in my parents’ house …He was miraculously unhurt.”
“Kemper and writer husband Michael Koman, who’s Jewish, were married in a Catholic ceremony — last summer, a very pregnant Kemper told Colbert that story — and like many interfaith couples, had to make a major decision when the first child came along.”
““We were sort of figuring out how to raise James, with what religion,” she told Colbert.”
““We’re going the Catholic route.”
“He did get baptized.”Kemper revealed James was baptized in May, when he was 10 months old — and she was a little concerned that he might be too big for the priest to manage.”
“Apparently, young James did scream, but all turned out well — even when he grabbed a shard of glass at his grandparents’ house.”
““An hour after the baptism,” Kemper said, “I found James with a shard of glass in his hand!”
“I don’t know if he was testing God.”
“Image: Courtesy CBSLearn more about Family Theater Productions’ upcoming, new and vintage productions as well as our Hollywood Outreach Programs; and, of course, you’ll find us on Facebook.”


"Visit our youtube and Ustream channels to learn about our contemporary and classic works."
"It was at my parents' house He was miraculously unhurt. "
"Kemper and the writer's husband, Michael Koman, are Jewish and married at a Catholic ceremony - a pregnant Kemper told Colbert the story last summer - and like many couples of different faiths, they have to make a big decision when their first child is born."
She told Colbert: "we're trying to find a way to raise James, with what religion."
"We're going Catholic."
"He was baptized." Kemper revealed that James was baptized in May, when he was only 10 months old - she was a little worried that he might be too old for the pastor to manage him
"Obviously, little James did scream, but everything was fine - even when he picked up a piece of glass at his grandparents' house."
"An hour after the baptism," Kemper said, "I found James with a piece of glass in his hand!"
"I don't know if he's testing God."
"Picture: learn more about the upcoming new and classic works of home theater, as well as our Hollywood expansion plan; of course, you can find us on Facebook."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“Sundays at 9 p.m.”
“She’s upset he would disrupt the family vacation with the kids there and the whole family there and hide a girl in the hotel.”Keeping Up With the Kardashians airs on E!”
““Kourtney is not upset that he’s seeing other women.”
““The family is deeply disappointed,” a source told Us at the time.”
“As Kourtney Kardashian — who shares kids Mason, 7, Penelope, 4, and Reign, 2, with Disick — drives off in a golf cart with her sisters, she says, “That actually made me feel better.”Back in February, Us Weekly reported that Disick left Costa Rica a day early after the blowout fight.”
“It seems Kim, Khloé and Jenner don’t accept his apology**, because they all throw water on Disick and completely douse him.”
““I did something wrong as always,” he says.”
“When that didn’t work, Jenner, 61, asked point blank: “I think what we’re all wondering is if you have a girl here and why?”In the preview, it appears the self-proclaimed Lord owns up to bringing Chelsea along on the tropical getaway.”
“During a group dinner, Kim, 36, and Khloé, 32, started talking about Chelsea Handler and Chelsea Clinton in an attempt to get Disick to admit to his actions.”


"Wait a minute."
"Nine o'clock Sunday evening."
"She's upset that he's going to disrupt the family and children's holidays and hide a girl in a hotel." Kardashian's look is on the E! "
"Courtney wasn't upset about dating other women."
"The family is very disappointed," a source told us at the time
Courtney Kardashian, who has three children, 7-year-old Mason, 4-year-old Penelope and 2-year-old raven, left with her sisters in a golf cart. "It makes me feel better," she said As early as February, American Weekly reported that Disick left Costa Rica one day earlier after the blowout
"It seems that Kim, heloe and Jenner won't accept his apology * * because they all poured water on Disick and poured him out completely."
"I did the wrong thing as always," he said
When that didn't work, Jenner, 61, asked bluntly, "I think what we all want to know is, do you have a girl here and why? "In the trailer, the man who claims to be God admits that he is going to take Chelsea on a tropical holiday."
"At a group dinner, Kim, 36, and heroy, 32, began to talk about Chandler and Clinton, trying to get dirick to admit his actions



**Something goes wrong**
“HollywoodLifers, who was your pick for worst dressed?”
“And, be sure to keep tabs on who takes home the coveted CMA Awards, with our full winner’s list — right here!”
“These stars just didn’t bring their A-game to the CMA Awards red carpet!”
“Kellie Pickler took a feathery risk and it didn’t pay off; and there’s more where that came from!”
“See the fashion flubs from country’s biggest night!”
“Someone call the fashion police, because we have some red carpet culprits!”
“While some stars showed up and showed out at the 2017 Country Music Association Awards in Nashville, there were others who missed the mark.”
“Sadly, the always-stunning Kellie Pickler just didn’t do it for us tonight.”
“She hit the red carpet in a long sleeve mini dress that was covered in feathers.”
“She certainly took a risk, but it didn’t exactly pay off.”


"Hollywood actress, who do you choose to dress worst?"
"Besides, we must pay close attention to who will bring home the coveted CMA award. Here is our complete list of winners!"
"These stars just didn't bring their A-game to the red carpet of CMA awards!"
"Kelly picker took a lot of risks, but it didn't pay off; and there are more risks coming from it!"
"Look at the fashion episode of the country's biggest night!"
"Someone called the fashion police because we have some red carpet culprits!"
"While some stars appeared at the 2017 Country Music Association Awards ceremony in Nashville, others missed the ceremony."
"Sadly, the always amazing Kelly picker didn't do it for us tonight."
"She went down the red carpet in a long sleeve miniskirt covered with feathers."
"She took the risk, of course, but it didn't work."



**Something goes wrong**
“Foy’s a fan of the former Suits actress’s old day job: “And she’s an actress, so there’s hope for us all.””
“And I think that’s why the monarchy will survive, and thrive, because it’s willing to change and listen to the people and realize that some elements of the institution are outdated and unnecessary.”As for Markle?”
“On Monday night, during a talk moderated by Vanity Fair’s Mike Hogan at 92nd Street Y in New York City with co-star Claire Foy, Smith did not mince words about his feelings on the fate of Prince Harry’s royal-to-be fiancée, Meghan Markle.”
““I feel sorry for her,” he said.”
““It’s such a transition in her life, and it’s such a huge thing to take on.”
“Life as she knows it is gone.”
“But hey, she’s marrying the prince of Britain—how exciting for her.”Though he plays a fictional royal, Smith understands a thing or two about the complex life of Prince Philip, who reluctantly lived in the Queen’s shadow for the better part of his early marriage.”
“Philip, a naval officer in the mid-20th century, had to make several sacrifices that many other husbands at the time did not.”
“As V.F.”
“...has noted, Philip was unable to give his children his surname—a request the Queen rejected.”


Foy is a fan of the former suit actress's old job: "and she's an actress, so there's hope for all of us."
"I think that's why the monarchy survives and prospers because it's willing to change, listen to the people, and realize that some elements of the system are obsolete and unnecessary." As for Marcel
"On Monday night, in a conversation with CO star Claire foy in the 92nd Street y District of New York city hosted by Mike Hogan of vanity fair, Smith made no secret of his feelings about the fate of Prince Harry's fiancee to be, Megan Markle."
"I feel sorry for her," he said
"It's a turning point in her life and a big event."
"The life she knew was gone forever."
"But, hey, how exciting it is for her to marry the prince of England." Although Smith plays a fictional member of the royal family, he has one or two things to know about Prince Philip's complicated life. Most of his early marriage, Prince Philip reluctantly lives in the shadow of the queen
Philip, a naval officer in the mid-20th century, had to make some sacrifices, which many other husbands did not
"As V.F."
“…… It has been noted that Philip can't give his child his surname - the queen refused the request. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Allure editors also love Too Faced Shadow Insurance.”
“Urban Decay's Eyeshadow Primer Potion is always a good choice.”
“The myriad of matte and metallic shades look stunning, but the thought of getting a selection of them onto lids without looking like a child's art project gone wrong can scare people away from them entirely.”
“Without the right blending, the shadows could end up looking muddy, splotchy, patchy, or harsh.”
“Cringe.”
“The word "blending" in and of itself freaks some people out.”
“Trust and believe that there's nothing to be afraid of.”
“Unlike those holographic snakes, eye shadow doesn't have fangs.”
“I asked a handful of professional makeup artists to demystify eye shadow blending, and I swear blending is easier than it looks with their tips.”
“You don't have to be giving celebrities perfectly diffused smoky eyes all day and all night to master the technique.”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“Julia MichaelsSame goes for Michaels, whose poofy red gown doesn't quite match Pink's fairytale princess interpretation of their similar look.”
“If only we loved this bodysuit/sweatpants/boots combination as much.”
“And Sunday night's ceremonies delivered, with a range of looks that were mostly fun, often questionable and sometimes disastrous — but never boring.”
“Take a look at the evening's best and worst dressed stars below.”
“Best dressedSelena GomezThis Coach minidress-sized leather jacket of a garment Gomez is wearing is doing everything for us right now, especially paired with her messy new bleach-blonde hair.”
“Jenna Dewan TatumBravo to Dewan Tatum for nailing this nude look from Julien MacDonald.”
“Demi LovatoLovato's Ester Abner look is vaguely Morticia Addams and a little Elizabeth Taylor and completely and totally flattering on her.”
“PinkYes, Pink's Monique Lhullier gown is exceedingly pink.”
“But fans don't often see the singer in overly girlish dresses, and these Disney princess vibes look nice on her.”
“Tracee Ellis RossTracee Ellis Ross was tasked with hosting this year's AMAs, and she set a high bar on the red carpet in Stella McCartney.”


"Julia mclesrem also likes mclesrem. His urinating red robe doesn't match the princess's interpretation of their similar shapes in pink fairy tales."
"If only we liked the Jumpsuit / sweatpants / boots combination as well."
"At the awards ceremony on Sunday night, a series of expressions were mostly funny, often suspicious, sometimes catastrophic - but never boring."
"Look down at the best and worst dressed stars of the night."
"Best dressed Selena Gomez, a leather jacket the size of a coach miniskirt, is one of Gomez's clothes now, and it does everything for us, especially with her messy new bleached blonde hair."
"Jenna Dewan Tatum Bravo thanks Dewan Tatum for her nude look for Julien MacDonald."
"Demi Lovato Lovato's ester Abner looks a bit like Morticia Addams and Elizabeth Taylor, totally and completely flattering her."
"Pinky, Pinker's Monique Le Julier dress is very pink."
"But fans don't often see the singer wearing too girlish clothes. The Disney Princess atmosphere is also very good on her."
"Tracy Ellis Ross, whose mission is to host this year's AMAS, has set a high standard on Stella McCartney's red carpet."



**Something goes wrong**
“See more below.”
“MORE: Paulina Gretzky Shares Incredible Bikini Pic Just 5 Months After Giving BirthIn February, Paulina, who is the daughter of hockey great Wayne Gretzky, revealed that she and Johnson were expecting their second child together with a precious pregnancy photo captioned, "Coming soon."”
“@paulinagretzky I love you."”
“"So many great things have happened especially Monday afternoon with our second son being born.”
“...the 32-year-old athlete gushed.”
“"What a great year it's been with the trophy!"”
“As the pro golfer prepares to defend his championship title, he reflected on the last year by sharing another Instagram photo holding his U.S Open trophy.”
“After the birth, Johnson flew from California to Wisconsin compete in this year's U.S. Open.”
“"I'm so thankful for my family and the new addition River Jones Johnson," he wrote.”
“READ: Paulina Gretzky Slams Fiance's Haters Over Olympics Controversy: 'He Didn't Work His A** Off for a Gold Medal'The mother of two also updated her Instagram bio to read, "Mama of Tatum & River," while Johnson posted the same hospital photo to his Instagram account.”


"See below."
"More information: Paulina Gretzky shared an incredible picture of a bikini five months after giving birth in February. Paulina, the daughter of hockey superstar Wayne Gretzky, revealed that she and Johnson are pregnant with a second child, as well as a precious pregnancy photo entitled "coming soon."
"@ Paulina Gretzky, I love you."
"So much has happened, especially on Monday afternoon when our second son was born."
“…… The 32 year old athlete gushed
"What a wonderful year with the trophy!"
"As the professional golfer prepared to defend his title, he shared a picture of holding the U.S. Open trophy on instagram to reflect on last year's situation."
"After he was born, Johnson flew from California to Wisconsin for this year's us open."
"I am very grateful to my family and to the new addition of river Jones Johnson," he wrote
"Interpretation: Paulina Gretzky criticizes her fiance's hatred of the Olympic controversy:" he didn't work hard for the gold medal. "The mother of two children also updated her instagram resume to" Tatum & River's mother, "while Johnson posted the same hospital photo to his instagram account



**Something goes wrong**
“"She wants like 100 babies, but I don't know if I can do that," he laughed.”
“Then he revealed Prinsloo wants even more than "a lot."”
“As a bonus treat for fans, the mom of two even included the first-ever glimpse of new daughter Gio Grace's face.”
“"My first baby holding OUR second baby," Prinsloo captioned a black-and-while shot of the "Voice" coach and Maroon 5 frontman with their 4-month-old cradled in his arms.”
“Father and daughter trade off big smiles in the sweet photo.”
“Prinsloo and Levine also have another daughter together, 21-month-old Dusty Rose.”
“"Our girls are so lucky to call you dad and I’m so lucky to have you as a husband a lover and a friend," she continued.”
“"We love you.”
“Life is better with you."”
“Adam Levine with wife Behati Prinsloo and daughter Dusty Rose, seen here after he was honored with a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame in Hollywood, California, on February 10, 2017.”


"She wants 100 children, but I don't know if I can," he said with a smile
Then he revealed that princlow wanted more than "a lot."
"As a bonus to fans, the mother of two even saw the face of her new daughter, GIO grace, for the first time."
"My first child is holding our second child," Prinsloo wrote in a black and white photo of voice coach and chestnut 5 team leader, their 4-month-old child in his arms
"In the sweet picture, father and daughter exchange bright smiles."
"Princlow and Levin have a daughter, 21 month old dusty Ross."
"Our daughter is lucky to call you dad, and I'm lucky to have husbands, lovers and friends like you," she continued
"We love you."
"Life is better with you."
"Adam Levine, his wife, behati Prinsloo and daughter, dusty rose, appeared here on February 10, 2017 after they won the title of Hollywood Walk of fame in Hollywood, California."



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Though Samantha plans to give birth in Los Angeles, where they also have a home, they will raise their new daughter primarily in Georgia, in the same house where they wed last February.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
““Both of our love and energy and magic and families are bonded forever because we’re going to have this child,” Gibson, 39, raved in a joint interview with his spouse.”
““It’s unbelievable.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Samantha, a 29-year-old social worker, learned she was pregnant with their daughter in late January, not long after they began trying to conceive.”
“Minutes after her positive first test — and before she could even plan out a surprise for her husband — Gibson arrived home, and they celebrated together.”
““It was me screaming and just being overly excited and just fired up about the news,” he says.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Image zoom Tyrese Gibson and wife Samantha in August 2017 | Credit: Paras Griffin/Getty ImagesFriends and family were equally enthusiastic.”
“… I’m just happy to be on the other side of it and have my daughter back home with us,” he says.”


Although Samantha plans to give birth in Los Angeles, where they also have a home, they will mainly raise their new daughter in Georgia, in the house where they married last February
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Our love, energy, magic and family are always connected because we want to have this child," Gibson, 39, told his spouse in a joint interview
"Unbelievable." Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Samantha, a 29 year old social worker, learned at the end of January that she was pregnant with their daughter, shortly after they started trying to conceive."
"A few minutes after her first positive test, before she had time to prepare a surprise for her husband, Gibson went home and they celebrated together."
"I screamed, just over excited, excited about the news," he said
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Tyris Gibson and his wife Samantha took a group photo in August 2017 | photo source: pas Griffin / Getty photo friends and family are equally enthusiastic."
"I'm happy to be on the other side and have my daughter come home with us," he said



**Something goes wrong**
“The whole thing is hilarious, and you can watch it in full below:The movie launches next Friday in cinemas around the world.”
“In his opinion, Reynolds should really apologize for a slew of movies he made before Deadpool.”
“Beckham accepts the apology with a huge twist.”
““I can’t wait to not watch Italy play the Netherlands,” he tells the soccer star, mentioning two countries that recently failed to qualify for this summer’s tournament.”
“The fact that he’s wearing what appears to be a Canadian soccer team shirt with the name Deadpool and number 2 on it is just glorious.”
“When all else fails, Ryan Reynolds, in full Deadpool gear and with a soccer t-shirt on top, offers Beckham tickets to the upcoming World Cup.”
“First it’s text messages, and when those don’t work, Deadpool himself comes to Beckham’s home.”
““It’s like he mouth-sexed a can of helium.”Beckham is watching that particular scene in the new clip when a deluge of Deadpool apologies assault him.”
““You ever heard David Beckham speak?” Deadpool says.”
“In the first Deadpool movie, Deadpool insults the former soccer player in one of the film’s hilarious scenes.”


"The whole thing is very funny. You can see the picture below: the movie will be shown in cinemas all over the world next Friday."
"In his opinion, Reynolds really should apologize for the series of films he made before his death."
"David accepted the apology, but there was a big turn."
"I can't wait not to see Italy and Holland," he told the football star, referring to two countries that recently failed to qualify for this summer's World Cup
"In fact, he seems to be wearing a Canadian football shirt with the words Deadpool and No. 2 on it. It's a great honor."
"When it all failed, Ryan Reynolds, wearing a full set of barrier free equipment and a football T-shirt, provided David with tickets for the upcoming World Cup
"The first is text messages. When they don't work, Depp will come to the Beckhams' house himself."
"It's like he's making love to a can of helium with his mouth." David is watching the scene in the new clip when a large number of death row inmates apologized to him
"Have you ever heard of David? "Dead pool said
"In the first death pool movie, death pool insulted a former football player in a funny scene in the movie."



**Something goes wrong**
“Mike Fleiss, Elan Gale, Bennett Graebner and Nicole Woods are the executive producers.”
“Hosted by Chris Harrison, "The Bachelorette" is a production of Next Entertainment in association with Warner Horizon Unscripted & Alternative Television.”
“...it's Becca Kufrin!”
“The most dramatic conclusion ever to "The Bachelor" abruptly ended Becca Kufrin's happily ever after with Arie Luyendyk Jr., but that's just the start for America's sweetheart as she is named the next Bachelorette for season 14 - premiering on MONDAY, MAY 28 on ABC!”
“The highly anticipated announcement was made on the live "The Bachelor: After the Final Rose" Special.”
“RELATED: Watch The Bachelor Finale now on ABC.com>>The gut-wrenching finish to Becca Kufrin's romance with Arie Luyendyk Jr. left Bachelor Nation speechless.”
“In a change of heart, Arie broke up with America's sweetheart just weeks after proposing to her – stealing her fairytale ending and her future.”
“Now, the humble fan favorite and girl next door from Minnesota returns for a second shot at love, starring on "The Bachelorette," when it premieres for its 14th season on MONDAY, MAY 28 (8:00-10:01 p.m. EDT), on The ABC Television Network, streaming and on demand.”
“The announcement was made on the live "The Bachelor: After the Final Rose" special.”
“SEE BECCA IN A DELETED SCENE FROM THE BACHELORWith the help of her family and friends, Becca was able to pick up the pieces and put the focus back on herself, moving forward with her life.”


"Mike fries, Elan Gail, Bennett grabner and Nicole woods are executive producers."
"Bachelor" by Chris Harrison is the next entertainment to work with Warner horizon screenless
“… I'm Becca Coughlin
The most dramatic ending in the history of bachelor abruptly ends the happy lives of Becca kufrin and Arie luyendyk Jr., but this is only the beginning of American sweetheart, because she is nominated as the next Bachelor in Season 14, which will premiere on ABC on Monday, May 28
The much anticipated news was announced in the live broadcast of the "Bachelor: after the last rose" special
Related report: let's see the ending of bachelor now ABC website > > the heartbreaking ending of the romantic story between Becca kuflynn and Ariel luyandik Jr. silences the bachelor country. "
"In order to change her mind, Ellie broke up with her a few weeks after proposing to American sweetheart - stealing her fairy tale ending and future."
"Now, the favorite girl next door from Minnesota is back, starring in bachelor, and will premiere Season 14 on ABC's streaming and on-demand programs on Monday, May 28 (8:00-10:01 p.m. EST)
"The news was announced in the live special" Bachelor: after the last rose. "
"In a deleted bachelor scene, with the help of family and friends, Becca picks up the pieces again, focuses on herself and continues her life."



**Something goes wrong**
“Rimmel Natural BronzerRimmel LondonSHOP NOWHeads up, Maria noticed there aren't too many waterproof bronzers out there, but she did manage to score this super affordable option!”
“4.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You'll have to find out in the video below, and make sure to watch until the very end to see what happens when Maria dunks her entire face into a bowl of water!”
“Sure, a bunch of makeup products out there claim to be waterproof, water-resistant or long-wearing, but can they actually do what they say?”
“Beauty Smartie Maria Gomez tested out some waterproof makeup products, which by the way, are all pretty affordable and can be found at your local drugstore.”
“...but this might help...”
“Although it is recommended to remove makeup prior to a sweaty workout to minimize pores from getting clogged non comedogenic makeup shouldn t clog the pores even if being worn while getting hot and sweaty It can be hard to break through the noise and find products that really work...”
“Dr. Garshick says that you can even wear waterproof makeup to workout.”


"Rimmel natural Bronzer Rimmel London shop now looks up. Maria notices that there isn't too much waterproof bronze outside, but she managed to get this super affordable choice!"
“4.”
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
This content was imported from {embedded name}
"You have to find the answer in the video below, and you have to see at the end what happens when Maria soaks her whole face in a bowl of water!"
"Of course, there are a lot of cosmetics that claim to be waterproof, waterproof or durable, but can they really do what they say?"
"Beauty guru Maria Gomez tested some waterproof cosmetics, which, by the way, are affordable and can be bought at local pharmacies."
“… But it might help... "
"Although it is suggested to remove make-up before sweating exercise to minimize pore clogging, non acne cosmetics should not clog pores. Even when wearing hot and sweating, it is difficult to break through the noise and find really effective products..."
"You can even exercise with waterproof cosmetics," says Dr. gahick



**Something goes wrong**
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“Viewers at the time also speculated on Twitter that it was a nod to the groom's late mother.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“...content is imported from Twitter...”
“There ll be a lot of things said written about Harry Meghan s wedding and rightly so but one of the stand outs for me was the empty seat right next to William for Princess Diana RoyalWedding HarryAndMegan PrincessDiana pic twitter com BuWbWRr9Rx Jason Reeves JaseReeves May 19 2018 This...”
“Getty ImagesRoyal fans got emotional over the tribute.”
“It was reserved for Prince Harry's late mother.”
“The supposed explanation?”


"This content was imported from twitter."
"At that time, the audience was still guessing on twitter that it was nodding to the groom's late mother."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
“… Import content from twitter... "
"There will be a lot of reports about Harry Megan's wedding, yes, but for me, the most prominent one is the empty seat next to Princess Diana's royal wedding, William. Harry andmegan princessdiana pic twitter com buwbwr9rx Jason Reeves jasereves May 19, 2018 this..."
"The fans of Getty Images Royal are filled with emotion."
"It's for Prince Harry's late mother."
"What explanation should it be?"



**Something goes wrong**
“I hope we continue having progressive conversations about inclusion and equality, and that the next generations sees themselves represented more diversely in the media!”It looks like Graham is a fan of the images—she shared them on her Instagram this morning.”
“This shoot, entitled “Ashley Graham Shows Her Colors,” was all about individuality, with Graham telling the book, “Individuality means feeling comfortable enough to be your authentic self.”
“This isn’t the first time the model’s gone topless for V. The beauty posed nude last May for a black-and-white photo shoot with Mario Sorrenti and corresponding interview with Tracee Ellis Ross.”
“The model shows off no shortage of color thanks to bold and fierce makeup by Maybelline’s global makeup artist Erin Parsons, and poses with standout accessories including a Fendi logo purse, Louis Vuitton earrings, and a “Monet” Jeff Koons x Louis Vuitton collaboration bag.”
“Ashley Graham is making a colorful splash in the latest issue of V Magazine in a pop art-inspired photo spread shot by Ben Hassett and styled by Anna Trevelyan.”
“She’s bright, she’s beautiful, and she’s…topless!”


"I hope that we will continue to have a progressive dialogue on inclusiveness and equality, and that the next generation will see a more diversified performance in the media! "It looks like Graham is a fan of the photos she shared on instagram this morning."
The photo, "Ashley Graham shows her colors," is about personality, in which Graham says, "personality means feeling comfortable enough to be who you are."
"It's not the first time a model has taken a V with her bare upper body. The beauty took a black-and-white photo with Mario sorrenti last May and was interviewed by Tracee Ellis Ross
"Thanks to the bold and fierce make-up of Erin Parsons, the global makeup artist of Maybelline, the models show a lot of color, and display outstanding accessories including the Fendi Logo Wallet, Louis Vuitton earrings and the" Monet "Jeff queens x Louis Vuitton cooperation bag."
"Ashley Graham has made a splash in the latest issue of V magazine, and this pop art inspired photo by Ben Hassett and Anna Trevelyan has been widely circulated."
"She's smart, she's beautiful, and Naked



**Something goes wrong**
“Here’s Nolan’s full post (and its votes):”
“What Nolan and Joy were suggesting was a sort of radical transparency that serves to distinguish online theories from actual spoilers with the perhaps idealistic notion that those who want to be spoiled can learn what happens and then protect the larger fan community with their knowledge of what s...”
“As part of a Reddit Ask Me Anything session, Nolan and Joy said that if certain requirements were fulfilled, the Westworld team would post a video spoiling the entire plot of the second season of their show, which returns on April 22.”
““If you guys agree, we’re going to post a video that lays out the plot (and twists and turns) of season 2,” Nolan and Joy wrote on Reddit.”
““Everything.”
“The whole sordid thing.”
“Up front.”
“That way the members of the community here who want the season spoiled for them can watch ahead, and then protect the rest of the community, and help to distinguish between what’s ‘theory’ and what’s spoiler.”The requirement: 1,000 “upvotes” — Reddit currency for popular posts.”
“This proposition came in the wake of the previous season, and preceding the final season, of HBO’s Game of Thrones, a show that has become a flashpoint when it comes to spoilers and how they affect television.”
“Both Westworld and Game of Thrones have massive and engaged fan followings who dissect every aspect of the show (including but not limited to their source material, episode and script leaks, theories, rumors, actor contracts, set photographs, etc.”


"This is Nolan's full position (and his vote):"
"What Nolan and joy suggest is a kind of radical transparency, which helps to distinguish the network theory from the actual saboteurs. Perhaps it is an idealistic idea, that is, those who want to be sabotaged can understand what happened, and then use their understanding of what to protect the larger fan group..."
"As part of the conference where reddit asked me anything, Nolan and joy said that if certain requirements were met, the Westworld team would release a video that would disrupt the entire plot of the second season of their return on April 22."
"If you agree, we will release a video showing the plot (and twists and turns) of season 2," Nolan and Joey wrote on reddit
"Everything."
"The whole dirty thing."
"In the front."
"In this way, those members of the community who want their season to be ruined can watch in advance, then protect other members of the community, and help to distinguish what is' theory 'from' disruption ' Requirements: 1000 "upvolumes" - reddit currency of popular posts
"This proposal was made before the last season of HBO's game of thrones, which has become a hot topic when it comes to spoilers and their impact on TV."
Both Western Hemisphere and game of Thrones have a large number of fans, who have analyzed all aspects of the play (including but not limited to their material, episode and script leakage, theory, rumors, actor contracts, scene photos, etc.)



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Guillermo del Toro’s 60s-set romantic fantasy The Shape of Water leads the way with 13 nominations.”
“Beatty replied: “The winner is Gone with the Wind.”Other confirmed presenters during this year’s telecast include Sandra Bullock, Lupita Nyong’o, Emily Blunt, Armie Hammer, Tiffany Haddish, Jodie Foster and Gal Gadot, while the ceremony will again be hosted by Jimmy Kimmel.”
“On Thursday evening, TMZ learned that the two were spotted rehearsing at the Dolby Theatre in Los Angeles, where Dunaway said “presenting is better the second time around”.”
“But Beatty and Dunaway, evidently, will get a second chance to announce the prestigious award.”
“This year, the Academy has streamlined its processes to prevent another mistake.”
“Then, producer Jordan Horowitz corrected the record, telling the the audience there had been a mistake and that Moonlight had won the award.”
“For several minutes the mistake went unaccounted for, as the cast of La La Land gave speeches on the stage.”
“The mistake was attributed to the accountants at PricewaterhouseCoopers, who mixed up the envelope for best actress, won by La La Land’s Emma Stone, with that of best picture.”
“When Beatty hesitated to announce the winner, visibly confused by the contents on the card, Dunaway read off La La Land as best picture.”
“Last year Beatty and Dunaway presented the night’s top honor to mark the 50th anniversary of Bonnie and Clyde.”


"Guillermo del Toro's romantic fantasies of the '60s, the shape of water, led with 13 nominations."
Biddy replied, "the winner goes with the wind." In this year's live TV show, other confirmed hosts include Sandra Bullock, Lupita Nyon, Emily Blunt, Amy hammer, Tiffany hadish, Judy foster and gal gado, and the award ceremony will again be hosted by Jimmy Kimmel
On Thursday night, TMZ learned that the two were found rehearsing at the Dolby theater in Los Angeles. Dunaway said, "the second performance is better."
"But it's clear that Beatty and Dunaway will have a second chance to announce this prestigious award."
"This year, the college streamlined its processes to prevent further mistakes."
"Then, producer Jordan Horowitz corrected the record and told the audience there was a mistake and moonlight won the award."
"For a few minutes, when the actors of" La Randy "gave a speech on stage, the mistake was not explained."
"The mistake was attributed to PwC's accountants, who confused the envelopes of the best actress award and the best picture award won by Emma stone of L.A. land."
"When Beattie hesitated to announce the winner and was obviously confused by the contents of the card, Dunaway declared" the land of Los Angeles "as the best picture."
"Last year, Betty and donnaway presented the night's highest honor for the 50th anniversary of Bonnie and Clyde."



**Something goes wrong**
“Thank you for understandingWell, if I can't get new Kanye West music, I will absolutely settle for more Kanye West family photos, so keep 'em coming, Kim!”
“I can t choose which photo is cuter Chicago and Kanye West having a precious moment together or the photo that Kim Kardashian posted of her with her three children North Saint and Chicago or Chi if you re trying...”
“I mean really fluffy stuff — puppies learning how to walk, epic marriage proposals, and literally anything to do with babies.”
“Fortunately, I have a celebrity family who truly understands my needs and is here to deliver.”
“I'm talking about Kim Kardashian and Kanye West and their adorable little family, obvi!”
“Every now and then, they take to social media to show us photos or videos of their growing family and, for that, I am eternally grateful.”
“And now, the world is #blessed with a photo of Kanye West kissing Chicago, and it is exactly what I needed to elevate my mood today.”
“Kanye West has definitely been stirring the pot recently with... well, pretty much everything.”
“But the one thing that has always remained constant is how much he clearly adores his children.”
“And on Tuesday, Nov. 13, Kim Kardashian shared the sweetest photo of the "Lift Yourself" rapper giving their 9-month-old daughter, Chicago, a kiss on Instagram.”


"Thank you for your understanding. Well, if I can't get the new Kanye West music, I will definitely be satisfied with more family photos of Kanye West, so keep them coming, Kim!"
"I can't choose which photo is cuter, Chicago and Kanye West have a precious moment together, or Kim Kardashian posted a photo of her with her three children, North saint and Chicago or pool if you're trying..."
"I'm talking about real furry things - Puppies learning to walk, epic proposals, anything to do with babies."
"Fortunately, I have a family of celebrities who really understand my needs and are here to help."
"I'm talking about Kim Kardashian and Kanye West, and their lovely little family, Obi!"
"From time to time, they show us pictures or videos of their growing families on social media, for which I am very grateful."
"Now, there is a picture of Kanye West kissing Chicago all over the world, which is exactly what I need to improve my mood today."
"Kanye West must have been using... Well, almost everything
"But one thing remains the same: how much he adores his children."
Kim Kardashian shared her sweetest picture on instagram on Tuesday, November 13, in which the self reliant rapper gave their 9-month-old daughter a kiss in Chicago



**Something goes wrong**
“Scroll down to see all the epic nods to the ‘90s sitcom.”
“The country crooner was all smiles and even sported a gold crown just like Green’s character during the Friends episode, “The One Where They All Turn Thirty.” And her newborn, Forrest Bradley Decker, even joined for the fun (and a feeding!)”
“James Decker — who welcomed her third child with husband Eric just ten days prior — appeared to embrace turning the big 3-0 surrounded by friends and family.”
“Jessie James Decker channeled her inner Rachel Green to celebrate her milestone 30th birthday on Thursday, April 12, with a Friends-themed party.”
“They’ll be there for her!”


"Scroll down to see all the epic praise for the '90s sitcom."
The country singer is smiling and even wearing a gold crown, just like green's role in friends, "they're almost 30 years old." Her newborn, Forrest Bradley Decker, even joined in (and feeding!) "
"Ten days ago, James Decker and her husband Eric ushered in her third child. He seemed to be embracing a 3-0 reversal surrounded by friends and family."
On Thursday, April 12, Jessie James Decker held a theme party with friends to celebrate her landmark 30th birthday
"They'll be there for her!"



**Something goes wrong**
““America’s Got Talent” airs Tuesdays at 8 p.m. on NBC.”
“Watch the video above.”
““I feel like I’m in a horror film right now!”Marie Antoinette Riana Graharani, known as The Sacred Riana, is an Indonesian magician and illusionist who won the second season of “Asia’s Got Talent” in 2017.”
“See Video: 'America's Got Talent': Olivia Munn Learns That Magic Is Real“Go away now!” Howie Mandel added.”
““I want this to end, right now,” Simon Cowell said.”
“A real person shatters through the chamber and stares at the judges, prompting them to call an end to the performance.”
“Naturally, Scary Spice is terrified, until Riana comes to take the doll from her and put her into the chamber.”
“See Video: 'America's Got Talent': 13-Year-Old Singer Stuns, Scores Howie Mandel's Golden BuzzerThe book comes out of the chamber with blood-smeared pages and the words: “I want to play with Mel B” sprawled on the last page.”
“Then, Riana shows an empty book and writes “Don’t You Want to Play?” on the cover with chalk, putting it back into the chamber.”
“A candle and a bell get put into a chamber, where the candle lights up.”


"America's got talent" is on NBC at 8 p.m. on Tuesday
"Watch the video above."
"I think I'm in a horror movie now! "Marie Antoinette Riana graharani, known as the sacred Riana, is an Indonesian magician and magician who won the second season of Asia's got talent in 2017."
"Watch the video: 'America has talent': Olivia Munn understands magic is real" go away! "Howie Mandel added
"I want to end it now," Simon Cowell said
"A real person broke into the court and stared at the judge, prompting them to announce the end of the show."
"Of course, the scary spice girl was scared until Liana took the doll from her and put her in the room."
"Watch the video: 'America's got talent': the 13-year-old singer is stunned, score Howie Mandel's golden buzzer. The book goes out of the room, blood stained pages and text:" I want to play with Mel B "spread out on the last page
Then Liana took out an empty book and said, "don't you want to play? "Put chalk on the cover and put it back in the room."
"A candle and a bell are put into a room where the candle is lit."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Irishman hits theaters in 2018.”
“They previously costarred in 2008’s Righteous Kill, 1995’s Heat and 1974’s The Godfather Part II.”
“This is the fourth time De Niro and Pacino have worked together.”
“He also wore a white shirt with a red tie.”
“Pacino was costumed in a grey trench coat with coordinating pants.”
“He added a brown tie with diagonal stripes.”
“Image zoom Credit: BACKGRIDImage zoom Robert De Niro | Credit: BACKGRIDIn addition to his platform shoes, De Niro also wore a royal blue trench coat over a white collared shirt and dark slacks.”
“I Heard You Paint Houses from which screenwriter Steven Zaillian adapted The Irishman s story...”
“The guy Sheeran was actually much taller about five six inches taller than me so the shoes were to show the relation to any of the other actors or characters that I m taller Author Charles Brandt detailed Sheeran s deathbed confession about Hoffa in the 2004 non fiction book...”
“De Niro confirmed that the height difference was the reason for the towering platforms on the Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon in April, saying they made the shoes to give him more inches in height.”


"The Irishman is on in 2018."
"They worked together in just killing in 2008, heat in 1995 and Godfather II in 1974."
"This is the fourth cooperation between De Niro and Pacino."
"He also wore a white shirt and a red tie."
"Pacino is wearing a grey windbreaker and a pair of trousers."
"He added a brown tie with diagonal stripes."
"Image zooming credit: backgrid image zooming credit: Robert De Niro | credit: backgrid in addition to his thick soled shoes, De Niro also wore a royal blue windbreaker, a white-collar shirt and a pair of dark trousers outside."
"I heard you were painting a house, and the screenwriter Steven zarian adapted the story of the Irish from it..."
"Sheeran is actually five to six inches taller than me, so this pair of shoes is to show his relationship with other actors or characters. I'm taller than him. In his 2004 nonfiction book, the author Charles Brandt described in detail Sheeran's confession to Hoffa before he died
"De Niro confirmed that the height difference was the reason for the towering platform in April's" Tonight Show "starring Jimmy Fallon. He said they made the shoes to give him more inches of height."



**Something goes wrong**
“Formulated with shea butter and camellia oil it will bring out the best of your curls and radiate shine and add volume to your curls instantly.”
“Type 3This curl defining and detangling mousse is a new favorite for curlies.”
“Type 3 cHere's the secret to the most magical twist out of your dreams!”
“It's packed with natural ingredients such as Honey, Shea Butter, and Avocado to keeps your curls hydrated.”
“This butter creme is the cure for dry hair and will leave your curls moisturized and softer than ever.”
“- Grace, 2aType 3This is a hydration sensation!”
“Used in soaking wet hair, scrunched til it was towel dried and scrunched in a bit more, then diffused until halfway dry and air dried the rest of the way."”
“I was really impressed.”
“Styling CreamsType 2"Amazing definition after using this product, probably the best I've seen in a very long time!”
“Ease of use and product distributionPackaging and product functionalityInnovationScentIngredientsIf you're on the search for a styler that will work for your curl pattern, check out our 2018 Editors' Choice award winners - and what we loved about them.”


"Made of shea butter and camellia oil, it can make your curly hair shine best and increase the volume of curly hair instantly."
"Type 3 this curl definition and de angled mousse is a new favorite of curl."
"Chery 3 is the most magical secret in your dream!"
It contains natural ingredients such as honey, shea butter and avocado to keep moisture in curly hair
"This cream is a great remedy for dry hair. It can make your curly hair more moist and softer than ever."
"Grace, it's a feeling of hydration!"
"It's used to wet hair, rub until the towel is dry, rub a little more, then spread to half dry, and air dry the rest."
"I'm really moved."
"Styling cream 2" amazing definition after using this product, may be the best I've seen for a long time
"Ease of use and product distribution packaging and product function innovation incentives if you are looking for a stylist with your curly pattern, please check out our 2018 editor's Choice Award winners and our love for them."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MailOnline contacted representatives for both Lindsay and Barron about the alleged incident but they have so far been unavailable for comment.”
“The Mean Girls star then deleted the post 30 minutes later.”
“Paris Hilton vows to make her brother Barron's attacker 'pay for what they did' following assault allegedly 'masterminded by Lindsay Lohan'After quietly simmering for years, the feud between Paris Hilton and Lindsay Lohan appears to have once again exploded.”
“Late on Saturday, the hotel heiress angrily stepped up in support of her brother Barron - who was allegedly beaten to a bloody pulp in Miami, Florida, by the Parent Trap star's friend - declaring the perpetrator will be made to 'pay'.”
“Paris may have been referring to Lohan, who Barr on believes 'masterminded' the attack which left him in hospital.”
“Thicker than water: Paris Hilton has vowed to make those involved in the alleged attack on her brother Barron, seen here together in Utah earlier this year, 'pay'Paris broke her silence about the alleged attack by posting a comment on Barron's Instagram page.”
“Pictured on TMZ, the 32-year-old wrote alongside on a picture of her younger sibling's battered face saying: 'They both will pay for what they did.”
“'No one f***s with my family and gets away with it!!'”
“The alleged aftermath Barron posted an image of the injuries he claims he received in the attack on Instagram Barron was assaulted on Friday allegedly at the direction of Lindsay who accused him of talking about her to her boyfriend while at a party held as part of the Maimi...”
“Art Basel event the previous evening...”


"Mailonline contacted representatives of Lindsay and Barron to comment on the allegation, but they are not available for comment at this time."
"The mean girl star deleted the post 30 minutes later."
"Paris Hilton vowed to make her brother Baron's attackers" pay for what they did. ". The attack is said to have been planned by Lindsay Lohan. After years of quiet brewing, the feud between Paris Hilton and Lindsay Lohan seems to break out again. "
"Late on Saturday, the heiress of the hotel angrily stood up in support of her brother, Baron, who was said to have been beaten to the core in Miami, Florida by a friend of the parent's trap star, and announced that the perpetrators would" pay the price. "
"Paris may be referring to Rohan. Baron thinks he" planned "the attack that led to his hospitalization."
"It's thicker than water: Paris Hilton vowed to" pay "a person she saw in Utah earlier this year who was suspected of assaulting her brother Baron, breaking her silence by commenting on Baron's instagram website."
"This picture was taken on TMZ. The 32 year old wrote next to the picture of her brother being beaten beyond recognition:" they will all pay for what they have done. "
"No one can be at large with my family!"
"The so-called aftercare Baron posted a picture of his injury when instagram was attacked. Baron was said to have been attacked on Friday at Lindsay's direction. Lindsay accused Baron of talking about her with her boyfriend at a party held as part of Maimi..."
"The Basel festival the night before..."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“DJ Khaled’s baby is winning Instagram:Read more from Yahoo Celebrity:”
““I wanted to use the shape of the bottle to represent and empower women.”Regardless of the bottle’s resemblance to an X-rated adult toy, the “offending” photo has since been deleted from Instagram.”
“We’re not just one note, or have one talent, or one personality,” she said.”
“All women, every single one of us, have this duality.”
““I wanted an object of feminine power.”
“News, one person wrote, “That is a vibrator, not perfume” while another asked, “Who approved this design?” Others on Instagram offered more candid responses, “Legit thought this was a dildo.”Herrera explained the inspiration behind the design.”
“According to E!”
“People on the Internet were quick to offer their thoughts and commented that the stiletto-shaped bottle resembled an adult sex toy.”
“While Kloss has a reputation for being one of the nicest women in the modeling industry, the bottle for the Good Girl fragrance she’s promoting is getting a different reaction.”
“Supermodel Karlie Kloss’ new fragrance ad for designer Carolina Herrera is attracting publicity — but for all the wrong reasons.”


"DJ Khalid's kids win instagram: read more from Yahoo celebrities:“
"I want to use the shape of the bottle to represent and empower women." Although the bottle is similar to an X-rated adult toy, the "offending" photo was later removed from instagram
"We're not just a note, or a talent, or a personality," she said
"All women, all of us, have this duality."
"I want a female power object."
One person wrote, "this is a vibrator, not a perfume." the other person asks, "who approved the design?" "Other people on instagram gave a more candid answer," legit said, referring to this as a penile. "Herrera explains the inspiration behind the design."
"According to e!"
"People on the Internet quickly expressed their opinions and commented that the bottles in the shape of stilettos are similar to adult sex toys."
"Although Close is one of the best women in the modeling world, she has got a different reaction from the good girl perfume bottle she sells."
"The new perfume advertisement designed by Karlie Kloss for designer Carolina Herrera (Carolina Herrera) is attracting public attention, but the reasons are all wrong," Carly Klaus said.



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Last summer, Jones also took to Twitter to express that no designer would dress her for the premiere of Ghostbusters, which the comedian starred in.”
“This also isn’t the first time the Saturday Night Live star has publicly expressed her concerns.”
“In 2015, the North Carolina Attorney General’s office investigated the luxury hotel chain’s Charlotte location for potentially discriminating against Black people by adding a 15 percent surcharge to customers bills during a CIAA conference.”
“!”The Ritz-Carlton’s official Twitter account expressed their dismay at Jones’ tweet, replying with the following response:This isn’t the first time that the Ritz-Carlton has been accused of discrimination.”
“THEY DONT LIKE BLACK PEOPLE!”
““But then had THE WORST STAY @RitzCarlton DO NOT STAY THERE!!”
““Wow was such a great night at the BET awards,” she posted.”
“But something went awry, as Jones took to her Twitter yesterday to express her anger.”
“Jones, who hosted the 2017 BET Awards on Sunday, stayed at the luxury hotel in Los Angeles after the show.”
“Paras Griffin/BET17Comedian Leslie Jones isn’t a fan of The Ritz-Carlton, and she’s making sure everyone is aware of it.”


Last summer, Jones tweeted that no designer would dress her for the premiere of ghost killer, starring the comedian
"It's not the first time the live star on Saturday night has publicly expressed his concerns," he said
"In 2015, the attorney general's office of North Carolina investigated the location of the luxury hotel chain in Charlotte, and during the CIAA meeting, the hotel increased a 15% surcharge on its customers' bills, which may discriminate against blacks."
"! Ritz Carlton's official twitter account was disappointed with Jones' tweet and replied as follows: This is not the first time Ritz Carlton has been accused of discrimination
"They don't like black people!"
"But the worst one was @ Ritz Carlton. Don't stay there!"
"Wow, it was a wonderful night at the lottery," she posted
"But something's wrong, because Jones tweeted her anger yesterday."
"Jones hosted the 2017 lottery awards on Sunday and stayed at a luxury hotel in Los Angeles after the show."
"Paras Griffin / Betty 17 comedian Leslie Jones is not a fan of Ritz Carlton and is making sure everyone is aware of that."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Plus, coming home was soooo much fun — I acted like I hadn’t seen her in forever!””
““On my first day back, True was perfect while I was gone,” she wrote on her website.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Khloé Kardashian Opens Up About Pregnancy Struggles During First Trimester on ‘KUWTK’But as she’s finding out, there are bright spots in being away from her little one.”
“And today I’m very anxious,” she said earlier this month.”
““I’ve been thinking about the 6th, the 6th, the 6th, oh my God, I have to start work on the 6th and I’ve been getting just anxious about it.”
“Leading up to her first day back at work, she shared a series of Snapchat videos on July 5 where she opened up about her anxiety.”
“It’s like riding a bike!” Kardashian wrote.”
“...through the motions everything fell into place...”
“Image zoom Kardashian opened up about getting back to work post maternity leave on her website and app saying it has definitely caused me a little anxiety Image zoom Credit Khloe Kardashian Instagram The days leading up to my very first day back were tough but once I started going...”
“She let her new ring nameplate shine and teamed it with thin bands covered in delicate pavé crystals.”


"Besides, it's so fun to go home - I haven't seen her for a long time!"
"On the first day I came back, when I was away, it was perfect," she wrote on her website
"Related video: in kuwtk, Kardashian tells about her struggle in the first three months of pregnancy, but as she found out, there are many bright spots to leave her little daughter."
"I'm very anxious today," she said earlier this month
"I've been thinking about the 6th, the 6th, the 6th, my God, I'm going to start work on the 6th, and I'm starting to worry."
"Before her first day at work, she shared a series of snapchat videos on July 5, revealing her anxiety."
"It's like riding a bicycle! "Kardashian wrote."
“… Through these movements, everything is in place... "
"Image zoom Kardashian announced on her website and app that she had returned to work after maternity leave. She said that it must have made me a little anxious. Image zoom credit Khloe Kardashian instagram it was hard before my first day back, but once I started to leave..."
"She makes her new ring's name plate sparkle and match it with a ribbon covered with delicate paville crystal."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So, it’s definitely a harder experience than I anticipated just in the control area.””
““What if they weren’t a fan of me or my husband?” she said.”
“Kardashian revealed that she did not extend an invitation to the woman, who’s been kept out of the public eye, during an appearance on “The Real” to promote her new line of fragrances on Thursday.”
““I did not,” Kardashian explained when host Loni Love asked whether she invited the surrogate to the party.”
“I introduced her to my family earlier that day and I just thought I don t know it was a weird decision to have to make She continued Of course I would have wanted her to be there and be...”
“...a part of it but I hadn t really gone that far in explaining it to my kids yet Kardashian already shares two children with West daughter North 4 and Saint 2 whom she felt weren t ready to understand...”
“...the surrogate s role...”
““I think I have to explain it to my kids first, and figure out how I’m going to explain it to them,” she said.”
“So I have to figure that out first before they really see and then if we re celebrating you know her I just wanted to celebrate the baby The beauty mogul however had nothing but praiseworthy things to say about...”
“...the surrogate who she revealed didn t know that she was carrying the celebrity offspring at first...”


"So the experience in the control area must have been harder than I expected."
"What if they're not fans of me or my husband? "She said
"Kardashian revealed that she did not send an invitation to the lady, and she was kept out of public view when she advertised her new series of perfume on Thursday's" reality "program.
"I didn't," Kardashian explained when host Ronnie Love asked her if she would invite a surrogate mother to the party
"I introduced her to my family earlier that day. I just felt that I didn't know it was a strange decision to let her continue. Of course, I would like her to be there and be there..."
“… This is part of it, but I didn't explain it to my children so thoroughly, but Kardashian has shared two children with her daughter, north 4 and Saint 2, and she doesn't think they are ready to understand... "
“… The role of the agent... "
"I think I have to explain to the children first and figure out how to explain to them," she said
"So I have to make it clear before they really see it, and then if we're celebrating that you know her, I just want to celebrate the baby, but the beauty tycoon says nothing but praises..."
“…… She revealed that the surrogate mother didn't know at first that she was pregnant with the offspring of a celebrity.... "



**Something goes wrong**
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Switch to Latino Español Feedback Help en Choose a language United States English en United States español es MLB Standings Scores Schedule Player Stats Teams Team Stats Fantasy Video Send...”
“English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية”
“Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines...”
“...msn back to msn home sports powered by Microsoft News Skip To Navigation Skip To Content Sign in Change language content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
"MSN feedback, we thank you for your comments..."
At present, in each of 1575 chechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechecheche Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut
"English polskapolski portugal portuguese Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomi Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rk è e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States English American Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ≤ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ P ιιιι P Чхישש㪞ביתاااااالبببببةااا
"Germany - Germany - Spain - France - France - India - English - India - India - India - India - New Zealand - Norway - Norway - Bokmal international version of the ú sterreich Deutsch per ú Espa? Ol Philippines..."
“… MSN returns MSN home Sports supported by Microsoft News jump to navigation jump to content login change language content Africa French French Latin America Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canada English Canada French French Cesc Republic Chile Spanish "Colombia Spain Denmark “



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So far, the kids are giving Kourtney good reports about Sofia.”“Sofia has shown over and over again that she is willing to stay with Scott even when things are not great — but Scott is doing well lately,” added the insider.”
““This is the first time I’ve ever been with anybody other than Kourtney [Kardashian], so it’s definitely different, but it’s been a really good thing for me,” Disick said on the Aug. 5 episode.”
“Appearing on Australian talk show The Morning Show on Thursday, Richie, 20, briefly touched on her boyfriend Disick, 35, revealing that the two are “very happy.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’m very happy,” she said.”
“When asked whether she’s reluctant to discuss her personal relationships, either with Disick or with her father Lionel Richie, the model said she’s used to living her life in the public eye.”
““I mean, I can’t deny the fact that that’s my life — by the way, that’s been my life forever,” she said.”
““It’s nothing new to me.”
“So I m not upset that I have to answer these questions but there are moments that I have where I m like I want to be my own person I want to stand as my own person I think that s actually what drives me to work and do...”
“...my own thing and want to make my own mark she continued...”
““Because I want to be seen as my own person — even though I have all these amazing people in my life that I love so much.”Richie and Scott have been officially dating since last September after initially sparking romance rumors in spring 2017.”


"So far, the kids have been good at Courtney's coverage of Sofia." "Sophia has repeatedly shown that she would like to stay with Scott even if things don't go well - but Scott has been doing well recently," the person familiar with the matter added
"It's the first time I've been with someone other than kurtany, so it's definitely different, but it's really a good thing for me," Disick said on the August 5 show
On Thursday, 20-year-old Ritchie briefly talked about her 35 year old boyfriend, dirick, on the Australian talk show the morning show and revealed that they were "very happy.". She can get push notification through news, feature, etc
"I'm happy," she said
"When asked if she was reluctant to discuss her personal relationship, whether with Disick or with her father Lionel Ritchie, the model said she was used to living in public."
"I mean, I can't deny that this is my life - by the way, this is my life forever," she said
"It's nothing new to me."
"So I'm not sad that I have to answer these questions, but there are moments when I think I want to be my own person, I want to be my own person, and I think that's actually what drives me to work and do things..."
“… My own things, want to be my own mark, she continued
"Because I want to be seen as my own person - even though there are so many amazing people in my life that I love so much." Ritchie and Scott started dating in September last year, initially sparking romantic rumors in the spring of 2017



**Something goes wrong**
“I will not allow my tongue to be cut.””
“They cut our tongues so we couldn’t communicate to each other.”
“Jimmy Kimmel shared his two cents about Kanye West’s controversial TMZ interview during the Tuesday, May 1, episode of Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“For whatever reason Kanye felt the need to spend a full hour on TMZ Live today to defend his love for Donald Trump and to go off on a tangent not seen since the glory days of Gary Busey on Celebrity Rehab he joked after showing a clip of the...”
“...rapper s admission that he was addicted to opioids after having liposuction in 2016”
“West, 40, recounted upping his dosage from two pills a day to seven following a stint in the hospital.”
“The late night host suggested Maybe you should be taking eight The Yeezy designer went on to compare TMZ to a hospital at which point Kimmel said Kim it s time to come get your husband The comedian 50 tried to reason with West Here s the thing though this...”
“...job doing this show every night is hard enough...”
“Keeping up with the White House on a daily basis is exhausting.”
“I can’t handle Donald Trump and Kanye West at the same time.”


"I won't let my tongue be cut."
"They cut our tongues, so we can't talk to each other."
"On Tuesday, May 1, Jimmy Kimmel shared his two cents on Kanye West's controversial TMZ interview on the live show
"For whatever reason, Kanye feels it's necessary to spend an hour on TMZ live today defending his love for Donald Trump, taking a tangent never seen since Gary busey's brilliant years at the celebrity rehabilitation center. After playing a video, he joked that..."
“… Rapper admits he became addicted to opioids after liposuction in 2016
West, 40, recalled that after working in the hospital for some time, he increased the dose from two tablets a day to seven tablets
"The late night host suggested that maybe you should take 8 tablets. Yeezy designer then compared TMZ to a hospital. At this time, Kimmel said that it's time for Kim to go to your husband. Comedian 50 tried to reason with West, but the thing is like this..."
“… It's hard enough to do this show every night... "
"It's tiring to keep up with the white house every day."
"I can't deal with Donald Trump and Kanye West at the same time."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bless.”
“Hall told hosts of the Morning Show:There was a time last year—I don’t know if I’m supposed to say anything—she was dating someone.”
“...a happy one...”
“Appearing on radio program The Kidd Kraddick Morning Show, Hall said that one particular ex was clearly so bad for Swift that she was physically affected by it.”
“Eagle-eyed Swift fans, who all seem to have detailed reference timelines memorised for emergencies just like this one, appear to think that the ex in question is British actor Tom Hiddleston.”
“Swift dated Hiddleston briefly but seriously (apparently) in 2016, and they broke up in September, which would put them together on the timeline at the right point for Hall to be referencing the relationship.”
“While some speculated that the three month romance was a publicity stunt mostly because of that weird I 3 T S singlet Hiddles was spotted wearing it seems like it was real enough to effect some changes in Swift not...”
“...positive ones...”
“I’d actually never met this person, but I could I could just tell every time I would talk to her, she would hunch over.”
“Aww.”


"God bless you."
Hall told the morning show host, "there was a time last year - I don't know if I should say something, she was dating someone."
“… A happy person... "
Hall told the radio show "Kidd Craddock morning show" that an ex girlfriend was obviously so bad for swift that she was physically affected
"The sharp eyed swift fans seem to have a detailed reference schedule in case of emergency. Just like this time, they seem to think that the former problem is British actor Tom sidleston."
"Swift dated sidleston briefly but seriously (apparently) in 2016, and they broke up in September, which will put them together on the timeline, just when hall mentioned the relationship."
"Although some people speculate that the three-month romance is a publicity stunt, mainly because the strange I 3ts bachelor was found wearing it seems to be real enough to influence some changes in swift is not..."
“… Positive... "
"I've never met this person before, but I can tell her that every time I talk to her, she's hunched."
"Ah."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’ve realized that I need to start having confidence in my relationship with John and that he accepts me for all my faults,” she told the camera.”
“...said she did feel bad she didn t tell Cena...”
“Her family were not happy, especially Colace, who wondered why Bella didn’t think she could come to her.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“It’s crazy ’cause John doesn’t even know and here we talk about marriage and we never bring it up.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
““I tried to forget about it but now it’s starting to come up, and I figured you guys have to hear from me before you hear from anyone else.”
““Even when I started walking down the aisle, I knew this was a huge mistake and how can I get out of it and I couldn’t,” she recalled.”
“We drove to Vegas, did it.”The union was something Bella regretted from the beginning.”
““Basically we got married by Elvis.”
“And got divorced at 23, to my high school sweetheart,” Bella said.”


"I realized that I needed to start to have confidence in my relationship with John, who accepted all my shortcomings," she told the camera
“… She said she was really sad that she didn't tell Senna... "
"Her family are not happy, especially koras, and she wants to know why Bella thinks she can't come to her."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"It's crazy because John doesn't even know that we talk about marriage here, but we never mention it." Want to know the latest news about people? "
"I tried to forget about it, but now it's starting to appear, and I think you have to hear from me first, and then from others."
"Even if I started walking down the aisle, I knew it was a huge mistake and how I could get rid of it, I couldn't," she recalled
"We drove to Vegas and did it." Bella felt sorry for the union from the beginning
"Basically we were married by Elvis."
"When I was 23, I divorced my high school sweetheart," Bella said



**Something goes wrong**
“C and Brad imir Pitt en Watch the full segment below Brad Pitt Big Questions With Even Bigger Stars...”
“Stephen replied I m not sure if numbers are the underlying reality but one thing is absolutely true You re a solid eight Brad also poked fun at some of his biggest films as he and Stephen tried to make each other laugh with silly nicknames like Colby Cheese Stevie...”
“PHOTOS: Check out the latest pics of Brad Pitt“Do you think mathematics are the underlying structure of the universe, or did we just invent it?” Brad pondered.”
“After making a joke that he hadn’t “been out in a while,” the 53-year-old War Machine actor laid back on the blanket with Stephen, 53, as they asked each other some of life’s deep, philosophical questions.”
“Brad Pitt made a rare late night appearance on last night’s (May 16) episode of the Late Show With Stephen Colbert, and participated in another hilarious installment of “Big Questions With Even Bigger Stars“!”


"C and Brad Emile Pitt are watching the full footage of Brad Pitt below, and there are bigger stars' big problems..."
"Stephen replied that I'm not sure whether the numbers are potential reality, but one thing is absolutely right, you're a solid eight Brad also teased some of his biggest movies because he and Stephen tried to make each other laugh at silly nicknames like Colby cheese Steve..."
"Photos: look at the latest photos of Brad Pitt." do you think mathematics is the basic structure of the universe, or did we just invent it? "Brad thought
After joking that he "hasn't been out for a while," the 53 year old war machine actor and 53 year old Stephen lie on blankets and ask each other some profound philosophical questions about life
"Brad Pitt made a rare late night appearance on the evening show with Stephen Colbert last night (May 16) and was involved in another hilarious" big problem with bigger stars "!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Tennon’s recent TV credits include roles on “Criminal Minds,” “Rizzoli & Isles” and “The Closer.” He joins a growing list of “HTGAWM” guest stars, one that includes Jimmy Smits as a “prominent figure in Annalise’s life.”The Shondaland drama premieres Thursday, Sept. 28 at 10/9c.”
“No further details about Tennon’s role, including his character’s name, are available.”
“Julius Tennon, the real-life husband of “How to Get Away With Murder’s” leading lady, will guest-star in the ABC drama’s upcoming fourth season, TVLine has learned.”
“...know murder...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Someone very close to Viola Davis is getting snared in her character s ever growing web of secrets lies and you...”


"Tanon's recent TV works include characters in criminal psychology, Rizzoli and the island and the closer man. He's joined a growing number of "htgawm" guest stars, including Jimi Smitz, who is "an outstanding character in annalis's life." The show will premiere at 10 / 9 degrees Celsius on Thursday, September 28
"There are no more details about tannon's role, including his character's name."
Tvline has learned that Julius tannon, the real husband of "how to escape murder," will guest star in the upcoming fourth season of ABC TV series
“… I don't know about murder... "
"Click to send this email to a friend to open in a new window click to share on Twitter to open in a new window click to share on Facebook to open in a new window a person close to Viola Davis is trapped by her role's growing web of secrets and lies, and you..."



**Something goes wrong**
“They would be remiss to leave out potential memories of her son, seeing as his life was so abruptly snuffed out, but we’re still interested in seeing how Skarsgård factors into things when the new season premieres in 2019.”
“I might have helped Meryl Streep with her acting… Not help, but just give her little pointers, fine tune it a bit.”Since Streep is playing Skarsgård’s character’s mother, Mary Louise Wright, it’s possible he will return to Big Little Lies season two in flashback scenes.”
“In fact, he recently appeared in some season two photos taken on set, and when he was asked about it during an appearance on The Tonight Show with Jimmy Fallon, he took time to address it — sort of.”
“More: Reese Witherspoon & Nicole Kidman May Have Dropped Some BLL Season 2 CluesDuring his appearance Thursday on The Tonight Show, Skarsgård was very coy about what he was doing on set as well as his funny history with Big Little Lies season two star Meryl Streep.”
““I was on set, yes.”
“I can’t disclose what I did on set,” Skarsgård told Fallon.”
““Maybe I was acting.”
“I might have been just moral support.”
“I might have just made coffee for the ladies.”
“Or maybe the show will take a supernatural turn and bring him back as a vengeful ghost.”


"Considering that their son's life has been so suddenly strangled, they will neglect the potential memory of their son, but we are still interested in how scarsgarde is integrated into the new season's premiere in 2019."
"I might have helped Meryl Streep with her acting I can't help, but just give her some advice and fine tune it. " As Streep plays Mary Louis Wright, the mother of scasgold, he is likely to return to the second season of little lies in the flashback scene
"In fact, he recently appeared in some of the second season's set photos, and when asked this question when he appeared on the tonight show with Jimmy Fallon, he took the time to speak - a bit like that."
"More: Reese Witherspoon and Nicole Kidman may have lost some of Bll's season 2 clubs on Thursday at the tonight show, and scasgold is shy about his performance on the set and his comic history with little lies Season 2 star Meryl Streep."
"I'm on set, yes."
"I can't reveal what I did on set," scasgold told Fallon
"Maybe I'm acting."
"I may be just a spiritual support."
"I may have just made coffee for the ladies."
"Or there will be a supernatural transformation in the play, bringing him back to the ghost of revenge."



**Something goes wrong**
“I definitely feel that in my life.”advertisementPutting more women on screen is a Hello Sunshine mandate.”
“Now it’s, ‘Yeah, got it.’ ” At the same time, she says, “a lot of us are having to step up into leadership positions that we didn’t know we were capable of.”
““And I also hope you will choose to make some of that trouble on behalf of women.” Fluorescent signs at the back of the room illuminate a five-word ethos: optimism, humor, curiosity, honesty, generosity.”
““I hope that you will find some way to break the rules and make a little trouble out there,” reads one, a line from Nora Ephron’s 1996 commencement address at Wellesley College.”
“Sheets of paper with typewritten words to live by, tacked to a wall, gently rustle every time the front door opens.”
“Vintage typewriters and hundreds of books make plain the company’s abiding passions: stories and the people who tell them.”
“The loft-like interior, with exposed wooden beams and pipes, is cheerfully decorated by Crate & Barrel (Witherspoon collaborates with the retailer).”
“For all the company’s digital ambition, Hello Sunshine’s Santa Monica, California, headquarters have an old-fashioned feel.”
“But Witherspoon is also laying the foundation for a direct-to-consumer brand, one that is already beginning to speak to women through a website, social media, YouTube and Facebook videos, audiobooks, podcasts, and newsletters—whichever platform she and Hello Sunshine execs think best honors the story being told.”
“She and her team currently have shows in development at Hulu, NBC, and Apple TV (which has partnered on three projects, one rumored to be the biggest deal in history for a straight-to-series show), as well as a film at TriStar/Sony Pictures.”


"I do feel that way in my life." Advertising to make more women appear on the screen is a good sunshine task
"Now it's" yes, I see. " At the same time, she said, "a lot of us have to go to leadership positions that we don't know we are capable of."
"I also hope you can choose to make some trouble for women." The fluorescent sign at the back of the room lights up five words: optimism, humor, curiosity, honesty and generosity
"I hope you can find some ways to break the rules and make some small troubles there," Nora Efron wrote at Wellesley College's graduation ceremony in 1996
A piece of paper pasted on the wall, on which is written the handwriting of life. Whenever the front door is opened, it will rustle gently
"The old typewriter and hundreds of books are a clear demonstration of the company's consistent passion: the story and the storyteller."
"Loft like interior, exposed timber beams and pipes, decorated with crates and barrels (Witherspoon works with retailers)."
"Despite the company's digital ambitions, hello sunshine's headquarters in Santa Monica, California, gives an old-fashioned feel."
"But Witherspoon has also laid the foundation for a direct consumer oriented brand that has started talking to women through websites, social media, youtube and Facebook videos, audiobooks, podcasts and newsletters, and no matter which platform she and hello sun excel have, she thinks the story is the most praiseworthy."
"She and her team currently have programs under development at Hulu, NBC and Apple TV (which has worked on three projects, one of which is said to be the largest direct series deal in History), as well as a film at Samsung / Sony Pictures."



**Something goes wrong**
“I thank them for their patience and grace.”Details from the latest accuserThe New York Times reports that one of the two additional women who accused Lauer of sexual misconduct had started as a producer for the Today show in the late 1990s.”
“I am blessed to be surrounded by the people I love.”
“We are deeply saddened by this turn of events.”
“Our highest priority is to create a workplace environment where everyone feels safe and protected, and to ensure that any actions that run counter to our core values are met with consequences, no matter who the offender.”
“While it is the first complaint about his behavior in the over twenty years he’s been at NBC News, we were also presented with reason to believe this may not have been an isolated incident.”
“As a result, we’ve decided to terminate his employment.”
“It represented, after serious review, a clear violation of our company’s standards.”
“...in the workplace by Matt Lauer...”
“NBC News chairman Andy Lack sent out the following memo to staff which was then read by Savannah Guthrie and Hoda Kotb who stepped in as a substitute host on the Today show Dear Colleagues On Monday night we received a detailed complaint from a colleague about inappropriate sexual behavior...”
“The staff of the Today show only learned that Lauer was being fired at about 4am, shortly before making the official announcement on air at 7am local time Wednesday.”


"I thank them for their patience and grace." Details from the latest accusations the New York Times reported that one of the two other women accused Raul of sexual misconduct began working as a producer of the today show in the late 1990s
"I'm lucky to be surrounded by people I love."
"We are deeply saddened by the change of events."
"Our top priority is to create a work environment where everyone feels safe and protected, and to ensure that any violation of our core values will be affected by the consequences, no matter who the criminal is."
"Although this is the first time he has complained about his behavior in more than 20 years of working on NBC news, we have reason to believe that this may not be an isolated incident."
"So we decided to terminate his employment."
"After careful examination, it clearly violates our company's standards."
“… In the workplace by Matt Raul... "
"NBC News chairman Andy Lacker sent the following memo to the staff, and Savannah Guthrie and Hoda Kotb read the memo later. They said on today show," dear colleagues, on Monday night, we received a detailed complaint from a colleague about improper sexual behavior... "
"Today's show" staff in the local time on Wednesday 7 am officially announced the dismissal of Raul, just know Raul was fired around 4 am



**Something goes wrong**
“Yeah, she will.” And then, referencing an oft-quoted barb from Ice Cube’s Friday movie:“Bye, Felicia.””
“Moments after the interview ended, a skeptical Robin Roberts said on-air: “She said she has a story to tell, and I’m sure she’ll be selling that story.”
“I can tell my story it is a profound story that I know the world will want to hear Not everyone bought Omarosa s sincerity in seeking to capitalize upon her short lived White House career...”
“As the only African American woman in this White House as a senior staff and assistant to the president I have seen things that have made me uncomfortable she explained that have upset me that have affected me deeply and emotionally that has affected my community and people and when...”
“...to write a tell all on her time with Team Trump...”
“People had problems with my 14 year relationship with this president but I ve always been loyal to him straightforward and I ve provided him with the support that he s needed throughout this year Despite that professed loyalty Manigault Newman ever the savvy ex Apprentice contestant hinted she plans...”
“...why her ex colleagues might have disliked her...”
“Speaking with GMA host Michael Strahan Omarosa disputed the notion she was fired of course and insisted that all stories about her dramatic exit come from one person who has a personal vendetta against me I had more access than most and people had problems with that she said of...”
“Her departure effectively marks the end of a political relationship that included Omarosa being “the most despised” person in a drama-riddled White House, despite her being among Trump’s most shameless boosters (“Every critic, every detractor, will have to bow down to President Trump,” she’s infamously said).”
“Omarosa’s tenure there lasted less than a year, and as The Daily Beast reported on Wednesday, she allegedly attempted to “storm the [White House] residence” to confront her only ally—the president—after being cut loose by chief-of-staff John Kelly.”


"Yes, she will." Then, it quoted a sentence often quoted in the ice cube movie on Friday: "goodbye, Felicia."
Shortly after the interview, a skeptical Robin Roberts said on the radio: "she said she had a story to tell and I'm sure she'll sell it."
"I can tell my story. It's a profound story. I know the world wants to hear it. Not everyone believes in Omarosa's sincerity and hopes to make use of her short white house career..."
"As the only African American woman in the White House who serves as a senior staff member and assistant to the president, I saw things that made me uncomfortable. She explained that these things made me feel uneasy, had a profound impact on me, had an impact on my community and people, when..."
“… Write a talk about her and the trump team... "
"People have opinions about my 14 year relationship with the president, but I have always been loyal to him and provided him with the support he needed during this year, even though the shrewd former apprentice hinted at his plan..."
“… Why might her former colleagues not like her... "
"In an interview with GMA host Michael Strahan Omarosa, she objected to her dismissal and insisted that all the stories about her dramatic departure came from a person who had personal grudges with me, I had more opportunities to contact her than most people, and people had problems with what she said..."
"Her departure actually marks the end of a political relationship in which Omarosa is a" most despised "person in the dramatic White House, even though she is one of Trump's most shameless supporters (she famously says that every critic and every slander must bow to President trump)
"Omarosa has been there for less than a year, and as the Daily Beast reported on Wednesday, she is said to have tried to" rush into the [white house] residence "and confront her only ally, the president, after being terminated by chief of staff John Kelly."



**Something goes wrong**
“The tour is scheduled to begin in June in Germany and then stop in nine more European countries before moving to the United States.”
“In November, Shakira canceled the first concerts to promote her 11th album, El Dorado, for what she said were medical reasons.”
“If the probe finds wrongdoing, Shakira would join a list of celebrities that have been in trouble with Spanish tax authorities, including footballers Lionel Messi and Cristiano Ronaldo.”
““It’s public knowledge that this is not the case,” Company told The Associated Press.”
“El Confidencial, citing papers it obtained from offshore services providers, reported that she listed the Bahamas as her official residence until 2015.”
“Shakira and Piqué’s relationship dates back to 2011, when Shakira started frequenting Barcelona.”
“The documents obtained by German daily Sueddeutsche Zeitung and investigated by Spanish news website El Confidencial showed that in 2009 Shakira had relocated her intellectual property rights and brands to a company based in Malta, the tiny European Union nation that has faced allegations of being a tax heaven.”
“Shakira was named in the “Paradise Papers” leaks that detailed the offshore tax arrangements of numerous high-profile individuals, including musical celebrities like Madonna and U2’s Bono.”
“Forastier declined to disclose any details.”
“Anna Forastier, a spokeswoman for auditing firm PwC, said the company has been hired by Shakira for the investigation.”


"The tour is planned to start in Germany in June and then stop in nine other European countries before heading to the United States."
In November, Shakira canceled the first concert of her 11th album, El Dorado, because she said it was for medical reasons
"If the investigation finds misconduct, Shakira will be added to the list of celebrities in trouble with the Spanish tax authorities, including footballers Lionel Messi and Ronaldo."
"It's public knowledge, it's not like that," the company told the associated press
"El confidential, citing documents obtained from offshore service providers, reported that she listed the Bahamas as her official residence until 2015."
"The relationship between Shakira and pique dates back to 2011, when Shakira began to frequent Barcelona."
"According to documents obtained by German daily Sueddeutsche Zeitung and documents investigated by Spanish news website El confidential, Shakira transferred its intellectual property and brand to a company headquartered in Malta in 2009, which is a small EU country and has faced accusations of tax haven."
Shakira is leaking detailed overseas tax arrangements in the "Paradise file" by many celebrities, including Madonna and U2's Bono music celebrities
"Faustier declined to give any details."
Anna Forestier, a spokesman for audit firm PwC, said Shakira had hired PwC to investigate



**Something goes wrong**
“...resort built to honor Marlon Brando, who famously frequented the atoll.”
“Pippa and James are said to be staying at The Brando, an exclusive (and pricey!)”
“The lovebirds are expected to kick back in wedded bliss in the Pacific Islands, where they'll be staying on Tetiaroa, a two-and-a-half square mile necklace of coral islets surrounding a lagoon.”
“News, "and people around them were definitely staring and wondering if it was really Pippa."”
“"They were happy but tired," an onlooker told E!”
“Meanwhile, Pippa and husband James Matthews were photographed Sunday evening at Los Angeles International Airport en route to their honeymoon.”
“Middleton also starred in newly-released PSA highlighting the importance of Children's Hospice Week.”
“Kate even offered to take a bite out of a cherry tomato that dropped on the ground, as she made her way through the blooms with BBC Radio 2 host Chris Evans.”
“During her visit, she got up close and personal with the exhibits, stopping to admire the "William and Catherine Rose," which was named in honor of her 2011 nuptials to Prince William.”
“Middleton shined in a dark green floral frock by Rochas, nude pumps and an elegant updo.”


“…… A resort built in memory of Marlon Brando, who is known for his frequent visits to the atolls. "
"Pippa and James are said to live in Brando, a specialty store (and expensive!)"
"The couple are expected to have a happy wedding on a Pacific island, where they will live in Tetiaroa, two and a half square miles of coral island necklaces around an atoll lake."
"News", people around must be staring at, want to know if it's really Pippa
"They're happy, but tired," one bystander told e! "
Meanwhile, Pippa and her husband, James Matthews, were photographed on their honeymoon Sunday night at Los Angeles International Airport
"Middleton also starred in the latest PSA release, highlighting the importance of children's hospice week."
"Kate even offered to bite off a cherry tomato on the ground because she and BBC Radio 2 host Chris Evans went through the blooming flowers together."
"During her visit, she personally approached the exhibits and stopped to enjoy the William and Catherine rose, which was named for her wedding to Prince William in 2011."
"Middleton shines in Roches' dark green floral dress, nude heels and elegant top."



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In his obituary, Lancaster was described as "a spiritual explorer, dreamy stargazer, inquisitive world traveler and barstool philosopher who enjoyed a good mind meld.””
“He is survived by his fiancée Sarah and his parents, Dennis and Carol.”
“After the show, he got his master's degree in elementary education.”
“Brian was 23 when he appeared on “Road Rules” in 1999.”
“...and drugs but his mother Carol told Radar last month that she believed he was sober at the time of his death and had died of heart failure...”
“The Chester County Coroner s Office told the site in a statement The cause of death was fentanyl heroin and ethanol intoxication with the manner of death being accidental Lancaster had a few arrests over the years related to alcohol...”
“Now, RadarOnline.com has learned the cause of his death.”
“FacebookFormer MTV “Road Rules” star Brian Lancaster was just 43 years old when he passed away in Pennsylvania in March.”


Lancaster was described in the obituary as "a spiritual explorer, a dreamer, a curious world traveler and a bar philosopher enjoying a good spiritual fusion."
"His fiancee Sarah and his parents Dennis and Carol survived."
After the performance, he received a master's degree in basic education
"In 1999, Brian was only 23 when he appeared on road rules."
“…… There are also drugs, but his mother Carol told radar last month that she believed he died sober and died of heart failure... "
"The Chester County coroner's office told the scene in a statement that the cause of death was fentanyl, heroin and alcohol poisoning, and the way of death was accidental. Lancaster has been arrested several times in the past few years and related to alcohol..."
"Now, RadarOnline.com The website already knows the cause of his death. "
Brian Lancaster, a former Facebook mtv "rules of the road" star, died in Pennsylvania in March at the age of 43



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It just didn’t work out for me.””
“I thought I was doing the smart thing and the right thing, and I do still think it was.”
“All this time I thought I had an amazing insurance policy, but it didn’t work out.”
““It was devastating for me.”
““None of my eggs survived,” she admitted.”
“The model received unwanted news after she and Carpenter thawed her eggs, which she had frozen nine years ago.”
“Marquardt has also been dealing with other personal woes.”
“He married 31-year-old Playmate Crystal Harris in 2012.”
““I was still in touch with Hef — and then we kind of lost contact.”A rep for Hefner did not immediately return Fox News’ request for comment.”
“Occasionally, my boyfriend [Nick Carpenter] and I would go back,” she said.”


"It's not quite right for me."
"I thought I was doing something wise and right, but I still think so."
"All this time I thought I had a great insurance policy, but it didn't work."
"It's devastating for me."
"None of my eggs survived," she admitted
"After she and carpenter thawed eggs frozen nine years ago, the model got unwanted news."
"Marquardt has been dealing with other personal issues as well."
"He married his 31 year old playmate, crystal Harris, in 2012."
"I was still in touch with Hefner, and then we lost touch." A representative for Hefner didn't immediately respond to Fox News's request for comment
"Occasionally, my boyfriend (Nick Carpenter) and I go back," she said



**Something goes wrong**
“His wife is also among the entertainment world’s elite, and the couple has a Jurassic-sized lifestyle with plenty of new — and likely lucrative — projects on the horizon.”
“He hit his stride in the last two years with leading roles in movies that were blockbusters.”
“That same year, he’ll also reprise his role as Owen in the “Jurassic World” sequel.”
“He reprised his role as Peter Quill/Star-Lord in the 2017 “Guardians of the Galaxy” sequel and is rumored to play the same character in “Avengers: Infinity War,” due out in 2018.”
“He played Josh Faraday in the 2016 reboot of “The Magnificent Seven,” originally a 1960 Western, and Jim Preston in “Passengers,” also released in 2016.”
“RELATED: Check out Forbes richest people in the world:Chris Pratt Movies, TV Career and AwardsChris Pratt’s movies have earned billions at the worldwide box office, and the actor shows no signs of slowing down.”
“A year after that, he starred in “Passengers” alongside Jennifer Lawrence for a whopping $12 million, according to Forbes.”
“The year 2015 brought Pratt a huge bump in earnings when he snagged the lead role in “Jurassic World,” earning just less than $10 million.”
“Chris Pratt went from earning $180,000 for “Delivery Man” in 2013 to $1.5 million for the first “Guardians of the Galaxy” one year later, according to celebrity earnings source TheRichest.”
“2,” which was released in May 2017 and garnered more than $145 million its opening weekend, according to Box Office Mojo.”


"His wife is also one of the elite in the entertainment industry. This couple has a Jurassic lifestyle and many new and potentially profitable projects are coming out."
"In the past two years, he has become famous as the leading actor in the blockbuster movies."
"In the same year, he will also play Owen in the Jurassic world sequel."
"He replayed the role of Peter quill / Star master in the 2017 sequel to the guardian of the galaxy, and it is rumored that he will play the same role in Avenger: Infinite War, which will be released in 2018."
"He played Josh Faraday in the 2016 re release of the seven, which was originally a 1960 western, and Jim Preston in the passenger was also released in 2016."
Related report: take a look at Forbes' world of the world's richest people: Chris Platt's films, television business and winner Chris Platt's films have made billions of dollars at the global box office, and the actor shows no sign of slowing down. "
According to Forbes, a year later, he and Jennifer Lawrence starred in "passengers" for $12 million
"In 2015, Platt played a leading role in Jurassic world, earning less than $10 million, which led to a significant increase in revenue."
"According to the richest, the celebrity source of income, Chris Pratt made $180000 from delivery man in 2013 to $1.5 million from the first" guardians of the galaxy "a year later."
《2》 It was released in May 2017. According to the box office curse, the box office revenue of the weekend exceeded 145 million US dollars



**Something goes wrong**
“Her battle to manage the condition forms part of a new documentary, Gaga: Five Foot Two, which launches globally on Netflix on 22 September.”
“Last week she wrote on her Instagram that her condition was “not simply hip pain or wear and tear from the road”.”
“Lady Gaga suffers from fibromyalgia, a chronic pain condition; the statement says she is going to use the coming weeks “to heal from this and past traumas that still affect her daily life, and result in severe physical pain in her body”.”
““She remains under the care of expert medical professionals who recommended the postponement earlier today.”The concerts, including five UK dates in London, Birmingham and Manchester, will be rescheduled in “early 2018”.”
““Lady Gaga is suffering from severe physical pain that has impacted her ability to perform,” the statement reads.”
“In a statement from concert promoters Live Nation, the pop singer is said to be “devastated” over the decision, made under the advice of doctors.”
“Following her cancellation of a concert in Rio due to “severe pain”, Lady Gaga has now also had to cancel a string of European dates.”


"Her efforts to control this situation form part of the new documentary Gaga: five feet two, which will be released worldwide on Netflix on September 22."
Last week, she wrote on instagram that her condition "is not just hip pain or road wear."
"Lady Gaga is suffering from fibromyalgia, a chronic pain; the statement said she will" recover from this trauma and past trauma that still affects her daily life and causes severe physical pain "in the next few weeks
"She's still in the care of experts and medical experts who suggested earlier today that the show be postponed." Concerts, including five UK performances in London, Bermingham and Manchester, will be rescheduled in early 2018
"Lady Gaga is suffering from severe physical pain, which has affected her performance," the statement said
In a statement by the concert's sponsor, livation, the pop singer was described as "shocked" by the decision made at the doctor's suggestion
Lady Gaga has cancelled her concert in Rio because of the pain, and now she has to cancel a series of European dates



**Something goes wrong**
“Having taken Prince Harry and Ms Markle's engagement photos, it brings me such joy to be able to witness again, the next chapter in this wonderful love story."”
“"I could not be more thrilled or honoured to photograph this historic occasion.”
“Mr Lubomirski said he is delighted to be named the official photographer for the big day.”
“A series of romantic images taken by Mr Lubomirski of Harry and his bride-to-be, including an intimate black and white portrait of the couple embracing, were released in December to mark their forthcoming nuptials.”
“Alexi Lubomirski, 42, who photographed the pair for their engagement, will be at Windsor Castle next month to take the official wedding shots, Kensington Palace announced.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle's official wedding photographer has said he is honoured to have the opportunity to capture the next chapter in the couple's "wonderful love story".”


"I'm very happy to see the next chapter of this wonderful love story again after taking the engagement photo of Prince Harry and Ms. markel."
"I feel very excited and honored to shoot this historic moment."
"Lubomirsky said he was happy to be appointed as the official photographer for this important day."
Mr lubomirsky's series of romantic photos of Harry and his bride to be, including intimate black-and-white portraits of the couple embracing, were released in December to commemorate their upcoming wedding
The Kensington Palace announced that Alexi Lubomirski, 42, will take their engagement photos at Windsor Castle next month
The official wedding photographer for Prince Harry and Megan markel said he was honored to have the opportunity to capture the next chapter of the couple's "wonderful love story."



**Something goes wrong**
“Written by Tweety Elitou...”
“But with Creed II beginning production in April, we're sure he's going to keep his build.”
“While the 30 year old actor has been super fit since he bulked for his lead in Creed it s clear that he s on his fitness but getting the perfect body doesn t come without lots of work and less of a social life which he confessed while appearing...”
“...on The Ellen DeGeneres Show...”
“"I'm just trying to stay in shape for as long as I can," the actor shared with Ellen.”
“"Why not?”
“Right?"”
“I'm working... A post shared by Michael B. Jordan (@michaelbjordan) on Sep 29, 2016 at 11:56am PDTSo how did he get his body right for his role as Erik Killmonger?”
“Drinking over a gallon of water daily was clearly a necessity while making sure he worked out two to three times a day.”
“His eating regimen of six times a day was even more crucial and complicated, especially when it came to his social life: "It's hard to go out to a club or a party when you're like, 'Oh, wait!”


"By Tweety elitou..."
"But with creed 2 coming into production in April, we're sure he'll stay in shape."
"Although the 30-year-old actor has been in good health since he played the leading role in creed, it is obvious that he is in good health, but it takes a lot of work and less social life to get a perfect body, which he admitted when he acted..."
“… In Alan DeGeneres's show
"I just want to stay in shape as long as possible," the actor told Allen
"Why not?"
"Really?"
"I'm working... Michael B. Jordan (@ michaelbjjordan) shared a post at 11:56 a.m. on September 29, 2016, how does he fit his body to play Erik killmonger? "
"It's obviously necessary to drink more than a gallon of water a day, while making sure he exercises two or three times a day."
"His eating habits six times a day are more critical and complex, especially in social life:" when you think 'Oh, wait! "



**Something goes wrong**
“The series is executive produced by Shonda Rhimes, and co-stars Viola Davis, Billy Brown, Jack Falahee, Aja Naomi King and Matt McGorry.”
“How to Get Away with Murder was renewed for a fourth season in February.”
“"There's a real vulnerability between them that we haven't seen before."”
“"I think we get to see so many different colors of Bonnie and Frank," Weil told People after the episode aired in October.”
“The characters shared a sex scene in Season 3 following the death of Bonnie's father.”
“Weil and Weber play longtime co-workers Bonnie Winterbottom and Frank Delfino on How to Get Away with Murder.”
“"Happy Birthday to my beautiful and talented partner in crime..... @liza_weil," he tweeted Monday.”
“The 38-year-old actor had dedicated a sweet message to Weil on her birthday the day prior.”
“Weil and Weber were first linked this week after they were spotted holding hands Tuesday in Los Angeles.”
“"They have been dating under the radar for nearly a year," a source said.”


Directed by shoda Reims, the series stars Viola Davis, Billy Brown, Jack farahi, aja Naomi king and Matt mcgori
"How to escape murder is on air in the fourth quarter of February."
"There's a real weakness between them that we've never seen before."
"I think we can see Bonnie and frank in a lot of different colors," will told people after the October broadcast
"After Bonnie's father died, the characters in the third season shared a sexual scene."
"Will and Weber play Bonnie winterbarton and frank Delfino's long-term partners and talk about how to escape murder."
"Happy Birthday to my beautiful and talented criminal partner..... @He tweeted on Monday
"The 38 year old actor made a sweet speech to will the day before her birthday."
"Will and Webber are in touch for the first time since they were photographed hand in hand in Los Angeles this week."
"They've been dating under radar for almost a year," a source said



**Something goes wrong**
“2 arrives on Digital HD on August 8th and 4K Ultra HD, Blu-ray and DVD on August 22nd.”
“Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“2 would be arriving on home video this month, director James Gunn teased one wild special feature the likes of which had never been seen on any Marvel Studios movie before.”
“That special feature has now arrived in its entirety online.”
“James Gunn created a Guardians of the Galaxy Vol 2 music video inspired by the original disco song “Guardians Inferno” by a group called The Sneepers, featuring none other than Star-Lord’s fictional father David Hasselhoff.”
“This is a full fledged retro music video created in the same style as real hit disco songs from the 1970s, and it’s so weird and glorious.”
“Watch it below!”
“Watch the Guardians of the Galaxy 2 Music Video What s really fantastic about this music video besides everything is that it actually features cast members Zoe Saldana Dave Bautista Michael Rooker Karen Gillan Pom Klementieff Sean Gunn and director James Gunn himself all decked out in their finest disco...”
“...gear lip syncing dancing and having a great time...”
“There’s even a cameo from Jimmy Kimmel Live security guard Guillermo, whose appearance that was shot for the movie didn’t make the final cut, and one more guest appearance that we won’t ruin here.”


"2 launched Digital HD on August 8, 4K Ultra HD, Blu ray and DVD on August 22."
"Guardian of the galaxy"
"2 will be released this month, and director James Gunn has made fun of a crazy special that has never been seen in a marvel studio movie before."
"This feature is now all online."
James Gunn created the second volume music video of "guardian of the galaxy", inspired by the original disco song "Guardian hell" by a band named Snapes. The protagonist is the fictional father of the star Lord, David Hasselhoff
"This is a mature retro music video, with the same style as the real popular disco songs in the 1970s, very strange and brilliant."
"Watch the bottom!"
"Watch the music video of the guardian of the Galaxy 2. The best part of this music video is that its actor Zoe Sardana Dave Bautista Michael rook Karen Gilan Bohm clementif Sean Gunn and director James Gunn are both wearing their best disco costumes..."
“… Gear lip synching, dancing and having a great time... "
"There's even a cameo of Jimmy Kimmel's live security guard Guillermo. The appearance of Guillermo for the film is not in the final editing. There's another cameo. We won't ruin it here."



**Something goes wrong**
“We have talked at length privately & I’ve been nothing but supportive of you & everyone who has co-hosted @TheView -If I came across as not being supportive of you, that wasn’t my intent.””
“It’s a serious time.”“We can take things seriously.”McCain shared similar sentiments on Twitter, to which Shepherd replied, “My response to @Andy on #WWHL wasn’t intended to be anything but constructive.”
“Right now, and not to make this too heavy, but in Trump’s America, we should not be telling women to lighten up.”
“It’s not the show that she once hosted.”
“We’re a news show now.”
“You know, ‘The View,’ it’s a tough show that’s really politically heavy.”
““She said I need to lighten up.”
““I was super bummed out when I saw her saying that,” McCain said.”
“I think being able to just lighten up a little.”The conservative co-host appeared on the same show Wednesday and shared with Cohen that Shepherd’s words didn’t sit well with her.”
“It makes you stressed, it makes you tense.”


"We've been talking in private for a long time & I only support you and all the people who have co hosted @ theview - if I don't support you, that's not my intention."
"This is a serious moment." "We can take things seriously." McCann tweeted a similar view, and Shepard replied, "my response to @ Andy on wwhl is just constructive."
"Now, don't make it too heavy, but in Trump's America, we shouldn't tell women to be relaxed."
"It's not a show she's ever hosted."
"We're in the news now."
"You know, 'point of view', it's a tough show, really heavy politics."
"She said I need to relax."
"When I saw her say that, I was very upset," he said
"I think it can be easier." The conservative co host appeared on the same show on Wednesday and shared with Cohen that Shepard's words didn't suit her
"It makes you stressed, it makes you nervous."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The eight plush bathrooms feature stand alone baths with huge windows overlooking the garden, and a separate make-up areaNeighbors!”
“The first floor bedrooms boast stunning views of the plush greenery surrounding the luxurious propertyRub-a-dub-dub!”
“Shower room: The smaller bathrooms feature waterfall showers and more modest fixtures and fittingsAt one with nature!”
“The Bel-Air property was recently sold for $17.8 million, four years after Kim and Kanye purchased it for $9 million.”
“'The home is done in terms of the renovation but it's finishing up the smaller things – they don't want to move in with any construction still happening,' a source previously revealed to Us in August.”
“The couple and their children have been living at their home in Bel-Air as they waited for renovations on their Hidden Hills property to complete.”
“Hills home which they bought in 2014”
“One room features a popcorn maker large TV screen and two rows of sofas for cosy family cinema nights in Home sweet home The property set in 1 28 acres of plush gardens Last week it was revealed that Kim and Kanye had finally moved into their 20 million Hidden...”
“One table features wooden chairs embellished with sheepskin seat covers and overlooks the swimming poolMovie room!”
“Perfect for entertaining: The Hidden Hills home comes complete with a 10-person spa, theater room and game roomThe home- located in the exclusive Hidden Hills neighbourhood, has beautifully landscaped grounds with a zero-edge poolLuxury dining!”


"Eight Deluxe bathrooms with separate bathrooms, huge windows overlooking the garden, and a separate make-up area!" "
"The bedroom on the first floor has a view of the plush green leaves around the luxury hotel!"
Shower: smaller bathroom with waterfall shower and more simple devices and accessories, integrated with nature
"Bel Air was recently sold for $17.8 million, and Kim and Kanye bought it for $9 million four years ago."
"The house has been renovated, but it's doing something smaller - they don't want to move in while any construction is still in progress," a source told us in August
"The couple and their children have been living in bellelle's house, waiting for the renovation of the Yinshan property to be completed."
"Hills home they bought in 2014"
"One room has a popcorn manufacturer's big TV screen and two rows of sofas for a cozy home theater night. Last week, the property was in a 128 acre luxury garden. It is revealed that Kim and Kanye have finally moved into their 20 million seclusion apartment... "
"A table with wooden chairs decorated with sheepskin seat covers overlooking the swimming pool and movie room!"
"Great for entertainment: Hidden Hills home has a 10 person spa, theater and game room. Located in the exclusive District of hidden hills, the residence has beautiful scenery, zero side swimming pool and luxury restaurant! "



**Something goes wrong**
“Gallery...”
“Embed Code Restart RELATED CONTENT Josh Duhamel on How Son Axl Influences His Acting Roles Exclusive Josh Duhamel Says He And Fergie Have A Lot of Love When It Comes to Co Parenting Exclusive Eiza Gonzalez Addresses Calvin Harris Romance Rumors I Want To Keep My Personal Life Private Related...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“She's Dated Other A-Listers This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Who Is Josh Duhamel's New Love, Eiza Gonzalez?”
“For more on Duhamel's new flame, watch the video below.”
“A source later told ET that the two have "fallen head over heels for each other."”
“BACKGRID"He felt guilty that he had feelings for another woman so quickly and he wants to be respectful to Fergie so he has kept this relationship very, very private," a source told ET in June, when the couple finally stepped out in public.”
“The two have a 4-year-old son together, Axl.”
“It's been less than a month since the couple decided to go public, but they reportedly kept their relationship under wraps out of respect for Fergie, whom Duhamel separated with in September after eight years of marriage.”


"Gallery..."
"Embedded code restart related content Josh Duhamel's exclusive report on how his son Axl affects his role. Josh Duhamel said that he and Fergie have a lot of love in raising children together. Exclusive report on eiza Gonzalez's address to Calvin Harris. Romantic rumor. I want to keep my private life secret..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"She's dated other first-line stars. This video is not available because we can't load sponsor information."
"Who is Josh dohamel's new love, Ezra Gonzalez?"
"For more information about Duhamel's new flame, watch the video below."
A source later told et that the two had "fallen for each other"
"Behind his back" he felt guilty, his feelings for another woman were so fast, he wanted to respect Fergie, so he kept this relationship very, very personal, "a source told ET in June, when the couple finally walked out of public
"Together they have a four year old son, Akers."
"It's less than a month since the couple decided to go public, but it's reported that out of respect for Fergie, they have kept their relationship secret. After eight years of marriage, Duhamel and Fergie separated in September this year."



**Something goes wrong**
“If you are affected by any of the issues raised in this article, please call the Samaritans on (free) 116123 or 020 7734 2800.”
“Exclusive BACKSPLASH The Chase star defends swimming with dolphins after disgusting scene backlash 6 Clay died in hospital following a self inflicted gunshot wound Credit Getty Images 6 Tributes have poure din for Clay Adler Credit Getty Images WireImage On Saturday his family and friends paid tribute the keen surfer...”
“Clay who was the lead in Newport Harbour: The Real Orange County, passed away from a self-inflicted gunshot wound on March 26, reports TMZ.”
“6 MTV star Clay Adler has died at 27 after taking his life Credit Getty Images FilmMagic Police sources told TMZ that Clay was with friends on March 25 when he took his own life after the group had gone into the desert to fire guns and Clay turned the...”
“...weapon on himself...”
“He shot himself in the head and died the following day in hospital.”
“Police do not believe drugs or alcohol were involved, but told TMZ that he had suffered with mental health issues in the past.”
“MOST READ IN TV SHOWBIZ CHILLING SCREAM Cops rushed to Marilyn Manson s LA home after someone was heard screaming GOING STRONG As gladiator Jet says she wants a new man here s where her co stars are now Exclusive CONSTANT PAIN Katie Price says I m disabled for life...”
“...waddle like a duck after fall HE SHOULD BE SO LUCKY Kylie forced to deny engagement after claims from partner s step mum Exclusive THIN ICE Dancing on Ice s Rufus Hound broke law with park visit while awaiting Covid test Exclusive WAG CLASH Coleen Rooney refuses to apologise to...”
“Becky Vardy as Wagatha talks break down HAPPY AS WE ARE Kylie DENIES engagement to boyfriend Paul Solomons Exclusive PRICEY PAYDAY Katie Price makes 2 500 in just five days selling old stained tops online MO S GLOW EastEnders star Kacey Ainsworth is unrecognisable with blonde hair for BBC drama...”


"If you are affected by any of the questions raised in this article, please contact Samaritans at (free) 116123 or 020 7734 2800."
"Exclusive fender chasing star defense with dolphins swimming after a sickening scene rebounds 6 clay died in hospital after self inflicted gunshot wounds credit Getty pictures 6 mourn has been pouring rain for clay Adler credit Getty pictures 6 mourn his family and friends keen to surf on Saturday
On March 26, clay, the leader of Newport harbour's "the real Orange County," died of self injury, TMZ reported
"6 MTV star clay Adler died of suicide at the age of 27. Getty film magic police sources told TMZ that clay committed suicide when he was with a friend on March 25. At that time, the organization had already entered the desert to shoot. Clay turned his gun to..."
“… The weapon on him... "
"He shot himself in the head and died in the hospital the next day."
"Police don't believe in drugs or alcohol, but told TMZ that he had mental health problems in the past."
"Most of the gruesome screams I read in the TV show business. After the police rushed to Marilyn Manson's Los Angeles home, someone heard the scream become stronger. The big Gladiator jet said that she wanted to have a new man here. Her co star is now in exclusive constant pain." Katie Price said, "I'm disabled for life..."
“… He should have been so lucky that Kelly was forced to refuse her engagement because her partner's stepmother claimed that the exclusive ice Rufus hound dancing on the ice violated the park access law while waiting for the coved test. Exclusive wag class Corinne Rooney refused to
"Becky Vardy plays wagatha. The conversation breaks down and we are happy. For example, we are Kelly, who denies her engagement to her boyfriend Paul Solomons. Katie Price earns 2500 in just five days. She sells old dyed tops online. Kacey Ainsworth, the star of MOS glow EastEnders, can't be identified because of her blonde hair in BBC TV series..."



**Something goes wrong**
“I wanna marry him, but we’ll see.””
“Someone asked if we’re married,” Amber said, reciting one of the questions that came through.”
“Well, the 33-year-old certainly sparked speculation after taking to her Instagram story on Saturday, Sept. 30, to share a snap of a huge diamond ring on THAT finger!”
“Amber and 21 Savage, whose real name is Shayaa Bin Abraham-Joseph, have been dating for some months now and the two seem to be happier than ever.”
“Between packing on the PDA at red carpet appearances and totally gushing over one another in interviews, it’s really no surprise that the duo would want to take their relationship to the next level.”
“Watch the video below to see her huge ring!”
“Just this past weekend the couple made an appearance at Amber’s third annual SlutWalk.”
“And in a lifestream for the feminist march, Amber and her man answered fan questions, some of which dealt with the status of their relationship.”
““Are we married?”
““We’re not married.”


"I want to marry him, but we'll see."
"We were asked if we were married," Amber said, reciting one of the questions
"Well, this 33 year old woman shared a picture of a huge diamond ring on her finger on instagram on Saturday, September 30, which undoubtedly triggered speculation!"
"Amber and 21 savages, real name Shaya Ben Abraham Joseph, have been dating for months, and they seem to be happier than ever."
"In the red carpet show, they greet each other on the PDA, and in the interview, they talk to each other. It's not surprising that they want to take their relationship to a new level."
"Watch the video below and see her huge ring!"
"Just this past weekend, the couple appeared at Amber's third annual carnival."
"In the life cycle of feminist parades, amber and her men answer fans' questions, some of which relate to their relationship status."
"Are we married?"
"We're not married yet."



**Something goes wrong**
“We hope these Hollywood institutions start realizing why representation matters.”
“Tonight was a powerful night for women in show business as the #TimesUp and #MeToo movements ruled the evening, but it should be noted that Greta Gerwig was snubbed for Best Director.”
“Women were in full force tonight: Oprah gave an incredibly empowering speech and Natalie Portman called out the Globes for its all-male directing category…and Portman wasn’t the only person on stage who called the ceremony out.”
“While presenting the last award of the evening for Best Picture, Drama (it went to Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri), Barbra Streisand gently — but powerfully — mentioned that she was the last woman to win Best Director at the Golden Globe Awards for the film Yentl.”
“She also mentioned that she won in 1984, which was 34 years ago.”
“34 years:“Backstage I heard they said I was the only woman…to get the best director award, and you know, that was 1984: That was 34 years ago.”
“Folks, time’s up!”
“We need more women directors and more women to be nominated for best director.”
“There are so many films out there that are so good directed by women.”We all know that we have a long way to go in Hollywood (and everywhere) when it comes to gender equality.”
“Lady Bird is critically acclaimed and even won Best Picture, Comedy or Musical tonight — but Gerwig wasn’t recognized for it.”


"We want these Hollywood institutions to start to realize why representation is important."
"It's a powerful night for women in the show business, because the two actions of time and meto'o dominate the whole night, but it's worth noting that Greta Gerwig is rated as the best director and ignored."
"Tonight, women go all out: Oprah has delivered an incredible speech, and Natalie Portman has collected" the queen of the globe "for her all male directing program And Portman is not the only one on stage to solicit awards
In presenting the night's Last Best Picture award, Barbara Streisand gently but forcefully mentioned that she was the last woman to win the Golden Globe Award for best director for her film Yentl
"She also mentioned that she won in 1984, 34 years ago."
"Backstage I heard them say I was the only woman who won the best director award, you know, 1984: 34 years ago."
"Time's up, guys!"
"We need more women directors and more women nominated for best director."
"There are so many good films directed by women," we all know that we have a long way to go in Hollywood (and around the world) on gender equality issues
"Mrs. bird was so well received that she even won the award for best picture, comedy or musical tonight - but gweig wasn't recognized for it."



**Something goes wrong**
“Keep scrolling to see her best looks!”
“Here at Stylish, we’ve been keeping tabs on her most, well, stylish moments both at home and abroad.”
“Oh, and we will forever be amazed by her ability to have a rainbow-hued stiletto (Christian Louboutin is her fave) to match just about any outfit.”
“...pastel Burberry coat to read to children at the annual White House Easter Egg Roll the First Lady s wardrobe creatively and tastefully embraces color texture and design...”
“Whether she was hosting her first state dinner for French President Emmanuel and First Lady Brigitte Macron in a sparkling Chanel Haute Couture gown which originally appeared on the brand s spring 2018 runway as a jumpsuit or sporting a...”
“Though, much like former first lady Michelle Obama before her, Melania’s outfits keep Us guessing.”
“...ever since...”
“For the inauguration in January 2017 she wore a pale blue Ralph Lauren cashmere coat dress with matching suede pumps and gloves that called to mind Jackie Kennedy s chic style and she s continued to rock high fashion designs...”
“It became clear from the onset that the Slovene-born beauty was taking wardrobe cues from previous trendsetting first ladies.”
“...the White House).”


"Keep rolling and see what she looks like most!"
"In fashion, we have been paying attention to her most fashionable moments at home and abroad."
"Oh, we'll always be surprised by her ability to have rainbow heels (Christian Louboutin is her favorite), because she can go with almost any outfit."
“… The light red Burberry coat read to children on the annual White House Easter egg roll. The first lady's wardrobe creatively and elegantly integrates color, texture and Design... "
"Whether she's holding her first state dinner for French President Emmanuel and first lady Brigitte Malone, or wearing a glittering Chanel haute couture dress, which first appeared on the brand's 2018 spring runway as a one-piece dress, or wearing a sweatshirt..."
"But just as before the former first lady, Michelle Obama, Melania's costume keeps us guessing."
“… Since then... "
"At her inauguration in January 2017, she wore a light blue Ralph Lauren cashmere dress with suede high heels and gloves, reminiscent of Jackie Kennedy's chic style. She continued to rock high fashion design..."
"It's clear from the beginning that this Slovenian born beauty was inspired by the wardrobe of the first lady who used to lead the fashion."
“… The White House. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Swiftâ€™s last album was 2014â€™s â€˜1989â€™, her last single was her â€˜I Donâ€™t Wanna Live Foreverâ€™ collab with ZAYN in January for the Fifty Shades Darker soundtrack.”
“Taylor has avoided the public eye ever since her spat with Kanye West and break up with British actor Tom Hiddleston.”
“We're not sure yet but it's certainly whipped fans into a frenzy!”
“Another album?”
“What does it all mean?”
“Now sheâ€™s posted a 10 second dark video with no audio of what looks like an animalâ€™s tail.”
“Even Taylorâ€™s website was a blank space!”
“On Friday, Taylor deleted all previous posts and her profile pictures from her Instagram, Twitter and Facebook.”
“...ðŸ¤”Published 21st Aug 2017Last updated 21st Aug 2017Just days after cleaning all her social accounts, Taylor Swift has posted a mysterious video, adding to the speculation that singer is about to make her musical comeback.”
“Taylor Swift shares mysterious video after social media blackoutWhat does it mean?!”


"Swift" ™ The last album was in 2014 ™ 1989 ™ Her last single is "I don't know" ™ I don't want to live forever ™  In January, we cooperated with zayn to produce the dark soundtrack of fifty shadows
"Taylor has been out of the public eye since she had a quarrel with Kanye West and broke up with British actor Tom sidleston."
"We're not sure yet, but it's going to drive the fans crazy!"
"Another album?"
"What does all this mean?"
"Now she ™ S released a 10 second black video without any animal sound ™ "Its tail."
"Even Taylor" ™ The website is blank
"On Friday, Taylor removed all previous posts and profile images from instagram, twitter and Facebook."
“…… Published on August 21, 2017 last update time: on August 21, 2017, Taylor Swift released a mysterious video, which makes people more speculate that singer is about to make a comeback in music. "
"What's the meaning of Taylor Swift sharing mysterious video after the dark scenes of social media?"



**Something goes wrong**
“To see more of Scheana Marie and her co-stars, tune into the seventh season of Vanderpump Rules on Monday nights at 9 p.m. on Bravo TV.”
““You’ll see some friendship changes, like positive.”
“While promoting the new season of Vanderpump Rules, which began airing on Bravo TV on Monday, the longtime reality star and aspiring singer opened up about her thoughts on staying close with exes post-split.”
““When it’s done, it’s done.”
“And if in a year or two years they come back into my life and I feel okay… okay.”
“But I can’t be like homies with my ex,” Scheana explained to E!”
“News.”
“Then, when asked if fans should anticipate a future reunion with Rob, Scheana exclaimed, “Hell no!”Also during her interview with E!”
“News, Scheana said fans of Vanderpump Rules should expect to see her undergo a number of changes with her friendships with her co-stars.”
“That said, rumors of a feud with her best friend Ariana Madix are false.”


"To learn more about scheana Marie and her partner, watch Season 7 of the vanderpump rules on Bravo TV at 9 p.m. on Monday."
"You'll see some changes in friendships, such as positive ones."
"While promoting the new season of vanderpump rules, the longtime reality TV star and aspiring singer revealed her idea of maintaining a close relationship with her ex girlfriend after the breakup."
"When it's done, it's done."
"If they come back to my life in a year or two, I feel good Good
"But I can't be like my ex boyfriend," she explained
"News."
Then, when asked if fans should look forward to their reunion with Rob in the future, she exclaimed, "hell, no! "It's also when she accepts e!"
"In the news, Shanna said fans of the Vanderbilt rules should look forward to seeing some changes in her friendship with her partners."
"That is to say, the rumors about her discord with her good friend Ariana madix are false."



**Something goes wrong**
“The saga continues ...”
“The singer said she tried to speak to Swift about the issue but noted She wouldn t speak to me The singer continued It was a full shutdown and then she writes a song about me and I m like OK cool cool cool that s how you want to...”
“The truth behind the Taylor Swift and Katy Perry feud has been largely a mystery.”
“We could guess it had something to do with backup dancers, as Swift previously told Rolling Stone her song “Bad Blood,” rumored to be about Perry, was about a singer “who basically tried to sabotage an entire arena tour.”Facts were scant, though.”
“Even with Perry’s “Swish, Swish,” a song rumored to be about Swift that debuted last week (more than a year after Swift’s track), we didn’t know the full story.”
“Now it’s coming at you like a dark horse.”
“During an extended “Primetime Carpool Karaoke Special” on Monday night, Perry opened up about everything to host James Corden.”
“According to Perry, the feud started because some of her usual dancers wanted to perform with Swift.”
“Perry said she had no problem with the dancers’ choice, but to make sure their contracts included a provision allowing them to drop out of Swift’s ensemble when Perry went back on tour in a year or so.”
“Well, when the time came for Perry to prepare for her tour, the dancers went to Swift’s management to discuss leaving ― and got fired.”


"The legend goes on..."
"The singer said she tried to talk to swift about it, but she said she wouldn't talk to me. The singer went on, it's a complete closure, and then she wrote a song about me, I like cool, that's what you want..."
"The truth behind the feud between Taylor swift and Katie Perry is basically a mystery."
"We can guess it's about backup dancers, because swift told rolling stone that her song" bad blood "is rumored to be about Perry, about a singer" basically trying to disrupt the entire arena tour. " Although the facts are few
"Even though Perry's" whoosh, whoosh, "which is rumored to be about Swift's song, premiered last week (more than a year after Swift's singing), we don't know the full story."
"Now it's coming at you like a black horse."
Perry revealed everything to host James Corden on Monday night's "golden time carpooling karaoke special."
"According to Perry, it's because some of her usual dancers want to perform with swift."
Perry said she has no objection to the choice of dancers, but to make sure there is a clause in their contract that allows them to quit Swift's company when Perry returns to tour about a year later
"Well, when Perry was going on tour, the dancers went to Swift's management to discuss leaving, and they were fired."



**Something goes wrong**
“The second highest is a CBE or Commander of the Order of the British Empire followed by an OBE, or Officer of the Most Excellent Order of the British Empire and then an MBE, or Member of the Order of the British Empire.”
“A knighthood or damehood is the highest honor awarded in the five categories approved by the Queen.”
“Image zoom Hugh Laurie | Credit: Also on the 2018 New Year roster was actor Hugh Laurie, who was named a Commander of the British Empire.”
“...is officially observed...”
“This is a moment in life to be treasured and never forgotten Twice a year Britain s Cabinet Office releases a list of the people receiving honors for merit service or bravery just before New Year s Eve and on the Saturday in June when Queen Elizabeth II s birthday...”
““It is as much theirs as it is mine.”
““I want to acknowledge how responsible my brothers are for this honor,” Gibb, 71, said.”
“Image zoom Paul McCartney and Ringo Starr in January 2014 | Credit: Kevin Mazur/WireImageBarry Gibb, the last surviving member of the Bee Gees, dedicated his knighthood to his late bandmates, twin brothers Robin Gibb, who died in 2012, and Maurice Gibb, who died in 2003.”
“Ringo.”Fun fact: Starr, McCartney, John Lennon and George Harrison were all recognized as Members of the Order of the British Empire in 1965.”
“Peace and love.”


The second highest ranking officer is the CBE or the commander of the British Empire command, followed by the OBE or the best commander of the British Empire, followed by the MBE or the commander of the British Empire command
"Of the five categories approved by the queen, knight or Dame is the highest honor."
"Hugh Laurie credit: actor Hugh Laurie is also on the 2018 new year roster, who has been appointed commander of the British Empire."
“…… Formally comply with... "
"This is a cherished and unforgettable moment in one's life. Twice a year, the British Cabinet Office publishes a list of people who have been honored for their meritorious service or bravery on New Year's Eve and on the Saturday of Queen Elizabeth II's birthday in June..."
"It's theirs and mine."
"I want to admit how much responsibility my brothers have for this honor," said Gibb, 71
"Paul McCartney and Ringo Starr in January 2014. Photo source: Kevin Mazur / wireimagebarry Gibb, the last surviving member of Bee Gees, dedicated his jazz title to his late band partner, twin brother Robin Gibb, who died in 2012, and Maurice Gibb, who died in 2003. "
Interesting fact: Starr, McCartney, John Lennon and George Harrison were all recognized as members of the order of the British Empire in 1965
"Peace and love."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I couldn’t have been happier about it,” he added.”
“The Queen attended his show before presenting him with the award in a special ceremony.”
“Queen Elizabeth made a surprise appearance during London Fashion Week on Tuesday, sitting front and center next to none other than Vogue’s Anna Wintour.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Queen stepped up her own fashion game, wearing a pale blue wool tweed dress and jacket embellished with tiny aquamarine Swarovski crystals by Angela Kelly (who sat to Wintour’s left).”
“She even added a pair of black gloves to her look.”
“Wintour had on her signature shades and a floral dress as she sat next to the monarch.”
“Image zoom Queen Elizabeth and Anna Wintour | Credit: Yui Mok/PA Wire/APThe pair were seen chatting before the Richard Quinn show began.”
“And in true royal form, the Queen even received a comfy cushion to sit on!”
“Image zoom Queen Elizabeth and Anna Wintour | Credit: Mike Marsland/WireImageImage zoom Credit: Mike Marsland/WireImageThe monarch was on hand to present the inaugural Queen Elizabeth II Award for British Design.”


"I'm so happy," he added
"The queen attended his performance and presented him with an award at a special ceremony."
On Tuesday, Queen Elizabeth made an unexpected appearance at London Fashion Week, sitting next to Anna Wintour of fashion magazine
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The queen stepped up her fashion game with a light blue tweed dress and jacket embellished with Angela Kelly's Aquamarine Swarovski crystal."
"She even added a pair of black gloves to her design."
"Wintour, wearing her trademark sunglasses and a floral skirt, sits next to the monarch."
"Image zooming Queen Elizabeth and Anna Wintour | image source: YUI Mok / PA wire / AP before Richard Quinn, they were chatting."
"In real Royal form, the queen even received a comfortable cushion!"
"Image zoom Queen Elizabeth and Anna Wintour | photo source: Mike Marsland / wireimageimage zoom photo source: Mike Marsland / wireimagethe monarch attended the first Queen Elizabeth II design award ceremony."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read the rest of the letter, via TMZ, here.”
“It no longer matters how I’m perceived.”
“But it’s the subject matter that’s gotten everyone’s attention.”
“In the letter to Madonna, Tupac admitted that he ended their relationship because she’s white.”
““For you to be seen with a black man wouldn’t in any way jeopardize your career,” he confessed in the letter, dated Jan. 15, 1995.”
““If anything it would make you seem that much more open and exciting.”
““But for me at least in my previous perception I felt due to my ‘image’ I would be letting down half of the people who made me what I thought I was,” he continued.”
“AdvertisementTupac goes on to write that he never meant to hurt Madonna, and explained his reasoning even further.”
“As you can see I have grown both spiritually and mentally.”
“Please understand my previous position as that of a young man with limited experience with a extremely famous sex symbol.”


"Through TMZ, read the rest of the letter here."
"It doesn't matter what people think of me anymore."
"But it's the subject that gets everybody's attention."
"In a letter to Madonna, Tupac admitted that he ended their relationship because Madonna was white."
In his letter of January 15, 1995, he admitted: "if you are seen with a black man, your career will not be affected in any way."
"If anything, it will make you look more open and exciting."
"But for me, at least in my previous impression, I felt that because of my 'image', I would disappoint half of the people who made me who I am," he continued
"Tupac went on to write that he had never intentionally hurt Madonna and further explained his reasons."
"As you can see, I have grown both spiritually and spiritually."
"Please understand my previous position, because I am a young man with limited experience and lack of experience in an extremely famous sexual symbol."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can find a complete list of reviews so far here...”
“...is reviewing every standup comedy special currently available on Netflix Canada , including this one.”
“...swagger intelligence touching truth and for its ability to laugh at mortality and to revel in beating death Exclaim...”
“...returns to heaven Jesus will be the cool guy at the party hanging with his comedian friend Jimmy Mack who perished in the same crash Although there are stretches that finds Morgan rambling and unfocused there s truly no other special out there quite like Staying Alive for its candour...”
“But Morgan is resourceful enough to avoid sticking completely to his accident and its aftermath instead he uses this experience to parlay into jokes describing family members who visited him during his hospital stay about how his wife shamed him out of feeling sorry for himself and how when he...”
“...speech therapist that This is the way I ve always talked...”
“...and Michael Jackson Throughout the 60 minute special Morgan s material never comes off entirely mind blowing or astute but it does come from actual events that Morgan never shies away from reciting from asking his doctor if his dick still worked to recovering from brain trauma and informing his...”
“B I G”
“Decked out in a white John Travolta suit the Bronx raised comedian delivers a touching and riotous set that often resembles a one man show as he recounts his life changing experience beginning with his time spent in the afterlife musing on how he met God Ol Dirty Bastard Notorious...”
“...insight into just how real and honest this special is willing to get Walking out in front of the crowd at the Count Basie Theatre in New Jersey Morgan wastes little time getting real...”


"So far, you can find the complete list of comments here..."
“… All stand up comedy features currently available on Netflix Canada are being reviewed, including this one. "
“…… Arrogant wisdom touches the truth. It can laugh at death and revel in the exclamation of conquering death. "
“… Back in heaven, Jesus would be a cool guy at the party with his comedy friend Jimmy Mack who died in the same crash, although there was an extension to find Morgan rambling and inattentive, really nothing else special there, just like living frankness... "
"However, Morgan is resourceful enough to avoid completely insisting on his accident and its consequences. On the contrary, he uses this experience to make up jokes, describe visiting his family during hospitalization, how his wife shames him for sympathizing with himself, and how he..."
"The speech therapist told me that this is the way I speak..."
“…… In Michael Jackson's 60 minute special program, Morgan's material was never completely exciting or smart, but it did come from actual events. Morgan never evaded recitation, never asked his doctor whether his second brother was still trying to recover from brain injury, and told him.... "
“B I G”
"The comedian who grew up in the Bronx, dressed in John Travolta's white suit, tells a touching and colorful scene, often like a one-man show. He tells about his life changing experience. From his time in the afterlife, he thinks about how he met God, a notorious dirty bastard..."
“… Learn more about how real and honest this special program is. Willing to walk in front of the audience at the Earl of Brazil theater in New Jersey, Morgan wasted very little time to become real... "



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“#blessings.”For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“As previously reported, it was announced in June that Remini was bumped to a series regular after she guest starred on the series on season 1.”
“It seems that Erinn Hayes won’t make even the slightest appearance in Kevin Can Wait’s season 2.”
“In the premiere, which aired on Monday, September 25, it was revealed in the first scene that her character, Donna Gable, had died.”
“The CBS comedy briefly mentioned her absence when Kevin Gable (Kevin James) received a postcard for her gym saying they missed her.”
““So do I,” he said.”
“No other details were given as to what happened to Donna, but she was also brought up toward the end of the episode during Kendra’s last-minute wedding.”
““[It’s] just missing one thing,” Kevin said at the ceremony.”
“Kendra (Taylor Spreitler) replied: “I know, I wish Mom was here too.” Leah Remini’s character, Vanessa, helped organize Kendra’s big day.”
“On the same day, CBS revealed that Hayes would be leaving the sitcom.”


"Blessing." For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to us weekly's YouTube page
"As previously reported, it was reported in June that ramini was promoted to the regular series after making a guest star in the series in the first season."
"It seems that Erin Hayes won't even play in Kevin cannett's second season."
"At the premiere on Monday, September 25th, the first scene revealed that her character Donna gable had passed away."
"When Kevin gable (Kevin James) receives a postcard from the gym saying they miss her, the CBS comedy briefly mentions her absence."
"Me too," he said
"There are no other details about what happened to Donna, but she was brought to the end of the episode at Kendra's last-minute wedding."
"(it) is just one thing missing," Kevin said at the ceremony
Kendra (Tyler spretler) replies, "I know. I want my mother to be here, too." Leah ramini's character Vanessa helped organize Kendra's big day
"On the same day, CBS revealed that Hayes would leave the sitcom."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...thing...”
“Sometimes you have to work at being happy which is absolutely OK And when you have someone like Kesha who opens up about her dark days but then also shows you how to learn from and let go of the darkness at the same time well it s a beautiful...”
“Accompanying the release of her new song, "Learn To Let Go," the 30-year-old wrote a stand-out piece explaining the meaning behind the song for The Huffington Post.”
“In the essay, Kesha says she is learning to let go after everything she has endured in her past.”
“The musician has been extremely open about her struggles, including battling an eating disorder, suffering from depression, and her ongoing lawsuit with music producer Dr. Luke.”
“According to Kesha, "Learn To Let Go" has "become one of [her] mantras over the last few years."”
“Her past is something that she refuses to let define who she is now or prevent her from moving forward, especially when it comes to her career.”
“"You have to learn to let go of those bad feelings and move forward," she writes.”
“"We all have bias based on whatever our own story and life experience has been, but really the only way to truly evolve is to let the past be the past and move forward with an open heart."”
“It's easy to let people who have wronged you or let the difficulties you have faced "haunt you forever," as Kesha puts it, but why give them that power?”


“… Things... "
"Sometimes you have to work hard to make yourself happy, which is absolutely possible. When you have a person like Katha, she opens her heart to talk about her dark days, but also shows you how to learn and let go from the dark, which is a beautiful..."
"With the release of her new song learn to let go, the 30-year-old wrote a compelling article for the Huffington Post explaining the meaning behind the song."
"In this article, Kesha says she's learning to give up what she's been through in the past."
"The musician is very open to her struggles, including the fight against eating disorders, depression, and her lawsuit against the music producer Dr. Luke."
According to Kesha, "learn to let go" has become her mantra in the past few years
"Her past is what she refuses to let others define who she is or what prevents her from moving forward, especially in her career."
"You have to learn to let go of those bad emotions and move on," she wrote
"No matter what our own stories and life experiences are, we are biased, but the only way to really evolve is to let the past be the past and move forward with an open heart."
"It's easy to let those who have wronged you, or let the difficulties you face" haunt you forever, "as Kesha said, but why give them such power?"



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Picture: Givenchy/MEGAThis story was originally published in The Sun and is reprinted with permission.”
“...the process...”
“Just.”
“JAMES Corden has revealed the awkward reason he almost interrupted the royal wedding vows.”
“The Late Late Show host attended the nuptials between Prince Harry and Meghan Markle on Saturday at Windsor Castle with his wife Julia, reports The Sun.”
“He also acted as a compere at the couple’s reception later that day, and having returned to LA, Corden opened up about his experience on Monday night’s show.”
“While he said it had been “one of the most beautiful ceremonies I’ve ever been to”, he revealed there was one part of it that he really struggled with.”
“James Corden explains why he almost interrupted the royal wedding.”
“Picture: CBSHe said: “Here’s the thing, the worst part of the ceremony for me was there was flowers everywhere, the most beautiful flowers you’ve ever seen.”
“I get quite bad allergies if I m in close proximity to flowers so for a lot of the ceremony I just needed to sneeze The 39 year old then mimicked how he was trying to suppress his sneezes as the couple said their vows making the audience laugh in...”


"Image: the Givenchy / Megan story was originally published in the sun and reprinted with permission."
“… Process... "
"It's just."
"James Colden revealed the embarrassing reason why he almost interrupted the Royal Wedding oath."
The late host attended the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel at Windsor Castle on Saturday, as did his wife Julia, the Sun reported
Later in the day, cordon hosted the couple's reception, and when he returned to Los Angeles, he made his story public on Monday night's show
Although he said it was "one of the most beautiful ceremonies I've ever attended," he revealed that part of it was a struggle for him
"James cordon explains why he almost interrupted the royal wedding."
Picture: he said, "the thing is, the worst thing for me is that there are flowers all over the ceremony. It's the most beautiful flower you've ever seen."
"If I am close to the flowers, I will have a serious allergic reaction, so at many ceremonies, I just need to sneeze. The 39 year old imitates how he tries to restrain his sneezing, because the couple said their vows make the audience laugh..."



**Something goes wrong**
“ET.”
““If we got through a second season, I wouldn’t see us getting through a third one.”
““There were some changes over the summer,” Roach, 38, told Omari, referencing the recasting.”
“Donna, played by Erinn Hayes, was killed off at the end of season 1 and later replaced by James’ longtime King of Queens costar.”
““Season 1, there was very good chemistry between Kevin and Erin and I always heard, ‘Oh Kevin and Leah … the chemistry!’ I was like ‘Ok, alright,’” Roach explained.”
““Then when you see it, you’re like ‘Oh, okay!’ She makes him funnier.”
“I don’t know what it is.”
“He’s very funny as it is, but when you add her to the mix [and] they start playing off each other, it’s really incredible.”Fans of the show were shocked when Hayes didn’t return for season 2 and they wanted answers.”
“So in an October 14 interview, James revealed that it really just came down to storyline.”
““The plot of the show didn’t have enough drive,” he told the New York Daily News.”


"Wait a minute."
"If we had a second season, I would not have seen us have a third."
"There have been some changes over the summer," roach, 38, told Omari, referring to recasting
Donna, played by Irene Hayes, was eliminated at the end of the first season and later replaced by James' longtime queen partner
"In the first season, there was a good chemistry between Kevin and Irene, and I always heard," Oh, Kevin and Leah Chemical reaction! "I said, 'OK, OK,'" roach explained
"When you see it, you say, 'Oh, OK! "She made him more interesting."
"I don't know what it is."
"He's funny, but when you add her to the group and they start fighting each other, it's incredible." When Hayes didn't come back for the second season, fans of the show were shocked and wanted answers
"So in an interview on October 14, James revealed that it was just a story."
"The plot of the play doesn't have enough momentum," he told the New York Daily News



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Love has declined, via her publicist, to speak further about the video.”
“(Photo by Billy Farrell/Patrick McMullan via Getty Images)TOPSHOT - Harvey Weinstein (C) arrives at Manhattan Criminal Court for a hearing on October 11, 2018 in New York City.”
“The Zurich Film Festival 2016 will take place from September 22 until October 2.”
“(Photo by Andreas Rentz/Getty Images)Film producer Harvey Weinstein and actress Gwyneth Paltrow arrive for the 50th anniversary gala of the NFT at the National Film Theatre on the South Bank in London.”
“(Photo by Yui Mok - PA Images/PA Images via Getty Images)Harvey Weinstein is escorted into court, Friday, May 25, 2018, in New York.”
“The movie mogul turned himself in at a police precinct earlier Friday.”
“(AP Photo/Mark Lennihan)McGowan to Weinstein: We got youHarvey Weinstein arrives to court in New York, Tuesday, June 5, 2018.”
“Weinstein pleaded not guilty Tuesday to rape and criminal sex act charges.”
“The hearing in Manhattan comes after a grand jury indicted the former movie mogul last week on charges involving two women.”
“(AP Photo/Seth Wenig)LOS ANGELES, CA - JANUARY 14: (L-R) Chris Backus, Mira Sorvino and Harvey Weinstein attend HBO's Annual Pre-Golden Globes Party hosted by Colin Callender, Chris Albrecht and Carolyn Strauss at Chateau Marmont on January 14, 2006 in Los Angeles, CA.”


"AI has declined to talk further about the video through her PR staff."
(Billy Farrell / Patrick McMullen photographed by Getty pictures) topshort Harvey Weinstein (c) arrived at the Manhattan Criminal Court in New York on October 11, 2018 for a hearing
"Zurich Film Festival 2016 will be held from September 22 to October 2."
(Andreas Lenz / Getty pictures) filmmaker Harvey Weinstein and actress Gwyneth Paltrow arrived at the south bank National Film Theatre in London for the 50th anniversary of NFT
"(YUI Mok PA images / PA images photographed by Getty pictures) Harvey Weinstein was escorted into the courtroom on Friday, May 25, 2018, New York."
"The film mogul turned himself in to the police earlier Friday."
(AP Photo / mark Lenihan) McGovern to Weinstein: we found you. Harvey Weinstein arrived in New York court, Tuesday, June 5, 2018. "
"Weinstein pleaded not guilty to the rape and sexual crimes act charges on Tuesday."
"Before the Manhattan hearing, the grand jury last week charged the former film tycoon with two women."
(AP Photo / Seth WEINIG) Los Angeles, California - January 14: (left right) Chris barks, mirasovino and Harvey Weinstein attend HBO's annual Golden Globe pre award party, hosted by Colin cullend, Chris Albrecht and Caroline straw, at Marmont castle on January 14, 2006 in Los Angeles, California



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I was aspiring to be in love with someone for the rest of my life and the rest of theirs, as we all do."”
“"I was in love and I think that's pretty evident," he said of the song.”
“Malik confirmed on the April 13 episode of On Air with Ryan Seacrest that his new single, "Let Me," was inspired by Hadid.”
“"She has such an incredible soul."”
“"Gigi and I had an incredibly meaningful, loving and fun relationship and I have a huge amount of respect and adoration for Gigi as a woman and a friend," Malik said at the time.”
“The couple had announced their split in March after two years of dating.”
“Malik and Hadid sparked reconciliation rumors earlier this month after Malik visited Hadid at home and was spotted leaving the next day in the same clothes, according to People.”
“"For Zayn, even if it is friendship he still wants Gigi in his life because she is the only one that really knows him," a source previously told the publication.”
“Malik sported a puffy black jacket, red hoodie and a new, shaved hairstyle.”
“AdvertisementHadid wore sunglasses and a black coat as she cozied up to Malik in Soho, according to Hollywood Life.”


"I long to fall in love with someone all my life, just like all of us."
"I'm in love, I think it's obvious," he said of the song
"Malik confirmed in" with Ryan Seacrest "on April 13 that the inspiration for his new single" let me do it "came from Hadid
"She has an incredible soul."
Malik said at the time: "my relationship with Gigi is very meaningful, full of love and fun. As a woman and friend, I have great respect and worship for Gigi."
"The couple broke up in March this year after two years of dating."
"According to people familiar with the matter, Malik visited Hadid at home earlier this month and was found wearing the same clothes to leave the next day. After that, Malik and Hadid triggered rumors of reconciliation."
"For zayn, even for friendship, he still wants Gigi in his life because she's the only one who really knows him," a source told the magazine earlier
Malik was wearing a puffy black jacket, a red Hoodie and a new haircut
According to Hollywood Life magazine, Hadid was wearing sunglasses and a black coat when he had intimate contact with Malik in Soho



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'”“Because you can see they’re sweating and they’re nervous because their kids are yelling and everyone’s mad at them,” said Reynolds, adding, “I’m the same way.””
““It takes only a few hours and it’s also kinda, sorta fun.”
“Ryan Reynolds is a real life superhero.”
“The dad of two posted a photo of himself Monday on Instagram after attending a CPR course, revealing that he once saved his nephew’s life because of the knowledge he gained.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Years ago, I took a CPR course thru the Red Cross,” he wrote in the caption.”
““And holy s—, I ended up saving my nephew’s life because I knew what to do!”
“True story!”“Yesterday I took a refresher course — focusing on infant and toddler CPR,” he continued.”
“Thank you to Dan from Viva First Aid for the lesson.”
“I remember before I had kids, I was always like, ‘God, that’s hard.”


"Because you can see they're sweating, they're nervous, because their kids are yelling, everyone's mad at them," Reynolds said. "So am I
"It's just a few hours, and it's fun."
"Ryan Reynolds is a real superhero."
"The father of two posted a picture on instagram on Monday after attending a CPR course, revealing that he had saved his nephew's life because he had learned knowledge."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A few years ago, I attended CPR classes through the Red Cross," he wrote in the title
"God, I finally saved my nephew's life, because I know what to do!"
"True story! "Yesterday I took a refresher course - focusing on infant cardiopulmonary resuscitation," he continued
"Thanks to Dan from Viva Emergency Center for the lesson."
"I remember before I had kids, I always said, 'oh my God, that's too hard.'"



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"It doesn't get any better," the 23-year-old Correa said.”
“"I've been thinking about it for months now, but I was waiting for the perfect opportunity, you know.”
“(1:46)Nights don't get much better than the one Carlos Correa had on Wednesday.”
“First, the star Houston shortstop became a World Series champion when the Astros toppled the Dodgers 5-1 in Game 7 in Los Angeles.”
“Then, while the Astros were celebrating on the Dodger Stadium field, Correa proposed to his girlfriend, who said yes.”
“"...”
“I was planning if we were World Series champions, I was going to do it right there," Correa said.”
“"I don't think that's a stage you can create; it just has to happen.”
“And we were able to win tonight, so perfect timing for me to get engaged.”
“I knew we had a great team, we could accomplish this, and I wasn't wrong."”


"Things are not getting better," said Correa, 23
"I've been thinking about it for months, but I'm waiting for a perfect chance, you know."
"(1:46) the night won't be much better than Carlos Correa's on Wednesday."
"First of all, in Game 7 in Los Angeles, when astro boy beat the Dodgers 5-1, the star Houston shortstop became the World Series champion."
"Then, while the astrologers were celebrating at dodge stadium, Correa proposed to his girlfriend, who agreed."
“"...”
"I was going to do it there if we were world champions," Correa said
"I don't think it's a stage you can create, it has to happen."
"We won tonight. It's the best time for me to get engaged."
"I know we have a great team and we can do that, and I'm not wrong."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kolstad is repped by APA, Circle of Confusion and Behr Abramson Levy.”
“Lionsgate retains all international and domestic distribution and home entertainment rights.”
“Starz and Lionsgate are teaming to develop The Continental, a television series adaptation of the highly successful Lionsgate film franchise.”
“The project was announced today during Starz’s portion of the TCA winter press tour.”
“The Continental will be set in the John Wick universe, focusing on the inner workings of the exclusive Continental Hotel which serves as a refuge for assassins.”
“StarzWriter/producer Chris Collins (Sons of Anarchy, The Wire, The Man in the High Castle) will write the series and serve as showrunner.”
“The team behind the film franchise will executive produce including John Wick star Keanu Reeves along with Thunder Road Pictures Basil Iwanyk the John Wick film franchise The Town Sicario Chad Stahelski John Wick co director and John Wick Chapter 2 director John Wick franchise screenwriter Derek Kolstad along with...”
“Collins and David Leitch John Wick co director Deadpool 2”
“Stahelski will direct the premiere episode.”
“It also was announced during Starz’s TCA session that Reeves would appear “at some point” in the series.”


"Colstad was replaced by APA, circle of chaos and Bel Abramson levy."
"Lion Gate reserves all rights of international and domestic distribution and family entertainment."
Starz and Lion Gate are working together to develop mainland, a TV series adapted from the very successful Lion Gate film series
"The project was announced today during Stuart's winter press conference with TCA."
"The mainland hotel will focus on the internal operation of the mainland hotel as a refuge for assassins against the background of John Wick's world."
"Star writer / producer Chris Collins (son of anarchism, wire, High Castle) will write the series and host the show."
"The team behind the film franchise will perform production including John wick star kenurives along with thunder road film basil ivank, John wick film franchise town sikario chadsta, herski, John wick co director and John wick chapter two director John wick, franchise screenwriter Derek colstad along with..."
"Collins and David rich John wick co directed" pool of death 2 "
"Starrski will direct the premiere."
"It was also announced at the TCA meeting at Starz that Reeves would be in the series" at some point. "



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, the Disney alum was most recently seen spending time with her friends in Sydney, Australia.”
“Weeknd her boyfriend of nearly 10 months...”
“As previously reported a source told Us exclusively earlier this month that Bieber and Gomez 25 pressed pause on their relationship mainly because of Selena s mom and her disapproval of Justin They dated on and off from 2011 to 2014 before reuniting in November after her split from The...”
“The pair were previously seen together while leaving Avenue nightclub in Hollywood with Abby, 21, and Schwarzenegger, 24, in the early hours of Friday, March 16, after attending the Midnight Sun premiere.”
“He was reportedly spotted with his arm wrapped around her waist as she danced on him.”
“He’s an amazing guy and an incredible artist.”An eyewitness told Entertainment Tonight that Bieber spent most of the night hanging out with Baskin in a VIP section.”
“I look up to him.”
“At the end of the show, the Canadian crooner hopped on stage to show some support for the British singer-songwriter, 36, telling the audience, “I got so much love for him.”
“Bieber, 24, and the 2014 Miss Alabama Teen USA winner, 22, attended Craig David’s concert at the Roxy Theatre in West Hollywood on Tuesday, March 20.”
“Us Weekly can reveal that she is model Baskin Champion, whose sister Abby Champion is dating Bieber’s BFF Patrick Schwarzenegger.”


Meanwhile, the Disney alumni was recently seen spending time with her friends in Sydney, Australia
"With her boyfriend of nearly 10 months..."
"As previously reported, earlier this month, a source told us exclusively that Bieber and Gomez asked to suspend their relationship on the 25th, mainly because of Selena's mother and her dissatisfaction with Justin. They met intermittently from 2011 to 2014, and then they met with her in November
"They were seen leaving the Hollywood street nightclub with Abby, 21, and Schwarzenegger, 24, in the early hours of March 16 (Friday) to attend the midnight sun premiere."
"It was reported that when she was dancing on him, he was found with his arm wrapped around her waist."
"He's a great man, an incredible artist." A witness told entertainment tonight that Bieber and Baskin spent most of the night in a VIP area
"I respect him."
At the end of the performance, the Canadian singer jumped onto the stage to show his support for the 36 year old British singer and songwriter, saying to the audience, "I love him very much."
On March 20, 24-year-old Bieber and 22-year-old Craig David, winner of Miss Alabama 2014, attended a concert at the Roxy theater in West Hollywood
American weekly can reveal that she is a model Baskin champion, and her sister Abby champion is dating Bieber's boyfriend Patrick Schwarzenegger



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From Adam Chitwoodadvertising...”
“...advertising Image via Marvel Studios Image via Marvel Studios Image via Marvel Studios Image via Marvel Studios Image via Marvel Studios Image via Marvel Studios Image via Marvel Studios Image via Marvel Studios Here s the official synopsis for Thor Ragnarok In Marvel Studios Thor Ragnarok Thor is imprisoned on...”
“Taika Waititi (Hunt for the Wilderpeople) directs what may just serve as something of a reboot for the character/franchise, with a story that somewhat ignores the Thor movies before it in favor of introducing a more comedic, less self-serious Thor.”
“The plot finds Chris Hemsworth’s title character removed from his hammer by the villainous Hela (Cate Blanchett) and thrown across the galaxy where he encounters an old friend (Hulk) and new frenemies (Jeff Goldblum’s Grandmaster and Tessa Thompson’s Valkyrie).”
“Thor must convince others to join him in stopping Hela from bringing an end to the galaxy once and for all.”
“...advertisingThese posters show off the dynamic palatte of the film, which is very much inspired by the art of Jack Kirby and offers a refreshing splash of fun to the Thor franchise.”
“You can check them out below, but first, don’t forget to read our extensive set visit coverage which has even more insight into what fans can expect.”
“Thor: Ragnarok also stars Tom Hiddleston, Karl Urban, Anthony Hopkins, and Idris Elba and opens in theaters on November 3rd.”
“Tickets are now available anywhere tickets are sold.”
“...the other side of the universe without his mighty hammer and finds himself in a race against time to get back to Asgard to stop Ragnarok the destruction of his homeworld and the end of Asgardian civilization at the hands of an all powerful new threat the ruthless Hela...”


"More ads from Adam Chitwood..."
“… Advertising pictures through Marvel studio pictures through Marvel studio pictures through Marvel studio pictures through Marvel studio pictures through Marvel studio pictures through Marvel studio pictures through Marvel studio pictures through Marvel studio pictures this is the official summary of the imprisonment of torragnarok in Marvel studio... "
"Taika waiiti directed a movie that might just restart the character / series. The story ignores the previous Thor movie to some extent and tends to introduce a more comic and less serious Thor."
"The plot finds that the hero of Chris Hemsworth is removed from the hammer by the evil Sheila (Kate Blanchett) and thrown to the other side of the galaxy, where he meets an old friend (Hulk) and a new friend (Jeff Goldbloom's grandfather and Tessa Thompson's valkiri)."
"Thor must persuade others to join him and prevent Sheila from ending the galaxy once and for all."
“… These posters show the dynamic taste of the film, which is inspired by the art of Jack Kirby and provides a refreshing pleasure for the Raytheon series
"You can see it below, but first of all, don't forget to read our extensive interview reports, which have a deeper understanding of fans' expectations."
Raytheon: ragnaro, also starring Tom sidleton, Carl urban, Anthony Hopkins and Idris Elba, will be released on November 3
"Now there are tickets everywhere."
“… On the other side of the universe, without his powerful hammer, he found himself racing against time, returning to Asgard to prevent ragnaro from destroying his home and the end of Asgard civilization, a powerful new threat in his hands, merciless Sheila... "



**Something goes wrong**
“During the final moments of the show – in a moment of spontaneous generosity – Ellen awarded Rippon with a cheque for $10,000 to aid Adam in his endeavor to help the disenfranchised.”
“AdvertisementThe 28-year-old said going to the Olympics allowed him to use a platform for the greater good, especially for LGTBQ youth.”
“The bronze-medal-winner opened up about the importance of providing a voice for people who may not have one, including his non-formal acquaintances in the LGBTQ community.”
“Adam said he’s still the “same old hot mess” he was ten years ago but now is life has “completely changed.”In addition to his crushes and personal life, Rippon revealed he has come to realize the importance of social and political activism in recent months.”
“Rippon said – while the audience laughed – “I know Harry will be upset.” He remarked, “I know, love is a funny thing.” Additionally, the athlete dished on how his life underwent a massive transformation after making it to the Olympics.”
“However, Rippon did have to jokingly concede that he knew such news would possibly break Harry’s heart.”
“When talking with Ellen, Adam said he was “sleeping on Shawn Mendes,” meaning he underestimated how much he liked him.”
“Rippon claimed Styles used to be high on the list, but he thinks Mendes is cuter, mostly because of his good looks.”
“Jake Gyllenhaal supposedly is the overall winner, but Mendes comes in at a close second place, and Harry takes third.”
“On Thursday’s episode of The Ellen DeGeneres show, the 28-year-old skater ran through the rankings of his most passionate celebrity infatuations.”


"At the end of the show - in a spontaneous moment of generosity - Allen gave Rippon a check for $10000 to help Adam try to help the disenfranchised."
"The 28 year old said that taking part in the Olympic Games allowed him to use a platform to serve the greater interests, especially the young people of lgtbq."
"The bronze medalist has publicly expressed the importance of giving voice to those who may not, including his informal acquaintances in the LGBTQ community."
Adam said he was still the "old mess" of ten years ago, but now his life "has completely changed.". In addition to obsession and personal life, Rippon revealed that in recent months, he has gradually realized the importance of social and political radicalism
Rippon said that when the audience laughed, he said, "I know Harry will be upset." He said, "I know that love is an interesting thing." In addition, the athlete also tells about the great transformation of his life after entering the Olympic Games. "
"However, Rippon had to admit jokingly that he knew such news might hurt Harry."
When Adam talks to Allen, he says he "sleeps on Sean Mendes," which means he underestimates how much he likes him
"Ripon claims that his former style is at the top of the list, but he thinks Mendes is more lovely, mainly because of his beauty."
"Jack Gyllenhaal was supposed to be the champion, but Mendes was close behind and Harry came in third
"On Thursday's Ellen DeGeneres Show, the 28 year old skater ranked his most avid celebrity obsession."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That’s what you did.”Though the women were co-existing calmly by the end of the episode, it appears the fight didn’t end there — the two have continued to feud on social media.”
“‘Cause from the moment that I introduced you, it’s like taking someone to a wedding and you deserted me at cocktail hour.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““After much reflection and Bravo’s support, I have decided that this will be my last season on The Real Housewives of New Jersey,” she said.”
““I am grateful to the network for allowing me to be part of this successful franchise and wish only the best for Teresa [Giudice], Melissa [Gorga], Dolores [Catania], Danielle [Staub] and Margaret [Josephs].”
“At this time I want to focus on my beautiful family my growing business and some exciting new projects Image zoom Credit Tommy Garcia Bravo NBCU Photo Bank via Getty RELATED VIDEO RHONJ s Danielle Staub Has Forgiven Teresa Giudice for Calling Her a Prostitution Whore 8 Years Ago Flicker...”
“50 joined the Bravo show in season 7”
“Her exit comes on the heels of a tense season, in which she’s feuded bitterly with Josephs, 50.”
“The drama came to a head during a group trip to Milan where Flicker — the only Jewish New Jersey Housewife — accused Josephs of being anti-Semitic after she made a controversial comment about Adolf Hitler.”
“(Flicker, whose father Dr. Mordecai Paldiel is Holocaust survivor, said Hitler’s name was a “trigger word” for her.)”


"That's what you do." Although at the end of the episode, the two women coexist peacefully, the battle does not seem to be over - the two continue to be at loggerheads on social media
"Because from the moment I introduced you, it was like taking someone to a wedding, and you abandoned me at cocktail time."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After careful consideration and Bravo's support, I decided that this would be my last season as a real housewife in New Jersey," she said
"I thank the Internet for making me part of this successful franchise and wish Teresa (Judith), Melissa (Gorga), Dolores (Catania), Danielle (stubb) and Margaret (Joseph) all the best."
"At this time, I want to focus on my beautiful family, my growing business and some exciting new projects picture scaling credit Tommy Garcia Bravo nbcu photo bank through Gatty related video rhonj s Danielle stubb has forgiven Teresa Giudice for calling her a prostitute 8 years ago..."
"50 people took part in the wonderful performance in the seventh season"
"Her exit followed a tense season in which she had a deep hatred with Joseph, 50
"The farce was staged during a group trip to Milan, where Flink, the only Jewish housewife in New Jersey, accused Joseph of anti Semitism after making a controversial comment on Adolf Hitler."
"Flinkett's father, Dr. moldkey pardier, a Holocaust survivor, said Hitler's name was her" trigger word. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know what you think of the announcements @CelebMix!”
“You go, Pink!”
“The singer has announced a 2018 tour, new single AND a new documentary all in one day!”
“She has been extremely busy with preparing for her tour, the release of her album as well as raising her two children with her husband Carey Hart.”
“She also recently received the Vanguard Award at this year’s MTV VMA’s which she accepted and made a beautiful speech regarding her daughter Willow.”
“Now the So What star is going to be releasing her seventh studio album Beautiful Trauma and will be going around North America on a 40-date tour in support of the record.”
“It will start off in 2018 on March 1st in Phoenix and finishes up on June 2nd in Los Angeles.”
“The tickets will go on sale on Friday, October 13th through Live Nation.”
“#VerifiedFan & AMEX Presales Start 10/10.”
“General On Sale Starts 10/13.”


"Let us know what you think of @ celebmix's announcement!"
"You go, pink!"
"The singer announced the 2018 tour, new singles and new documentaries in one day!"
"She's been busy planning tours, releasing albums and raising two children with her husband, Kelly Hart."
"She also recently won this year's MTV VMA Pioneer Award, which she accepted and gave a beautiful speech on her daughter Yangliu."
"Now, sowhatstar will release her seventh studio album, beautiful tramair, and will tour North America for 40 days to support that record."
"The competition will start in Phoenix on March 1, 2018 and end in Los Angeles on June 2, 2018."
The tickets will be available through live country on Friday, October 13
"Validation of fans and American Express pre-sale 10 / 10 start."
"Officially available on October 13."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Gomez cheered him on and took photos with fans from the bleachers.”
“Yesterday, the pair was spotted at two of their usual date spots—church and the hockey rink.”
“The pair was seen at a Hillsong Church service in LA, according to TMZ.”
“Fans caught them sitting together during the sermon, and Bieber even appeared to be stroking Gomez's hair.”
“The two showed less PDA when they were swarmed by paparazzi on their way out of the venue.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Later that evening, they made an appearance at Los Angeles Valley Ice Center in Ventura, California, according to People, for one of Bieber's hockey games.”
“The two were photographed as they were leaving the rink, too.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Gomez cheered him on and took a picture with the fans in the stands."
Yesterday, they were found dating at a church and hockey field
According to TMZ, the two were seen during a service at the hillsson Church in Los Angeles
"Fans found them sitting together while preaching, and Bieber even seemed to be stroking Gomez's hair."
"The two were surrounded by paparazzi on their way out of the venue, and the PDA display was less."
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
Later that evening, they appeared at the Los Angeles Valley Ice Rink in Ventura, California, for a field hockey game in Bieber, according to people
"They were also photographed as they left the rink."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The lipsticks, the full skincare line, the beauty bar and 88Fin clothing trickled down from that.””
“I’ll tell you firsthand that they very much loved each other.”
“They’re just not happy anymore.”
“I remember when her and Rob met, how they fell in love and how happy they were.”
““It wasn’t a mistake, it wasn’t an ‘entrapment,’ it wasn’t anything like that.”
““They both wanted to have Dream,” said Rose.”
“The two welcomed daughter Dream Renée last November, and in his recent Twitter spree, Kardashian accused Chyna of having a baby with him “out of spite.” But according to Rose, both Chyna and Kardashian genuinely wanted to have a child together.”
“...of the romance...”
“It was very real Given Chyna s complicated history with Kardashian s famous family she shares a 4 year old son with Kardashian s sister Kylie Jenner s former boyfriend Tyga news of her relationship with Kardashian which began in January 2016 launched an onslaught of speculation about the nature...”
““I was around when her and Rob first met.”


"Lipstick, complete skin care product series, beauty bar and 88Fin clothing are all from there."
"I'll tell you straight away that they love each other very much."
"They're just not happy anymore."
"I remember how they fell in love and how happy they were when she and rob met."
"It's not a mistake, it's not a trap, it's not like that."
"They all want to have a dream," Rose said
Last November, they met their daughter, dream Ren é e, and in a recent tweet, Kardashian accused Zina of having a baby with him "out of resentment.". But according to Ross, both Zina and Kardashian really want to have a baby together
“… Romantic... "
"This is very true, because Zina and Kardashian's famous family has a complicated history. She has a 4-year-old son with her sister, Kelly Jenner's ex boyfriend, TEGA. Her relationship with Kardashian began in January 2016. This news has triggered a lot of speculation about nature..."
"I was there the first time she and rob met."



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...cheered her on...”
“It will never be forgotten rockinriolisboa In the clip Lovato begins to cry as she sings the lyrics And I m sorry for the fans I lost who watched me fall again I wanna be a role model but I m only human Lovato got more emotional as the audience...”
““Thank you to everyone who has supported me throughout this journey.”
““Tonight I took the stage, a new person with a new life,” Lovato wrote alongside a clip of her performance at the Rock in Rio Lisboa festival on Sunday, June 24.”
““To the ones who never left me / We’ve been down this road before / I’m so sorry, I’m not sober anymore.”Three days later, she performed “Sober” live for the first time.”
““Mama, I’m so sorry I’m not sober anymore / And Daddy, please forgive me for the drinks spilled on the floor,” Lovato sings.”
“The Disney alum revealed in her powerful new song, “Sober,” released on Thursday, June 21, that she had relapsed.”
““The team that tats together stays together,” Lovato captioned the group tattoo photo on her Instagram Story.”
“The “Tell Me You Love Me” crooner, who has more than 20 tattoos on her body, revealed that multiple members of her team also got the new “Free” ink.”
“Lovato shared a selfie of the tattoo on her Instagram Story on Monday, June 25, but dated the photo Friday, June 22.”


“…… Cheer for her... "
"People will never forget that Lovato cried when singing the lyrics. I'm sorry for the fans I lost. They watched me fall down again. I want to be an example, but I'm just human. Lovato has become more emotional in the audience..."
"Thank you all for supporting me on this journey."
"I'm on stage tonight, a new man with a new life," Lovato wrote next to a performance clip at the Lisbon rock festival in Rio de Janeiro on Sunday, June 24
"To those who have never left me / we've been through this road / I'm sorry, I'm not awake anymore." Three days later, she performed "awake" live for the first time
"Mom, I'm sorry I'm not awake anymore / dad, please forgive me for spilling my drink on the floor," Lovato sang
"The Disney alumni revealed in her new song sober, released on June 21 (Thursday), that she had a relapse."
In her instagram story, Lovato added a title to the group tattoo photo: "the team that posts together is always together."
The "tell me you love me" singer, who has more than 20 tattoos, revealed that several members of her team have also received new "free" ink
"On Monday, June 25, Lovato shared a tattoo photo of himself on instagram, but the date was Friday, June 22."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'I will love you forever.'”
“'To be so young and to be accepted into that world at such an early age, it was like a high for me.'”
“...chin...”
“...his body Passion He says fell in love with drag after seeing his first show as a teenager The world famous drag queen says he started by getting injections in his face cheeks lips and a little bit in his...”
“Famous face Matthew pictured in April 2017 was a runner up on season two of RuPaul s Drag Race All Stars as well as a season five alum Keeping it real Matthew estimates that he has gallons of silicone in...”
“'If I had to put a number on the amount of silicone I have in my body, probably gallons,' he estimates.”
“Matthew says he met a man who was able to give him 'some alterations here and there, so I jumped on the opportunity and I jumped on the needle.'”
“'Then I started meeting all these other people who had these beautiful bodies and these gorgeous faces and they looked like aliens,' he explains, 'and I was like I want that.'”
“...to see those weird lumps the reality star explains I was like 17 years old wearing 10 inch platform heels and going to every bar in the city and people knew who I was he recalls...”
“'My lips were like huge and I could see them bouncing when I would walk around.'”


"I will always love you."
"It's like a thrill for me to be accepted by the world so young and so young."
“… Chin... "
“… He said that he fell in love with drag after watching his first performance as a teenager. The world-famous drag queen said that he began to give injections on his face, cheek and lips, and a little bit of it was in his heart
"The famous face that was photographed in April 2017, Matthew, was the runner up in the second season of rupaul all star rally, and also the alum of the fifth season. Matthew estimated that he had several gallons of silica gel in..."
He estimated that if I had to add a number to the silicon content in my body, it would be a gallon
"Matthew said he met a man and he could give him 'change everywhere, so I took this opportunity, and I took it."
"Then I began to meet other people who had beautiful bodies and beautiful faces, and they looked like aliens," he explained. "That's what I wanted to do."
“… Seeing those strange lumps, the reality TV star explained, "I'm like 17 years old, wearing 10 inch heels, going to every bar in town, and people know who I am, he recalled."
"My lips are so big that when I walk around, I can see them beating."



**Something goes wrong**
“It’s formulated with natural and organic ingredients, like antioixdants and rosehip oil, for a gentle yet effective treatment.”
“Courtesy of Birchbox100% Pure Organic Coffee Bean Caffeine Eye Cream ($26, birchbox.com)Not only does this pick contain caffeine from coffee beans, but it also uses green tea to de-puff undereyes while increasing circulation.”
“That would be coffee.”
“Saturday, Sept. 29, is National Coffee Day, and in celebration of the most important day of the year, I’ve rounded up the best caffeine-infused beauty products from Birchbox to wake you up and keep you going.”
“Ingesting coffee does one thing for your insides, but on your skin?”
“That’s a whole other (wonderful) story.”
““Coffee is useful in skincare because it’s rich in antioxidants that protect the skin, as well as caffeine to help the body get rid of excess fluid,” Dr. Joshua Zeichner, Director of Cosmetic and Clinical Research at Mount Sinai Hospital, tells Elite Daily.”
““Applying caffeine topically may improve the appearance of both cellulite and undereye puffiness, and by helping constrict blood vessels, it flushes away excess fluid that accumulates which makes the fat look more prominent,” he says.”
“Not only is coffee an anti-inflammatory, explains Zeichner, but it can help reduce redness, while antioxidants prevent skin damage from free radicals.”
““Topically applied, caffeine may help protect against some skin cancers at the molecular level,” he says.”


It is made up of natural and organic ingredients, such as oil repellents and Rosehip oil, which is a mild and effective treatment
Offer birchbox100% Organic Coffee Bean Caffeine Eye Cream ($26, birchbox.com "This kind of picking agent not only contains caffeine in coffee beans, but also uses green tea to remove fundus edema and increase blood circulation."
"That's coffee."
"Saturday, September 29th is national coffee day. To celebrate the most important day of the year, I collected the best caffeinated beauty products from birchbox to wake you up and move on."
"Coffee is good for your internal organs, but is it good for your skin?"
"That's quite another (wonderful) story."
Dr. Joshua zeckner, director of cosmetics and clinical research at Mount Sinai Hospital, told elite Daily: "coffee is very useful in skin care because it is rich in antioxidants that protect the skin and caffeine that helps the body excrete excess fluids."
"Topical caffeine improves the appearance of fat masses and fundus edema, and by helping constrict blood vessels, it washes away excess fluid that accumulates and makes the fat look more prominent," he said
Zeichner explained that coffee not only has anti-inflammatory effects, but also helps reduce redness and swelling, while antioxidants can prevent free radical damage to the skin
"Topical application of caffeine may help prevent certain skin cancers at the molecular level," he said



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MTVOne thing Kail didn't REALLY want to get into was...the timeline.”
“After the big reveal, fans were quick to wonder...what does Kailyn Lowry think of her ex-husband expecting another child?!”
“On her podcast, Coffee Convos, the Teen Mom 2 star didn't hold back.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MTVKail explained that she first asked her second baby daddy if his girlfriend was pregnant in person, but he denied it.”
“She claimed that she then called Javi hours later asking if Lauren was pregnant and he did confirm that she is expecting.”
“Source: MTV"I truthfully have no feelings towards them being pregnant.”
“I'm not mad, I'm not sad, I'm not happy, like I literally wish them the best and that's it," she added.”
“As previously reported, Kailyn revealed during the Teen Mom 2 reunion taping that she and Javi hooked up after he split with Briana DeJesus.”
“Source: MTVWhat do you think of Kail's thoughts on the pregnancy?”


"Let us know what you think!"
"The article continues in the following ad source: mtvone thing Kyle doesn't really want to get into is Time line. "
"After the big unveiling, fans soon want to know What does Karen lorry think of her ex husband having another child? "
"In her podcast" the coffee team, "the No. 2 star of the young mother didn't flinch."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: MTV Kail explains that she first asked the father of her second child if his girlfriend was pregnant, but he denied it."
"She claimed that a few hours later she called Javier and asked if Lauren was pregnant, and he did confirm that she was."
"Source: MTV" I really don't feel about their pregnancy
"I'm not angry, I'm not sad, I'm not happy, just like I really want the best of them, that's it," she added
"As previously reported, in the reunion video of teen mum 2, Karin revealed that she and Javier were dating after he broke up with Briana dejesu."
"Source: MTV, what do you think Kail thinks about pregnancy?"



**Something goes wrong**
“You’re more open and receptive to life experiences than you are at home.””
“...alum opened up about possibly having a second child with the Star Wars actor.”
“The Nashville actress, 36, was spotted shopping at Sweet Williams children’s clothing store.”
“She wore blue jeans, a black and white patterned blouse and carried a black messenger bag.”
“Us broke the news that Bilson and Christensen, 36, “have been on the outs for a couple of months.” The pair, who are parents of daughter Briar, 2, met on set of the 2008 film Jumper and got engaged that December.”
“They called off their engagement in 2010, but reconciled shortly after.”
““They are completely, officially done,” the source added to Us.”
““She’s full-time back in L.A. He’s in Toronto.”Last month, the O.C.”
““I may have another child, that’s still up in the air,” she told Lapalme Magazine’s Summer Issue at the time.”
“I think anytime you’re on location you feel like you’re away at summer camp in a way.”


"You are more open and receptive to life experiences than at home."
“…… Alum said publicly that she might have a second child with the Star Wars hero
The 36 year old Nashville actress was found shopping at swift Williams children's clothing store
"She's wearing blue jeans, a black-and-white shirt and a black messenger bag."
According to US media, 36 year old Bilson and Christensen have separated for several months. The couple, the parents of their 2-year-old daughter briar, met on the set of the 2008 movie "the jumper" and got engaged in December
"They cancelled their engagement in 2010, but they soon reconciled."
"They are completely, officially finished," the source added
"She's back in Los Angeles full time, he's in Toronto." Last month, O.C
"I may have another child, which is still up in the air," she told lapalme magazine when it was released in the summer
"I think whenever you're on location, you feel like you're a little bit away from summer camp."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Upon arranging a “personal,” assistants were required to clear or adjust any and all other scheduled plans which potentially conflicted with the “personal.”Assistants possessed copies of a document known as the “Bible,” an assistant-created guide to working for HW which was passed down through Assistants.”
“HW required his assistants to schedule “personals” for sexual activity both during the workday and after work.”
“HW’s assistants were compelled to take various steps to further HW’s regular sexual activity, including by contacting “Friends of Harvey” and other prospective sexual partners via text message or phone at his direction and maintaining space on his calendar for sexual activity.”
“...of this entourage was flown from London to New York to teach HW s assistants how to dress and smell more attractive to HW A second group of predominantly female employees served as his assistants...”
“At HW s direction TWC employed one group of female employees whose primary job it was to accompany HW to events and to facilitate HW s sexual conquests These women were described by some witnesses as members of HW s TWC roster or his wing women One of the members...”
“HW touted his connection to powerful political figures and asserted that he had contacts within the Secret Service that could take care of problems.”
“...do or words to that effect...”
“Specific examples of HW s harassment intimidation assault and a hostile work environment alleged in the complaint include among many others HW told several employees throughout the relevant time period that in substance I will kill you I will kill your family and You don t know what I can...”
“The investigation also included an exhaustive review of company records and emails.”
“The investigation included interviews with multiple company employees, executives, and survivors of Harvey Weinstein’s sexual misconduct.”


In arranging "private" work, the assistant must clean up or adjust any and all other plans that may conflict with "private" work. The assistant has a copy of a document called the Bible, which is a guide to working with hardware created by the assistant and passed down through the assistant
HW asked his assistant to arrange "personal" sexual activities on weekdays and after work
HW's aides were forced to take various measures to promote HW's normal sexual activities, including contacting "Harvey's friends" and other potential sexual partners by text message or phone, and making room for sexual activities on his calendar
“…… One of the entourage flew from London to New York to teach HW's assistant how to dress and smell more attractive to HW. The second group was mainly assisted by female employees.... "
"Under HW's guidance, TWC employs a group of female employees whose main job is to accompany HW to events and promote HW's sexual conquest. Some witnesses described these women as members of the HW TWC roster, or as one of the female members of its ailerons... "
"HW boasts that he has connections with powerful politicians and claims that he has contacts within the secret service who can handle problems."
“…… Do or say so... "
"Specific examples of HW's harassment, intimidation, attack and hostile working environment alleged in the complaint include, in many other cases, HW told several employees in the relevant time period that in essence I would kill you and your family, and you don't know what I can do..."
"The survey also includes a detailed review of company records and emails."
"The survey included interviews with employees, executives and survivors of Harvey Weinstein's sexual misconduct."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“But according to new reports, the royals may be about to move into bigger accommodation already.”
“It was recently revealed that Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank will live next door to Prince Harry and Meghan after their own royal wedding on October 12.”
“While Eugenie and Jack will live in Ivy Cottage on the Kensington Palace estate, it's extremely possible that Meghan and Harry will soon be moving out of their first home together, Nottingham Cottage.”
“But it's unlikely that the Duke and Duchess of Sussex will move very far.”
“Vanity Fair is reporting that while Meghan first settled into Harry's bachelor pad, she will soon be moving into a new marital home in Kensington Palace, following the extensive renovations of the apartment next door to Prince William and Kate Middleton.”
“Chris Jackson Getty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Per Vanity Fair, the renovations cost a jaw-dropping $1.8 million, to help make the 21-room Apartment 1 liveable.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"But according to the latest reports, members of the royal family may be ready to move into larger homes."
"It has recently been reported that Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank will live next door to Prince Harry and Megan after their royal wedding on October 12."
"Although Eugenie and Jack will live in the Ivy cottage at Kensington Palace estate, Megan and Harry are likely to move out of their first home, Nottingham cottage, soon."
"But the Duke and Duchess of Sussex are unlikely to go far."
Vanity Fair reports that although Megan is living in Harry's Bachelor's apartment for the first time, she will soon move into her new home in Kensington Palace with the extensive renovation of the apartment next to Prince William and Kate Middleton
"Chris Jackson Getty Images this content is imported from {embed name}."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"According to Vanity Fair magazine, the renovation cost $1.8 million to make the 21 room apartment livable."



**Something goes wrong**
“They believe he stole it and we're told it's likely he'll also be charged with theft.”
“And our sources say when Jacobs was apprehended cops say he had a sign-in sheet that security uses.”
“We're told Jacobs has repeatedly busted into the development to get at Kris since he was fired from his security job with the gated community.”
“He made it to the front of her house when Kris' private security detail pounced on the guy and held him until cops arrived.”
“Law enforcement sources tell TMZ, Joshua Jacobs broke the arm at the security gate in the Hidden Hills gated community where Kris lives.”
“EXCLUSIVEA fired security guard at Kris Jenner's home has been arrested for felony stalking, and we're told it's the 3rd time he's broken into the gated community to get at Kris.”


"They believe he stole it, and we are told that he is likely to be charged with theft as well."
"Our source said that when Jacob was arrested, the police said he had a sign in slip used by the security services."
"We have been told that since Chris was fired from security work in a closed community, Jacob has repeatedly broken into the development zone and attacked him."
"When Chris's private security personnel jumped on the man and detained him until the police arrived, he rushed to her door."
"Law enforcement sources told TMZ that Joshua Jacobs broke his arm at the security gate in the closed community of Yinshan where Chris lives."
"A fired security guard at Chris Jenner's house was arrested for felony tracking, and we were told that this was the third time he had broken into a gated community to attack Chris."



**Something goes wrong**
“'”He did however admit last week that he's open to dating one of his fans... so ladies, line up!”
“I’m not supposed to be with anyone right now.”
“Let it be.”
“Of course, seeing all those other artists and people in relationships, you think, ‘Maybe it would be nice; who would be great for me?’ And that’s when you realize: ‘This is wrong.”
““It hasn’t stumbled across me, and I’m not chasing it.”
““I’m not currently dating anyone, but it’s not because I don’t have time — I don’t know if I’d be dating anyone if I was home in Pickering, either,” he explains.”
“Shawn spoke with Variety recently to talk about his HUGE transformation from a Vine star to a pop-music sensation and also touched on his elusive love life, and why he's not in a relationship right now.”
“BUT, Shawn has his reasons.”


He admitted last week that he would like to date one of his fans... Ladies, line up
"I shouldn't be with anyone right now."
"Let it be."
"Of course, when you look at all the other artists and people, you think, 'maybe it will be good; who will be good to me?'"? Then you realize, "this is wrong."
"He didn't touch me, and I didn't chase him."
"I'm not dating anyone at the moment, but it's not because I don't have time - I don't know if I would date anyone if I were at Pickering's house," he explained
"Sean recently spoke to variety about his huge transformation from a grapevine star to a pop star, about his elusive love life and why he's not in love now."
"But Sean has his reasons."



**Something goes wrong**
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



**Something goes wrong**
“[Featured Image by Dave Kotinsky/Getty Images]”
“Kim will also show up on the new season of RHOA when it starts airing.”
“She started out on The Real Housewives of Atlanta and even has her own show now called Don’t Be Tardy.”
“Kim is returning to this season of RHOA and now she is speaking out about the one thing that is bad about having your entire life filmed.”
“E!”
“Online shared what Kim had to say about it all.”
“A new season of Don’t Be Tardy will start airing on Friday.”
“This show lets everyone get a glimpse into her everyday life.”
“News had to ask Kim what was hard about having the cameras around all the time.”


"[close up of Dave kottinsky / Getty pictures]"
"Kim will also show up when the new season of ROA starts."
"She started with real Atlanta housewives and even has her own show, now called don't be late
"Kim is going back to RhoA season, and now she says frankly that it's a bad thing to photograph your whole life."
“E！”
"Kim Jong Il's views on all this are shared online."
"The new season of don't be late starts on Friday."
"This program gives everyone a glimpse of her daily life."
"The press has to ask Kim what's the difficulty of having cameras around all the time."



**Something goes wrong**
““An hour later you’re going, ‘God, I can’t wait ’til they get home.’ ””
““There’s days where you go, ‘Oh my God, when does school start?’ ” he said.”
“Gwen Stefani and her kids opted for a less traditional spring break this year — rather than jet off to the tropics, they headed to Blake Shelton‘s home state of Oklahoma for some adventures in nature.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The No Doubt frontwoman, 48, documented the outdoor fun on her Instagram stories Monday.”
“A series of Boomerangs captured the children jumping off rocks into the water and floating along with the stream.”
“Out of the water, they had a blast burying themselves in the sand and riding ATVs.”
“Stefani, donning a green tank top and reflective aviator-style shades, also made sure to share a selfie.”
“She even appears to have captured Shelton in the wilderness despite his camo attire.”
“Along for the fun was Stefani’s goddaughter Stella, who proved to be a model in the making while posing for a shot on the singer’s Instagram page wearing camo overalls.”


"You're leaving in an hour." God, I can't wait for them to go home. "
"Sometimes you say, 'my God, when does school start? "He said
Gwen Stefani and her children chose a less traditional spring break this year. Instead of flying to the tropics, they went to black Shelton's home state of Oklahoma for some natural exploration
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"There is no doubt that the 48 year old actress recorded her outdoor anecdotes on instagram on Monday."
"A series of boomerangs caught the children jumping from the rocks into the water and floating with the stream."
"Coming out of the water, they buried themselves on the beach, riding ATV."
"Stefani, wearing a green vest and reflective pilot style sunglasses, must also share a selfie."
"Although Sheldon was in camouflage, she seemed to have captured him in the wilderness."
Stella, Stephanie's goddaughter, also took part in the event, posing as a model on instagram's home page in a camouflage costume



**Something goes wrong**
“US Weekly first broke the news.”
“Former cast mate Audrina Patridge welcomed her first child, daughter Kirra Max, last June, and Lauren Conrad is currently expecting her first child with husband William Tell.”
“...who is growing her little family...”
“Spencer and Heidi Pratt Tell All Although the MTV personality looked forward to building a future family with her 33 year old husband she admitted of Pratt I had to pray to get my husband to even agree to have a kid And Montag isn t the only Hills alum...”
“...priority and full time job RELATED VIDEO Is There a Mini Speidi on the Way...”
“Image zoom Credit Jason LaVeris FilmMagic I am writing a coffee table wife type of book it is more like a fun project something I enjoy doing and then I am getting ready to be a mom hopefully next year She explained So that is going to be my main...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Last September, Montag, 30, revealed to Faithwire that she was “hopeful” about the possibility of getting pregnant within the next year.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"US weekly first revealed this news."
"Former acting partner audienne partridge had her first child in June last year, and daughter Cora Max and Lauren Conrad are looking forward to their first child with husband William Tell."
“… She's supporting her family... "
"Spencer and Heidi Pratt tell everyone that although MTV's personality looks forward to building a future family with her 33 year old husband, she admits that Pratt, I have to pray for my husband to even agree to have a child. Montague is not the only alum..."
“… Priority and full time job related videos have a little speidi way... "
"Image zooming thanks to Jason Raffles film magic I'm writing a coffee table wife type book, which is more like an interesting project, something I love to do, and then I'm going to be a mom, hoping she explains next year, so this will be my main..."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"In September last year, Montague, 30, revealed to fiswell that she was' Hopeful 'about the possibility of pregnancy next year."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“<P> From left to right: Miguel Ferrer, aunt Mary Guilfoyle, Clooney, Mary McDonough and Rafi Ferrer.”
“"And I think that's what led him away from broadcasting generally and directly into film acting and filmmaking."”
“"But even there, George would find ways with humor to make it work for him.”
“<P> "It certainly affected him at the time," Nick Clooney said.”
“According to father Nick Clooney, his face was half paralyzed for several weeks and some remnants of the disease lasted months.”
“Courtesy Nick and Nina ClooneyBefore They Were Famous At 13, Clooney developed Bell's palsy, a temporary form of facial paralysis caused by damage to the cranial nerve.”
“"George and his glasses -- an experiment that did not work out," father Nick Clooney joked.”
“In middle school, Clooney was a nerdy-looking kid in glasses.”
“Courtesy of Nick and Nina ClooneyGeorge Clooney: Before He Was Famous Even the photogenic George Clooney had an awkward stage.”
“He was living in Columbus, Ohio, at the time.”


<P> From left to right: Miguel Ferrer, Aunt Mary gilfoyle, Clooney, Mary MacDonald and Rafael Ferrer
"I think that's why he came out of ordinary radio programs and went directly into the field of film performance and film production."
"But even there, George will try to use humor to make it useful to him."
"< p >" Nick Clooney said: "he must have been affected at that time."
"According to father Nick Clooney, his face was paralyzed for weeks, and some of the residual diseases continued for months."
"Thanks to Nick and Nina Clooney. Before they became famous at the age of 13, Clooney developed Bell's palsy, a temporary facial paralysis caused by cranial nerve injury."
"George and his glasses - an unsuccessful experiment," father Nick Clooney joked
"In high school, Clooney was a bookworm with glasses."
"Thanks to Nick and Nina Clooney: even George Clooney had an embarrassing stage before he became famous."
"He lived in Columbus, Ohio."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow the AllAboutTRH Podcast on iTunes & Soundcloud – Remember to Rate, Comment & Subscribe!”
“I’m so excited for RHOC to be back!”
“So, I’m thrilled to announce it’s finally here!”
“Woohooooo!”
“Fans should buckle up for a wild season filled will drama and betrayal!”
“As the season 13 trailer promises: “the line between love and hate, between loyalty and betrayal, completely disappears in the O.C.”This season returning Housewives Kelly Dodd, Vicki Gunvalson, Shannon Beador, and Tamra Judge will be joined by two new Housewives – Emily Simpson and Gina Kirschenheiter.”
“Check out the RHOC season 13 trailer below!”
“Season 13 of RHOC is set to premiere on Monday, July 16 at 9 pm.”
“The trailer looks really good!”
“Like AllAboutTRH On Facebook.”


"Follow allaboutthh podcasts on iTunes and Soundcloud - remember ratings, reviews and subscriptions!"
"I'm glad RhoC can come back!"
"So I'm happy to announce that it's finally here!"
"Hoo Hoo!"
"Fans should wear seat belts for a season of passion and betrayal
As the season 13 Trailer promises: "the boundaries between love and hate, loyalty and betrayal, disappear completely in O.C." Two new housewives, Emily Simpson and Gina kirshheit, will join this season's returning housewives, Kelly Dodd, Vicky gonwason, Shannon BIDO and Tamra gage
"Take a look at the following RhoC season 13 Trailer!"
"Season 13 of RhoC is scheduled to premiere at 9 p.m. on Monday, July 16."
"The trailer looks great!"
"It's like allaboutthh on Facebook."



**Something goes wrong**
“Watch the entire tutorial below.”
“Finish by filling in the brows and brushing them up and you are all done.”
“Every time Selena Gomez steps out on stage, we're left wondering how she does it.”
“With her flawless hair, to-die-for costumes and glammed-out makeup, it's easy to understand why she's the most followed person on Instagram.”
“Though the Kill em' With Kindness singer does not shy away from the spotlight, she isn't usually someone who dishes out her on-tour beauty secrets.”
“Until now.”
“Gomez's make-up artist, Melissa Murdick, recently released a quick video tutorial on how to recreate one of her most adored copper smokey eye looks from Selena's Revival Tour.”
“The best part?”
“There are only six easy-to-follow steps.”
“The #RevivalTour eye.”


"Watch the entire tutorial below."
"Finally fill your eyebrows, brush them clean, and you're done."
"Every time Selena Gomez comes on stage, we wonder how she did it."
"With her flawless hair, dying for clothes and makeup, it's easy to understand why she's the most watched person on instagram."
"Although the singer who" killed them with kindness "doesn't avoid the spotlight, she doesn't usually trumpet her beauty secrets on tour."
"Until now."
"Melissa murdick, Gomez's make-up artist, recently released a quick video tutorial on how to recreate one of Serena's favorite bronze smoke eyes in her Renaissance journey."
"The best part?"
"There are only six easy steps to follow."
"Our eyes"



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Prosecutors also allege both Hicks and Tamburo, 23, committed the robberies against victims who are over the age of 60, according to the criminal complaint obtained by Radar.”
“A judge on May 10 appointed a doctor to help determine the former Zeke and Luther star’s current mental state, said Ricardo Santiago, a spokesman for the Los Angeles District Attorney’s Office.”
“SEE THE SHOCKING COURT DOCS HERES.W.A.T.”
“...officers arrested Hicks and his girlfriend, aspiring actress Danni Tamburo, on January 24 after the troubled couple were linked to a string of robberies in Burbank, Calif.”
“According to Burbank Police officials, Hicks allegedly held a handgun up to a 52-year-old man and demanded his wallet.”
“As police were investigating the first robbery, three additional street robberies took place “within minutes of each other,” police officials said.”
“Hicks and Tamburo have been charged with three counts of felony attempted second-degree robbery and two counts of second-degree robbery.”
“Hicks is also facing allegations that he personally used a handgun during the robbery.”
“Hicks remains in Men’s Central Jail in lieu of $550,000 bail, while Tamburo posted $350,000 bail on February 6, according to court records.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Prosecutors also charged Hicks and tamburu, 23, with committing robbery. The victim was over 60 years old, according to the criminal complaint obtained by radar."
"On May 10, the judge appointed a doctor to help determine the current mental state of the former Zeke and Luther star," said Ricardo Santiago, a spokesman for the Los Angeles District Attorney's office
"Look at these shocking court papers."
"On January 24, Hicks and his girlfriend Danni Tamburo were arrested in connection with a series of robberies in Burbank, California."
"According to Burbank police officials, Hicks is said to have held a gun from a 52 year old man and demanded his wallet."
"When the police investigated the first robbery, there were three more street robberies" in a few minutes, "a police official said
"Hicks and tamburu are charged with three counts of attempted second degree robbery and two counts of second degree robbery."
"Hicks also faces charges that he personally used a pistol during the robbery."
"According to court records, Hicks is still being held in the men's central prison, instead of $550000 in bail, while tamburu paid $350000 in bail on February 6."



**Something goes wrong**
“Scroll through the gallery below to see Jenelle and David’s cutest moments as a couple!”
“Be sure to join our Teen Mom Facebook group to chat about all the latest updates and juicy gossip!”
“She said yes — to the dress!”
“This year has been pretty great to Jenelle Evans — so far in 2017, she’s given birth to her baby girl Ensley Jolie, got engaged to her fiancé David Eason, and now she’s getting married!”
“Shortly after she announced her wedding date, the Teen Mom 2 star tackled the next big step in the planning process — finding her perfect wedding dress!”
“The 25-year-old shared adorable snaps from her day spent wedding dress shopping in NYC for her September 23 nuptials.”
“Jenelle wore an off-the-shoulder white dress with lace detail to symbolize that she’s the bride, and she stopped to pose in front of rows and rows of racks filled with gorgeous wedding dresses.”
““It’s finally happening!” she wrote, and she later revealed that she chose a dress.”
“Next, she shared a photo of her wedding dress shopping squad, posing with two unidentified brunettes.”
“She said she brought her pals along to help, but many fans pointed out that Jenelle’s mom, Barbara Evans, was noticeably absent from such a special occasion.”


"Scroll down to the gallery to see the loveliest moments of Janel and David as a couple!"
"Be sure to join our teen mom Facebook group and share all the latest updates and interesting gossip!"
"She agreed - yes, the skirt!"
"This year has been great for Jenelle Evans - since 2017, she has given birth to a baby girl, ensley Jolie, and is engaged to her fiance, David eason. Now she's getting married!"
"Shortly after she announced her wedding date, the No.2 star of the teenage mother set out to plan the next important step in the process - to find her perfect wedding dress!"
"The 25-year-old shared a lovely snapshot of her wedding dress purchased in New York on September 23."
"Jenelle is wearing a white dress with off the shoulder and lace details, symbolizing that she is the bride. She stops to pose in front of a row of hangers full of gorgeous wedding dresses."
"It happened at last! "She wrote and later revealed that she had chosen a skirt."
"Next, she shared a picture of a wedding dress shopping team with two unidentified brunettes."
"She said she brought her friends to help, but many fans pointed out that Janel's mother, Barbara Evans, was obviously absent from such a special occasion."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Family is everything: Khloe, who is almost six months pregnant with her first child, showed off her baby bump at her mom Kris' Christmas Eve bash; Khloe with Kris and Kendall JennerSister, sister: Kylie, who is also pregnant, posed with Khloe at the Sunday party...”
“Kourtney sandwich!”
“The reality star, 37, styled the frock completely different than how it debuted on the runway 20 years prior at the Autumn/Winter ready to wear collection for the luxury label, according to AOL.”
“Meanwhile, earlier in the week at this year's annual family Christmas Eve bash, Kim wowed in a vintage 1997 Dior mini dress.”
“Another iconic moment was captured when Kris, Kim's mom, posed with JLo's mother Guadalupe Rodríguez posed for a snap while chatting on a couch together.”
“...referring to the initial confusion over being videotaped.”
“JLo could be heard exclaiming 'why does this always happen to me?'”
“...star panned up from JLo s shoes to show her glittering outfit as she can be heard saying Who else would organize a taco Wednesday in this dress this girl...”
“Kim got a snap with her sister Kourtney and Jennifer Lopez at the party Oops Kim appeared to have slyly tricked her host along with what appeared to be Joan Collins by revealing they were being video taped rather than photographed for a group shot In one video the reality...”
“While Kim appeared to have slyly tricked her host along with what appeared to be Joan Collins by revealing they were being video taped rather than photographed for a group shot.”


"Family is everything: Khloe, who is nearly six months pregnant with her first child, shows her little lump at Kris's Christmas Eve party; Khloe, Kris and Kendall Jenner's sister, sister: Kylie, who is also pregnant, takes a picture with Khloe at a Sunday party..."
"Courtney sandwich!"
According to AOL, the 37 year old reality star has designed the dress in a totally different style from its debut on the runway of the luxury brand's autumn and winter ready to wear collection 20 years ago
At the same time, at the annual family Christmas Eve party earlier this week, gold's 1997 Dior Vintage miniskirt was a hit
"Another iconic moment was captured when Chris, King's mother, posed with JLO's mother, Guadalupe Rodriguez, and chatted on the sofa."
“… It refers to the initial confusion about being videotaped. "
"JLO can be heard shouting 'why does this always happen to me?'"
“… The star came out of JLO's shoes to show off her shining clothes, because she could hear her say, "who else would organize a taco Wednesday to wear this dress, this girl..."
"Kim took a snapshot at the party with his sisters Kourtney and Jennifer Lopez. Gee, Kim seems to have cunningly cheated her master and the people who seem to be Joan Collins, revealing that they were recorded instead of the real photos taken in a video... "
"And Kim seems to have cunningly deceived her master and what it seems is Joan Collins revealed that they are being videotaped, not photographed for a group."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This story first appeared on Billboard.com.”
“Watch Camila Cabello, Jimmy Fallon and The Roots sing "Havana" on classroom instruments below.”
“In the U.S. and the U.K., it's challenging current leader The Greatest Showman for the top spot on the respective albums charts.”
“Her debut album, Camila, dropped Friday, and it's poised for a big splash on sales charts around the globe.”
“The former Fifth Harmony singer should be laughing it up right now.”
“The pop star tackled the lemon shaker and took lead vocals; host Jimmy Fallon tried his hand at the wood block, bass drum and Casio keyboard; and Questlove looked at ease on the hand clappers.”
“Cabello dropped by The Tonight Show studios for a performance with classroom instruments of her international hit "Havana."”
“She may be one of the hottest artists in pop right now, but Camila Cabello isn't too cool for school.”
“The pop artist tackled the lemon shaker and took lead vocals, while Fallon played a wood block, bass drum and Casio keyboard.”


"This story first appeared in Billboard.com Website. "
Watch Camilla Cabello, Jimmy Fallon and roots sing "Havana" on the classroom instruments below
"In the U.S. and the U.K., it's a challenge to be the current leader, the biggest presenter, at the top of their respective album charts."
"Her debut album, Camilla, fell on Friday and is expected to shine on the global sales charts."
"The former fifth harmonic singer should be laughing now."
The pop star took over the lemon shaker as the lead singer; the host, Jimmy Fallon, tried to play with wood blocks, bass drums and Casio keyboards; and queistrov took it easy on the clappers
Cabello came to the studio of tonight's show to perform with the classroom instruments of her international pop song "Havana"
"She may be one of the hottest artists in pop music, but Camilla Cabello is not so cool for the school."
The pop singer composes and leads in a lemon shaker, while Fallon plays wooden blocks, bass drums and Casio keyboards



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scathing Responses To President s Tweets...”
“The #PuberMe campaign is a positive and lighthearted way to bring awareness and aid to Puerto Rico and everyone affected by the recent hurricanes.”
“In return, here's me trying to look like a tough guy because I hadn't yet hit #puberme.”
“#PuberMe #PuertoRicoRelief pic.twitter.com/UC9a7XtjZa — Stephen Colbert (@StephenAtHome) September 28, 2017Thank you Stephen.”
“So here's me lookin' cool as hell!”
“Nick Kroll asked me to post a pic of my awkward stage, but I never had one.”
“Judd Apatow’s is reminiscent of Freaks and Geeks while Steve Martin’s is very…beardy.”
“This included enjoyable snapshots of Kroll’s Oh Hello and Big Mouth co-star John Mulaney and Sarah Silverman.”
“After Colbert and Kroll shared their pics, others started rolling in.”
“Jennifer Lopez donated $1 million and continues to support while Beyonce lent her voice to a remix of J Balvin and Willy William’s “Mi Gente” with the proceeds from the song going to hurricane relief efforts.”


"A stern response to the president's twitter..."
"The adolescent movement is a positive and relaxed way to bring awareness and assistance to Puerto Rico and everyone affected by the recent hurricane."
"In return, I try to look like a tough guy because I'm not yet adolescence."
"Puberty and puerperium" pic.twitter.com/UC9a7XtjZa -Stephen Colbert (@ Stephen athome) September 28, 2017 thank you, Stephen. "
"So I look cool!"
"Nick Kroll asked me to post a picture of my embarrassing stage, but I never did."
"Judd apato's books are reminiscent of geeks and geeks, while Steve Martin's books are very Beard. "
"This includes a delightful snapshot of Croll's" Oh, Hello, big mouth "co stars John Mulani and Sarah Silverman."
"After Colbert and Kroll shared their photos, others began to join in."
"Jennifer Lopez has donated $1 million and continues to support Beyonce in mixing her voice with J. Baldwin and Willie Williams' mighty, the proceeds of which will be used for hurricane relief work."



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Chris Pratt and the 'Jurassic World' Cast Share Favorite Lines from the Original This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Chris Pratt and Bryce Dallas Howard Dish on Having Kids on 'Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom' Set (Exclusive) This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Strength and intelligence can be weapons, and do not wield them against the weak -- that makes you a bully."”
“If you're strong, be a protector, and if you're smart, be a humble influencer.”
“In this real world it is illegal to slap people, [but] don't take advantage of that fact.”
“3, don't be a turd.”
“No.”
“2, you have a soul, be careful with it.”


If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Chris Platt shared his favorite original lines with the actors of Jurassic world. This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor information."
"Chris Pratt and Bryce Dallas Howard dish's video on having a baby in Jurassic world: Fallen Kingdom (exclusive) is not available because we can't load the sponsor information."
"Strength and wisdom can be weapons. Don't use them against the weak - it will make you a bully."
"If you are strong, be a protector; if you are smart, be a humble influencer."
"In the real world, it's illegal to slap someone in the face, but don't take advantage of that fact."
"3. Don't be silly."
"No
"2. You have a soul. Be careful of it."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...school football drama All American In the Dark and a spinoff of The Originals titled Legacies...”
“The returning series are Dynasty Supernatural Crazy Ex Girlfriend Jane The Virgin Black Lightning The Flash Supergirl DC s Legends of Tomorrow Arrow Riverdale and The 100 The network has also ordered five new shows to series reboots of Charmed and Roswell which is titled Roswell New Mexico the high...”
“This comes on the heals of the CW’s midseason freshman drama “Life Sentence” getting canceled along with the military drama “Valor.”The CW has renewed 11 series for the 2018-19 television season.”
“The series, which is currently airing its fourth season, is averaging a 0.25 rating in the 18-49 demo and 771,000 live viewers.”
“The show hails from Warner Bros. Television.”
“Thomas serves as executive producer alongside Diane Ruggiero-Wright, Danielle Stokdyk and Dan Etheridge.”
“David Anders, Robert Buckley, Malcolm Goodwin, Rahul Kohli and Aly Michalka also star.”
“...their deaths...”
“Created by Rob Thomas the network describes the series as the only rom com zom dram It stars Rose McIver as an undead medical examiner who is able to help the Seattle police department solve homicides by eating the brains of the deceased and seeing visions of the moments before...”
““iZombie” has been renewed for a fifth season at the CW.”


“… The derivative works of the campus football drama "America in the dark" and the original book "heritage"
"The return series is dynasty supernatural crazy ex girlfriend Jane virgin black lightning flash super girl DCS legend tomorrow arrow Riverdale and 100 network also ordered five new program series to restart magic and Roswell, which is titled Roswell New Mexico high..."
"This is when CW's mid season freshman drama" life imprisonment "and military drama" bravery "are cancelled together. CW has continued 11 series for the 2018-19 TV season. "
"The show is currently on air in the fourth quarter, with an average audience rating of 0.25 in 18-49 auditions and 771000 live viewers."
"This program is from Warner Bros
"Thomas worked as executive producer with Diane Ruggiero Wright, Danielle stockdick and Dan Ethridge."
"David Anders, Robert Barkley, Malcolm Goodwin, Rahul Corley and Ali Michalka are also stars."
“… Their death... "
"The network created by Rob Thomas describes the series as the only undead coroner played by rose McIver, who can help the Seattle police department solve homicide cases by eating the brains of the dead and seeing the visions of the moment before..."
"Isambie" has renewed its contract for the fifth season at CW



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Kate Storey Esquire Writer-at-Large Kate Storey is a Writer-at-Large for Esquire covering culture, politics, and style.”
“The Time's Up Legal Defense Fund combats harassment and pay inequities in Hollywood and other industries.”
“WME, the agency that represents Wahlberg, Williams, and the movie's director Ridley Scott, agreed to pledge an additional $500,000 to Time's Up.”
“Anthony Rapp, for all the shoulders you stood on, now we stand on yours."”
“"Today is one of the most indelible days of my life because of Mark Wahlberg, WME and a community of women and men who share in this accomplishment.”
“If we truly envision an equal world, it takes equal effort and sacrifice," Williams said in a statement to ELLE.com.”
“My fellow actresses stood by me and stood up for me, my activist friends taught me to use my voice, and the most powerful men in charge, they listened and they acted.”
“"Today isn’t about me.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Kate storry is a writer for gentleman magazine, covering culture, politics and style."
"The time's up legal defense fund combats harassment and pay inequality in Hollywood and other industries."
"WME, the agency representing wolfberg, Williams and the film's director, Radley Scott, has agreed to pledge another $500000 to time."
"Anthony Rapp, you're on my shoulders, and now we're on your shoulders."
"Today is one of the most unforgettable days of my life, because mark wolberg, WME and a community where men and women share this achievement."
"If we really envision an equal world, we need to make the same effort and sacrifice," Williams said in a statement ELLE.com Website. "
"My fellow actresses stood beside me and stood up for me. My rights friends taught me to use my own voice. The most powerful people in power listened and acted."
"It's none of my business today."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See More: Arie Luyendyk Jr. and Lauren Burnham Had a Joint Bachelor and Bachelorette Party in Las Vegas...”
“"I can't wait for her to come."”
“The couple celebrated the impending arrival of their baby girl with an activity-filled baby shower on Saturday.”
“Burnham’s friends Sarah Stidham and Kayla Evangelista hosted the shower, where everyone was invited to join in on the fun, Entertainment Tonight reports.”
“There were traditional games, like a baby bottle chugging competition and having the couple guess who would be better at certain parenting activities, like singing lullabies.”
“They also had one activity that was totally out of the box: The parents-to-be set up a sonogram machine so that fellow moms to be could check out their own buns in the oven.”
“Luyendyk and Burnham met on the 22nd season of The Bachelor in 2017 and wed in Hawaii in January.”
““I made some bad decisions but the best decision was running back to you,” the reality star said before he proposed with—what else?—a ring from Neil Lane.”
““I truly believe you are my soul mate.”
“I’m ready to face this life with you and all that comes with it.”


"More information: Little Ali luyandick and Lauren Burnham have a bachelor and bachelor party in Las Vegas..."
"I can't wait for her to come."
"On Saturday, the couple held a vigorous baby shower to celebrate the arrival of the baby girl."
"Burnham's friends Sarah steadham and Keira Evangelista hosted the shower, and everyone was invited to the entertainment tonight."
"There are some traditional games, such as baby bottle competition, which let couples guess who is better at some parenting activities, such as singing lullaby."
"They also have an activity that's completely out of the box: having parents install an ultrasound scanner so mothers to be can check their buns in the oven."
"Luyendyk and Burnham met in 2017's singles season 22 and got married in Hawaii in January this year."
"I made some bad decisions, but the best one was to run back to you," the reality star said, and then what did he come up with? -Neil Lane's ring. "
"I really believe you are my soul mate."
"I'm ready to face life with you and everything that comes with it."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Soules attempted to resuscitate Mr. Mosher and remained on the scene with him until emergency medical personnel arrived.””
“Despite all the nasty things that have been going on with the star, he was all smiles posing for the picture for the O’Reilley’s employee.”
“The former Bachelor star has come out of his hiding place oddly enough to stop at an O’Reilly’s Auto Parts in Iowa this Wednesday.”
“Soules was pretty friendly with the press, and we really seemed in a good mood at the moment.”
“He chatted with some customers and employees during his errand.”
“There was one very excited employee who told the 35-year-old that she always wanted to meet him and she also asked him to pose a photo which he did.”
“Earlier this week, he pleaded not guilty for leaving the scene of the accident in April.”
“The auto parts employee posted a photo on her Instagram account saying that he was her sweet customer from that day.”
“She received some backlash for her Instagram post and then she posted an emotional message on her Facebook account for the whole world to see as she was asking for compassion and love.”
“AdvertisementHis lawyers said in a statement last month that Soules was the one that contacted the police and, “during the call, he clearly identified himself and explained his role in the terrible accident.”


"Sules tried to bring Mr. Mosher back to life and stay with him until the paramedics arrived."
"Despite all the annoying things that have happened to the star, he still poses for aureli's employees with a smile on his face."
"The former bachelor star came out of his hiding place and stopped at an O'Reilly auto parts store in Iowa on Wednesday."
"Sules is quite friendly to the media and we seem to be in a really good mood at the moment."
"He chats with some clients and employees when he's on a business trip."
"A very excited employee told the 35 year old that she always wanted to see him, and she asked him to put up a picture, and he did."
"Earlier this week, he pleaded not guilty for leaving the scene of the accident in April."
"The auto parts employee posted a picture on her instagram account saying that he had been her sweet customer since that day."
"Her post on instagram caused some repercussions, and then she posted an emotional message on her Facebook account, letting the world see her praying for sympathy and love."
In a statement last month, his lawyer said sours was the person who contacted the police. "During the call, he clearly identified himself and explained his role in the terrible accident."



**Something goes wrong**
“Newshub.”
“They are waiting for tests results to come back and then they would know more."”
“"It is so bad.”
“"They are not sure she is going to recover from or make it at this point," an unnamed source told Radar Online.”
“Miller is reportedly undergoing chemotherapy, and Radar Online reports the cancer has not been responding to treatment as doctors hoped.”
“After her diagnosis the plans were then changed to focus more on her treatment, but it quickly became clear this would not be possible.”
“A source told the website Miller, 51, had agreed to go back to the show on the condition teenage dancers Nia Sioux, Kendall Vertes, Kalani Hilliker, Cameron Bridges and Chloe Lukasiak did not return.”
“Radar Online says there had been plans to return with a smaller team for a new season of Dance Moms after Miller was released from prison.”
“She had been serving a one-year sentence for bankruptcy fraud, concealment of bankruptcy assets and false bankruptcy declarations.”
“Miller was reportedly diagnosed with non-Hodgkin lymphoma shortly after being released from prison in March.”


"News center."
"They are waiting for the test results to come out, and then they will know more."
"Too bad."
"They're not sure if she can recover from that," a source told radar online on condition of anonymity
Miller is reported to be undergoing chemotherapy, and radar online reports that the cancer is not responding to the treatment as doctors would like
"After her diagnosis, the plan was changed to focus more on her treatment, but it soon became clear that it was impossible."
"A source told the website that Miller, 51, has agreed to return to the show on the condition that teenage dancers niasu, Kendall Vettes, kalanishlik, Cameron bridges and Chloe lukasiak do not return."
"Radar online said that after Miller got out of prison, there were plans to bring a smaller team back to participate in the new season of dance mom."
"She was sentenced to one year's imprisonment for bankruptcy fraud, concealment of bankruptcy assets and false bankruptcy declaration."
"Miller was reported to have been diagnosed with non Hodgkin's lymphoma shortly after his release from prison in March."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’ll be looking forward to it,” William joked at the Greenhouse Sports Centre in London on Thursday.”
“Revenge is sweet.”
“Prince William and Duchess Kate celebrated their seventh wedding anniversary on Sunday, April 29, and Kensington Palace commemorated the occasion with an adorable photo of the couple from their wedding day.”
““Seven years ago today – thank you for all the lovely messages on The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge’s wedding anniversary!,” the Palace captioned an Instagram pic, which shows the then-newlyweds driving away from Buckingham Palace in a convertible.”
“The royal couple, who tied the knot in 2011, left their wedding reception in a blue vintage Aston Martin Volante, which belongs to the groom’s father, Prince Charles.”
“The car was decorated by William s best man his brother Prince Harry and it was adorned with red heart balloons balloons with their initials and a license plate with the words JU5T WED The pair received quite the anniversary present this year they welcomed their third child less than...”
“...a week ago...”
“The Duchess of Cambridge gave birth to Prince Louis Arthur Charles in London on Monday, April 23.”
“The baby, who is fifth in line to the British throne, weighed 8 pounds, 7 ounces.”
“They are also the parents of Prince George, 4, and Princess Charlotte, 2.”


"I'll be looking forward to that," William joked at the London greenhouse Sports Centre on Thursday
"Revenge is sweet."
On Sunday, April 29, Prince William and Duchess Kate celebrated their seventh wedding anniversary. Kensington Palace commemorated the occasion with a lovely picture of their wedding day
"Seven years ago today - thank you for the lovely message you sent me on the wedding anniversary of the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge!"! "The palace added a caption to an instagram picture showing the newlyweds driving their convertible out of Buckingham Palace."
"The royal couple got married in 2011, leaving behind a blue old-fashioned Aston Martin Volante from the groom's father, Prince Charles."
"The car was decorated by Prince William's best man, his brother Prince Harry. The car was decorated with red heart balloons with initials on the balloon and" ju5t wed "on the license plate. The couple received quite a lot of anniversary gifts this year, and they were less than We have a third child. "
“… A week ago... "
On Monday, April 23, the Duchess of Cambridge gave birth to Prince Louis Arthur Charles in London
The baby, the fifth in line to the throne, weighed eight pounds and seven ounces
"They are also the parents of 4-year-old Prince George and 2-year-old Princess Charlotte."



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I guess it’s an American cultural thing, but personally, it’s exciting.””
“[But] it’s such a strange feeling when people, like, applaud it like it’s this accomplishment.”
““It’s incredible for my relationship to be engaged.”
““It’s extremely exciting,” she said.”
“RELATED VIDEO: The Most Painful Ballet Boot Camp You’ve Ever Seen!”
“The dancer told PEOPLE in November she was thrilled to be engaged to Evans, but finds the excitement over engagements a little silly.”
“I just want to enjoy the day, and not have it be about the preparation,” she said.”
““I think I’m a pretty simple girl, so I like for there to be no drama.”
““I’m super busy so I have amazing people taking care of a lot of stuff.”Rather than focusing on the little details, Copeland said she just wanted to have fun.”
“It’s happening this summer so it’s very soon,” Copeland said.”


"I think it's something of American culture, but personally, it's exciting."
"(but) it's a strange feeling when people applaud this achievement like applause."
"My engagement is incredible."
"It's so exciting," she said
Related video: the most painful ballet training camp you've ever seen
"The dancer told people in November that she was happy to be engaged to Evans, but she thought the excitement of engagement was a bit silly."
"I just want to enjoy the day, not to prepare," she said
"I think I'm a very simple girl, so I like no drama."
"I'm too busy, so I have a lot of great people to deal with a lot of things." Copland said she didn't want to focus on the details, but wanted to have fun
"It happened this summer, so it will happen soon," Copland said



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This past school year more than 875 California schools in the WE Schools program made an incredible impact in their own backyards and in communities around the world through their commitment and passion for change.””
“Standing in a stadium full of passionate youth will affirm your belief that real change can happen — and is happening every single day right here in California.”
“...for a better tomorrow...”
“She scored her first Vogue cover for the April 2017 issue and has been promoting the Netflix series she produced 13 Reasons Why WE Day according to its founder Craig Kielburger celebrates the amazing young people who have taken action at home and around the world to create sustainable change...”
“Gomez has been making a calculated return to the spotlight since releasing her “comeback” record, “Revival,” in October 2015.”
“Lovato was also in attendance last year, as were Charlize Theron and Joe Jonas.”
“Other VIP appearances are expected to include Demi Lovato, Bryan Cranston, Lily Collins, Magic Johnson, DJ Khaled, Miss Piggy and Alessia Cara.”
“I am grateful to be a part of such a supportive community and hope I can inspire the kids at WE Day just as they continue to inspire me.“She will be joined by Alicia Keys, who will perform.”
““The electricity of an arena full of thousands of young people who are making real change in the world is like nothing I’ve ever experienced.”
“She was one of the performers at last year’s event.”


"In the past academic year, more than 875 California schools have participated in our school program, and through their commitment and enthusiasm for change, they have had an incredible impact in their own backyards and communities around the world."
"Standing in a stadium full of passionate young people, you will firmly believe that real change can happen - and it happens every day in California."
“… For a better tomorrow... "
"She appeared on the cover of vogue magazine in April 2017 for the first time, and has been promoting the Netflix series. She made 13 reasons for our days, and according to Craig kielburger, its founder, she pays tribute to outstanding young people who have taken action to create sustainable change at home and around the world..."
"Gomez has been returning to the spotlight in an orderly way since he released his" comeback "album Renaissance in October 2015."
"Lovato joined last year, and so did Charlize Theron and Joe Jonas."
"Other VIP appearances are expected to include Demi Lovato, Brian Cranston, Lily Collins, Magic Johnson, DJ Khalid, Miss Piggy and alexia Carra."
"I appreciate being part of such a supportive community and hope that I can inspire my children in our days just as they continue to inspire me." Alicia case will play with her. "
"An arena is full of thousands of young people who are making real changes in the world, which I have never experienced before."
"She was one of the performers at last year's event."



**Something goes wrong**
“Hit the comments!”
“Got casting tips?”
“Thoughts on Riverdale‘s decision to give Reggie a facelift?”
“On Monday, we reported that Pitch‘s Mark Consuelos has signed on to play Veronica’s heretofore-unseen dad Hiram Lodge, although his casting is in second position to Fox’s on-the-bubble baseball drama.”
“The Reggie recast is the second significant piece of Riverdale Season 2 news to break in as many days.”
“And of course we all wish Ross the best.”Butler is a series regular on Netflix’s breakout hit 13 Reasons Why, which is a lock to get a Season 2 pickup.”
“Those are big shoes to fill, but we’re confident we can find an actor who is as funny and sexy as Ross.”
“— and because Ross is unavailable to come back to Riverdale, we’re looking for a new Reggie.”
““[Next season], we want more Reggie on our show — he’s Archie’s rival!”
“10 Shows on the Bubble“We love what Ross did with the role of Reggie [this season], but because of his commitments to other projects, we couldn’t use him nearly as much as we would have liked,” series creator Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa said in a statement to TVLine.”


"Click comment!"
"Do you have casting skills?"
"The idea that Riverdale decided to give Reggie a facelift?"
"On Monday, we reported that mark Consuelos of the stadium had signed up to play Veronica's hitherto unseen father, Hiram Lodge, even though his cast was second only to Fox's" bubble baseball. "
"Reggie's recasting is the second big part of the second season news in Riverdale, which has been reported for so many days."
"Of course, we all want Ross to go well." Butler is a regular on Netflix's "13 reasons" series, which is the key to second season ratings
"These are big shoes to fill, but we are confident that we can find an actor who is funny and sexy Ross."
"And because Ross can't go back to Riverdale, we're looking for a new Reggie."
"(next season), we hope to have more reggies on the show - he's arch's opponent!"
"We like what rose did when he played Reggie [this season], but because of his commitment to other projects, we can't use him as much as we would like," show creator Roberto Aguirre sacasa said in a tvline statement



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“5: Why That Number Is Important to Them This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Chip and Joanna Gaines Are Expecting Baby No.”
“5Chip and Joanna Gaines Share New Restaurant is 'Getting So Close' -- See the Pics!”
“5 Post-'Fixer Upper'Pregnant 'Fixer Upper' Star Joanna Gaines Shares Sonogram of Baby No.”
“RELATED CONTENT:Everything Chip and Joanna Gaines Have Told Us About Welcoming Baby No.”
“See more in the video below.”
“5 in January.”
“InstagramInstagramGaines and her husband, Chip, announced they were expecting baby No.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"5: why is this number important to them? This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's message."
"Chip and Joanna Gaines are pregnant, No."
"5 chip and Joanna Gaines share a new restaurant" getting closer "- look at the picture!"
"5 post fixator top 'pregnant' fixator top 'star Joanna Gaines shares ultrasound photos of baby number one."
"Related content: all chips Joanna Gaines told us to welcome children."
"Please see more in the video below."
"January 5."
"Instagram Gaines and her husband chip announced that they were not pregnant with children."



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There are dragons,” joked EP Daniel Palladino, making a Game of Thrones reference.”
“Buzz has been that there’s an episode set in Paris, as well as one in the comedy stomping ground of the era, the Catskills.”
“Season 2 is “about opening Midge’s world up,” says Palladino.”
“...listening to her father s story about Greenwich Village and opening up for Johnny Mathis and Dinah Washington...”
“We can look back at 1959 and see that today women aren t wearing corsets anymore but the problems still exist The entire late 50s comedy era is Oz for Sherman Palladino having grown up in the San Fernando Valley...”
“I’m glad it’s a character that still resonates.”
“...taking trolls down...”
“You never set out to drive a political message through your show it just won t work said Sherman Palladino You gotta love the show love your characters it was an interesting fluke that Maisel came out when we were...”
“The media was quick to observe how the show about a newly-separated single woman who is vying to become a stand-up in a male-dominated late 1950s world, just rang so loudly with the times.”
“...of the MeToo movement...”


"There are dragons," jokes EP Daniel Palladino, who is playing a game of power
"There's a rumor that one episode is set in Paris, and another is set in a Catskill comedy."
Palladino said the second season was "about opening up the world of Mickey."
“…… Listen to her father tell the story of Greenwich Village, open up for Johnny Matisse and Dinah Washington... "
"We can look back to 1959 and see that today's women no longer wear corsets, but the problem still exists. The whole comedy era in the late 1950s was Sherman Palladino growing up in Oz in the San Fernando Valley..."
"I'm glad it's a character that still resonates."
“… Kill trolls... "
"You've never intended to send a political message in your show, and it doesn't work," Sherman Palladino said. "You have to love the show, love your character, Messier in us It's an interesting coincidence that they appear at the same time
"The media soon noticed how this drama about a newly separated single woman competing to be a one-man in a male dominated world in the late 1950's became loud with the development of the times."
“… "The beauty of the meto movement."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I wish her all the success in the world but not at our expense.”In the episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians scheduled to air Sunday, Kim will be seen making one of her first public appearances, in Dubai, following the robbery.”
“.”
“I really don't.”
““I just don't care about that stuff anymore.”
“...my kids Kardashian West also said she does not feel the same need to show her possessions and jewelry on social media...”
“I was definitely materialistic before not that there s anything bad with having things and working hard to get those things I m really proud of everyone around me that s successful but I m so happy that my kids get this me that this is who I am raising...”
“I really feel like things happen in your life to teach you things.”
“It's just not who I am anymore.” She told DeGeneres that she now understands that the thieves had been tracking her for two years, as they were monitoring and aware of her acquisitions and range of possessions, in part due to her social-media posts.”


"I wish her all the best in the world, but not at our expense." Kim will be seen making his first public appearance in Dubai after the robbery in the episode "keep in touch with the kardashians" scheduled to air on Sunday
“.”
"I really don't know."
"I just don't care about those things."
“…… My child, Kardashian West, also said, "she doesn't need to show her property and jewelry on social media..."
"I used to be absolutely materialist. It's not that there are bad things. I work hard to get these things. I'm really proud of every successful person around me, but I'm glad that my children have got me. This is the person I want to raise..."
"I really think what happens in your life is to teach you something."
She told DeGeneres that she now understood that thieves had been following her for two years because they monitored and knew her property and scope, in part because of her social media posts



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...she said.”
“It's been one year since she debuted her 300lbs weight loss on the show, and she has vowed to never put the weight back on.”
“The 38-year-old star of the We tv reality series Mama June: From Not to Hot donned a replica of the iconic white dress Marilyn wore in the 1955 film The Seven Year Itch.”
“While modeling the billowy frock, Mama June reenacted the famous scene in which the screen siren was standing on a subway grate when a gust of wind lifted up her dress.”
“Scroll down for videoFeeling glam!”
“Mama June donned a replica of Marilyn Monroe s famous white halter dress for a promo shoot inspired by the 1955 film The Seven Year Itch Old Hollywood The 38 year old s hair was done up in curls and she donned bright red lipstick The Georgia native s blonde...”
“...hair was styled into tousled curls and she sported bright red lips just like Marilyn did in the film...”
“Mama June topped off her halter dress with a pair of strappy silver sandals and sparkling bracelet on both of her wrists.”
“A behind-the-scenes video from the We tv promo shoot shows Mama June striking pose after pose while a wind machine lifts her dress up behind her.”
“Like Marilyn, the mother-of-four was photographed holding her dress down in the front while the back billowed up behind her.”


“…… She said
"It's been a year since she made her debut on the show with 300 pounds of weight loss, and she vowed never to put on weight again."
"The 38 year old star of the US reality TV series" June Mom: never hot to hot "wore a replica of Marilyn's iconic white dress in the 1955 movie" the seven year itch. "
When Joan's mother was modeling the wavy dress, she recreated a famous scene: when a gust of wind blew up her skirt, the alarm on the screen was standing on the grille of the subway
"Scroll down to view the videofeeding slam!"
In June, mom shot a replica of Marilyn Monroe's famous white suspender dress, which inspired a promotional film for the 1955 year old film "seven years of old Hollywood". The 38 year old has curly hair, and she has a red lipstick on her face. This is the native blonde in Georgia.
“…… She combed her hair into messy curls and showed her bright red lips, just like Marilyn in the movie... "
"Mother Joan added a pair of silver lace up sandals to her suspender skirt and wore a glittering bracelet on her wrist."
"A behind the scenes video from our TV Promo shows Joan's mother posing one eye-catching pose after another, with a wind turbine lifting her skirt behind her."
"Like Marilyn, the mother of four was photographed with the skirt in front and the skirt in the back rolling behind her."



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“In a preview for the upcoming episode of KUWTK, Kourtney Kardashian talks about potentially wanting more kids some day.”
“To make sure she has the option, she goes through the egg freezing process, which includes hormone shots that make her crazy emotional.”
““I just feel like this is for safety,” she says.”
““I hope that going through all of this is worth it.”
“I don’t want to put my body through something like this again.”
“The emotions of it all are just a lot.”This content is imported from {embed-name}.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"In the trailer for the upcoming kuwtk, kurtany Kardashian talks about the possibility of wanting more children one day."
"To make sure she had a choice, she went through the egg freezing process, which included hormone injections, which got her out of control."
"I just feel like it's for safety," she said
"I hope it's worth the experience."
"I don't want my body to go through this again."
"All the emotions are rich." This content is imported from {embedded name}



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“According to CBS News, the actor was in the San Diego area to promote youth turnout in the midterm elections, reprising the role of Ron Burgundy as part of Funny Or Die and Billy Eichner’s “Glam Up The Midterms.””
“He did not suffer any significant injuries and witnesses said he was awake and on his phone when paramedics took him away from the scene, TMZ reports.”
“The “Anchorman” star was one of three passengers in the vehicle.”
“The SUV was sideswiped by another car, causing the vehicle to spin and flip over.”
“According to TMZ, Ferrell was in an SUV that reportedly flipped over in a two-car accident on Interstate 5 near Aliso Viejo in Southern California.”
“Actor/comedian Will Ferrell was released from the hospital early Friday morning after he was involved in a rollover car accident the night before, TMZ first reported and multiple outlets confirmed.”


According to CBS News, the actor promoted youth turnout in the mid-term elections in San Diego and played the role of Ron Burgundy in "funny or dead" and "beautifying the mid-term elections" by Billy Eisner
"He didn't receive any major injuries and witnesses said he was awake and on the phone when medical staff took him away from the scene," TMZ reported
The "host" star is one of the three passengers on the bus
"The off-road vehicle was overturned by another vehicle, causing the vehicle to skid and overturn."
"According to TMZ, Ferrer was in an SUV, which was reported to have collided with two cars on Interstate 5 near Aliso Vico in Southern California."
"Actor / comedian Will Ferrell was discharged from the hospital early Friday morning after a car crash the night before. TMZ first reported the incident and several media confirmed it."



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



**Something goes wrong**
“I won’t put in writing what I did but let’s just say he’s LUCKY I was 9 months pregnant,” she tweeted.”
““Oh well thank God a camera was NOT with me in Cleveland!!!”
“She was in Cleveland, OH at the time, where Tristan’s basketball team, the Cleveland Cavaliers are based, and there were no cameras there to witness her response but she did give a hint as to how it was to her followers on Twitter.”
“...initial reaction to Tristan s alleged cheating was a lot more intense than was seen on camera...”
“To relive these moments all over again is incredibly difficult emotionally but I also hope that with every trail SIC tribulation and curve ball life throws at us that we ALL get to learn from our journeys Although Khloe has been working hard on the relationship she admitted that her...”
“...caption on Instagram...”
“Tonight s episode is an uncomfortable and super emotional one for me but when we signed up for this show over a decade ago we signed up for a reality show which meant showing you guys inside our lives the good the bad and the ugly Khloe wrote in a...”
“The cheating scandal and Khloe’s labor were spotlighted in the latest episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians and the new mom took to her social media account before it aired to reveal that it was tough for her to watch the intense scenes.”
“...impressive considering how difficult things were for her in the days right before giving birth...”
“People have accused her of being in denial about their future but Khloe insists she s not in denial she s just choosing to move past the negativity and find happiness Khloe s ability to forgive and try to make things better between her and her basketball player beau is...”


"I'm not going to write about what I've done, but he's lucky I'm nine months pregnant," she tweeted
"Oh, thank God, I don't have a camera in Cleveland!"
"She was in Cleveland, Ohio, where Tristan's basketball team, the Cleveland Cavaliers, was. There was no camera to see her reaction, but she did give a hint to her followers on twitter."
“…… The initial reaction to Tristan's alleged cheating was much stronger than what was seen on the camera... "
"It's extremely difficult emotionally to relive these moments, but I also hope that with every ordeal and twist in life, we can learn from our journey. Although Khloe has been working hard, she admits to herself..."
“… Title On instagram... "
"This episode tonight is a disturbing and super touching one for me, but when we signed up for this show ten years ago, we signed up for a reality show, which means to show you the good, the bad and the ugly Chloe in our lives in a..."
"In the latest episode of" keep up with Kardashian's family ", the cheating scandal and heroy's labor have attracted attention. The new mother has logged into her social media account before the broadcast, revealing that it is difficult for her to watch these intense scenes."
“…… It's impressive considering how difficult she was in the days before delivery... "
"People accused her of denying her future, but Khloe insisted that she didn't deny it, she just chose to get rid of negative emotions, find happiness, Khloe's forgiveness ability, and try to make things better between her and her basketball player beau..."



**Something goes wrong**
“'””
“I can have a beer and a cigarette now, right?”
“...just did this cleanse and I feel so much better...”
“...health food store in Greenwich Village and I saw a little paperback book describing a master cleanse and I was like What s that I remember the next day after I finished the cleanse I was like Oh wow I”
“I had it done on my cesarean scar I had some buckling in the scar and it really evened it out In the issue s editor letter Paltrow also recalls her first ever cleanse I remember standing in a hippie...”
““The doctor stings you [with a live bee] like it’s an acupuncture needle,” shared the mother of Apple, 13, and Moses, 11 (with ex Chris Martin).”
“In one standout story, the actress talks about having bee venom injected into her C-section scar.”
“...herself...”
“The Fall 2017 issue specifically covers a makeup bag detox deep dives into crystals and mud masks a do anywhere workout from fitness guru Tracy Anderson fall fashion tips for a better orgasm and a candid conversation with Paltrow 44”
“Just like the online brand, the book will feature wellness advice, clean beauty secrets, healthy recipes and more.”


“'””
"I can have a beer and a cigarette now, can't I?"
“… Just after washing, I feel much better... "
“… At the Greenwich Village health food store, I saw a paperback book describing a big facial cleanser. As I remember, the next day when I ran out of facial cleanser, I was like, "Oh, wow, I'm"
"I did this operation on my cesarean scar, I made some bends on the scar, and in the editor's letter of the magazine, it really flattened the scar. Paltrow also recalled the first time she cleaned. I remember her standing in a hippie... "
Apple's mother, 13, and Moses, 11 (with former Chris Martin), share: "a doctor (with a live bee) stabs you like a needle."
"In a prominent story, the actress talked about injecting bee venom into caesarean scar."
“… She herself... "
"Autumn magazine in 2017 has specially reported cosmetic bags, detoxification, crystal and mud mask, fitness and exercise provided by master Tracy Anderson (Tracy Anderson) whenever and wherever possible, and autumn fashion tips for better climax, and a frank dialogue with Paltrow 44."
"Just like online brands, this book will include health advice, cleaning and beauty tips, healthy recipes and so on."



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m a little afraid that I might explode into tears.””
““I’m scared to be sitting here,” she admitted at the time.”
“On her first day back, Kotb had a hard time fighting back the tears.”
“The new mom took a few weeks off to bond with her baby before returning to “TODAY” last week.”
“She’s got great advice, and she’s a wonderful person.”AdvertisementIn February, Kotb announced she and her boyfriend Joel Schiffman adopted a baby girl.”
““She’s great.”
“RELATED: Adam Levine shared an emotional tribute to Christina Grimmie on “The Voice”“She gave me some swaddling advice, and she’s trying to help me make sure I balance my day out better than I do,” Kotb said.”
“Kotb also shared that fellow mom Savannah Guthrie has been helping her learn the tricks of the trade.”
““I mean, check with me in a couple weeks and see how I’m doing, but I’m feeling good.”Kotb shared that she does still indulge in her “wine time” on the weekends and with her on-air BFF Kathie Lee Gifford before and after their show.”
“Exhausted and overjoyed,” she said.”


"I'm a little afraid that I'll burst into tears."
"I'm afraid to sit here," she admitted at the time
"On the first day back, it was hard for Kotb to hold back his tears."
"The new mother took a few weeks off to get along with her baby, and only last week did she return to today."
"She has good advice, she's a good person." In February, Kotb announced that she and her boyfriend Joel sheffman had adopted a baby girl
"She's great."
"Related story: Adam Levin paid an emotional tribute to Christina grimy in the voice." "she gave me some advice on swaddling, and she tried to help me make sure I had a better balanced day than before," kotbe said
"Koteb also said that Savannah Guthrie, a mother, had been helping her learn the tricks of trade."
"I mean, talk to me in a few weeks and see how I am now, but I feel good." Kotb said she was still addicted to the weekend's "wine time" and had a good time with her on TV shows with Kathy Lee Gifford before and after the show
"Exhausted, ecstatic," she said



**Something goes wrong**
““But mostly it’ll help with debloating.””
““Because it is high-fiber, your body could continue to keep working on [digesting] it when you’re sleeping,” says Amy Shapiro, a registered dietitian and nutritionist based in Manhattan.”
““I’m Brazilian, so I need that.”The expert says: In theory, Lima’s buckwheat can help boost the metabolism all night long.”
“Favorite splurge: “I have to have my cappuccino or latte every day, but I’ll [sweeten it with] honey instead of sugar,” she says.”
“...two who adheres to a strict regimen year round and has walked in 15 Victoria s Secret shows previously...”
“...cranberries Early dinner Protein typically chicken or fish Japanese yams and quinoa Late night snack Buckwheat shake What she does before the Victoria s Secret Fashion Show I actually don t change my workouts or diets says the mother of...”
“Eating buckwheat before bedtime actually helps you burn calories while you sleep Breakfast A bowl of oatmeal Midmorning snack Piece of fruit Lunch Protein typically chicken or fish Japanese yams and quinoa Afternoon snack Raw almonds raw cashews and dried...”
““I’ll mix [buckwheat] with hemp milk and honey, and I’ll eat it hot or cold depending on how I feel,” she says.”
“Rather, it’s a grain-like seed that’s gluten-free, packed with protein and, according to Lima, can help satisfy cravings for sweets and boost the metabolism.”
““I eat six meals a day and work out at least six days a week doing mostly boxing.”Secret weapon: Every night, she downs a beverage made with buckwheat, which, despite the name, isn’t actually wheat.”


"But mainly to help eliminate impetuosity."
"Because it's high in fiber, your body can continue to digest it when you sleep," said Amy Shapiro, a registered dietitian and nutritionist in Manhattan
"I'm Brazilian, so I need this." Experts said: theoretically, Lima's buckwheat can promote metabolism all night
"I drink cappuccino or latte every day, but I sweeten it with honey instead of sugar," she said
“… Two people who insist on strict health care all the year round have participated in 15 Victoria's Secret shows before... "
“… Cranberry early dinner protein typical chicken or fish Japanese yam and quinoa late night snack buckwheat milkshake what did she do before Victoria's Secret fashion show I don't actually change my exercise or diet said mother... "
"Eating buckwheat before bed actually helps you burn calories while you sleep. Breakfast a bowl of oatmeal lunch snack a piece of fruit lunch protein typical chicken or fish Japanese yam and quinoa afternoon snack raw almonds raw cashew nuts and dried..."
"I'll mix buckwheat with hemp milk and honey, and I'll eat it hot and cold according to my feeling," she said
"Instead, it's a grain like seed, gluten free, protein rich, which, according to Lima, can help satisfy cravings for sweets and boost metabolism."
"I eat six meals a day, exercise at least six days a week, and mainly do boxing." Secret weapon: every night, she drinks a kind of buckwheat drink. Although it's called buckwheat, it's not wheat



**Something goes wrong**
“Image zoom Credit: Daniel Boczarski/GettyMisty May-TreanorThe athlete announced she would be retiring shortly before she and teammate Kerri Walsh-Jennings took home their third straight gold medal in beach volleyball at the 2012 London Olympics.”
“May-Treanor first announced the news via Twitter on Nov. 16.”
“The three-time Olympic gold medalist volleyball pro welcomed her second and third children, daughters Mele Elizarin and Mia Kanoelani, on Thursday, Nov. 9, her rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Our family feels so blessed to have welcomed these two little miracles into the world,” May-Treanor tells PEOPLE.”
“May-Treanor, 40, is already mom to daughter Malia Barbara, 3, with husband Matt Treanor.”
“Image zoom Credit: Ana Brandt PhotographyMisty May-Treanor’s daughters Malia Barbara, 3, and twins Mele Alizarin (left) and Mia Kanoelani (right), 3 weeksWant all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
““The @lbccvikings women’s team got to meet the latest [addition] of Treanors earlier this week,” she revealed, sharing a photo of her babies meeting the Long Beach City College women’s volleyball team she now coaches.”
“Malia’s middle name was chosen in honor of May-Treanor’s late mother, nationally-ranked tennis player Barbara May, who died of cancer in 2002.”


"Photo zooming credit: Daniel boczarski / gettymisty may treanhe, the athlete, announced that she would retire and soon won her third gold medal in beach volleyball with her teammate Kerri Walsh Jennings at the 2012 London Olympics."
"May Treanor announced this news for the first time through Twitter on November 16."
"The three time Olympic volleyball gold medalist welcomed her second and third children, Mel elizarin and Mia canolani, on Thursday, November 9, as her representative exclusively confirmed to people magazine
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Our family feel very lucky to be able to bring these two little miracles to the world," may trener told people
"May treno, 40, is the mother of her three-year-old daughter, Maria Barbara, and her husband, Matt treno."
Image zooming credit: Anna Brandt photo art may treno's daughter Maria Barbara, 3 years old, twins melie elisabine (left) and Mia canolani (right), 3 weeks want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blog? "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Earlier this week, the @ lbccvikins women's volleyball team will meet with the newest team, trenol," she revealed, sharing photos of her baby meeting her current coach, the long beach city college women's volleyball team
Maria's middle name is in honor of her late mother, Barbara may, the nation's No. 1 tennis player who died of cancer in 2002



**Something goes wrong**
“Write to Megan McCluskey at megan.mccluskey@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“During a Monday appearance on The Ellen DeGeneres Show, Lourd revealed that she met with director J. J. Abrams to discuss following in her mother’s Princess Leia footsteps by playing the lead in Episode VII of the galaxy far, far away saga.”
““J.J.”
“Abrams called me to come in for Star Wars because he couldn’t find someone for the lead,” she explained, referring to the role of Rey.”
““He ended up finding Daisy Ridley, who’s an incredible actress — so talented!”
“But I went in and he ended up giving me this tiny role with a couple lines.”
“I was super excited.”Lourd also spoke about how much it meant to her to act alongside Fisher — who passed away in December at the age of 60 after suffering a heart attack — as a Resistance fighter in the film.”
““It was incredible,” she said.”
““I’m a big believer in things happening for a reason and I think I ended up in that movie for a reason.”


"To Megan McCluskey Megan McCluskey @ time.com."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"On Monday at Ellen DeGeneres, Lauder revealed that she met with director J.J. Abrams to discuss the role of Princess Leia, who plays the leading role in the seventh episode of the legend of the distant galaxy and follows her mother."
“J.J.”
"Abrams called me to take part in Star Wars because he couldn't find a star," she explained, referring to Ray's role
"He finally found Daisy Redley, an incredible actress - so talented!"
"But I went in and he finally gave me a few lines for this little character."
"I'm so excited." Lloyd also talked about how important it was for her to play a resistance fighter with Fisher in the film. Fisher died of a heart attack in December at the age of 60
"It's incredible," she said
"I really believe there's a reason why it happened. I think there's a reason why I played that movie."



**Something goes wrong**
“Norway for a four day visit later this month...”
“And last fall Prince William The Duke of Cambridge her father joked that his daughter is going to be trouble when she gets older The young princess who recently started nursery school will get plenty of chances to look after her big brother when their parents head to Sweden and...”
“Last year, the Duchess of Cambridge reportedly told a fellow mom that her daughter Charlotte was “the one in charge” at home.”
“Chris Jackson / Getty ImagesThis shouldn’t be a complete shocker for royal family fans.”
“Princess Charlotte looks out fro the balcony of Buckingham Palace with her brother and parents during last year's Trooping the Colour parade.”
“"It is second child syndrome."”
“"It is often the case that a younger child is more confident," he said at the event.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge / EPAAccording to the father of the lucky student, who won the same prize as his daughter in 1990, Charlotte's inclination to watch over her older brother is typical sibling behavior.”
“Quite so, says Queen Elizabeth!”
“Bossy Princess Charlotte?”


"A four-day visit to Norway later this month..."
"Last fall, the father of Prince William, Duke of Cambridge, joked that his daughter would be in trouble when she grew up. When her parents go to Sweden, she will have many opportunities to take care of her brother, and.... "
According to reports, last year, the Duchess of Cambridge told a mother that her daughter Charlotte was "in charge" of the family
"It shouldn't be a complete shock to Royal fans."
"Princess Charlotte looked out from the balcony of Buckingham Palace with her brother and parents at last year's parade."
"It's second child syndrome."
"Usually young children are more confident," he said at the event
"Duchess of Cambridge / EPA according to the father of the lucky student, Charlotte's tendency to take care of her brother is typical of sibling behavior. The lucky student won the same prize as his daughter in 1990
"Indeed," said Queen Elizabeth
"The overbearing Princess Charlotte?"



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the next three hours, it is best to wear loose clothing and try to avoid sweating.”
“Apply the self-tanner in sections (such as the arms, then legs, followed by the torso).”
“These basic tips will help you apply a self-tanner so you get even coverage and longer-lasting results.”
“Exfoliate.”
“Use a washcloth to exfoliate the skin prior to applying a self-tanner.”
“Using an exfoliating product also will help remove dead skin cells.”
“Spend a little more time exfoliating where your skin is thickest, on the elbows, knees and ankles.”
“Dry your skin.”
“Drying your skin before you apply a self-tanner helps it go on evenly.”
“Apply in sections.”


"For the next three hours, it's best to wear loose clothes and try to avoid sweating."
Apply self tanning agent to all parts (e.g. arms, then legs, then trunk)
"These basic techniques will help you use self tanning agents to achieve even coverage and lasting results."
"Exfoliate."
"Before applying the self tanning agent, exfoliate with a towel."
"Using exfoliating products also helps remove dead skin cells."
"Spend more time exfoliating your elbows, knees and ankles where your skin is thickest."
"Dry your skin."
"Dry the skin before using the self tanning agent to help the skin continue to tan evenly."
"Apply in segments."



**Something goes wrong**
“Take a peek at what the Biebs is teasing in the video below.”
“Instead, he's focusing on his Purpose world tour -- and there may even be some new music in the works, according to snaps the singer shared to social media earlier this month.”
“NEWS: Justin Bieber Gets Giant Eagle Tattoo On His StomachThankfully, Bieber seems to have kept himself largely out of trouble and on the right side of the law more recently.”
“That arrest came amidst a spate of legal trouble for the young Biebs, who also faced charges that year for egging a neighbor's home in Calabasas, California, and dangerous driving during a date with Selena Gomez, in his hometown in Canada.”
“At the time, the singer also admitted to having smoked marijuana and taken prescription medication.”
“The mugshot comes from the "Sorry" singer's Miami Beach, Florida, arrest for driving under the influence, resisting arrest and having an expired license.”
“...he captioned the snap.”
“WATCH: Justin Bieber Teases New Music In Recording Studio Pics"I LOVE THIS because it reminds me IM NOT EXACTLY WHERE I WANT TO BE BUT THANK GOD IM NOT WHERE I USED TO BE!!"”
“The pic contrasts Bieber's infamous January 2014 mugshot alongside a more recent snap of his face.”
“Justin Bieber posted a meaningful throwback pic to Instagram on Sunday, one that allowed the 23-year-old singer to reflect on a troublesome period in his life.”


"Take a look at what the biebers are joking about in the video below."
"Instead, he's focusing on his world tour - according to a snapshot the singer shared on social media earlier this month, there may even be some new music in the work."
News: Justin Bieber has a giant eagle tattoo on his stomach. Unfortunately, Bieber seems to have basically got out of trouble recently and stood on the right side of the law
"The arrest took place in a series of legal disputes between the young Bibbs family, who were also charged with abetting a neighbor's home in Calabasas, California, and dangerous driving while dating Serena Gomez in his hometown in Canada."
"At the time, the singer also admitted to smoking marijuana and taking prescription drugs."
This is a picture of "sorry" singer arrested in Miami Beach, Florida, for drunk driving, resisting arrest and expired driver's license
“… He added a title to the snapshot. "
Watch: Justin Bieber is laughing at the new music in the studio's photo. "I love this song because it reminds me that I am not where I want to go, but thank God I am not in the past!"
"This photo contrasts with Bieber's infamous January 2014 photo, next to his latest face."
"Justin Bieber released a meaningful retrospective photo on instagram on Sunday that allowed the 23-year-old singer to reflect on a troubled period in his life."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Plaid Shirt ($29.40)SheFinds receives commissions for purchases made through the links in this post.”
“Guess Urban Outfitters Plaid Skirt ($59)Topshop Ella Tartan Crombie Jacket ($170)Jeffery Campbell Siren Bootie ($124.95)ASOS Stradivarius Yellow Plaid Longline Blazer ($42)Guess Urban Outfitters Plaid Trucker Jacket ($98)Tiger Mist Pearl Pants ($89)BP.”
“...our classic plaid ensembles for fall...”
“Shop The 90s Inspired Yellow Plaid Trend Below Get 20 off premium CBD products CHECK IT OUT Paramount Pictures Whether you chose to wear the 90s trend in the version of a skirt blazer or even shoe the yellow hue is just what we need to put a spin on...”
“In true Cher Horowitz fashion, plenty of designers are bringing back the signature yellow plaid blazer and pleated schoolgirl skirt duo that she wore to rule the school.”
“Since we’re already embracing all of the fab ‘90-inspired trends the decade has to offer, we might as well go all or nothing and bring back “Clueless”.”
“This fall, we’re going old school–literally!”
“You can’t scroll through Instagram or walk down the street without spotting at least one of these throwback styles.”
“From cargo pants to cat-eye sunglasses and even combat boots.”
“This season’s trends have shown us that the ‘90s are back in more mores than one.”


"Plaid shirt (US $29.40) she found that she can get commission by buying it through this link."
"Guess Urban Outfitters plaid skirt ($59) Topshop Ella tartan Crombie jacket ($170) Jeffery Campbell siren boots ($124.95) ASOs Stradivarius yellow Plaid long line jacket ($42) guess Urban Outfitters Plaid truck jacket ($98) tiger mist pearl pants ($89) BP."
“… Our autumn classic Plaid suit... "
"Buy the following 90's inspired yellow checkerboard trend, enjoy 20% discount CBD products, check out Paramount Pictures, no matter you choose to wear the 90's trend in the skirt, coat or even shoes version, yellow color is exactly what we need to wear..."
"In real Cher Horowitz fashion, many designers brought back the iconic combination of yellow plaid coat and pleated schoolgirl skirt she wore when she dominated school."
"Now that we have accepted all the trends inspired by FAB'90 over the past decade, we might as well either go all out or do nothing to bring back ignorance."
"This fall, we're going the same way - really!"
"You can't scroll through instagram, or walk around the street and find at least one retro style."
"From cargo pants to cat's-eye sunglasses, even combat boots."
"The trend this season tells us that there is more than one return in the 1990s."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...okurrr!”
“...i'm stopping bags and i don't need a red octagon."”
“...following the leak of cardi's new song "money" on tuesday, the artist went on instagram live to address nicki minaj's fans.”
“...in cardi's brief ig live video, she explained that her newest song was leaked two days early, much to her dismay.”
“...cardi then alludes to the barbz being the reason why she and her team decided to go ahead with the release in advance of it's planned date.”
“"we tried to retract it, but you know the barbz.”
“...they always posting me, they always post everything i do," she said.”
“"they claim they hate me, but they really love me, because they be on my page before my fans."”
“...the "bodak yellow" rapper continued, "so clearly, that seems like love to me, seems like you love me, so it's like, 'f--k it.'”
“...i can't retract it, i might as well put it out."”


“… All right
“… I'm collecting luggage. I don't need a red octagon. "
“…… On Tuesday, after Katie's new song "money" was leaked, the artist broadcast it live on instagram to address Nicky Minagi's fans
“…… In Katie's short, funny live video, she explained that her latest song was leaked two days in advance, which made her very depressed. "
“… Caddy then hinted at Barbie's reason why she and her team decided to release ahead of schedule. "
"We tried to take it back, but you know it."
"They always send out everything I do, everything I do," she said
"They claim they hate me, but they really love me because they're on my page in front of my fans."
“… The rapper went on, "obviously, it's like love to me, it's like love to you, so it's like 'F -- k it'"
“… I can't take it back. I might as well let it out. "



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I would be diabolical enough, but then still find a way to be likable.””
““I would be like you guys.”
““Thank you,” gushed Lawrence.”
““You would be a great Housewife,” Frankel said.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Andy Cohen’s Top 5 Most Revealing Plead the Fifth AnswersQuickly composing herself, Lawrence started firing off questions about the upcoming 10th anniversary season of RHONY and grilling Frankel about jokes she had made about Real Housewives of Beverly Hills‘ star Dorit Kemsley.”
““I’m going to cry,” she said, holding back tears.”
“She jumped for joy, screaming “Oh my God” and quickly running over to hug the Real Housewives of New York City.”
“All of this left Lawrence in complete shock.”
“Image zoom Luann de Lesseps, Jennifer Lawrence and Bethenny Frankel | Credit: Charles Sykes/BravoWhile Disick couldn’t make Cohen’s get-together, the WWHL team was able to find a cardboard cutout to fill his spot.”
““I’m not proud of that, but that’s what comes from my heart,” Lawrence said in the chat, published by The Hollywood Reporter.”


"I'll be evil, but I'll find a way to please people."
"I'll be like you."
"Thank you," Lawrence gushed
"You're going to be a great housewife," Frankel said
"Related video: Andy Cohen's five most inspiring reasons for defense the fifth answer, Lawrence began to ask questions about the upcoming" Ronnie "10th anniversary season, and questioned Frankel about her jokes compared with Foley hills star dorit Kemsley's" Real Housewives. "
"I'm going to cry," she said, holding back her tears
She jumped up with joy, screaming "oh my God," and then quickly ran to embrace the Real Housewives of New York City
"It all took Lawrence by surprise."
"Image zooming LuAnn de Lesseps, Jennifer Lawrence and Bethenny Frankel | photo source: Charles Sykes / Bravo while disc was unable to attend Cohen's party, and the wwhl team found a cardboard to fill his place."
"I'm not proud of it, but it's from the bottom of my heart," Lawrence said in a chat with the Hollywood Reporter



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And this is the scientific reason why thick eyebrows are so trendy.”
“These are 5 tricks to naturally gorgeous eyebrows.”
“The actress-slash-dancer recently launched her own beauty channel on YouTube and has since divulged all sorts of secrets—everything from her 3-concealer hack to the body oil she calls “heaven in a bottle.” Next up?”
“Dewan’s revealing the secret to thick, enviable brows—that last all day and also look thick, yet natural.”
“Because, as she shares in this video on her YouTube channel, “I really think brows frame a face,” she says.”
“I have nothing on the face maybe a little bit of concealer but if the brows are good the face is framed and I m ready to go To start this all off Dewan uses a spoolie to brush her brow hairs up and out moving them away from her...”
“...eyes so that they take up more space on the brow bone...”
“Then, she uses a waxy pencil (her choice: the Anastasia’s Brow Definer Pencil), making tiny dashes on the on the tops of brows to strengthen the line, while still looking natural.”
“She continues brushing the hairs up with the spoolie to help blend the pencil line with the hairs.”
“While she used to do the same on the bottom edges of the arches, she stopped because it made the lines look too harsh.”


"That's the scientific reason why thick eyebrows are so fashionable."
"Here are five tips for natural beauty."
The actress slant dancer has recently launched her beauty channel on YouTube, and has since revealed all kinds of secrets from her 3 blemish to the body oil she called "paradise in the bottle."
"Dewan reveals the secret of thick eyebrows. The enviable eyebrows can last all day. They look thick and natural."
"Because, as she said when sharing the video on YouTube channel," I really think eyebrows make a face, "she said
"What I have on my face is not there. Maybe there is a little concealer, but if the eyebrows are very good, my face is set. I am ready to start." Dewan uses a fake clip to comb up her eyebrows and remove them from her
“… The eye will occupy more space on the brow bone... "
Then, she uses a wax pencil (her choice: Anastasia's Brown definer pencil) and draws small dashes on her eyebrows to strengthen the lines while looking natural
"She continued to brush her hair with a spool to help mix pencil lines with hair."
"Although she used to do the same thing at the bottom of the arch, she stopped because it made the lines look too rough."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““What’s so specific about Kira is the order of the moves that she does that complement one another, which really makes a huge difference in her workout.”And since they started, Bure says her body has completely transformed.”
““Our workouts incorporate strength training with cardio, plyo work and balance,” Bure said.”
“Most Fit and Strong That I ve Ever Felt in My Life She and Stokes focus on mixing up their workouts to get the biggest benefits...”
“What keeps me on track is that I want to feel good and have a long life with my husband Valeri Bure 42 and kids daughter Natasha 18 and sons Lev 16 and Maksim 15 RELATED VIDEO Candace Cameron Bure Is in Her Best Shape at 40 I Feel the...”
““I feel the most fit and strong that I’ve ever felt in my life,” Bure told PEOPLE in February.”
“Bure says that at 40, she’s in the best shape she’s ever been.”
“Bure’s dressing room — for fun workouts.”
“Though Stokes is based in the New York area, she’s out in Los Angeles with Bure this week while she films season three of Fuller House, and the duo are hitting the gym — a.k.a.”
“#evolutionofabs,” Stokes posted on Instagram.”
““Am I doing it right @candacecbure @melissacoulier?”


"What's special about Kira is the sequence of her movements. Her movements complement each other, which has a huge impact on her exercise." Bure says her body has completely changed since the action began
"Our training includes strength training, aerobic exercise, plyo training and balance," Bray said
"She and Stokes are the healthiest and strongest people in my life. They focus on mixed training to get the most benefits..."
"What's going to get me on track is that I want to share videos with my husband Valerie Bray, 42, daughter Natasha, 18, son LEV, 16, Maxim, 15. Candice Cameron Bray was in the best shape when he was 40, I think..."
"I think this is the healthiest and strongest time of my life," Bray told people in February
"When she's 40, Bray says, she's in her best form ever."
"Bray's dressing room - for fun exercise."
"Although Stokes is headquartered in the New York area, she and Bray are in Los Angeles this week, while she's filming season 3 of Fuller's house, and they're in the gym - also known as the gym."
Stokes wrote on instagram: "the evolution of Arbus."
"Did I do it right @ candacebru @ Melissa corrier?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“David and Victoria Beckham Stylishly Arrive in Paris During Men's Fashion WeekEXCLUSIVE: Victoria Beckham Explains Why She's 'So Proud' to Have Son Brooklyn's Support During NYFW This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“RELATED CONTENT:Brooklyn Beckham Gets New Tattoo in Honor of His Dad David -- See the PicChloe Grace Moretz Celebrates 21st Birthday Alongside Boyfriend Brooklyn Beckham -- See the Party Pics!”
“Watch below for more times the Beckham family has been adorable together.”
“WWD/REX/ShutterstockWWD/REX/ShutterstockThe Beckham parents also sent their best to their oldest son, Brooklyn, who missed his mom's fashion show to go to a drag show back in West Hollywood, California, with girlfriend Chloe Grace Moretz.”
“See the heartwarming family moments below.”
“After the show, Victoria sweetly kissed David and her kids on the side of the catwalk, along with sharing a super sweet photo of herself hugging Harper, captioned, "Love u baby girl x #VBAW18 #NYFW love u @davidbeckham @romeobeckham @cruzbeckham x kisses x VB."”
“Aww, congrats, mama Beckham!”
“Proud of mummy @victoriabeckham@romeobeckham @cruzbeckham#harperseven we miss you @brooklynbeckham."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"David and Victoria Beckham arrive in Paris at menswear Week fashion exclusive: Victoria Beckham explains why her son Brooklyn's support during the New York Film Festival made her" so proud. ". This video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information. "
Related content: in memory of his father David, Brooklyn David has got a new tattoo - look at this picture - grace Moretz celebrates her 21st birthday with her boyfriend Brooklyn David - look at the party picture
"Take a look at how lovely the Beckhams are together."
David's parents also gave the best gift to their eldest son Brooklyn, who missed his mother's fashion show and went to a drag show in West Hollywood, California with his girlfriend Chloe grace Moretz
"Take a look at the warm family moment below."
"After the show, Victoria kisses David and her children sweetly on the catwalk and shares a super sweet photo of herself hugging Harper, with the title of" love your baby girl x # vbaw18 # NYFW love you@ davidbeckham@romeobeckham@cruzbeckham  x kisses x VB。”
"Ah, Congratulations, mother Beckham!"
"Be proud of your mother @ Victoria Beckham @ Romeo Beckham @ Cruz Beckham # Harper, even if we miss you @ Brooklyn Beckham."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know on Facebook or Twitter...”
“What do you think makes a happy marriage?”
“You go girl.”
“It sounds like Victoria really CAN have it all.”
““His toast jumps out of the toaster the minute he comes down for breakfast.”And in terms of facing the aging process she added: “I focus on what I’ve accomplished and I feel blessed.”Words to live by.”
“...get to the kitchen to puree Romeo s avocados...”
“Victoria finds the time to work out run a fashion house and still make breakfast for Romeo CREDIT Instagram romeobeckham Instagram romeobeckham She explained I go for a three mile run every morning and I work out for an hour with a PT which gives me just enough time to...”
“She also let us in on her morning routine which includes a VERY early work out and making breakfast for son Romeo.”
“And Posh Spice didn't stop there with the revelations.”
““And I certainly wouldn’t be married anymore.”The Beckhams are a happy bunch (CREDIT: Instagram/victoriabeckham) ©Instagram/victoriabeckhamWe always knew the fashion designer had a killer sense of humour and while she doesn't smile that often, when she does, it's worth the wait.”


"Notify us on Facebook or twitter..."
"What do you think can make a happy marriage?"
"You go, girl."
"It sounds like Victoria can really have everything."
"As soon as he came down for breakfast, the toaster jumped out to bake." Speaking of the aging process, she added: "I'm focused on what I've achieved and I feel happy."
“… Go to the kitchen and cook Romeo's avocado... "
"Victoria finds time to work out, runs a fashion shop and makes breakfast for Romeo credit instagram romeobeckham instagram romeobeckham. She explains that I run three miles every morning and I work out for an hour with a Pt, which gives me enough time..."
"She also asked us to take part in her morning routine, including getting up early to exercise and making breakfast for her son Romeo."
"Hot girls don't stop here because of the exposure."
"Of course I won't get married again." The Beckhams are a happy family (photo source: instagram / Victoria Beckham) we always know that the fashion designer has a good sense of humor. Although she doesn't laugh often, it's worth waiting when she smiles



**Something goes wrong**
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Photo by Andrew Milligan PA Images via Getty Images Andrew Milligan PA Images PA Images via Getty Images Carey Mulligan and Marcus Mumford British musician Marcus Mumford and British actor Carey Mulligan arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain s Prince Harry Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St...”
“Gareth Fuller—PA WireOprah WinfreyOprah Winfrey arrives at Windsor Castle ahead of the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle.”
“Chris Jackson—PA WireGeorge Clooney and Amal ClooneyAmal Clooney and George Clooney arrive at St George's Chapel at Windsor Castle for the wedding of Meghan Markle and Prince Harry, May 19, 2018.”
“Chris Jackson—AFP/Getty ImagesElton JohnSir Elton John leaves St George's Chapel in Windsor Castle following the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle, May 19, 2018.”
“Chris Jackson—AFP/Getty ImagesCharlotte Riley and Tom HardyTom Hardy and Charlotte Riley arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Alastair Grant—AFP/Getty ImagesAbigail SpencerAbigail Spencer (left) and Priyanka Chopra arrive for the wedding ceremony of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and US actress Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Ian West—AFP/Getty ImagesSarah RaffertySarah Rafferty and Santtu Seppala arrive for the wedding of Britain's Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”
“Ian West—AFP/Getty ImagesGina TorresGina Torres arrives for the wedding ceremony of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St George's Chapel, Windsor Castle, in Windsor, on May 19, 2018.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Marcus Mumford, a British musician, and Kerry Mulligan, a British actor, have arrived in St. Louis for the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan markel."
"Gareth fuller and Winfrey Oprah Winfrey arrive at windsor castle before the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle."
"On May 19, 2018, Chris Jackson and George Clooney arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle for the wedding of Megan Marcel and Prince Harry."
"On May 19, 2018, after Prince Harry married Megan markel, Chris Jackson left St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."
"On May 19, 2018, Chris Jackson / Getty Images Charlotte Riley, Tom Hardy, Tom hardy and Charlotte Riley arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, Windsor, for the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan Markle."
"On May 19, 2018, Alastair grant AFP / Getty imagesabigail Spencer (left) and Priyanka Chopra arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle to attend the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and American actress Meghan Markle."
"Ian West AFP / Getty Images Sarah Rafferty, Sarah Rafferty and santtu seppala arrived at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle on May 19, 2018 to attend the wedding ceremony of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Megan Marcel."
"On May 19, 2018, Ian West AFP / Getty Images Gina Torres Gina Torres arrived in Windsor to attend the wedding of Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan Markle at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle."



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Everyone needs to stop putting words in my mouth and making it out to be something that was never confirmed nor talked about.””
““Brielle’s lying!” she said.”
“Early on Wednesday — five days after Zolciak came under fire for telling Brielle to flash a breast on Snapchat — the 20-year-old took to Twitter with an announcement.”
““OMG!!!”
“...i’m so excited my mom is PREGNANT with baby number 7!!!!”
“Brielle wrote in a now-deleted tweet.”
“When a fan asked when Zolciak is due, Brielle responded, “in the spring sometime.”Brielle then shared the news on Instagram with the caption: “OMG!!!”
“...i can’t wait to meet the little nugget.”
“...it’s been so hard keeping this a secret!!!”
“...woo!!”


"Everyone should stop putting words in my mouth and regard it as something that has never been proved or talked about."
"Blair is lying! "She said
"Zorchak, 20, posted an announcement on twitter five days after he was attacked earlier on Wednesday for telling briel to flash his chest on snapchat."
"My God!"
“… I'm so excited, my mother is pregnant with No.7 baby!! "
"Briel wrote on a tweet that has now been deleted."
When a fan asked zorchak when it was due, Brill replied, "sometime in the spring." Brill then shared the news on instagram, with the headline: "my God!!"
"I can't wait to see the Nuggets."
“… It's hard to keep this secret
“… Woo



**Something goes wrong**
““It’s time to go see her, Tess,” Randall says.”
“That’s my brother.”Tess hasn’t seen “her” in awhileBack on the Season 2 finale, we got our first glimpse of an older Randall and an older Tess.”
“Sterling K. Brown: We’ve all [in the cast] known that it’s Rebecca, though the audience didn’t know, and we know why it’s Rebecca and you guys will find out at the end of the season what it is.”
“How soon are we going to find out why everyone is gathering to see her?”
“TheWrap: How did you feel about the reveal Rebecca is the mysterious future “her” we’ve all been wondering about?”
“So since we didn’t get anymore new hints on screen, TheWrap was able to gather a few clues for you while speaking with Brown about Randall winning the Philadelphia City Council race and how those election results might impact the Pearsons in the present and the future.”
“Also Read: 'This Is Us' Season 3: 'ER' Alum Goran Visnjic Cast as Beth's Teacher on Backstory Episode“This Is Us” returned from hiatus tonight with an episode that jumped between the past and present — but didn’t head into the future again.”
“Does that mean they separate or even divorce?”
“That spat led to Randall sleeping on the couch, and a not so happy vibe between the happy couple in the present, with some hints in the future indicating the two are only communicating between Adult Tess.”
“The episode also ended with a fight between our Present Day Beth and Randall, because Randall refused to drop out of the city council race, when the polls show he won’t win and his wife asks him to give up and come back to helping his family.”


"It's time to see her, Tess," Randall said
"That's my brother." Tess didn't see "she" in the last episode of season 2 for a long time. We saw old Randall and old Tess for the first time
"Stirling K. Brown: we all know it's Rebecca, although the audience doesn't know, we know why it's Rebecca, and you'll know what it is at the end of the season."
"How long will it take us to figure out why everyone got together to see her?"
"The wrap": how do you feel about the revelation of "Rebecca" in "Rebecca is the mysterious future we've always wanted to know"
"So, since we don't get any new cues on the screen anymore, the wrap gathered some clues for you when talking with brown about Randall's winning the city council election in Philadelphia and the impact of these election results on the present and future of the Pearsons."
"Also read: 'this is our' third season: 'er' Alan Golan Visnjic plays Beth's teacher backstage episode 'this is our' return to rest tonight and jump between the past and the present with an episode - but not towards the future."
"Does that mean they are separated or even divorced?"
"The quarrel caused Randall to sleep on the sofa. The atmosphere between the happy couple is not very pleasant now. Some hints in the future indicate that they are only communicating with adult Tess."
"This episode also ended with the fight between Beth and Randall today, because Randall refused to withdraw from the city council election. At that time, the polls showed that he would not win, and his wife asked him to give up and come back to help his family."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was at the gathering that the pop star sung her praises about meditational therapy, which she claims “helped a lot with my anxiety.”We are glad to hear Katy is back to feeling like the “Firework” she is.”
“In April, the songstress and her actor boyfriend were able to meet the Pope as part of Unite to Cure conference in Vatican City.”
“If I want to have that true balance, I have to step into being Katheryn Hudson.”That back-to-basics mentality has helped the 33-year-old to value the relationships and people around her, like rumored boyfriend Orlando Bloom.”
“But for my personal life, it doesn’t work that way.”
“In February, the star told Glamour, “This last year has been about killing my ego, which has been really necessary for my career.”
“It’s not just a material foundation: it’s a soul foundation.”This spiritual awakening comes as no surprise to fans of the “I Kissed A Girl” singer.”
“It gave me a new foundation.”
“'”She continued on to say, “That brokenness, plus me opening up to a greater, higher power and reconnecting with divinity, gave me a wholeness I never had.”
“...much you do truly love yourself...”
“She explained Music is my first love and I think it was the universe saying Okay you speak all of this language about self love and authenticity but we are going to put you through another test and take away any kind of validating blankie Then we ll see how...”


At the party, the pop star praised her views on meditation therapy, which she said "helped me a lot with my anxiety.". We're happy to hear that Katie has regained her sense of "fireworks."
In April, the singer and her boyfriend met with the pope at the Vatican's "unity cure" conference
"If I want to have real balance, I have to be Katherine Hudson." This return to basics helps the 33 year old woman value the relationships and people around her, just like her rumored boyfriend Orlando Bloom
"But as far as my personal life is concerned, it doesn't work."
In February, the star told Glamour magazine: "I've been killing myself last year, which is very necessary for my career."
"It's not just a material foundation: it's a spiritual foundation." This spiritual awakening is no surprise to fans of "I kissed a girl.".
"It gives me a new foundation."
"She went on," this fragmentation, coupled with my opening up to greater and higher power and my reconnection with divinity, has given me a wholeness that I have never had before. "
“… You really love yourself... "
"She explained that music is my first love, and I think it's the universe saying, well, what you're saying is all about self love and authenticity, but we'll let you pass another test, take away any form of blank, and then we'll see how..."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Pick up my sci-fi novel series, The Earthborn Trilogy, which is now in print, online and on audiobook.”
“Follow me on Twitter and on Facebook.”
“An early copy of this Sunday’s Game of Thrones episode, The Spoils of War, has leaked online.”
“But amazingly, according to The Verge, the leak actually has nothing to do with the hack, and is instead the fault of a distribution partner who let the episode slip online.”
“While the hackers have published a script outline for this episode online, they have yet to release any actual episodes, including this one.”
“It’s still unclear whether they have stolen episodes in their possession (they had full episodes of a few other HBO shows like Insecure and Ballers), or whether that was not something they were able to be lifted in the breach.”
“You will not find any spoilers for this episode here because I have not watched the leaked episode nor am I seeking out any information about what it contains.”
“I would recommend that no one actually watch it, not just for ethical reasons, but because the episode has been uploaded in absolutely garbage quality, only 360p, and many that have watched it say they wish they’d just waited two more days.”
“HBO has been battling Game of Thrones leaks ever since the first four episodes of season five leaked online two years ago.”
“After that, they didn’t give out any press screeners for season six, yet one of those episodes leaked anyway, that time due to an HBO subsidiary screwing up.”


"Pick up my science fiction series, the trilogy of the birth of the earth, and it's now in print, online, and audio books."
"Follow me on Twitter and Facebook."
"The early version of the game of Thrones episode, booty, has been leaked online this Sunday."
"But surprisingly, according to verge, the leak was not really about hackers, it was the fault of a distribution partner who let the episode slip online."
"Although hackers have published the script outline of this episode on the Internet, they haven't released any actual episodes, including this episode."
"It's not clear whether they've stolen their own shows (they have complete episodes of several other HBO shows, such as unsafe and Ballerina), or whether they can remove them in violation."
"You can't find the destroyer of this episode here, because I haven't seen the leaked episode, and I haven't found any information in it."
"I suggest that you don't really watch it, not just for moral reasons, but because the upload quality of this episode is absolutely rubbish, only 360p. Many people who have watched it say they hope to wait another two days."
"Since the first four episodes of the fifth season were exposed on the Internet two years ago, HBO has been fighting against the leaks of game of Thrones."
"After that, they didn't provide any news screeners for Season 6, but one episode leaked out because one of HBO's branches screwed up."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The BBC Three documentary is scheduled to air tomorrow, March 28.”
“While Kelly did not comment to either the BBC or the Guardian, the R&B singer has vehemently denied all allegations against him in the past.”
“He calls them his pets.”Jones also said that Kelly forced the young girl, whom he referred to as his “fucking pet,” to crawl around the floor and perform oral sex on him.”
“That’s when it clicked in my head that he had been grooming me to become one of his pets.”
““I saw that she was dressed like me, that she was saying the things I’d say and her mannerisms were like mine.”
““I was introduced to one of the girls, that he told me he ‘trained’ since she was 14, those were his words,” she said.”
“The Guardian reports that in the documentary, Jones says that the R&B singer introduced her to an unnamed young “sex slave” sometime between 2011 and 2013.”
“Jones is the woman behind the most recent allegation.”
“During this time, there was an additional woman who accused R. Kelly of grooming her to be a sex slave when she was 16.”
“...was with the R B singer...”


"The BBC three documentary is scheduled to air tomorrow, March 28."
"Although Kelly did not comment on the BBC or the guardian, the R & B singer strongly denied all the charges against him in the past."
Jones also said Kelly forced the little girl, whom he called his "motherfucker pet," to crawl around the floor and have oral sex with him
"Just then, it occurred to me that he had been dressing me up as his pet."
"I saw that she dressed like me, said what I said and behaved like me."
"I was introduced to one of the girls and he told me that he had been 'training' since she was 14, that's what he said," she said
Jones said in the documentary that the R & B singer introduced her to an unknown young "sex slave" sometime between 2011 and 2013, the Guardian reported
"Jones is behind the latest charges."
"During this time, another woman accused R. Kelly of dressing her up as a sex slave when she was 16."
“… With R & B Singers... "



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, fans will get to see how newly single Chase reacts to Todd meddling in his love life, while Savannah faces her own relationship insecurities.”
“...prepare to move into a new home put on their first pageant and start a dessert business...”
“I love you I appreciate you from the bottom of my heart RELATED VIDEO Todd Chrisley Not Surprised Savannah Luke Kennard Broke Up When You Crawl in Bed with a Snake Don t Bitch When It Bites This season of Chrisley Knows Best will follow Todd and Julie as they...”
“— I thank you,” says Todd in the clip.”
“Image zoom Credit: USA Network“To all you fans that have been with us for 100 episodes — can you believe, 100 episodes?”
“...out she was driving around on a suspended license for failure to appear in traffic court...”
“In addition to the launch of Savannah s clothing line and celebrating Julie being five years cancer free one of the show s highlights was the iconic moment Todd decided to teach his mother Nanny Faye a lesson by tricking her into thinking she was getting arrested after he found...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In the clip, patriarch Todd Chrisley reflects on his favorite moments since the series premiered in 2014 alongside wife Julie and kids Savannah, Chase and Grayson.”
“On June 19, the USA Network series will air its 100th episode — and PEOPLE can exclusively reveal your first look at the promo.”


"Meanwhile, fans will see how the new single chase reacts to Todd's involvement in his love life, while Savannah faces her own emotional insecurity."
“… I'm going to move into my new home for their first party and start a dessert business. "
"I love you, and I thank you from the bottom of my heart, Todd creasley. It's no surprise that Savannah Luke Kennard broke up. When you crawl on the bed with a snake, don't complain. When it bites, creasley of this season will follow Todd and Julie best, because they..."
"Thank you," Todd said in the clip
"Image scaling credit: American network" for all the fans who watched 100 episodes with us - can you believe it, 100 episodes? "
“… She was suspended because she didn't appear in traffic court... "
"In addition to launching Savannah's clothing series and celebrating Julie's five years of cancer free life, one of the highlights of the show is the landmark moment when Todd decides to teach his mother Fay a lesson. He deceives Fay into thinking that he is discovering And then he was arrested. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In this video, patriarch Todd chrisley, along with his wife Julie and children Savannah, chase and Grayson, reviews his favorite moments since the series premiered in 2014."
"On June 19, the 100th episode of the American network series will be broadcast, and people will be able to give exclusive information about the promo you saw at first sight."



**Something goes wrong**
“But I’ll just leave it for that now.””
““I’m fortunate enough to say that I have met someone special.”
“In PEOPLE’s exclusive look at the upcoming new season of Long Island Medium, the former couple comes face-to-face for the first time since announcing their separation last year.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We separated about a year ago and so I haven’t physically seen Larry in like, nine months,” Theresa says in the clip.”
“As the two sit down at a restaurant to talk, Larry admits that seeing his ex is harder than he expected.”
““It’s not easy,” says Larry.”
““After 30-plus years — how do you not have emotions?”Theresa is also faced with the harsh reality of having to experience life on her own for the first time in nearly three decades.”
“After tearing her ACL, the medium undergoes her first major surgery.”
““It was weird waking up and Larry not being there,” she says.”


"But I'll let it go now."
"I'm very lucky. I met a special person."
"In people's Daily's exclusive report on the upcoming new season of Long Island media, the former couple face-to-face for the first time since they announced their separation last year."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We separated about a year ago, so I haven't seen Larry for nine months," Theresa said in the clip
"When they sat down and talked in a restaurant, Larry admitted that it was harder than he expected to meet his ex girlfriend."
"It's not easy," Larry said
"More than 30 years later - why don't you have feelings? "Theresa also faces the harsh reality of having to experience life alone for the first time in nearly 30 years."
After tearing the ACL, she had her first major operation
"It's strange that Larry wasn't there when he woke up," she said



**Something goes wrong**
“FOLLOW US ON TWITTER AND INSTAGRAM”
“2018 Mel B s cohosts laugh off the gesture and try to reassure her that she s safe She moves away from Walsh who says he s only looking after her...”
“Footage from a 2014 airing of the British show, The X Factor, shows Mel putting former cohost Walsh in his place after he grabbed her butt.”
“After resurfacing on social media over the weekend, the clip sparked outrage.”
“A Twitter user shared the video clip on Sunday (July 8), writing “sexual harassment on live TV folks.”The clip shows the Spice Girl, Walsh, Simon Cowell and Cheryl Cole being interviewed by Sarah-Jane Crawford on the reality show.”
“During the interview, Walsh places his hand on Mel’s butt.”
“He then cups it before giving it a tap.”
“As noted by ebony com the discomfort can be seen on Mel B s face as she stops the interview telling Crawford hold on a second She then asks Walsh Why are you grabbing my butt sexual harassment on live TV folks pic twitter com tjJtE45ZFk junieblackjones dys_nania July 8”
“Some online users defended Walsh because he’s a homosexual and others justified his actions because he was unaware of what he was doing.”
“LIKE US ON FACEBOOK.”


"Follow us on Twitter and instagram"
"In 2018, Mel BS's associates laughed at the gesture and tried to assure her that she was safe. She left Walsh and Walsh said he only took care of her..."
"A video from the 2014 British show the X factor shows Mel grabbing Walsh's ass and putting her in his place."
"The video sparked anger after it reappeared on social media at the weekend."
A twitter user shared the video on Sunday (July 8) and wrote "sexual harassment in live TV.". The video shows spice girls, Walsh, Simon Cowell and Cheryl Cole interviewed Sarah Jane Crawford on the reality show
"In the interview, Walsh put his hand on Mel's butt."
"Then he drank it before he gave it a tap."
"As ebony pointed out, when Mel B stopped the interview and told Crawford to wait for a moment, the discomfort on her face could be seen on her face, and then she asked Walsh, why are you grabbing my ass on live TV? Pictures of sexual harassment on twitter website tjjte45zfk junieblackjones dys \ \ unania July 8"
"Some netizens defended Walsh because he was gay, others defended his behavior because he didn't know what he was doing."
"It's like we're on Facebook."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch Isaac react in the clip above to fans who dressed up as him.”
““I’m a sophisticated gentleman, so I didn’t want to get the powder on my fingers,” Isaac said.”
“Because the internet’s boyfriend likes to keep it classy, of course.”
““Chili-lime, it’s a very Latino kind of thing.”But why the chopsticks?”
“...the time you couldn t get on the East Coast it s just from here he told Kimmel whose show is filmed in Los Angeles...”
“...was littered with medicine because he had a bad cold and he said that he had a mustache because of his character in the HBO mini series Show Me A Hero I really was into flaming lime Cheetos which at...”
“It was a simple yet perplexing scene and it spawned memes and copycats across the Internet Isaac finally broke down the story behind the viral photo Tuesday night on ABC s Jimmy Kimmel Live The actor first explained the counter...”
“The “Star Wars” star seemed to be caught mid-act in the photo, wearing a black beanie, a red sweater and a thick mustache while enjoying his snack.”
“Oscar Isaac became synonymous with eating Flamin’ Hot Limón Crunchy Cheetos with chopsticks, when a photo of him doing just that went viral in 2016.”


"Look at Isaac's reaction to posing as his fan in the clip above."
"I'm a sophisticated gentleman, so I don't want to get powder on my fingers," said Isaac
"Because of course, boyfriends on the Internet like to keep it up."
"Lime, it's a very Latin thing." But why use chopsticks? "
“… When you can't get to the east coast, start here, and he tells Kimmel that his show was shot in Los Angeles... "
“… Because he had a bad cold, there was medicine everywhere. He said that he grew a beard because his role in HBO mini series showed me a hero. I really like the burning lime cheese. In... "
"This is a simple but confusing scene, which has triggered meme and imitation on the Internet. The story behind Isaac's viral photos on ABC's Jimmy Kimmel live on Tuesday night was finally exposed, and the actor first explained the problem..."
"The star in Star Wars seems to be photographed. He is wearing a black Bini, a red sweater, a thick beard and eating snacks."
"Oscar Isaac became synonymous with eating flamin 'hot Lim ó n crunchy chietos with chopsticks, when a picture of him doing so became popular in 2016."



**Something goes wrong**
“He planned to combine those loves by directing an adaptation of The Queen’s Gambit, a novel about a chess player who is addicted to pills, but Ledger died before production began.”
“He was also an aspiring director, having directed music videos for Harper and the hip hop artist N’fa, a childhood friend.”
“Sarah Rhodes—Getty ImagesAng Lee cast Heath Ledger in Brokeback Mountain because of his performance in Monster’s Ball.”
“He was mortified, and he felt owned.”Heath Ledger in 2006.”
“And then when he got it, he didn’t want it.”
“As his friend, the director Matt Amato, puts it in the documentary, “He wanted fame.”
“His ruggedly handsome face and tousled hair — accompanied by the promise, “He will rock you” — was plastered all over Los Angeles, and he was set to tour the U.S. as the film’s “secret weapon.” But the role of salesman didn’t sit well with the actor.”
“Ledger’s next move after The Patriot was the medieval adventure film A Knight’s Tale.”
“MORE: Jake Gyllenhaal on How Heath Ledger’s Death Affected HimIt was during the promotion of A Knight’s Tale that Ledger began to really struggle with fame.”
“But Gibson and Emmerich saw something in the young actor and took a chance on him, giving him his first big role since breaking out in 10 Things I Hate About You.”


He plans to combine these loves by directing a novel adapted from the Queen's trick about a pill addicted chess player who died before filming
He was also an aspiring director, directing music videos for Harper and hip-hop artist n'fa (a childhood friend)
"Sarah Rhodes Getty Lee plays heath ledger in Brokeback Mountain because of his performance in monster's ball."
"He's ashamed, he feels owned." Heath Ledger said in 2006
"Then he got it and didn't want it."
As his friend and director Matt Amato said in the documentary, "he wants to be famous."
"His handsome face and shaggy hair, coupled with the promise that" he'll rock you, "are everywhere in Los Angeles, and he's arranged to tour the United States as the film's" secret weapon. ". But the role of salesman is not suitable for the actor
"After the Patriots, Ledger's next move is the medieval adventure film the knight's story."
"More: Jack Gyllenhaal tells the story of the impact of Heath Ledger's death on him. During the promotion of the knight's story, ledger began to fight against fame."
"But Gibson and Emmerich saw something from the young actor and gave him a chance to become his first major role since the ten things I hate you."



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
““I’ve worked on myself, and I’ve realized that this is a new chapter in my life and to embrace it and to make the best of it,” he said.”
“The two sat down at a restaurant in Santa Monica, California to talk about the year they had lived on separate coasts.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“And I want to tell her how I’m doing.”This content is imported from YouTube.”
““She’s been a part of my life for so long that I just want to know how she’s doing, and I’m sure she’d like to know how I’m doing.”
““I know there are some things that I want to say and need to tell her,” he said.”
“He told his friend Kejo what he wanted out of meeting Theresa.”
“He was filmed working out in the gym, where a new focus on his health has led to a whole new physique.”
“At the end of the day, no matter what, we can continue as a unit for our children as role models.”This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"I've been working hard and I realize that this is a new chapter in my life and I want to embrace it and make good use of it," he said
"They sat down in a restaurant in Santa Monica, California, and talked about the year they lived on different coasts."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"I want to tell her how well I'm doing." The content was imported from YouTube
"She's been a part of my life for so long. I just want to know how she's doing. I'm sure she wants to know how I'm doing."
"I know there are things I want to say that need to be told to her," he said
"He told his friend cajo that he didn't want to see Theresa."
"He was photographed working out in the gym, where the new focus on health brought a whole new physique."
"At the end of the day, no matter what happens, we can continue to set an example for our children as a whole." This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address



**Something goes wrong**
“What has been your mood this 2018?”
“So it’s kind of nice, because I have a bunch of artists around me who I have direct relationships with.”When you are slaying a Versace gown, Louboutin shoes and custom jewelery and tell people to “calm down,” they probably will.”
“Co-star of upcoming thriller, “A Simple Favor,” flawlessly wore a Renaissance-esque dress and with the help of Met Gala crew, stepped onto the red carpet.”
“That is when all the photographers got a little chaotic.”
“(But it’s Blake Lively so who can really blame them?)”
“Who has time for screaming and demands in 2018?”
“Not Blake!”
“Blake Lively Models on the Met Gala Red Carpet Blake Lively telling photographers to “calm down” at the Met Gala is a BIG mood.”
“Posted by E!”
“News on Monday, May 7, 2018When the paparazzi erupted, she took a brief moment from hitting each pose to say something we have all wanted to say at one point or another thus far in 2018.”


"How are you feeling in 2018?"
"So it's a little good, because I have a group of artists who have a direct relationship with me," when you're going to ruin Versace's dress, louboutin's shoes and custom jewelry and tell people to "calm down," they might. “
The co stars of the upcoming thriller "a simple help" put on a Renaissance style dress perfectly and walked onto the red carpet with the help of the staff of the metropolitan party
"All the photographers were a little confused at that time."
"(but it's Blake Lively. Who can really blame them?"
"Who has time to scream and demand in 2018?"
"Not black!"
"Black lively, a model on the red carpet at the met, told the photographer that it was a great mood to" calm down "at the met
"By E!"
"On Monday, May 7, 2018, when the paparazzi broke out, she spent a short time in every pose saying something we wanted to say at some point in 2018 so far."



**Something goes wrong**
“Chris Pratt would participate in a Parks and Recreation revival.”
“I know I would do it.”And there you have it, the answer to all (one) of your (my) questions.”
““I would love it.”
“I mean, you can’t do Parks and Rec without Andy.”“I miss Andy,” he said.”
““It films, like, 10 minutes from my house, so that would be dope.”
“News reporter Will Marfuggi.”
“Advertisement“As long as I’m in town, yeah, I’ll do it,” he told E!”
“He said he’d “love” to, if he’s around.”
“Chris Pratt, Jezebel’s canon fourth-tier famous Chris, was asked about his interest in doing said hypothetical revival while on the red carpet for Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom’s L.A. premiere Wednesday night.”
“Last month, Parks and Recreation stars Amy Poehler and Nick Offerman floated the idea of bringing back the Emmy-nominated sitcom, which ran for seven seasons between 2009 and 2015, à la Will & Grace, Fuller House, and Canceledanne.”


"Chris Platt will participate in the park and recreation Renaissance."
"I know I'll do it." This is your answer, the answer to all your (my) questions
"I'll like it."
"I mean, you can't go to the park and have fun without Andy." "I miss Andy," he said
"It can be shot 10 minutes from my home, so that's drugs."
"Journalist will Malfoy."
"Advertising" as long as I'm in town, yes, I'll do it, "he told e!"
"He said he would be happy to go if he was there."
"On the red carpet at the premiere of Jurassic world: the fallen kingdom in Los Angeles on Wednesday night, jazebel's Canon 4-star Chris Pratt was asked if he was interested in repeating Jurassic world: the fallen kingdom."
"Last month, park and entertainment stars Amy Poehler and Nick offerman put forward the idea of moving back Emmy nominated sitcoms" a la will & Grace "," fuller house "and" cancelled Anne ", which were broadcast for seven consecutive seasons between 2009 and 2015."



**Something goes wrong**
“[Featured Image by Dimitrios Kambouris/Getty Images]”
“The source explained how their relationship had been on shaky ground for months prior to the breakup.”
“Following the end of her relationship with NFL star Aaron Rodgers, the actress is reportedly dating a new man.”
“Has Munn already put Rodgers’ family drama behind her?”
“Radar Online reports that Munn was caught getting extra cozy with Trevor Noah this past weekend.”
“The two allegedly met up twice over the extended weekend, including a romantic lunch in East Village.”
“The actress donned heels, a camo jacket, and a leopard pattern romper for the outing while the comedian wore a casual blue outfit.”
“The two appeared more than happy during their lunch, though it isn’t clear if they are actually dating.”
“Munn has not been spotted with other men since her breakup with Rodgers.”
“The two parted ways because Rodgers was reportedly tired of all her drama.”


"[Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images selected pictures]"
"The source explained that their relationship had been unstable in the months before the breakup."
"After ending her relationship with NFL star Aaron Rogers, the actress is reported to be dating a new man."
Has Munn left Rogers' family drama behind? "
"Radar Online reported that Munn was found to be particularly close to Trevor Noah last weekend."
"The two are said to have met twice over the extended weekend, including a romantic lunch in the East Village."
The actress wore high heels, a camouflage jacket and a leopard print Jumpsuit for the outing, while the comedian wore a casual blue suit
"The two seemed very happy at lunch, but it's not clear if they were actually dating."
"Since Munn and Rogers broke up, no one has found her with other men."
"The two parted ways because Rogers was reported to be tired of all her plays."



**Something goes wrong**
“Related:”
“However, recommendations for your specific situation should only be made by your doctor.”
“Anyone who has flown while pregnant knows that travel has its own set of particular annoyances and complications when "you're knocked up," as Danes put it live on air, and even Emmy award-winning actors aren't immune.”
“Danes began the interview by explaining that, in order to encourage blood flow to her heart, she's supposed to wear compression stockings (also referred to as "compression socks") as often as possible.”
“But she avoids them unless she's traveling because she thinks they're "dreadful."”
“On her flight to L A she delayed putting the stockings on until it was entirely essential which meant trying to squeeze into the extra tight stockings in the teeny tiny bathroom of the plane which resulted in a battle...”
“...of life and limb that took upwards of 20 freakin minutes to get through...”
“As Danes pointed out in her lesson learned, "it turns out compression stockings are rather tight" and she may have been wise to have followed her doctor's suggestion to use talcum powder to help with the process.”
“Thankfully, all turned out well and the Homeland actress now has a funny story that other moms will surely relate to.”
“"I don't know what they thought I was doing in there," said Danes at the end of the story, "but it was not erotic."”


Related:
However, suggestions for your specific situation can only be made by your doctor
"Anyone who has been on a plane during pregnancy knows that travel has its own set of special worries and complications. As the Dane said during the live broadcast, even Emmy award-winning actors are not immune."
The Dane explained at the beginning of the interview that in order to encourage blood flow to the heart, she should wear compression socks (also known as "compression socks") as much as possible
"But she would avoid them unless she was traveling because she thought they were terrible."
"On the flight to Los Angeles, she delayed wearing stockings until it was absolutely necessary, which meant that she tried to squeeze into the super tight stockings in the narrow bathroom on the plane, which led to a fight..."
“… Life and limbs take 20 minutes to get through... "
"As the Dane points out in her lesson," compression stockings have proven to be quite tight, "and she may be wise to use talcum powder to help with the process, as her doctor suggests
"Thank goodness, everything is going well. This local actress has an interesting story now, and other mothers will love it."
"I don't know what they think I'm doing in there," the Dane says at the end of the story, "but it's not pornography."



**Something goes wrong**
“His fans can chill down as he seems very healthy and he also managed to put on some weight.”
“AdvertisementBut now, he is back in the spotlight and he is looking greater than ever.”
“They were photographed getting inked at the Tattoo Mania parlor in West Hollywood.”
“...disney pajama party with the greatest roommates of all time A post shared by Paris-Michael K. Jackson (@parisjackson) on Jul 28, 2017 at 11:23pm PDTMacaulay, 36, and Paris, 19, got matching spoon tattoos on their arms.”
“Such designs often symbolize a continuing struggle.”
“Macaulay and Paris did not explain the meaning behind their new tattoos.”
“With a totally new look, the Home Alone actor was spotted walking in Hollywood with Paris Jackson, the daughter of his friend, the late Michael Jackson.”
“The two of them went into a tattoo parlor.”
“Paris looked at the photographers as they headed to the tattoo parlor.”
“The two of them have occasionally hung out before.”


"His fans can calm down because he looks very healthy and he managed to gain some weight
"But now, he's back in the spotlight and looks bigger than ever."
"They were photographed inking in the tattoo craze hall in West Hollywood."
“… Disney pajamas party shared a post with the greatest roommate of all time, Paris Michael K. Jackson (@ parisjackson), at 11:23 pm on July 28, 2017. 36 year old Kelly and 19-year-old Paris tattooed their arms with matching spoons. "
"Such designs often symbolize an ongoing struggle."
"Macaulay and Paris didn't explain the meaning behind their new tattoos."
The lone actor took a new look in Hollywood, taking a walk with his friend Paris Jackson, daughter of the late Michael Jackson
"They both went into a tattoo shop."
"Paris looks at the photographers who are going to the tattoo shop."
"The two of them used to go out once in a while."



**Something goes wrong**
“We want to be better…So if you found a mistake in this article, please let us know...”
“It’s time for you to come out and show off what you have got.”
“This includes controlling the diet, moving gym to gym, trying various different trainers and God knows what not.”
“Sometimes they reach their goals and sometimes they do not.”
“Getting a perfect booty is a dream of every girl out there.”
“Being curvy, round and smooth is preferred by everyone.”
“However, this ideal booty is not something that can be accomplished easily.”
“Some sweat has to be shed and a lot of different exercises have to be done.”
“Shannon Nadj | InstagramTo help you get a perfect booty, Selena Gomez’s trainer reveals booty perfecting workouts.”
“Our days to become like Selena Gomez are not far now.”


"We want to do better So if you find errors in this article, please let us know... "
"It's time you showed off."
"It includes diet control, moving the gym to another gym, trying different kinds of coaches, God knows what doesn't work."
"Sometimes they get there, sometimes they don't."
"It's every girl's dream to get a perfect trophy."
"Everyone likes curves and smoothness."
"However, this ideal trophy is not easy."
"I have to sweat and do a lot of different sports."
"Shannon nadj | instagram to help you get the perfect trophy, Selena Gomez's coach showed the perfect trophy training."
"We're not far from becoming Selena Gomez."



**Something goes wrong**
“Multiple nominees: Chadwick Boseman, shown in July in Los Angeles, also was nominated in the Style Star category and landed two more nominations for his work in Black Panther...”
“Boseman, 40, along with his nod for Style Star also was nominated for Male Movie Star and Action Movie Star for his work in Black Panther.”
“New categories this year include: the Bingeworthy Show of 2018, the Game Changer of 2018, the Revival Show of 2018 and the Style Star award.”
“Tough competition: Rihanna, shown in June in London, and Blake Lively, shown last month in New York City, will compete against Markle for the Style Icon awardThe annual awards are voted on by fans in categories including movies, music, television and pop culture.”
“...network after previously being broadcast on CBS.”
“The 44th People's Choice Awards will be presented on November 11 from downtown Los Angeles and will air for the first time on the E!”
“The former Suits star also has become known for flouting traditional British royal protocol by baring her legs, wearing off the shoulder ensembles and styling her dark tresses in a messy bun for her nuptials.”
“Royal style: The Duchess of Sussex, shown on Tuesday in London, was named the Best Dressed Star of 2018 by People on Wednesday as part of its annual listThe stylish star has been winning plaudits for blending outfits from retail fashion stores with designer couture.”
“The Los Angeles native joined the royal family when she married Britain's Prince Harry in May.”
“The Los Angeles native was given the top honor by People in its annual list ahead of Cate Blanchett, Sandra Bullock, Amal Clooney and Kim Kardashian.”


"Multiple nominations: Chadwick Bosman, who was released in Los Angeles in July, has also been nominated as a fashion star, and his work the Panther has won two more nominations..."
Bosman, 40, has been nominated as a male and action star for his role in panther
"This year's new categories include: binggworth show 2018, game changer show 2018, Renaissance show 2018 and Fashion Star Award."
"Fierce competition: Rihanna, who was shown in London in June, and Blake Lively, who was shown in New York last month, will compete with markel for the fashion idol awards, which include film, music, television and popular culture
“… It was broadcast on CBS before and then on the Internet. "
"The 44th people's Choice Awards will be presented in downtown Los Angeles on November 11 and will be held in E!"
The former suit star is also known for her defiance of British Royal etiquette, with her legs bared, her shoulders off and her dark hair in a messy bun
"Royal Style: Duchess of Sussex, on display in London on Tuesday, was named the Best Dressed star of 2018 by people magazine as part of its annual list. The fashion star has won plaudits for integrating the clothing of retail fashion stores with that of fashion designers. "
"The Los Angeles native joined the royal family when he married Prince Harry in May."
The Los Angeles native won the highest honor in the annual rankings, ahead of Kate Blanchett, Sandra Bullock, Amar Clooney and Kim Kardashian



**Something goes wrong**
“...makeup looks for YSL.”
“Ultimately, Halsey is changing the rulebook for celebrity partnerships with beauty brands.”
“It's that enchanting and emotional.”
“But the New Jersey-born singer has many other talents.”
“Allure exclusively reports that Halsey is the new face of Yves Saint Laurent Beauté.”
“The stunning singer will also be flipping the script with her brand ambassadorship by showing off her skills as a makeup artist.”
“Instead of simply appearing in ad campaigns and commercials hawking the brand's luxe makeup, Halsey will create makeup looks herself.”
“She will then post them on her multi-million-strong Instagram.”
“She is taking an influencer route with this partnership — and will speak directly to her fanbase and makeup-loving millennials with this approach.”
“So if you love Halsey's ever-shifting look, you will learn how to replicate it.”


“… Make up is for YSL. "
"In the end, Halsey is changing the rules for celebrities to work with beauty brands."
"That's the charming emotion."
"But the New Jersey born singer has many other talents."
Temptation exclusive: Halsey is the new face of Yves Saint Laurent bott
"The amazing singer will also remake the script with her brand ambassador by showing off her skills as a makeup artist."
"Halsey will make her own make-up, instead of simply appearing in advertising and advertising to sell the brand's luxury make-up."
"Then she'll post these photos on instagram of millions of her own people."
"She's taking an influential route with this partnership - that's how she's going to talk directly to her fan base and makeup loving Millennials."
"So if you like Halsey's fickle look, you'll learn how to copy it."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on The CW.”
“It’s usually one to 100.”
“Read at your own risk!”
“Oliver and Felicity officially reunited during Thursday’s episode of Arrow.”
“Despite their kiss in the season 5 finale, when Arrow returned, Oliver (Stephen Amell) and Felicity (Emily Bett Rickards) had pressed pause on their relationship so that William could adjust to life with Oliver.”
“But now that Oliver has given up the mantle of being the Emerald Archer and William seems somewhat settled, Oliver gives Felicity a key to his apartment, a sign he’s ready for their romance to continue — something they seal with a kiss at the close of the hour.”
““They are back together,” Amell confirms to EW.”
““Right now, they’re back together, but I don’t know [what’s next].”As Amell previously teased, there is much more trust between the duo now in the wake of everything they’ve experienced, which means they won’t be restarting this relationship from square one.”
““I don’t think they can,” Rickards concurs.”
““I just don’t think you can with anyone you have history with and someone you really, really care for.”


"Et on CW."
"It's usually one to 100."
"Reading at your own risk!"
"Oliver and felicity are officially reunited in arrow on Thursday."
"Although they kiss in the season 5 finale, when arrow comes back, Oliver (Stephen amel) and felicity (Emily bate Ricardo) have asked to suspend their relationship so that William can adapt to the life with Oliver."
"But now that Oliver has given up the title of emerald Archer, William seems to have settled down a bit. Oliver gives felicity a key to his apartment, which shows that he is ready to let their love continue - it was sealed with a kiss at the end of an hour."
"They're together again," amel told Ai Weiwei
"Now, they're together again, but I don't know (what's next)." As Amer had ridiculed before, after all that happened, the two people now have more trust, which means they will not start the relationship from the very beginning.
"I don't think they can," agreed Ricardo
"I just don't think you can be with anyone you have a history with and someone you really, really care about."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'Everyone here at Smile Train, and all of the cleft children around the world that she has helped, couldn’t be more grateful.'”
“'Kylie has a beautiful smile herself, yet we were most impressed with her selflessness, huge heart and extremely generous giving spirit.”
“But Kylie Jenner, 19, looked a little tired as she got off a private jet with her mother Kris, 61, in Cusco, Peru with a zebra blanket wrapped around her.”
“The mother-daughter duo are in the South American country on a medical trip to support Smile Train, an organization that provides free surgeries to repair cleft pallets for children living in developing countries.”
“Worn out?”
“Kylie Jenner, 19, looked a little tired as she got off a private jet with her mother Kris, 61, in Cusco, Peru with a zebra blanket wrapped around herKylie had her dark hair up in a ponytail parted down the center and appeared to be covering up dark leggings.”
“Mother Kris was a little more dressed up in a black shirt and a grey overcoat.”
“She wore dark sunglasses on her face as she departed the private jet.”
“The mother-daughter duo managed to squeeze in a little sight-seeing in between giving back on the trip.”
“Little more put together: Kris was a little more dressed up in a black shirt and a grey overcoatKylie was later seen with the blanket off and was sporting a sequined leather jacket and the same leggings.”


"Everyone on the smile train, and all the cleft lip children around the world she helped, are very grateful."
"Kelly herself has a beautiful smile, but what impresses us most is her selflessness, great heart and extremely generous dedication."
"But Kylie Jenner, 19, and her mother Kris, 61, got off the private plane in Cusco, Peru, wrapped in a zebra blanket and looked a little tired."
"The mother and daughter are on a medical trip to South America to support smile train, which provides free surgery to repair cleft palate trays for children living in developing countries."
"Tired?"
"Kylie Jenner, 19, and her mother Kris, 61, got off a private plane in Cusco, Peru, wrapped in a zebra blanket and looked a little tired. Kelly braided her black hair in a ponytail, separating it from the middle, as if covering her dark leggings
"Mother Chris is more beautiful in a black shirt and a gray coat."
"She left the private plane with dark sunglasses on her face."
"Mother and daughter managed to squeeze in a little sightseeing during their return trip."
"Plus: Chris was wearing a black shirt and a gray coat, and then people saw Kelly take off her blanket and wear a sequined leather jacket and the same tights."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“...and saddened they were by the news...”
“The Duke of Cambridge took time to commemorated the victims and observed a moment of silence before the Emirates FA Cup Final at Wembley Stadium on Saturday.”
“"The Duke of Cambridge laid a wreath @wembleystadium before today's #FACupFinal for those who have died in Manchester," Kensington Palace said in a statement.”
“The Twitter account also shared a handwritten letter by the 34-year-old royal, which said, 'We will never fear coming together to celebrate all that unites us.”
“In memory of the friends and family taken from us in Manchester."”
“"We will never fear coming together to celebrate all that unites us.”
“...pic twitter com ZxJchEdH7V The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge KensingtonRoyal May 27 2017 Getty Images Getty Images RELATED Prince Harry Reunites With Barack Obama at Kensington Palace to Discuss Manchester Victims After the fatal bombing Prince William Kate Middleton and Prince Harry released a joint statement expressing how shocked...”
“"Like everyone, Catherine, Harry and I are left shocked and saddened by the tragedy that unfolded in Manchester overnight.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
“… They feel sad about the news... "
"Before the UAE FA Cup final at Wembley on Saturday, the Duke of Cambridge took time to commemorate the victims and observe a moment of silence
"The Duke of Cambridge laid a wreath at wembletta in Manchester ahead of today's final," Kensington Palace said in a statement.
"The twitter account also shared a personal letter from the 34 year old royal, saying," we will never be afraid to come together to celebrate what we are united. "
"In memory of the friends and family that were taken from us in Manchester."
"We'll never be afraid to get together and celebrate what we're united for."
“… Pic twitter com ZxJchEdH7V Prince Harry and Barack Obama reunite at Kensington Palace to discuss the Manchester victims, Prince William Kate Middleton and Prince Harry issued a joint statement expressing their shock at the incident... "
"Like everyone else, Catherine, Harry and I were shocked and saddened by the tragedy that happened in Manchester overnight."



**Something goes wrong**
“Hopefully, everything moves smoothly and Luann and Tom can part ways without too much extra drama.”
“Since this season of RHONY has almost wrapped completely, it is unclear whether the divorce will be part of next season's storyline.”
“Luann's costars have begun to weigh in on the situation, with Ramona taking to Twitter to give her response to the news.”
“Unfortunately, it doesn't look like things were able to be completely resolved in the end and Luann made an announcement about their split on her Twitter page, asking fans to please respect their privacy.”
“Some fans were shocked to see that they went ahead with the wedding despite these allegations, but Luann was confident that they could move past the drama.”
“I deeply regret the mistakes I've made, and most of all hate the way it hurt Luann.")”
“...soon afterward in which Tom said If I could take it back I would...”
“Tom has never flat out denied these claims he said on the show that he didn t remember and then he said to Luann on the phone It ll never happen again He and Luann did an interview with People...”
“Last season, fellow housewife Bethenny Frankel alleged that she had photos of Tom and another woman kissing at a NYC bar before the couple's engagement party.”
“RHONY fans are well aware that Luann and Tom were not starting off their brief marriage on the most stable of feet.”


"I hope everything goes well. Luan and Tom can go their separate ways without too many extra parts."
"As this season of Ronnie is almost over, it's not clear whether divorce will be part of the story for the next season."
"Luan's stars have begun to pay attention to this situation, Ramona responded to the news on twitter."
"Unfortunately, things don't seem to work out in the end. Luan announced their breakup on her twitter page, asking fans to respect their privacy."
"Some fans are shocked to see that despite the accusations, they continue to hold the wedding, but Luan an believes that they can go beyond the play."
"I deeply regret the mistake I made. What I hate most is the way it hurt Luan.")
“… Soon after, Tom said, "if I could take it back, I would..."
"Tom never flatly denied these claims. He said in the program that he didn't remember. Then he told Luan on the phone that it won't happen again. He did an interview with Luan..."
Last season, the same housewife, Bethenny Frankel, claimed that she had pictures of Tom and another woman kissing before an engagement party in a New York bar
"Ronnie's fans know very well that Luan and Tom didn't start their short-term marriage on the most stable basis."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And he knows exactly what he is doing, which makes it worse.”
“Making fun of a disabled reporter, stereotyping ethnic groups, attacking reporters for how they look – all of that stuff is totally and completely unacceptable.”
“Most comedians who speak at the correspondents’ dinner take a fair number of shots at the attendees in the room.”
“I wonder whether Talev thought Wolf’s approach was such a great idea after the comedian’s speech.”
“(A coastal comedian is not exactly “regular” people, but whatever.)”
“That was seen as a good thing, given that the criticism of Washington and its denizens since the election of Trump is that they/we are deeply out of touch with normal Americans.”
“Wolf had zero interest in playing to the roomIntroducing the “Daily Show” comic, White House Correspondents’ Association President Margaret Talev praised Wolf as someone who was very much not part of the world of Washington.”
“(You can watch the whole speech yourself here.)”
“These are in no order other than how they occurred to me.”
“I thought I’d share them – and expand on them – here.”


"And he knows what he's doing, which is even worse."
"Making fun of a disabled journalist, stereotyping racial discrimination, attacking the reporter's appearance - all these are totally unacceptable."
"Most of the comedians who speak at the press dinner will shoot at the participants in the meeting."
"I don't know if, after the comedian's speech, talev thought Wolff's approach was a good idea."
(coastal comedians are not all "ordinary" people, but anyway.)
"It's seen as a good thing, because since Trump's election, the criticism of Washington and its residents is that they / we are seriously out of touch with ordinary Americans."
Wolff has no interest in the daily show comics. Margaret talev, President of the White House Press Association, praised Wolff for not belonging to Washington
"You can read the whole speech for yourself here."
"That's what I thought."
"I think I should share them here and expand them."



**Something goes wrong**
“Even within this giant paradigm that a lot of times doesn’t include people who look like us.”Oh will face off against Elisabeth Moss (The Handmaid’s Tale), Claire Foy (The Crown), Keri Russell (The Americans), Evan Rachel Wood (Westworld) and Tatiana Maslany (Orphan Black) come Emmy night.”
“And Nancy goes Sweetheart it s Eve it s Eve Image zoom Sandra Oh Credit Dominik Magdziak Photography Getty Her surprise was the result of a bigger problem racism she claimed to have experienced for so long in Hollywood that left her brainwashed In that moment I did not assume...”
“Oh my goodness, I didn’t even assume when being offered something that I would be one of the central storytellers.”
“It’s like, how does racism define your work?”
“[So] many years of being seen [a certain way], it deeply, deeply, deeply affects us.”
“Of just going, how deep have I internalized this?”
““I think about that moment a lot.”
“...the offer was for Eve she said...”
“So I’m like, ‘So Nancy, I don’t understand, what’s the part?’ ” Oh recalled to Vulture in April.”
“She continued: “But if what you want is to connect, if what you want is to be a great artist, I think you can find your way.”


"Even in this huge paradigm, most of the time people who look like us are not included." Oh, Emmy night will be against Elizabeth moss, Claire foy, Kerry Russell, Evan Rachel wood and Tatiana maslani
"Nancy went to sweetheart it's Eve it's Eve image zooming Sandra Oh credit Dominic majiak photography Getty her surprise is a bigger problem as a result of racism, she claims to have gone through so long in Hollywood, let her brainwash that moment, I don't think..."
"Oh, my God, when someone offered me something, I didn't even think I would be one of the central characters in the story."
"Like, how does racism define your job?"
"It's been seen (in some way) for years, and it's deeply, deeply, deeply affecting us."
"If I go on like this, how deeply do I internalize this point?"
"I thought a lot at that moment."
“… This proposal is for Eve. She said
"So I thought," Nancy, I don't understand. What's the role? "Oh, I said to the vultures in April."
"But if you want to connect, if you want to be a great artist, I think you can find your way," she added



**Something goes wrong**
“...from her usual amount of spotlight...”
“RELATED VIDEO Kim Kardashian West Is Giving Us a Piece of Their Christmas Photo One Day at a Time A source revealed to PEOPLE Monday that Khloé although not quite as private as expectant sister Kylie Jenner has been since news of her pregnancy broke is enjoying some time away...”
“Even though her torso is clearly visible in the new photo, the soon-to-be first-time mom — who’s expecting a baby boy with boyfriend Tristan Thompson early next year — wears high-waisted jeans and a white cropped top.”
“Fans looking for a pregnancy hint from Khloé, 33, may be disappointed.”
“On day 8, she was visible from the chest down in a photo focusing on Saint and his sister North, 4½, making her official debut on day 13 and posing in group shots on days 14 and 19.”
“Day 20 is Houghton’s fifth appearance in the family’s pictorial countdown.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Everyone aside from Saint, Dream and Houghton, 83, is shot from the waist up, letting the snap express the obvious pride on Houghton’s face during the memorable moment.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


“… From her usual spotlight... "
"Kim Kardashian west gives us a picture of them every day. On Monday, a source revealed to people that although Kylie Jenner's privacy is not as private as her sister to be Kylie Jenner's after the news of her pregnancy came out, she is enjoying a period of vacation..."
"Although her torso is clearly visible in the new photo, the soon to be first mother - who will have a baby boy with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson early next year - is wearing high waisted jeans and a white cropped top."
"Fans who want to get pregnant hints from 33 year old Heroe may be disappointed."
"On the 8th day, you can see her below her chest in a photo. The focus of the photo is the saint and his 4-and-a-half-year-old sister north. She officially appeared on the 13th day, and took photos on the 14th and 19th days."
"Day 20 is Horton's fifth appearance in the countdown to the family."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"With the exception of Saint, dream and 83 year old Horton, everyone was photographed from the waist up. At this unforgettable moment, let the camera express the obvious pride on Horton's face."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Praying for her right now, addiction is a terrifying disease.”
“Country star Brad Paisley, who collaborated with Lovato on a song from his newest album, tweeted his support: "My friend @ddlovato is one of the kindest, most talented people I’ve ever met.”
“Lovato's former "Camp Rock" co-star (and ex) Joe Jonas said he had the singer in his thoughts.”
“#ImConfidentInDemi Demi, I love you," she wrote.”
“And may you receive the love so many have for you.”
“If I know my monsters as well as I believe I do, we all wish you self-compassion and inner peace.”
“Thank God.”
“I am so happy you’re alive.”
“Lady Gaga said she was thankful Lovato is OK."We should all wrap our arms of love around Demi Lovato.”
“Former professional basketball player Dennis Rodman shared of photo with Lovato and encouraged her to "Stay strong!"”


"Pray for her now, addiction is a terrible disease."
"My friend @ ddlovato is one of the kindest and most talented people I've ever met," tweeted country singer Brad Paisley, who collaborated with Lovato on a song from his latest album
Lovato's former "Camp Rock" co star (former) Joe Jonas said he was a singer in his mind
"I believe in Demi and I love you," she wrote
"May you have the love of many people."
"If I know my monster as well as I believe, we all want you to have self compassion and inner peace."
"Thank God."
"I'm glad you're alive."
Lady Gaga said she was grateful Lovato was OK. "We should all put our arms around Demi Lovato."
Former professional basketball player Dennis Rodman shared a group photo with Lovato and encouraged her to "stay strong!"



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“… especially Letitia Wright as Princess Shuri …Peter Travers, Rolling Stone:AdvertisementAdvertisementThere’s no beating the smarts and sass of the wonderous Letitia Wright, who brings scene-stealing to the level of grand larceny as Princess Shuri, T’Challa’s kid sister.”
“Angela Bassett swans in as the royal mother, while Lupita Nyong’o, as a spy, makes the case for her own spinoff.”
“Peter Debruge Variety T Challa doesn t feel like a superhero so much as a deeply conflicted world leader albeit one who must defend his title via brutal hand to hand bloodmatches in a ritual that suggests a considerably more primordial and decidedly anti democratic form of governance Rather than...”
“The fictional universe’s politics may be complex and conflicting …Manohla Dargis, New York Times:AdvertisementThe movie also rather too breezily establishes Wakanda as a militaristic monarchy that is nevertheless fair and democratic.”
“Leah Greenblatt, Entertainment Weekly:In that context, Panther’s nuanced celebration of pride and identity and personal responsibility doesn’t just feel like a fresh direction for the genre, it’s the movie’s own true superpower.”
“Not this one … As with all Marvel screen ventures, the story has a lot of moving parts, but in general the results don’t register as the same-old superhero busywork, the kind that makes for forgettable stories and strenuously overinflated running times.”
“Manohla Dargis, New York Times:Most big studio fantasies take you out for a joy ride only to hit the same exhausted story and franchise-expanding beats.”
“Kenneth Turan, L.A. Times:AdvertisementAdvertisementBlack Panther… is an against-the-grain $100-million-plus epic so intensely personal that when the usual Marvel touchstones (Stan Lee, anyone) appear, they feel out of place.”
“… making it like no other superhero movie before it.”
“Here, Coogler makes black identity invincible, but avoids simplification by turning Wakanda into a society of different tribes, each with its own customs, goals and political agendas.”


“…… Especially letia Wright as Princess Shuri Peter travos, rolling stone: advertising is there. It's not as smart and rude as the great Letitia Wright, who takes the drama to the stage of theft as t'challa's sister, Princess Shuli
"Angela Bassett plays the role of the Royal mother, while Lupita Nino defends her illegitimate son as a spy."
"Peter debruge t Challa is not so much a superhero as a contradictory world leader, although he has to defend his title through cruel hand-to-hand combat. This ceremony means a more primitive and resolute form of anti democratic governance rather than..."
"Fictional cosmopolitanism can be complex and conflicting New York's Manora Dargis times: the film ads also establish vakanda as a militarist monarchy. Nevertheless, it is fair and democratic. "
"Leah Greenblatt, Entertainment Weekly: in this context, Panther's subtle celebration of pride, identity and personal responsibility is not only a new direction for this type of film, but also a real superpower of the film itself."
"Not this Like all marvel movie adventures, the story has a lot of moving parts, but on the whole, the result is not as busy as the previous superheroes, the kind of forgotten stories and the extremely inflated running time. "
"Manora Dargis, New York Times: the fantasy of the biggest film company takes you out for a ride, only to find the same exhausted story and rhythm."
"Kenneth Turan, Los Angeles. Times: advertising Panther It's an epic worth more than 100 million dollars. It's very personal. When the usual miracle touchstone (Stan Lee, anyone) appears, they feel out of place. "
“… Make it like any superhero movie before. "
"Kugeller makes black people invincible here, but by turning vakanda into a society of different tribes, each with its own customs, goals and political agenda, simplification is avoided."



**Something goes wrong**
“Luna: 0,” she quipped.”
“Baby boy: 1 point.”
““I can confirm postpartum life is 90% better when you don’t rip to your butthole.”
“She previously said on Twitter things are better this time around.”
““If you haven’t seen @AliWong’s new Netflix special, you are bad at picking Netflix specials #AsianPearUnderwear,” she captioned the image.”
“On Sunday night, she posted a topless snapshot while holding little Miles.”
“...disgusting.”Teigen hasn’t shied away from the ups and downs of motherhood.”
“The supermodel poked fun at Legend on Twitter, writing, “Wow didn’t u just have a baby John smh go take care of it!!!!!!”
“...handling two kids...”
“When he came out and we hung out with him for a little we were like He looks like a Miles While Legend 39 was out working the red carpet and performing at the ceremony which saw Janet Jackson receive the icon award Teigen 32 was home cooking dinner and...”


"Luna: 0," she quipped
"Baby boy: 1 point."
"I'm sure if you don't tear your butt, you'll get 90 percent better after childbirth."
"She said on twitter before that this time it's better."
"If you haven't seen @ aliwong's new Netflix special, you're not good at choosing Netflix special," she wrote in the title of the picture
"On Sunday night, she held little miles in her arms and posted a snapshot of her topless body."
“… Disgusting. " Tegan did not avoid the ups and downs of motherhood
The supermodel teased the legend on Twitter and wrote: "Wow, you just had a baby, John Smith, take care of it!"
“… Dealing with two children... "
"When he came out, we went out with him for a while, we thought he looked like a mile, while legend 39 worked on the red carpet, performed at the ceremony, Janet Jackson won the idol award, tygan 32 cooked at home, and..."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When asked about the album's release date, Timberlake said, “I’ll put it out when it’s done — when it feels right.”Until that day comes, he'll likely continue dropping hints to keep his fans on their toes.”
“"I would pay Justin a huge compliment to say he’s just discovering who he is now," Pharrell said.”
“Pharrell Williams confirmed on "Today" that he is working on new music with Justin Timberlake.”
“Timberlake tweeted "On the way.." at some impatient Twitter fans who were itching for a new album.”
“In November Justin revealed that the sound of his new album would be much different than the last.”
“It's been nearly four years since Justin Timberlake released his back-to-back studio albums "The 20/20 Experience" and "The 20/20 Experience — 2 of 2."”
“Since his last records dropped in 2013, Timberlake, besides becoming a first-time dad, has been keeping busy as a prominent feature on several musical projects.”
“He saw success with “Love Never Felt So Good” on the posthumous Michael Jackson album "Xscape" in 2014.”
“There was also his happy-go-lucky No.”
“1 single “Can't Stop The Feeling” from the "Trolls" motion picture soundtrack in 2016.”


Asked about the release date of the album, Timberlake said: "I'll release it when it's finished - when it feels right." Until that day comes, he may continue to hint to keep his fans on the alert. "
"I want to give Justin a big compliment, saying he just found out who he is," Farrell said
Pharrell Williams confirmed on "today" that he is working with Justin Timberlake to create new music
"Timberlake tweeted:" on the road... "Some impatient twitter fans who are eager for a new album."
"Last November, Justin revealed that the sound of his new album will be very different from that of his previous one."
"Justin Timberlake has been releasing studio albums the 20 / 20 experience and the 20 / 20 experience-2 of 2 for nearly four years."
"Since his last record was eliminated in 2013, besides becoming a father for the first time, Timberlake has been busy, which is one of his outstanding features in several music projects."
"In 2014, he saw the success of" love has never been so good "on Michael Jackson's post death album" Xscape. "
"He's lucky, too."
"1 single the feeling that can't be stopped" in the soundtrack of 2016 Troll movie



**Something goes wrong**
“Photo credit: E!”
“(Photo: E!)”
“While drama consumed the episode, Kourtney, Khloe and friend Jonathan Cheban brought some bizarre comedic relief with the help of an "as seen on TV" tool Khloe couldn't live without.”
“Khloe told the group she bought a fascia blaster to rub out the appearance of cellulite on her body.”
“(Kardashians, they're just like us.)”
“"It gets rid of cellulite, you rub it on your body, it's literally the most painful [thing]," Khloe said.”
“"You rub this on your body really hard, but you gotta be naked.”
“You should see me naked in my bed doing this.”
“It looks like a very weird sexual thing."”
“Up Next: Khloe Kardashian Swears by This Vibrating Tool Before and After Her Workouts"You take your jeans off and I'll do this to you," Khloe instructed Kourtney.”


Image source: e! "
"(photo: e!)"
"When the drama consumed this episode, kurtany, Khloe and friend Jonathan Cheban brought some strange comedy relief with the help of" tool Khloe can't live without life ", as seen on TV
"Khloe told the team that she bought a fascia blaster to wipe the fat off her body."
"They're like us, Kardashian."
"It removes cellulite, and you rub it on your body, which is the most painful thing," Khloe said
"You rub hard on yourself, but you have to be naked."
"You should see me doing this in bed naked."
"It looks like a very strange sexual act."
"Next: Khloe Kardashian swears with this vibrating tool before and after exercise:" you take off your jeans, and I'll do it to you, "Khloe told Kourtney



**Something goes wrong**
“Williams sits on the board of advisers to Oath, HuffPost’s parent company, which is owned by Verizon.”
“The remaining installments will air subsequent Wednesdays at the same time.”
“On May 2 HBO will premiere Being Serena a five part documentary series about the tennis superstar that will not only delve into Williams career but will also chronicle her 2017 marriage to Reddit co founder Alexis Ohanian and the birth of her first child Alexis Olympia Ohanian Jr Williams...”
“...has spoken about complications she faced throughout her pregnancy revealing that she almost died after giving birth to her daughter...”
“The new series takes a deeper dive into what really went on, as well as into Williams’ journey back to the tennis court.”
“Tim Clayton - Corbis via Getty Images "Being Serena," a new five-part HBO series about tennis superstar Serena Williams, premieres on May 2.”
““When I realized that I was pregnant I was like, ‘Oh my God.”
“How am I going to play?’” Williams says in the “Being Serena” teaser, exclusively premiering on HuffPost.”
““I put so much pressure on myself.”
“I want to make sure that I’m the best.”A post shared by Serena Williams (@serenawilliams) on Mar 26, 2018 at 7:55am PDT“Being Serena” also touches on Williams’ life as a businesswoman and investor in technology, fashion, fitness and philanthropy.”


Williams is a member of the Advisory Board of the parent company, Vaughn, who owns Verizon
"The rest of the show will be broadcast simultaneously on the following Wednesday."
"On May 2, HBO will premiere a five part documentary series about the tennis superstar, which will not only deepen Williams' career, but also record her 2017 marriage to reddit co-founder Alexis Ohanian and her first child Alexis Olympia The birth of Ohanian Jr Williams.... "
“…… She talked about the complications she faced during her pregnancy and revealed that she almost died after giving birth to her daughter.... "
"The new series provides insight into the real situation and Williams' return to the tennis court."
"Tim Clayton Colby" becomes Serena "through Getty pictures, a new five part HBO series about tennis superstar Serena Williams, premiered on May 2
"When I realized I was pregnant, I said, 'oh my God.'"
"How do I play? Williams said in the "be Serena" teaser that the film premiered exclusively in the huff post
"I put a lot of pressure on myself."
"I want to make sure I'm the best." At 7:55 a.m. on March 26, 2018, Serena Williams (@ Serena Williams) shared an article "becoming Serena", which also covered Williams' life as a businesswoman and investor in technology, fashion, fitness and philanthropy



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Is Eileen only wearing one super long earring on purpose or did she lose one?”
“Eileen asks Kim, “Have you seen yourself on TV?” Kim is the most overly dramatic person on any franchise and Eileen is frequently called boring because she is not dramatic at all in real life.”
“Just shut the fuck up.”
“Just shut the fuck up Dorit, this has nothing to do with you.”
“Dorit the idiot opens her mouth and I scream at her to shut up louder than Rinna did.”
“Kim only has Rinna.”
“Rinna has a lot of other publicity.”
“For the last year or so, I only get one when she in on RHOBH and Rinna’s name is always on it too.”
“I used to cringe when they would come through because it was always something bad.”
“It’s the only Google Alert I have.”


"Is Irene wearing only one extra long earring on purpose or missing one?"
"Did you see yourself on TV?" Irene asked Kim? "Kim is the most dramatic of all dramas, and Irene is often called boring because she is not dramatic at all in real life."
"Shut the hell up."
"Shut up, dorit. It's none of your business."
"Dorothy, idiot, open her mouth. I told her to shut up, louder than Lina."
"It's only Lina."
"Lina has a lot of other publicity."
"In the past year or so, I only got one when she was in RHOBH and Lina's name was always on it."
"I always flinch when they come, because it's always bad."
"This is my only Google alert."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That remains to be seen, but the source said Ortiz-Magro “just wants to do his best for the baby.”“That’s where his heart is at,” the source said.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Like, being with someone for seven years and then you don’t end up with that person?”
“… Every man wishes that he can be with the love of his life.”
“And I feel like that’s why I am the way I am and will continue to be the way I am.”
“And that’s so f—ing hard to find.”
““Because that’s what she gave.”
“Why are we still talking about this?”“I think I just miss the feeling of like, security,” he replied.”
“It’s been f—ing 10 years.”
“Babe, get over Sam.”


"It remains to be seen, but sources say that Ortiz Magro" just wants to do his best for the kids. " "That's what he meant," the source said
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"For example, seven years with one person, and then you're not with that person?"
“…… Everyone wants him to be with the love of his life. "
"I think that's why I became who I am and will continue to be who I am."
"That's too hard to find."
"Because she gave it."
"Why are we still talking about this? "I think I just miss that sense of security," he replied
"It's been 10 years."
"Baby, forget Sam."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now it's sort of become this thing whenever they're in town.”
“We had quiche.”
“Antoni didn't come that time, but he came over [another time].”
“So, he came over.”
“I knew he was in Brooklyn or something because he was with Antoni, and he immediately hit me back, and he was like, 'Oh, my God, yes, I'm coming right away.'”
“And I sent him a little—I was like, hey, you probably won't get this, this is Justin, but I'm making a quiche this Easter and if you want to come by.”
“That's how we celebrate.”
“I was making a quiche.”
“...in Jonathan s Stories that he was in New York...”
“And then I did one of those things that I ve never done before in my life where I was with some friends it was Easter and I was just like I m just gonna DM them because I saw...”


"Now that's what happens as soon as they get into town."
"We had omelets."
"Anthony didn't come that time, but he came (another time),"
"So, he came."
"I know he's in Brooklyn or something, because he's with Anthony, and he immediately hit me back, and he said," oh my God, yes, I'll be right here. "
"I sent him a little - I said, hey, you may not get this, this is Justin, but this Easter I'm going to make an omelet, if you want to come."
"That's how we celebrate."
"I'm making waffles."
“… In Jonathan's story, he's in New York... "
"Then I did something I had never done in my life. It was Easter, and I was with some friends. I was like I was going to make DM for them, because I saw..."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““The police were not there to help us.”
“Their relationship with the Ramseys completely broke down when they threatened to refuse to release JonBenét’s body for burial unless the Ramseys came in for an interview, and there were frequent leaks from the Boulder police department to the media.”
“She had been bashed over the head, strangled with a garrote fashioned out of a nylon cord and her mother’s paintbrush, and possibly sexually assaulted.”
“When he brought her upstairs, it was obvious she had been dead for some time.”
“He went down to the basement with a friend and there he saw his daughter, bound and gagged.”
“After the kidnappers failed to call at the promised time, one of the officers suggested to John that he look around the family’s large house.”
“The police arrived at the Ramsey house, along with many of the Ramseys’ friends, who wandered freely around the property.”
“She had found a two-and-a-half-page ransom note demanding $118,000 for her safe return.”
“Her daughter had been taken from their home in the middle of the night, she said.”
“The few undisputed facts are as follows: just before 6am on 26 December, Patsy called the Boulder police department from her home.”


"The police are not here to help us."
"Their relationship with the Ramsey couple was completely broken. They threatened to refuse to release giobennet's body for burial unless the Ramsey couple came for an interview, and the boulder police often leaked secrets to the media."
"She was hit in the head, strangled by a nylon rope throat and her mother's brush, and possibly sexually assaulted."
"When he took her upstairs, it was clear that she had been dead for some time."
"He went down to the basement with a friend, where he saw his daughter, tied and gagged."
The kidnappers didn't call at the appointed time, and one of the police officers suggested that John go to see the big house
"The police came to Ramsey's house with many of Ramsey's friends, and they wandered around the house."
"She found a two-and-a-half-page ransom note demanding $118000 to return safely."
"Her daughter was taken from her home in the middle of the night," she said
"The few undisputed facts are as follows: just before 6 a.m. on December 26, Passy called the boulder police station from his home."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on the telethon benefiting Hurricane Harvey relief, watch the video below:”
“Though her speech was for her adorable 6-year-old daughter, Willow, and centered on not conforming to one standard of beauty, she admitted Willow was "incredibly unimpressed" with her!”
“The two superstars played a game of "Never Have I Ever" during their appearance on The Ellen DeGeneres Show, airing Wednesday, and gamely coughed up a few surprising confessions.”
“Chief among them was both Pink and Witherspoon admitting they've had sex before in a public place.”
“"A park," Pink revealed when asked where.”
“EXCLUSIVE: 'Outlander' Stars Sam Heughan and Caitriona Balfe Play a Whisky-Filled Game of 'Never Have I Ever!'”
“Witherspoon, however, was a bit more shy.”
“"I said no follow-up questions!"”
“...she joked.”
“During the game, the ladies at some point revealed they've both gotten a tattoo they regret, went topless at the beach, and hooked up with a person while another person was in the room.”


"For more information about the TV program to help rescue hurricane Harvey, watch the following video:
Although her speech is for her lovely 6-year-old daughter, willow, and focuses on beauty that doesn't meet a standard, she admits willow is "incredibly indifferent" with her
The two superstars played a game of "I've never done it before" on Wednesday's "Ellen DeGeneres Show" and boldly uttered a few surprising confessions
"The main ones are Pinker and Witherspoon, who admit to having sex in public before."
"A park," Pinker revealed when asked where it was
Exclusive: outlander stars Sam HaiGan and Katrina barf play a whiskey filled game "I've never had one!"
"But Witherspoon is a little shy."
"I said no follow-up questions!"
“…… She joked
"In the competition, the ladies revealed at some point that they all got a tattoo, they felt sorry, went to the beach, went topless, and hooked up with one person while the other person was in the room."



**Something goes wrong**
“Then it takes two minutes to chop up some vegetables, make a nice sauce, and you're done.”A representative for Paltrow wasn’t immediately available to comment.”
“I always keep cooked brown rice in the fridge.”
“Celebrity chef Kate McAloon — who’s cooked for A-listers like Miranda Kerr, Steven Spielberg and Courtney Cox — says Paltrow and ex-husband Chris Martin were very restrictive when it came to what they ate.”
““When I first started cooking for Gwyneth and Chris Martin [the pair were married for 10 years but ‘consciously uncoupled’ in 2014], it was when she was doing the first Iron Man movie,” McAloon told News.com.au.”
“GWYNETH PALTROW'S 'GOOP' CRITICIZED BY EX-NASA SCIENTIST FOR BOGUS HEALING STICKERS“I had a brief from their assistants ... they eat nothing.”
“They are very strict.”
“They avoided any sugars, anything sweet, no dairy, just more vegetables.”
“When I got there I was trying to stick to the brief and I realized as I started adding more ingredients in they said Your food is getting better That s what happens when you eat more than grass Paltrow...”
“...has talked about some of the crazy diet fads she s tested out in the past...”
“At the beginning of the year she told Shape about a cleanse she tested out for Goop where she s known as the guinea pig because she ll try anything I just tried a goat milk cleanse for eight days...”


"Then take two minutes to chop up some vegetables, make a delicious sauce, and you're done." A representative of Paltrow did not immediately comment
"I always put the cooked brown rice in the refrigerator."
"Celebrity chef Kate McAloon cooks for A-list stars like Miranda Kerr, Steven Spielberg and Courtney Cox, and she says Paltrow and ex husband Chris Martin are very strict about what they eat."
"When I first started cooking for Gwyneth and Chris Martin (who had been married for 10 years, but" consciously disconnected "in 2014), it was when she was making her first Iron Man movie," McCarron told CNN
"Gwyneth Paltrow's grunt was criticized by former NASA scientists as a fake treatment sticker." I got a short message from their assistant... They don't eat anything. "
"They are very strict."
"They don't eat any sugar, any sweets, no dairy, just more vegetables."
"When I got there, I tried to keep it short, and when I started adding more ingredients to my food, I realized they said your food was getting better and better, and that's what happens when you eat more than grass..."
“… Talking about some of the crazy eating fashions she's tested in the past... "
"At the beginning of this year, she told shape that she had tested a cleanser, where she was called a guinea pig, because she would try anything I had just tried for eight days..."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There are plenty of fads out there, but this is one all-natural ingredient that will never go out of style — especially with all of its benefits.”
“Just remember to check in with your doctor before you start taking it in pill form.”
“It's an imbalance of hormones that the body is trying to balance out, according to Ann Marie Gianni, an organic skincare brand.”
“It's more than just oil build-up.”
“Alberto E. Rodriguez/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesHormonal acne is stubborn.”
“Get your wallets ready, because this isn one skin solution that you can't afford not to try out.”
“Oh, and it will only set you back $12 on Amazon Prime.”
“According to the product description on Amazing, it's a one-a-day pill that contains "important omega-6 fatty acid Gamma-Linolenic Acid."”
“The best part of it all is that primrose oil is super affordable.”
“News.”


"There's a lot of fashion, but it's an all natural ingredient that never goes out of fashion - especially with all its benefits."
"Before you start taking it as a pill, please contact your doctor."
Ann Marie Gianni, an organic skincare brand, thinks it's a hormonal imbalance the body is trying to balance
"It's not just oil accumulation."
"Alberto E. Rodriguez / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images female acne is stubborn."
"Get your wallet ready because it's a skin solution that you can't help trying."
"Oh, it'll only cost you 12 dollars less on Amazon Prime."
"According to the product description on amazing, it's a tablet a day that contains' the important omega-6 fatty acid, gamma linolenic acid. '"
"The best thing is that primrose oil is super affordable."
"News."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Celebrities Say The Craziest Things About Marriage See Gallery...”
“Click through the slideshow below to see the craziest things celebs have said about marriage.”
“The two co-starred together in "Bridesmaids" in 2011, and last year they announced that they will co-star in an upcoming pilot for CBS.”
“They now have two daughters together.”
“The couple met in 1998 in a comedy writing class at the Groundlings comedy school in Los Angeles and married in 2005.”
“And we really make each other laugh," he said.”
“We love each other, respect each other and try not to sweat the small stuff.”
“From the very first time we spoke, we were on the same page.”
“"We got hit with the same lucky stick.”
“Falcone also had sweet words to say about his wife.”


"Celebrities say the craziest thing about marriage, see the gallery..."
"Click on the slide below to see the craziest things celebrities say about marriage."
The two co starred in "the bridesmaid" in 2011, and last year announced that they would co star in CBS's upcoming trial show
"Now they have two daughters together."
"The couple met in a comedy writing class at the Greenland comedy school in Los Angeles in 1998 and got married in 2005."
"We really make each other laugh," he said
"We love each other, respect each other and try not to sweat for small things."
"Since the first time we spoke, we have been in the same position."
"We were hit by the same lucky stick."
"Falcone has sweet words for his wife, too."



**Something goes wrong**
““We’re both ready to get married, but we haven’t set a date because we want to make sure we’re not doing it for anyone but ourselves,” said Bushnell.”
“It’s hard.”Higgins, meanwhile, told PEOPLE he couldn’t apologize “for being honest or expressing what I thought was the best thing to express at the time.”“Don’t get us wrong.”
““It is with heavy hearts that we announce our decision to go our separate ways,” they tell PEOPLE in an exclusive statement.”
““We feel fortunate for the time we had together, and will remain friends with much love and respect for one another.”
“We wish nothing but the best for each other, and ask for your support and understanding at this time.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Nevertheless, the two did their best to overcome their issues together and Bushnell moved to Higgins’ hometown of Denver shortly after going public with their engagement following the season finale, which aired in March.”
“Of Higgins declaration of love to both women Bushnell told PEOPLE exclusively at the time that post filming was more of an emotional roller coaster than the actual show I fall more in love with Ben every day and it s hard to separate what happened long ago and my...”
“...current feelings she said...”
““It’s confusing.”
“It does wear on me.”“It hurts,” she added.”


"We're all ready to get married, but we haven't set a date yet because we want to make sure we do it not for others, but for ourselves," Bushnell said
At the same time, Higgins told people that he could not apologize for "being honest or expressing what I thought was the best expression at the time." don't get us wrong. "
"It is with a heavy heart that we announce our decision to go our separate ways," they told people in an exclusive statement
"We feel very lucky because of the time we spend together and will maintain love and respect between friends."
"We just want to have the best of each other, and we ask for your support and understanding at this time." Get push notification containing news, functions, etc
Nevertheless, Bushnell and Higgins did their best to overcome their conflicts. After the season 2 finale broadcast in March, Bushnell moved to Higgins' hometown Denver shortly after his public engagement
"On Higgins's declaration of love for two women, Bushnell exclusively told people magazine at that time that after shooting, it was more like an emotional roller coaster than a real show. I love Ben more every day, and it's hard to compare what happened a long time ago with my..."
“… What she said about the present feeling... "
"It's confusing."
"It's really on me." "It hurts," she added



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Other celebrities like Chrissy Teigen, Ariel Winter, and Iggy Azalea have openly admitted to having plastic surgery.”
“"Do whatever makes you feel better about yourself."”
“...she said.”
“Of course, always be your authentic self, but if someone wants a nose job that makes them feel better, and they love their profile more because of it, it's like 'Go ahead!'"”
“"We're getting away from that negative stigma about physical alterations.”
“The singer—who's often been speculated for having work done—wants everyone to know that even if she had, it would be okay.”
“People tend to think they are fake, but it doesn't really matter."”
“"I've done lasers and got [filler] injections under my eyes for the hollowing—which I'd recommend for everyone who wants a solution for their dark circles—but all of my assets are real.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
Other celebrities, such as Chris tegan, Ariel winter and egie Rhododendron, have also publicly admitted to plastic surgery
"Do anything that makes you feel better."
“…… She said
"Of course, always be who you are, but if someone wants to have a nose surgery that makes them feel better, and they like their profile better, it's like" go! "
"We are getting rid of the negative stigma of physical change."
"The singer, who is often suspected of having finished her work, wants everyone to know that even if she does, it doesn't matter."
"People tend to think they're fake, but it doesn't really matter."
"I've done laser treatment and injected (filler) under my eyes to treat dark circles. I recommend it to everyone who wants a solution for dark circles, but all my assets are real."



**Something goes wrong**
“Erik is married to Tammi Menendez who in a 2002 interview with Barbara Walters revealed I fell in love with him unexpectedly And now I m very happy Lyle has been married twice and spoke out about his current relationship with wife Rebecca Sneed saying Physical comfort is much less...”
“Lyle and Erik, now 48 and 45 years old respectively, both tied the knot while behind bars.”
“'” (The family estate was worth 14 million at the time of her murder.)”
“They know I’m not gonna give them any money.”
“Karen recalled mentioning to Kitty that Erik was listening in the other room: “She said, ‘I don’t care.”
“Kitty was at the family computer updating her will and speaking openly to Karen about it.”
“...a moment between Kitty and Erik...”
“Erik saying The last photo shoot was a little bit different He was a quieter A little more humble Those pictures to me look a little more haunting Kitty Admitted in Front of Erik That She Was Taking Him Out of Her Will Kitty s friend Karen Ferrell then recalled...”
“...somehow He continued As time went by Erik took that screenplay and reworded the first four or five pages to exactly what happened in the crime When Kearney turned on the news the morning after the murder he recalled feeling a chilling realization Kearney recalled the famous underwear photoshoot with...”
“We wrote several screenplays Photographer Philip Kearney known for taking the infamous shirtless modeling photos of Erik was a recipient of the script saying it was about the boy who kills his parents to collect the insurance Cignarelli clarified the plot point saying We needed the characters to get money...”


"Eric married Tammy Menendez. In an interview with Barbara Walters in 2002, she revealed that I fell in love with him by accident. Now I'm very happy that Lyle has been married twice, and frankly speaking about his current relationship with his wife Rebecca Snyder, she said that her comfort is much less..."
"Lyle and Eric are 48 and 45 years old respectively. They both married in prison."
"(at the time of her murder, the family property was worth $14 million)"
"They know I won't give them money."
Karen recalled telling Kitty that Eric was listening in another room: "she said, 'I don't care.'
"Kitty updated her will in front of her home computer and talked to Karen about it publicly."
“… Between Kitty and Eric... "
"Eric said that the last photos were a little different. He was quieter and more modest. Those photos seemed more unforgettable to me. Kitty admitted in front of Eric that she took him away from will Kitty's friend Karen Ferrer, and then recalled..."
“… Somehow, he continued over time. Eric took the script and rewritten the first four or five pages of what happened. When Carney opened the news, the morning after the murder, he recalled a chilling realization. Carney recalled the famous underwear photos and
"We've written several plays, and photographer Philip Carney is famous for taking pictures of Eric's infamous shirtless model. He's the recipient of the play, saying it's about a boy who killed his parents to get insurance. Singnarelli clarifies the plot and says we need characters to make money..."



**Something goes wrong**
“...sa gaminggclub...”
“Dapatkan 1 akun resmi untuk memainkan semua permainan.”
“Permainan yang tersedia pada situs kami merupakan games yang di sediakan oleh idn poker seperti poker, ceme, domino, capsa susun, Omaha poker, super 10 dan ceme keliling.”
“Dengan minimal deposit yang rendah menjadikan seluruh kalangan dapat bermain dengan leluasa pada situs tersebut.”
“...game yang di sediakan pada situs kami merupakan permainan yang di sediakan oleh domino99Situs qq poker online merupakan agen judi poker online yang memberikan kenyamanan bermain dengan kualitas pelayanan terbaik.”
“Dengan minimal deposit 25 ribu sudah bisa ikut bermain bersama qiuratu website terbaik 2014 yang lalu.”
“Situs dominoqq online terpercaya bandarqq merupakan game domino online indonesa.”
“Featuring instantaneous heat up for your 710 wax for full flavor dabbing vapor sessions.”
“Boundless Vaporizers, the award winning producers of the CFX, CFV, and Tera have now released the world’s smallest dab pen – the Boundless Terp Pen.”
“Many prefer liquid screen protectors to tempered glass screen protectors because it is invisible and much less bulky.”


“… Game club... "
“Dapatkan 1 akun resmi untuk memainkan semua permainan。”
“Permainan yang tersedia pada situs kami merupakan games yang di sediakan oleh idn poker seperti poker，ceme，domino，capsa susuun，Omaha poker，super 10 dan ceme kelling。”
"Yang rendah menjadikan seluruh kalangan dapat bermain dengan leluasa Pada situs tersebut, the smallest deposit in dengan."
“… Game Yang Di sedikan Pada situs Kami merupakan permain Yang Di sedikan oleh domino 99 situs QQ Poker Online merupakan agen Judi Poker Online Yang memberikan kenyamanan bermain dengan kualitas Pelayanan Terbaik. "
"Dengan minimum deposit 25 ribu Sudah bisa ikut bermain Bersama qiuratu website Terbaik 2014 Yang Lalu."
"Situs domino QQ online terpercaya bandarqq merupakan game domino online Indonesia."
"Provide instant heating function for your 710 wax to provide full flavor application steam course."
"Boundless carburetor, award-winning manufacturers of CFX, CFV and Tera have now released the world's smallest DAB pen - boundless trump pen."
"Compared with toughened glass screen protectors, many people prefer liquid screen protectors because they are invisible and much smaller."



**Something goes wrong**
“Auditorio Citibanamex Wed 14”
“Brazil Esplanada Do Mineirao Tue 30 JUNE Bogota Colombia Parque Simon Bolivar Fri 2 San Juan Puerto Rico Coliseo De Puerto Rico Sun 4 San Jose Costa Rica Parque Viva Amphitheater Tue 6 Mexico City Mexico Palacio De Los Deportes Sat 10 Guadalajara Mexico Arena VFG Mon 12 Monterrey Mexico...”
“Mon 1 Tue 2 Lima Peru Estadio Nacional Sat 13 Santiago Chile Movistar Arena Mon 15 Buenos Aires Argentina Estadio Unico De La Plata Sat 20 Curitiba Brazil Pedreira Paulo Leminsky Tue 23 Rio de Janeiro Brazil Rio Arena Thu 25 Sao Paulo Brazil Allianz Parque Sun 28 Belo Horizonte...”
“Arena Wed 12 Thu 13 Glasgow UK SSE Hydro Sun 16 Mon 17 Newcastle UK Metro Radio Arena Wed 19 Thu 20 Manchester UK Arena Sat 22 Sun 23 Nottingham UK Motorpoint Arena Tue 25 Wed 26 Birmingham UK Barclaycard Arena Fri 28 Sat 29 MAY London UK The O2”
“Sweden Ericsson Globen Thu 30 APRIL Herning Denmark Jyske Bank Boxen Sat 1 Amsterdam The Netherlands Ziggo Dome Mon 3 Tue 4 Antwerp Belgium Sportpaleis Wed 5 Paris France Accor Hotels Arena Thu 6 Madrid Spain WiZenk Center Sat 8 Barcelona Spain Palau San Jordi Sun 9 Dublin Ireland 3”
“MARCH Turin Italy Pala Alpitour Fri 17 Zurich Switzerland Hallenstadion Sun 19 Munich Germany Olympiahalle Mon 20 Mannheim Germany SAP Arena Wed 22 Cologne Germany Lanxess Arena Thu 23 Hamburg Germany Barclaycard Arena Sun 26 Berlin Germany Mercedes Benz Arena Mon 27 London UK Royal Albert Hall Tue 28 Stockholm...”
“Check out his full tour schedule below.”
“...to June...”
“Read more Ed Sheeran s new album tour dates release date new songs and everything you need to know As well as announcing details of a special London gig at Royal Albert Hall for Teenage Cancer Trust Sheeran will play dates in the UK Europe and South America from March...”
“He has recently been spotted filming Carpool Karaoke with James Corden.”


"Wednesday, 14th, auditorium of Citi Stock Exchange"
"Brazil Marina Boulevard June 30 Tuesday Bogota Columbia Park Simon Bolivar Friday 2 San Juan Puerto Rico corisode Puerto Rico sun 4 San Jose Costa Rica Park Viva arena Tuesday 6 Mexico City Palacio dellos Saturday 10 Guadalajara Mexico arena VFG Monday 12 Monterey, Mexico..."
"Monday 1 Tuesday Lima Peru National Stadium Saturday 13 Santiago Chile cinema Monday 15 Buenos Aires Argentina National Park La Plata Saturday 20 Curitiba Brazil pedrella Paulo lemminski Tuesday 23 Rio de Janeiro Brazil arena Thursday 25 Sao Paulo Brazilian Allianz Plaza Sunday 28 Belo Horizonte..."
"Arena Wednesday 12 Thursday 13 Glasgow Scotland and Southern Energy UK hydropower Sunday 16 Monday 17 Newcastle UK MTR radio arena Wednesday 19 Thursday 20 Manchester UK arena Saturday 22 Sunday 23 Nottingham UK circuit Tuesday 25 Wednesday 26 Birmingham UK buckleca arena Friday 28 Saturday 29 London UK may 2"
"Ericsson global, Sweden, Thursday, April 30, Henning, Denmark, jyske bank, Boxen, Saturday 1 Amsterdam, Netherlands, Ziggo dome, Monday 3, Tuesday 4, Antwerp, Belgium, sportpaleis, Wednesday 5, Accor hotel arena, Paris, France, Thursday 6, wizenk center, Madrid, Spain, Saturday 8, Barcelona, Palau, Spain, San Jodi sun 9, Dublin, Ireland 3"
"March Turin, Italy, Pala appito, Friday 17 Zurich, Switzerland, harlenstadion, Sunday 19 Munich, Germany, Olympia, Halle, Monday 20 Mannheim, Germany, SAP arena, Wednesday 22 Cologne, Germany, Lancaster arena, Thursday 23 Hamburg, Germany, buckleca arena, Sunday 26 Berlin, Mercedes Benz arena, Monday 27 London, UK, Royal Albert Hall, Tuesday 28 Stockholm..."
"Look at the full schedule below him."
“… By June... "
"Learn more about ED Sheeran's new album tour dates, release dates, new songs and everything you need to know, as well as the details of the announcement of a special London concert for the youth Cancer Trust at Royal Albert Hall. Sheeran will perform dates in the UK, Europe and South America from March..."
"He was recently photographed carpooling with James Corden in karaoke."



**Something goes wrong**
“Thank you for the abundance and support you have shown him these many years.””
““It’s nice when your dad can be your friend.”But over time, the pair drifted apart.”
“On Friday, the Arrow actress shared a heartbreaking tweet honoring the late star, who died of organ failure Tuesday at the age of 67.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Words cant express the solace our family’s received from all the love & support during this trying time,” she wrote.”
“My father s last words were So much wasted time This will be a daily reminder for me to share my gratitude with those I love as to never waste another minute Thank you The Partridge Family star and Katie 30 had a complicated relationship Though Katie was raised by...”
“...her mother former model Sherry Williams and her stepfather Richard Benedon David still played a role in her life...”
““Because I didn’t raise her, I didn’t have to parent her,” David told PEOPLE in 2009.”
““I’m always here and totally nonjudgmental.”“To be able to go to someone I’m genetically linked to, tell them anything and know that they’re not going to judge me — it’s unbelievable,” Katie said at the time.”
“In February, David confessed to PEOPLE that the two were no longer in contact.”


"Thank you for your support and support over the years."
"It's great to be your father's friend." But with the passage of time, the two gradually alienated
"On Friday, the aro actress shared a heartbreaking message on her microblog in memory of the late movie star, who died of organ failure on Tuesday at the age of 67."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Words can't express the comfort our families get from all the love and support they have during these difficult times," she wrote
"My father's last words waste too much time. It will be a daily reminder to share my gratitude with my loved ones and never waste a minute. Thank you. The stars of the partridge family have a complicated relationship with Katie 30, although Katie is made up of..."
“…… Her mother, former model Shirley Williams and stepfather Richard Beneden David still play a role in her life... "
"Because I didn't raise her, I didn't have to be a parent for her," David told people in 2009
"I'm here all the time, not judging at all." "It's amazing to be able to go to someone who has a genetic connection with me, tell them anything, and know that they won't judge me," Katie said at the time
"In February of this year, David confessed to people that they had no contact."



**Something goes wrong**
“Corden is set to host the Grammy Awards in on January 28th, for the second time in a row, having taken over from five-time host LL Cool J.”
“He added that the classic American reaction 'a much better way to be, because it IS amazing.'”
“'When someone like Prince Harry is getting married, we go "Oh great, we should get a little tiny flag"; America goes: "This is amazing!"”
“'I think inherently as British people we just don’t get quite as excited about anything as America does, and to our detriment many times in truth,' he said.”
“...many times in truth he said When asked if the US public were making a bigger deal about the wedding than the British...”
“Pick one The Late Late host revealed his preference on CBS This Morning on Thursday Calm down I think inherently as British people we just don t get quite as excited about anything as America does and to our detriment...”
“'I don't think so.'”
“'I don’t think I’ll be there, I'd be very surprised,' he said.”
“Harry is set to wed fiance Meghan Markle on May 19; 39-year-old Corden insisted he was probably not going to be asked to attend.”
“...sure… he’s going to have a hell of a bachelor party — that’s what I’m looking forward to.'”


Cordon will host the Grammy Awards ceremony for the second time in a row on January 28, succeeding five time host LL Cool J
"The typical American response, he added," is a better way of life because it's amazing. "
"When people like Prince Harry get married, we say, 'Oh, great, we deserve a little flag'; the United States says, 'that's great!"
"I don't think, as Britons, we're as excited about anything as the United States is, in fact, against us many times," he said
“…… In fact, when asked whether the American public's view of weddings is more important than that of the British, he said many times... "
"Choose a late host who revealed his preference on CBS on Thursday morning. Calm down, I think as Britons, we are not as excited about anything as the United States, which is not good for us..."
"I don't think so."
"I don't think I'll be there, I'll be very surprised," he said
"Harry will marry his fiance Megan markel on May 19; the 39 year old insists he may not be invited to the wedding."
“…… Of course He's going to have a great bachelor party - that's what I'm looking forward to. "



**Something goes wrong**
“And I'm like, 'This isn't really my aesthetic, but I'll wear it because you love me.'"”
“She continued, in the way only Miley can, "Sometimes I replace it with an actual unicorn or a Looney Tune, and he's kind of like, What's going on?'”
“They don't look that good together because they kind of mix up."”
“The talk-show host congratulated the 23-year-old, to which Cyrus replied, "It's very weird because this is, like, real jewelry, and most of my jewelry is made out of gummy bears and cotton candy.”
“...engaged...”
“A photo posted by Miley Cyrus mileycyrus on Jan 18 2016 at 7 07am PST However during an interview on The Ellen DeGeneres Show on Thursday afternoon an overall wearing Cyrus confirmed to DeGeneres that the pair are once again...”
“...strawberry inspired outfit of the day...”
“Given her history of provocative social media posts no one could quite be sure if the return of the ring was an indication of their on again engagement or if she just happened to think the accessory worked with her...”
“After quietly resuming their relationship earlier this year, Cyrus raised a few eyebrows when she posted a photo to Instagram in which she's wearing her old engagement ring.”
“The pair became engaged in 2012 before calling off the engagement in 2013.”


"I said," it's not my aesthetic, but I'll wear it because you love me. "
"She went on, in a way that only Miley could do," and sometimes I replace it with a real Unicorn or a madman's song, and he's kind of like, what's going on? "
"They don't look good together because they're a little confused."
The host of the talk show congratulated the 23-year-old girl and Cyrus replied, "it's strange because it's like real jewelry. Most of my jewelry is made of bear glue and marshmallow."
“… Engagement... "
"On January 18, 2016, at 7:07 a.m. PST, Miley Cyrus released a photo. However, in an interview at the Ellen DeGeneres Show on Thursday afternoon, Cyrus, who was wearing a full suit, confirmed to DeGeneres that they were again.... "
“… Strawberry inspired clothing of the day... "
"Given that she has published provocative posts on social media, no one can be completely sure whether the return of the ring is a sign of their re engagement, or whether she just happens to think that the accomplice works with her..."
Earlier this year, Cyrus quietly resumed their relationship by posting a photo on instagram showing her wearing an old engagement ring, which attracted some attention
"The two were engaged in 2012 and cancelled in 2013."



Number  207
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We ARE filming a show, remember that, (RHOA) and Nene released this video herself!”
““Brielle went to the bathroom and saw several bugs and had sent ME the video on snap and NO ONE ELSE!!!”
““@briellebiermann We don’t have roaches!”
“In addition, Leakes shared the recently resurfaced video of Brielle on her own Instagram account.”
“Leakes shared her response to an old video that showed Brielle in her bathroom with what appeared to be black bugs.”
“On Thursday, Leakes, 49, slammed Brielle over claims of “prejudice” after the mother-daughter pair visited Leakes’ home and allegedly found cockroaches.”
““This is far beyond just having an opinion.”The reality star’s decision to hire legal advisors comes on the heels of a public feud that involves herself, her 20-year-old daughter Brielle Biermann and Leakes.”
“It’s one thing like I said to kind of banter back and forth and have an opinion,” Zolciak-Biermann, 39, told E!’s Daily Pop on Tuesday.”
““I don’t take this lightly.”
“And I won’t allow it.”“I probably won’t shoot with her again,” she shared.”


"We're shooting a show, remember, (RhoA) and Nene released the video themselves!"
"Brill went to the bathroom, saw a few bugs, sent me the video on snap, no one else!!"
"@ briellebiermann, we don't have cockroaches!"
"In addition, Alex shared briel's recent reappearance video on his instagram account."
"Alex shared her reaction to an old video showing briar in the bathroom with a black looking bug."
On Thursday, the 49 year old attacked briel's "Prejudice" after a mother and daughter visited his home and found a cockroach
"It's much more than an opinion." The reality star decided to hire a legal adviser, following a public feud between herself, her 20-year-old daughter, briel Bilman, and Alex
Zolciak Biermann, 39, told e! Daily pop music on Tuesday
"I don't take it lightly."
"I won't allow it." "I may not shoot with her again," she said



Number  208
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Matt Damon added his insight in an interview with Entertainment Tonight:“He’ll be great, he’ll be a mess, but [Amal] will take care of everything."”
“Friends are already weighing in on how the 56-year-old will be as a brand new father.”
“The boy and girl are the first children for the attorney and her husband, George Clooney.”
“Clooney's rep has also already weighed in with some humor:Julie Chen, a friend of the couple, first announced the Clooney’s pregnancy news on her CBS show, The Talk, in February.”
“Since then Amal Clooney has been spotted with her husband at the Cesar Awards in February and at the United Nations in March she has been continuing her work as a human rights lawyer which she has done since the...”
“...early 2000s...”
“George Clooney who was one of Hollywood s most famous bachelors before marrying Amal in September 2014 at the age of 53 told People in February that his friends whose children are all grown and in college had taken to...”
“...jokingly ribbing him about his late in life fatherhood...”
“Despite the quips from his pals, Clooney was ready to take on the challenge.”
““Look, it’s exciting,” Clooney said.”


Matt Damon added in an interview with Entertainment Tonight: "he's going to be great, he's going to be a mess, but [Amar] is going to take care of everything."
"Friends are already weighing how the 56 year old father will become a new father."
"The boys and girls are the first children of the lawyer and her husband, George Clooney."
"Representatives of Clooney have also considered a number of issues: Julie Chen, a friend of the Clooney couple, first announced that Clooney was pregnant on CBS's talk in February
"Since then, Amar Clooney has been found to have participated with her husband in the Cesar prize in February and continued her work as a human rights lawyer at the United Nations in March since She's been doing that for the last two years. "
“… At the beginning of the 21st century
"George Clooney is one of the most famous bachelors in Hollywood. In September 2014, he married 53 year old Amar. In February this year, he told people that his friends' children have grown up and are going to college..."
“… Jokingly ridicule his fatherhood in his later years... "
"Despite the banter of his friends, Clooney is ready for the challenge."
"Look, it's exciting," Clooney said



**Something goes wrong**
“Others still are so specific (like “What if you spent 15 hours on the edge of sanity?”) that you’ll want to know how exactly that question was posed in the first place.”
“Each show title starts with “What if … ” (with titles like “What if you were a white supremacist?”) to tell the listener exactly what to expect, but others are more rhetorical (“What if you went to the dark side?”).”
“Report at ESPN, the predecessor of The Bill Simmons Podcast.”
“Early on—The B.S.”
“Report predates Marc Maron’s WTF by two years—Simmons grasped that an uninterrupted, long-form interview scarcely existed in the media wasteland.”
“He took note of the diminishing returns of what celebrities and athletes were willing to say and the disgust fans had for sound bites and puff pieces.”
“Now, he routinely books guests who won’t, or don’t always, open up elsewhere: Kevin Durant, an NBA champion and typically a man of few words, for instance, showed up this year for a series of fascinating, raw interviews.”
“Simmons’s talk with The Atlantic’s Ta-Nehisi Coates is also a must-listen.”
“The host steers the conversation toward sports to get them chatting, and then everything you want to hear from America’s writer-in-residence comes out in unexpected, new ways.”
“Gateway Episode: “Ta-Nehisi Coates on Storytelling, Challenging Obama, and the Kaepernick Situation”The Every Little Thing host Flora Lichtman will make her obsessions your obsessions.”


Others are still so specific (like, "what if you spend 15 hours on the edge of reason?" You will want to know how the question was first raised. "
"Every program is titled with" if... " The title is "what if you're a white supremacist?" Tell the audience exactly what to expect, but others are more rhetorical ("what if you go to the dark side?" ).”
"Reporting on ESPN, the predecessor of bill Simmons podcast."
"In the early days of B.S."
"This report is two years ahead of mark Malone's WTF, and Simmons realizes that there are almost no uninterrupted, long hours of interviews on the media wasteland."
"He has noticed that celebrities and athletes are less and less willing to say anything in return, and fans are more and more disgusted with sound clips and boasting clips."
"Now, he's often booking guests who won't or don't always open up elsewhere: Kevin Durant, for example, an NBA champion, a typical quiet man, has been in a series of fascinating original interviews this year."
"Simmons' conversation with taneshi Coates of the Atlantic Monthly must also be listened to."
"The host turns the topic to sports and lets them chat. Then every sentence you want to hear from the resident American writer will appear in unexpected new ways."
Portal episode: "taneshi Coates tells stories, challenges Obama, and the situation of capenick." flora Lichtman, the host of every little thing, will make her obsession your obsession



**Something goes wrong**
“The duo wed in May 2013 in a Parisian-themed ceremony in Malibu.”
“My heart A post shared by Aaron Paul (@glassofwhiskey) on Feb 8, 2018 at 8:31pm PSTThe Emmy winner and the philanthropist met at the Coachella festival and got engaged in January 2012.”
“Aaron Paul and his wife, Lauren, have welcomed their first child together, a baby girl.”
“According to her birth certificate, which was obtained by The Blast, the new parents named their daughter Story Annabelle.”
““There are no words that will ever be able to explain what just happened to my heart,” the proud mom captioned an Instagram pic of their newborn on Thursday, February 8.”
“The actor, meanwhile, shared a pic of their daughter’s foot while at the hospital.”
“He gushed: “My heart.”The Path actor, 38, opened up about his soon-to-be bundle of joy while appearing on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...on Tuesday, January 23.”
““[She’s due] any minute now,” he revealed.”
““I love babies, I’ve always loved babies.”Paul and the Kind Campaign founder announced their pregnancy news in September 2017.”


"The Paris themed wedding of the two was held in Malibu in May 2013."
"My heart" Alan Paul (@ glassofwhiskey) shared a blog post at 8:31 pm on February 8, 2018. Emmy winner and philanthropist met at the cochella Festival and got engaged in January 2012
"Alan Paul and his wife Lauren have their first child, a baby girl."
"According to the birth certificate obtained by the explosion, the new parents named their daughter Stoli Annabel."
On Thursday, February 8, the proud mother took a picture of their newborn on instagram with the title: "no words can explain what happened to my heart."
Meanwhile, the actor shared photos of their daughter's feet in the hospital
"My heart," he gushed The 38 year old actor revealed the joy he was about to become on the live show of Jimmy Kimmel
“…… Tuesday, 23 January. "
"(she's coming) right away," he revealed
"I love babies. I always love babies." Paul and the founder of the good movement announced their pregnancy news in September 2017



**Something goes wrong**
“We’re not even the same people we were two months ago,” Kordei, 21, told PEOPLE about the four-part harmony in May.”
““We’re not the same people we were a year ago.”
“(No, It’s Not A Dance Move)Image zoom Credit: Mike Pont/WireImageCabello, 20 parted ways with 5H in December with hopes of pursing her own music career.”
“I’m dead.”FROM COINAGE: What Is The Grammy Bounce?”
““Hella went down!”
““Leave it to Normani to eat the stage,” she joked after the performance.”
“(See it at 2:15 in the video above.)”
“Unfortunately Kordei took the song title a bit too literally, falling to the stage mid-Gucci rap.”
“The ladies gave “Down” its television debut when they performed during Good Morning America‘s summer concert series Friday, where they were joined by the rapper.”
““Down,” featuring Gucci Mane, comes days after the girl group teased their new song on social media.”


"We're not even who we were two months ago," 21-year-old Cordy told people in May
"We're not the same as a year ago."
(no, it's not a dance move) photo scaling credit: Mike pound / WireImage Cabello, 20, broke up with 5h in December, hoping to pursue his music career. "
"I'm dead." From seigniorage: what is a Grammy bounce? "
"Hella's down!"
"Let normanny eat on stage," she joked after the show
(see 2:15 in the video above)
"Unfortunately, Cordy took the title a little too far and fell on the stage in Gucci's rap."
The women made their television debut at Friday morning's American summer concert series, and rappers joined them
"Down" features gucci mane, a group of girls who talked about their new songs on social media a few days ago



Number  212
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  213
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementAs for his party affiliation, Johnson has attended both Republican and Democratic national conventions in the past and says he is a registered independent.”
“...m at Johnson added...”
“I continue to watch our leaders in government and like all Americans I continue to be hopeful that our leaders exhibit poise perspective and the ability to bring our country together during these tough times which I don t feel our presidency is currently doing so that s where I”
“In the interview, the Rock also spoke his mind on the current administration.”
“...was this sentiment of We re not joking and we would really love the idea if you would run he said...”
“On Saturday Night Live in May he first touted the possibility of a run Advertisement It was never something that I trumpeted and beat my chest and ever said publicly This is what I m going to do but as that story picked up Americans picked it up and there...”
“Johnson said that it was the people who really made him consider the move.”
““Realistically, as we go into 2018, when you look at my slate as we’re developing and shooting into 2019 and 2020, the slate goes deep into 2021, so it feels like the realistic consideration would be 2024,” he said.”
“...for the land s highest office said in an interview published in Variety on Thursday that he would 100 percent consider running for president but it would most likely be in 2024 not 2020 as first reported because he has to make that Hollywood skrilla first...”
“Advertisement And so Dwayne the Rock Johnson the black Samoan former pro wrestler of the Fast and the Furious franchise Jumanji Welcome to the Jungle and Moana movie fame as well as Tyrese beefs and Ballers the last two should preclude him from showing his face outside much less running...”


Regarding his party relations, Johnson has attended Republican and Democratic National Congresses in the past and said he is a registered independent
“… I added in Johnson
"I continue to pay attention to our government leaders, and like all Americans, I continue to hope that our leaders will show a steady view and ability to unite our country in these difficult times. I don't think our president is doing this right now. That's what I'm going to do."
"In the interview, rock also talked about his views on this government."
"We're not kidding, we really like the idea if you can run," he said
"On Saturday night live in May, he touted the possibility of a running advertisement for the first time. It was never something I advocated and beat my chest and feet, and it was never publicly said that it was something I wanted to do, but when the story caught the attention of the Americans, it was there..."
"Johnson said it was the people who really made him think about a move
"Realistically, when we enter 2018, when you look at my slate, we are developing and filming 2019 and 2020, and the slate goes deep into 2021, so it feels like the realistic consideration will be 2024," he said
“…… In an interview with variety magazine published on Thursday, the top U.S. official said that he will 100% consider running for president, but it is likely to be in 2024, not the first reported year of 2020, because he must first make Hollywood's scrilla President... "
"Advertising, so Dwayne's rock Johnson, the former pro wrestler's fast and angry franchise in Samoa, Jumanji welcome to the jungle and Mona film's reputation, as well as tiresbevs and ballet after two should prevent him from showing his face outside, let alone running..."



Number  214
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And let's not forget Teen Vogue cover girl Lily Collins, whose bewitching, bushy brows (shown here) have earned her comparisons to one of the trend's true pioneers: Audrey Hepburn.”
“It goes without saying that this trend is largely epitomized by Cara Delevingne, who was attributed with a decrease in tweezer sales last year.”
“Thankfully, and perhaps refreshingly, fashion's obsession with "thin" hasn't applied to brows in quite some time.”
“That's right, we've fully embraced bigger, bolder, thicker, more emphatic eyebrows.”
“Anyone who's laid eyes on a runway, fashion campaign, movie screen, or beauty counter in the past five or so years knows it: We're living in the Arch Ages.”


"Don't forget" teen fashion "cover girl Lily Collins, whose charming, bushy eyebrows (as shown in the picture) put her on a par with Audrey Hepburn, one of the true pioneers of the trend."
"Needless to say, this trend is largely reflected in Carla delaviny, who was attributed to the decline in tweezers sales last year."
Fortunately, perhaps refreshing, the fashion industry's obsession with "thin" has not appeared on the eyebrows for quite some time
"That's right, we've totally accepted bigger, bolder, thicker, more emphatic eyebrows."
"Anyone who has followed a runway, a fashion event, a movie screen or a beauty counter in the past five years or so knows that we live in the age of arches."



Number  215
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Next Chrissy Teigen's Best Maternity Style Advertisement - Continue Reading BelowThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“We may earn commission on some of the items you choose to buy.”
“Getty Images Last night, the biggest stars in Hollywood braved the rain to attend the 2018 Film Independent Spirit Awards in Santa Monica, California.”
“Here are some of the best looks of the night.”
“View Gallery 22 Photos Getty Images 1 of 22 Elizabeth Olsen In Zuhair Murad.”
“Getty Images 2 of 22 Timothee Chalamet In Off-White and Saint Laurent sneakers.”
“Getty Images 3 of 22 Alison Brie In Ralph & Russo.”
“Getty Images 4 of 22 Greta Gerwig In Rosie Assoulin.”
“Getty Images 5 of 22 Kerry Washington In Missoni.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Next Chris tegan's most maternal ad - continue reading the following, which is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"We can earn commission on some of the items you choose to buy."
"Getty Images last night, Hollywood superstar attended the 2018 independent spirit award in Santa Monica, California in the rain."
"These are the most beautiful pictures of the evening."
"View 22 photos in gallery Getty Images 1 of 22 Elizabeth Olsen in zuhair Murad."
"Getty picture 2 22 Timothy chalamet in beige and St. Laurent sneakers."
"Getty picture 3 22 Alison Bree in Ralph and Russo."
"Getty picture 4 22 gretagwig in rosiassulin."
"Getty picture 5 22 Kerry Washington in Missoni."



Number  216
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MY KIND OF SPORT — aleX cwioK (@AlexCwiok) January 9, 2018BACHELOR WINTER GAMES?”
“Many fans are stoked for the triumphant return of our favourite Bachelor babesOH MY GOD BACHELOR WINTER GAMES???”
“Simple.”
“How does one win a date card, you ask?”
“...to pursue romantic one on ones with fellow competitors...”
“Here s how the game works Ten former Bachelor Bachelorette contestants from the United States along with 14 contestants from overseas editions of The Bachelor including Australia s Tiffany Scanlon Canada s Benoit Beausejour Savard and New Zealand s Jordan Mauger will compete for date cards that they can use...”
“We are seriously not sure if we can handle it all, HBU?”
“That means—including Arie’s season—there will be six hours of Bachelor Nation programming on the weeks of February 12 and 19.”
“The four-parter airs from 8:00 EST to 10:00 EST on Tuesday, February 13, Thursday February 15, Tuesday February 20 and Thursday February 22 on ABC.”
“When it airsClear your calendars, babes.”


"My favorite sport - Alex crook (@ Alex cwiok) January 9, 2018bachelor Winter Games?"
"A lot of fans are very excited about the return of our favorite bachelor baby. My God, bachelor Winter Games???"
"It's easy."
"You ask, how can a person win a date card?"
“… One on one romance with other competitors... "
"Here's how the game works: Ten former bachelors from the United States and 14 bachelors from overseas, including Tiffany Scanlon of Australia, Benoit poseru saward of Canada and Jordan Mogg of New Zealand, will compete for available dating cards..."
"We're really not sure we can handle this, Harvard Business School?"
"This means that there will be six hours of bachelor state programming in the weeks of February 12 and 19, including Ali's season."
"The four programs will be broadcast on ABC from 8:00 to 10:00 EDT on Tuesday, February 13, Thursday, February 15, Tuesday, February 20 and Thursday, February 22."
"When it clears your calendar, baby."



**Something goes wrong**
“You got this.”
“A post shared by Kensington Palace (@kensingtonroyal) on Sep 7, 2017 at 1:10am PDTGood luck, George!”
“Their Royal Highnesses were met by the Head of Lower School on arrival, before The Duke took Prince George inside to his reception classroom.”
“This morning Prince George, accompanied by The Duke of Cambridge, attended his first day of school at Thomas's Battersea in London.”
“Yep, it's Monday through Friday for the rest of your life.”
“The little prince looked understandably nervous, replacing his usually jovial grin with a look of grave apprehension as he began to comprehend his fate.”
“...woman who could only be described as a blonde version of Kate Middleton who was clad in a dusty rose dress the color not the daughter of Adam Levine and Behati Prinsloo and sensibly flat shoes...”
“Prince George arrives for his first day of school at Thomas s Battersea with his father The Duke of Cambridge PA A post shared by Kensington Palace kensingtonroyal on Sep 7 2017 at 2 03am PDT The father and son duo were greeted by the Head of Lower School a...”
“Because this is 2017, the whole ordeal was captured for Instagram, and thus, for eternity.”
“The 4-year-old eldest son of the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge (and soon to be big brother to a second sibling) was escorted by Prince William to his first day of school at Thomas Battersea School in London on Thursday morning.”


"You see."
"Kensington Palace's post at 1:10 a.m. on September 7, 2017. Good luck, George!"
"Before the Duke brought Prince George into the reception room, their highness was received by the headmaster of the junior school on his arrival."
This morning, Prince George, accompanied by the Duke of Cambridge, attended his first day of school in London
"Yes, Monday to Friday is the rest of your life."
"The little prince looked very nervous, which is understandable. When he began to understand his fate, he replaced his usual happy smile with a serious worry."
“… A woman who can only be described as a blonde Kate Middleton, wearing a dusty rose dress, not the daughter of Adam Levin and Beth princlow, wearing a pair of flat shoes... "
"At 2:03 a.m. on September 7, 2017, Prince George and his father, the Duke of Cambridge, arrived at Thomas s Battersea to begin his first day of school life. Kensington Palace Kensington Royal shares a position with Prince George. The father and son were welcomed by the headmaster of a primary school. "
"Because this is 2017, the whole suffering is recorded by instagram, so it's eternal."
"The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge's 4-year-old eldest son, who will soon be the eldest brother of their second sibling, arrived in London on their first day of school on Thursday morning, accompanied by Prince William."



Number  218
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Johnny Depp and Vanessa Paradis' Son Jack Has 'Serious Health Problems': ReportLily-Rose Depp Opens Up About Parents Johnny Depp and Vanessa Paradis, Lands First 'Vogue' CoverHow Johnny Depp Is 'Getting His Life Back on Track' After a Difficult Couple of Years (Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartET reached out to Paradis' rep for comment.”
“The 45-year-old French actress and director Samuel Benchetrit tied the knot in an intimate ceremony in Saint-Simeon, France, on Saturday.”
“According to the French newspaper Le Parisien, the couple's wedding was attended by a few dozen guests, including singer Matthieu Chedid and Paradis' two children, Lily-Rose and Jack Depp, whom she shares with Johnny Depp.”
“Paradis and the Pirates of the Caribbean star dated from 1998 to 2012.”
“Paradis looked stunning in a cream-colored wedding gown with sheer long sleeves and an embroidered veil.”
“She accessorized her blonde curly locks with purple and pink flowers.”
“Benchetrit opted for a blue suit on his special day.”
“Lily-Rose Depp Stuns in First Vogue Cover Shoot, Talks Famous Parents Johnny and Vanessa Paradis This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Related content: Johnny Depp and Vanessa Paradis' son Jack has a 'serious health problem': Lily Rose Depp opens the story about his parents, Johnny Depp and Vanessa Paradis. The first" fashion "reports how Johnny Depp" gets his life back on track "after a few tough years (exclusive) Gallery... "
"Embed Code restart contacted a representative of Paradis for comments."
On Saturday, the 45 year old French actress and director Samuel benchtrett held a close wedding in Saint Simon, France
"The couple's wedding was attended by dozens of guests, including singer Mathieu Shepard and Paradis's two children, Lily Rose and Jack Depp, who shared the two children with Johnny Depp, the Parisian reported
"Paradis and Pirates of the Caribbean star were filmed between 1998 and 2012."
"Paradis is wearing a beige wedding dress with transparent long sleeves and embroidered veil. She looks very beautiful."
"She had curly blonde hair with purple and pink flowers."
"Benchetrit chose a blue suit on his special day."
"Lily Rose Depp was amazing in the first cover shoot of fashion, and the video about famous parents Johnny and Vanessa Paradis was not available because we couldn't load the sponsor's information."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



**Something goes wrong**
“...may have received a wig containing real princess hair, it’s a hopeless task, says Creese, who adds that many donations are anonymous.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Comparing Meghan & Princess Kate’s Style – Why Meghan Will Likely Be Able to Continue Her Laid-back LooksAs for tracking down which mini princess (or prince!)”
“A picture he posted on social media of him holding his lobbed-off hair attracted over two million likes.”
“Harry Styles supported the charity in 2016 by cutting off his ponytail and donating his hair.”
“This isn’t the charity’s first brush with fame!”
“...for sick children both boys and girls and it can take anything from seven to 10 donations to make just one wig...”
“...lovely thought and it s fantastic for raising awareness plus it s gorgeous hair we all lust after that hair Founded in 2006 by parents Wendy and Simon Tarplee in memory of their daughter Hannah who died from cancer in 2005 the charity has since funded over 5 500 wigs...”
“Image zoom Kate Middleton debuts shorter haircut in July 2017 Credit Karwai Tang WireImage It s lovely to think that somebody somewhere probably more than one person has received a wig containing Princess Kate s hair Helen Creese a spokesperson for the charity tells PEOPLE adding It s a really...”
“The Herefordshire-based organization makes wigs from real hair and donates them to children who have lost their own hair through chemotherapy or radiation treatments.”
“According to the Sunday Express, seven inches of royal hair was anonymously sent to a charity called the Little Princess Trust.”


“… May have received a wig containing real princess hair, which is a hopeless task, Chris said, who added that many donations are anonymous
"Related video: compare Megan's and Kate's styles - why Megan continues her leisurely look in order to track which Mini Princess (or prince!)"
"A photo he posted on social media attracted more than two million people."
"Harry stiles supported charity in 2016 by cutting his ponytail and donating his hair."
"It's not the first time that charities have missed fame!"
“… For sick children, boys and girls, it can take anything from 7 to 10 donations to make a wig... "
“… Lovely idea, it's a great way to raise awareness, and it's the beautiful hair we all aspire to. It was founded in 2006 by parents Wendy and Simon Tapley in memory of Hannah, who died of cancer in 2005. The charity has funded more than 5500 wigs... "
"In July 2017, Kate Middleton cut her hair for the first time. It's a good idea that someone somewhere might have received more than one wig containing Princess Kate's hair. A spokesman for Helen Chris charity told people, "it's really a..."
"The Herefordshire based group makes wigs from real hair and donates them to children who have lost their hair due to chemotherapy or radiation therapy."
"Seven inches of Royal hair was sent anonymously to a charity called the little princess trust, according to the Sunday Express



**Something goes wrong**
“Linkin Park is signed to the label and has released seven studio albums since 2000’s “Hybrid Theory.””
““I thought it would be better than having him up there screaming.”Never compares his mix of street culture, fine art, and 1950s advertisements to Linkin Park’s musical hybrid.”
“Local muralist Jonas Never, a former college baseball player-turned-artist, spent two days with spray cans and house paint, creating his tribute to the rocker that now looms just past the Coldwater Canyon exit, adorning the side of Rock’n Pies Pizza Co. on Riverside Drive.”
““I grew up listening to [Chester],” says the 35-year-old Venice, Calif., native, whose influences include the graffiti art and decks of Dogtown, Bulldog Skates, and the Seventh Letter collective that, in turn, had a profound effect on Linkin Park’s Mike Shinoda.”
““I used to take the pitching mound to the sound of ‘One Step Closer’ (off of debut album ‘Hybrid Theory’).”The pizza joint is one of two recently opened by Boston native Jim Conners – the other is on Wilshire Blvd.”
“...between Lincoln Blvd.”
“...and 14th Street in Santa Monica — who came to Los Angeles in 1995 for film, but ended up in the restaurant business.”
“Never created a number of indoor murals for the Santa Monica location, including one of Guns N’ Roses based on an image that adorns the side of Canter’s Deli, except the members are downing slices instead of pastrami.”
“There are also wall renderings of Kurt Cobain eating pizza and the Beastie Boys standing in front of a local pizzeria.”
““I’d been seeing that big blank wall from the 101 and thought it would be good for something,” says Never, who also created the Dave Grohl mural which adorns the eatery’s front.”


"Lynn Parker signed up with the record company and has released seven studio albums since 2000's mixed theory."
"I think it's better than having him scream there." No one has ever compared his street culture, art and 1950s advertising to the mix and match of Lincoln Park Music
Jonas never, a local mural painter, was a college baseball player and later an artist. He spent two days on spray cans and interior paint to create an ode to rock music that now looms at the exit of cold water Canyon, adorning the side of rock'n pies pizza Co. on Riverside Drive
"I grew up listening to (Chester)," said the 35 year old Venetian, Calif., whose influence included graffiti art and the deck of dog city, bulldog skates and the seventh letter group, which in turn had a profound impact on michinoda in Lincoln Park
"I used to take pitcher Qiu to" one step closer "(from the first album" mixed theory ")" the pizza parlor is one of two recently opened by Boston native Jim Conners, and the other is on Wilshire Blvd. "
“… Between Lincoln Avenue. "
“…… And 14th Street in Santa Monica - in 1995, he came to Los Angeles to make movies, but he ended up in a restaurant business. "
"There have never been many murals for the site in Santa Monica, one of which is based on an image of a gun and roses decorated on the side of the Cantor Deli, but the members are eating slices rather than smoked beef."
"There are pictures of Kurt Cobain eating a pizza on the wall, and Beastie Boys standing in front of a local pizza shop."
"I've been looking at the big blank wall of 101 building, and I think it's going to be good," said never, who also created the Dave Grohl mural that adorns the front of the restaurant



**Something goes wrong**
“She also spent time getting treatment then as well.”
“She returned home on December 30.”
““Well they say third times a charm… I’m going back to treatment people for 6 weeks to work on my trauma and getting on different meds.”
“THANK YOU @TylerBaltierra I LOVE YOU SO MUCH!!!!!”
“You are my light!!”
“And nova you are my sunshine #KeepTalkingMH,” the MTV personality, 25, tweeted on Wednesday, January 17.”
“Well they say third times a charm… I’m going back to treatment people for 6 weeks to work on my trauma and getting on different meds.”
“And nova you are my sunshine #KeepTalkingMH — Catelynn Baltierra (@CatelynnLowell) January 17, 2018When a fan tweeted and asked Lowell about what “trauma” she was referring to, she responded with, “My childhood trauma!!”


"At that time, she also spent time in treatment."
"She went home on December 30."
"Well, they say the third time is a charm I'm going back to the therapist for six weeks to treat my trauma and take different drugs. "
"Thank you @ Tyler baltierra, I love you so much!!"
"You are my light!"
"Nova you are my sunshine keep talking MH," the 25-year-old MTV celebrity tweeted on Wednesday, January 17
"Well, they say the third time is a charm I'm going back to the therapist for six weeks to treat my trauma and take different drugs. "
"Nova you are my sunshine? Keeptalking MH catelynn baltierra (@ catelynn Lowell) on January 17, 2018, when a fan asked Lowell on twitter what" trauma "she was referring to, she replied:" my childhood trauma! "



**Something goes wrong**
“Suzanne de Passe, Madison Jones, Robert Teitel, and Peter McGuigan executive produce with Dianne Houston directing from a script by Elizabeth Hunter.”
“...the last two years of his life...”
“Told through the eyes of the King of Pop s trusted bodyguards Bill Whitfield Chad Coleman and Javon Beard Sam Adegoke the movie will reveal firsthand the devotion Michael Navi the world s 1 Michael Jackson tribute artist had to his children and the hidden drama that took place during...”
“Based on the best-selling book, “Remember the Time: Protecting Michael Jackson in His Final Days,” by Bill Whitfield and Javon Beard with Tanner Colby, “Michael Jackson: Searching for Neverland” will premiere on Memorial Day, May 29 at 8pm ET/PT.”


Susan de Paz, Madison Jones, Robert Tuttle and Peter McGregor are executive producers directed by Diana Houston based on Elizabeth Hunt's play
“… The last two years of his life... "
"Through the eyes of bill Whitfield Chad Coleman and Javon beard Sam adegoke, the bodyguards trusted by the king of pop, the film will directly reveal Michael Navi, the world's number one Michael Jackson Jackson) pay homage to the artist's loyalty to his children, and in The hidden drama that happened during that period. "
According to bill Whitfield, Javon beard and Tanner Colby's best seller "remember the time: protect Michael Jackson's last time." Time:Protection Michael  Jackson in his finish days Jackson:Searching for  Neverland will be killed on May 29 est



Number  223
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Allen tours with his band playing clarinet, and the ensemble last visited Germany in 2011, according to the concert program.”
“"(The) activist’s naked body is the undisguised hatred toward the patriarchal order and new aesthetics of women’s revolution."”
“"FEMEN’s naked attacks is a naked nerve of the historic woman-system conflict, its most visual and appropriate illustration," reads the website for the group, which was founded in Ukraine but now operates out of France.”
“Earlier this year, six Femen activists staged a topless stunt on France's election day, wearing Donald Trump and far-right candidate Marine Le Pen masks to protest Le Pen's candidacy.”
“In a Facebook post, Femen took credit for the protest, writing in French that they stormed the stage to condemn alleged perpetrators of sexual violence.”
“Allen issued a statement after the show calling the protest “stupid."”
“According to SHZ.de, the website for local newspaper Schleswiger Nachrichten, the band had already finished the performance.”
“The crowd began booing once the two women took the stage, and the performance continued after concert hall employees escorted them away.”
“Femen members are known for their topless protests, and these two activists painted their bare torsos with quotes from the 2014 open letter that Dylan Farrow, Allen's adopted daughter, wrote to accuse him of sexual assault.”
“Allen was performing with his Eddy Davis New Orleans Jazz Band in Hamburg, Germany when two protesters from the radical women's group Femen ran onstage, yelling “Stop the culture of silence."”


"Alan and his band play clarinet tour together, and according to the concert plan, the band's last visit to Germany was in 2011."
"The naked body is a naked hatred of patriarchal order and women's revolutionary new aesthetics."
"The nudity attack of women is a naked nerve in the conflict of women's system in history, which is the most direct and appropriate example," the organization's website wrote
"Earlier this year, six female activists staged a topless stunt on French election day, wearing the masks of Donald Trump and the far right candidate Marlene Le Pen to protest Le Pen's candidacy."
"In a Facebook post, FEMEN won praise for the protest, writing in French that they rushed onto the stage to condemn the perpetrators of suspected sexual violence."
"Alan made a statement after the show, calling the protest" stupid "
"According to SHZ.de The company, the local newspaper schleswigner Kristen's website, and the band have finished performing
"As soon as the two ladies came on stage, the audience began to hiss. After the staff escorted them away, the performance continued."
"The female members are known for their topless protests, and the two activists described their bare trunks with quotes from a 2014 open letter from Allen's adopted daughter Dylan Farrow accusing him of sexual assault."
Alan and his Eddie Davies New Orleans jazz band perform in Hamburg, Germany, as two protestors from the radical women's group FEMEN rush onto the stage, shouting "stop the culture of silence"



**Something goes wrong**
“Image zoom Credit: Michael Loccisano/GettyStanley Tucci and wife Felicity Blunt...”
“Image zoom Credit: Michael Loccisano/GettyFelicity BluntTucci and Blunt were engaged by November 2011, five years after Tucci starred with his bride’s sister Emily Blunt in The Devil Wears Prada, where he shone as Nigel, a sharp-tongued yet supportive art director.”
“PEOPLE first learned of the couple’s pregnancy news in March, when they stepped out together at N.Y.C.’s Guggenheim Museum, where the mom-to-be embraced her baby bump while in a multicolored V-neck dress.”
“Image zoom Credit: ANGELA WEISS/AFP/GettyStanley Tucci and wife Felicity BluntEmilia joins big brother Matteo Oliver, 3, as well as Tucci’s three children from his marriage to late wife Kate: Camilla, 16, and twins Nicolo and Isabel, 18.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““Hopefully she will have the looks and brains of her mother and one of my better personalities,” Tucci, 57, jokes to PEOPLE of his new baby girl.”
“Daughter Emilia Giovanna Tucci was born on Thursday, April 19, weighing in at 6 lbs., 6 oz.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Oscar-nominated actor and his wife Felicity Blunt have welcomed their second child together, his rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively.”


"Image zooming credit: Michael losisano / Getty Stanley tooch and his wife felicity blunt..."
"Credit for image zooming: Michael locciano / gettyfelty blunt and blunt got engaged in November 2011. Five years ago, tutch and the bride's sister Emily Blunt starred in Devil Wears Prada Prada), in which he plays Nigel, the sharp but supportive art director
The first news of the couple's pregnancy came in March, when they arrived at the Guggenheim Museum in New York State, where the mother to be was wearing a colorful V-neck dress holding her little lump
"Image zooming credit: Angela Weiss / AFP / gettystanley Tucci and his wife felicity blunt Emilia joined their three-year-old brother Matteo Oliver, and Tucci married his late wife Kate with three children: 16-year-old Camilla and 18-year-old twins Nicolo and Isabel."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"I hope she has the looks and brains of her mother, and I have a better character," tooch, 57, joked to his new baby girl
"My daughter, Emilia Giovanna Tucci, was born on Thursday, April 19, weighing 6 pounds and 6 ounces."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The Oscar nominated actor and his wife felicity Bronte have their second child, and his agent has confirmed exclusively to people."



**Something goes wrong**
“Sheen, meanwhile, dated Beckinsale from 1995 to 2003 and actress Rachel McAdams from 2010 to 2013.”
“As previously reported, Silverman announced on Monday, February 5, that she and Sheen, 49, split after nearly four years of dating.”
“Sarah Silverman received a hilarious gift from Kate Beckinsale after revealing that she had ended her relationship with Michael Sheen.”
“Beckinsale, who dated the Passengers actor in the ‘90s, gave Silverman blue and white M&Ms with a photo of Silverman kissing Sheen on the cheek to help her through the breakup.”
““Been ending every night with a microwaved bowl of personalized m&ms given to me by the very thoughtful and very cruel @katebeckinsale to remind me that I’m alone in this world.”
“So very alone,” Silverman wrote along with an Instagram photo of the sweet treats on Wednesday, February 7.”
“The comedienne added: “THANKS, KATE.”
“Seriously they are so good esp.”
“...melted which is why the microwave.”Beckinsale, 44, shares 19-year-old daughter Lily Mo Sheen with the actor, but the exes remain close friends.”
“She’s also established a friendship with Silverman, 47, through the years.”


Meanwhile, Shane dated Beckinsale from 1995 to 2003 and actress Rachel McAdams from 2010 to 2013
"As previously reported, Silverman announced on February 5 (Monday) that she and 49 year old sin split up after nearly four years of dating."
"Sarah Silverman received a funny gift from Kate Beckinsale, revealing that she has ended her relationship with Michael sheen."
"Beckinsale dated the passenger actor in the 1990s and gave Silverman a blue and white M & m with a picture of Silverman kissing her cheek to help her through the breakup."
"Every night, I use a microwave oven to hold a bowl of personalized M & M, which is given to me by the very considerate and cruel @ katebeckinsale to remind me that I am the only one in the world."
On Wednesday, February 7, Silverman posted a picture of sweets on instagram and wrote, "it's so lonely."
The comedian added, "thank you, Kate."
"Seriously, they are very good."
Beckinsale, 44, shares her 19-year-old daughter Lily Mosin with the hero, but the two former boyfriends are still close friends
"Over the years, she has also forged a friendship with Silverman, 47."



**Something goes wrong**
“Related: Amy Schumer's New Comedy 'I Feel Pretty' Looks Like the Pick-Me-Up We All Need...”
“Love, Amy.”
“That doesn't change when you're going through a rough breakup, either—just ask Jennifer Lawrence.”
“In a recent appearance on Watch What Happens Live, J.Law described the hilarious way that her friend cheered her up when she called it quits with Darren Aronofsky.”
““When Darren and I first broke up.”
“I told [Schumer] and I was really sad,” the 27-year-old actress said.”
““The next day I got a bouquet of flowers delivered and I said, ‘What is this?’” she continued.”
““I bring the bouquet of flowers in and there was a note that says, ‘I’m so sorry to hear you’re gonna die alone.”
“'”Lawrence and Aronofsky, 49, began dating after the production of mother!, which he wrote and directed.”
“I couldn't be happier for them."”


"Related story: Amy Schumer's new comedy I feel pretty looks like the kind of refresher we all need..."
"Love you, Amy."
"That doesn't change when you're going through a tough breakup, or you can ask Jennifer Lawrence."
In a recent appearance on watch what happens live, J. law described the funny way her friends cheered her on when she and Darren Aronofsky broke up
"When Darren and I first broke up."
"I told (Schumer) that I was really sad," said the 27 year old actress
"The next day I received a bunch of flowers and I said," what is this? "She continued
"I came in with the bunch of flowers and a note said," I'm sorry to hear that you're going to die alone. "
Lawrence and Aronofsky, 49, have been dating since mother was released! He wrote it and directed it. "
"I can't be happier for them."



Number  227
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Right now I probably wouldn’t do anything, actually.””
““I feel like if it makes you feel better, and if that’s what you want to do, I’m not against it,” she said about plastic surgeries.”
“...her best selling Lip Kit products...”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians reality star, 20, opened up about her makeup business in an interview with sister Kim Kardashian West for Evening Standard magazine, and revealed that lip makeup products helped give her confidence.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It came from an insecurity and I turned it into something.”
“I was insecure about my lips, and lipstick is what helped me feel confident,” Jenner explained to fellow beauty mogul Kardashian West.”
““It’s the most authentic thing I’ve done in my career, and it really relates to me, and I feel like people can tell that I’m super passionate about it,” Jenner said about being an entrepreneur.”
““I feel like people could see that it’s authentic to me, and it was organic, and it just worked!”Image zoom Kylie Jenner in 2007 and in 2017In May 2015, Jenner admitted that she enhanced her lips with temporary fillers after spending years overlining her mouth.”
“And years later, in September 2017, the mother of one revealed she got fuller lips after a boy assumed she’d be a bad kisser because of her naturally thin lips.”


"Actually, I may not do anything now."
"I think if it makes you feel better, if it's what you want to do, I don't object," she said of plastic surgery
“… Her best selling lipstick product... "
"The 20-year-old" keep up with Kardashian "reality show star revealed her make-up business in an interview with Kim Kardashian West's sister in evening news magazine and revealed that lip makeup products helped her build confidence."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It came from a sense of insecurity, and I turned it into something."
"I'm not safe with my lips, lipstick makes me feel confident," Jenner explained to beauty tycoon Kardashian West.
"It's the most real thing I've ever done in my career," Jenner said of being an entrepreneur. "It really has something to do with me. I think people can see that I have a great passion for it."
"I think you can see that it's authentic to me, and it's organic, and it works! "In 2007 and 2017, in May 2015 and may 2015, Jenna admitted that after several years of applying it to her mouth, she used a temporary filler to strengthen her lips."
"A few years later, in September 2017, the mother of a child revealed that her lips became fuller because a boy thought she was born with thin lips, so she didn't kiss well."



**Something goes wrong**
“Todd finally got his payback!”
“When the all-new American Idol episode began on Sunday, the host, Ryan Seacrest was missing in action momentarily.”
“3.”
“Miranda went along with Theater Mania’s joke by tweeting in support before revealing it was an April fool’s joke later in another tweet.”
“Miranda joined in on an April fool’s prank initiated by Theater Mania via a tweet that announced a Broadway Musical of Tommy Wiseau’s “The Room” by Miranda giving an official song and cast list.”
“Lin-Manuel MirandaCelebrated American lyricist, composer, playwright and actor, Lin-Manuel Miranda also had his fair share of April Fool’s fun.”
“Keep up ABC’s American Idol and more by following Ryan Seacrest on Facebook and Twitter2.”
“Ryan Seacrest then jumped in appreciating his co-host’s effort before handing him the Trademark rose from “The Bachelor” and then saying “Goodbye.” Chris Harrison then revealed the intro as an April fools prank.”
“Chris Harrison, The Bachelor show host introduced the episode instead with a dramatic voice over and music throwing the audience into a frenzy.”
“Ryan Seacrest and Chris HarrisonABC had fun with viewers on 1st April 2018 by staging a surprising crossover between two of its biggest reality shows; American Idol and The Bachelor.”


"Todd has been rewarded at last!"
"When the new episode of" American Idol "opened on Sunday, the host, Ryan Seacrest, disappeared for a while."
“3.”
"Miranda agreed with the drama madman joke. He tweeted his support and later revealed on another twitter that it was an April Fool's Day joke."
Miranda joined an April Fool's Day prank launched by a drama fanatic group that tweeted a Broadway musical "the room," giving her an official list of songs and actors
As a famous lyric poet, composer, dramatist and actor in America, Emmanuel Miranda also has a lot of fun on April Fool's day
"Learn about ABC's American Idol and other programs by following Ryan Seacrest on Facebook and twitter2."
Ryan Seacrest then readily accepted the host's effort, handed him the rose logo from "Bachelor" and said "goodbye.". Chris Harrison later revealed the introduction as an April Fool's Day prank
"Bachelor host Chris Harrison introduced the episode with dramatic dubbing and music, driving the audience crazy."
"On April 1, 2018, Ryan Seacrest and Chris Harrison ABC staged an amazing time travel show between their two biggest reality shows, American Idol and bachelor, which made the audience very happy."



**Something goes wrong**
“He was due to be sentenced on March 7 and sources say mum Condy and his family reportedly refused to turn against him.”
“TMZ claimed that before raiding his LA house the police were 100 they would find what they were looking for based on an interview with a former girlfriend of Salling s as well as other evidence Insiders claimed the police had done a thorough investigation after speaking with the ex...”
“Salling, 35, was due to be sentenced next month for possessing more than 50,000 images of child sexual abuse, having accepted a plea deal in December 2017 to get a reduced jail term.”
“The Glee star – whose body was discovered near his home this week - was waiting for his sentencing at home in LA when he died from an apparent suicide by hanging.”
“And in his last days he became a "total shut in", a source told E!”
“News .”
“(Image: FilmMagic)"He isolated himself in that house in Sunland and was a very depressed, lonely human," the source continued.”
“Yesterday it was revealed that it was an ex girlfriend of Salling who tipped off the cops after finding disturbing images on his laptop.”
“...girlfriend...”
“He would also be unable to communicate with anyone under the age of 18 unless the minor was in the presence of a parent or legal guardian.”


"He was originally scheduled to be sentenced on March 7, and the source said it was reported that his mother, Kangdi, and his family refused to do him any harm."
"TMZ claimed that before searching his house in Los Angeles, the police were in their 100s and they would find what they were looking for based on interviews with sallings' ex girlfriend and other evidence. Insiders claimed that the police made a thorough investigation after talking to their ex girlfriend.... "
"Sarin, 35, is due to be sentenced next month for holding more than 50000 photos of child sexual abuse. He accepted a plea agreement in December 2017 to get a commutation of his sentence."
"The glee star, whose body was found near his home this week, died of apparent hanging while awaiting sentence at his Los Angeles home."
A source told e
"News."
"(picture: filmmagic)" he isolated himself in the house in Sang Lan and was a very depressed and lonely man, "the source continued
"Yesterday, it was reported that sarin's ex girlfriend reported to the police after she found disturbing pictures on her laptop."
“… "Girlfriend..."
"A minor cannot communicate with anyone under the age of 18 unless he has a parent or legal guardian present."



**Something goes wrong**
“I mean William.’ He laughed to himself, then got on his bike.”Sounds a lot like another William we know.”
“.”
“...out his hand and said Hi I m William She replied Oh you look like a Bradley And he responded Well that s my middle name and smiled and winked at her As Lydia exited she said Nice to meet you Bradley...”
“Pitt reportedly showed up on his motorcycle wearing sunglasses jeans and a leather jacket how cool and sparked up a conversation with a woman in line who looked a little like Kate Bosworth but it wasn t her Per Page Six When the woman said I m Lydia Pitt put...”
“And wouldn’t you know, according to “Page Six,” dear ol’ Brad recently introduced himself as William when chatting with a lady at Coffee Commissary in Los Angeles.”
“As Wikipedia confirms, Brad Pitt was actually born William Bradley Pitt.”
“Or should we say, his real name.”
“So it should come as no surprise that sometimes the baggy-pants aficionado chooses to go incognito with the ladies by using a different name.”
“Photo: Valerie Macon/AFP/Getty ImagesNoted sculptor Brad Pitt is famously single — and apparently fighting off gangs of thirsty women everywhere he goes.”


"I mean William." He laughed to himself and got on his bike. "It sounds like another William we know."
“.”
“… He held out his hand and said, "Hi, I'm William." she replied, "Oh, you look like Bradley. He answered very well. That's my middle name, and she blinked at her with a smile. When Lydia left, she said," nice to meet you, Bradley... "
"It's reported that Pete showed up on his motorcycle in sunglasses, jeans and leather jacket, which was cool and triggered a conversation with a woman in line who looked a bit like Kate Bosworth, but on page 6, when the woman said I was Lydia Pitt, it wasn't her..."
According to page 6, dear old Brad introduced himself as William when he was chatting with a woman at a coffee shop in Los Angeles recently
"As Wikipedia confirms, Brad Pitt was actually born in William Bradley Pitt."
"Or, we should say, his real name."
"So it's not surprising that slacks lovers sometimes choose to anonymize women under different names."
"Photo: Valerie Macon / AFP / Getty photo: Brad Pitt, the Ted sculptor, is famously single - he's obviously fighting a bunch of thirsty women everywhere he goes."



Number  231
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While appearing on Watch What Happens Live in February 2017, Ora told Andy Cohen she had “only positive vibes” for Kardashian.”
“The reality TV personality later revealed he bashed Ora online in an attempt to stop him from taking her back, saying, “I just had to do that to make her hate me.”Things have clearly changed between the former flames — and for the better.”
“Miami where his sisters tried to reason with him about why blasting her on the internet was inappropriate...”
“In 2013 the Arthur George designer who admitted he gained 40 pounds while dating Ora in 2012 went on a social media tirade against the British pop star and accused her of cheating on him with nearly 20 dudes The incident played out on an episode of Kourtney Kim Take...”
“...who have spent the last decade keeping up with the Kardashians...”
“Ora s mea culpa which stated the song was written to represent my truth apologized to those who found the song offensive while serving as an admittance that she had romantic relationships with women and men Kardashian s choice to back up the Radioactive singer was not lost on those...”
“...hands emojis a day later...”
“...lengthy Instagram post where she said that the message the tone deaf song sends is dangerous and fuels the male gaze while marginalizing the idea of women loving women The How We Do Party singer issued an apology for the song on Monday May 14 which Kardashian retweeted alongside praising...”
“...fans for several lyrics including Sometimes I just wanna kiss girls girls girls Red wine I just wanna kiss girls girls girls and I am excited I m open minded I m 50 50 and I m never gonna hide it Singer Hayley Kiyoko also blasted the song in a...”
“Rob Kardashian showed ex girlfriend Rita Ora who he infamously bashed in 2013 some support after the singer faced backlash over controversial lyrics in her new song Girls Ora 27 released the new single featuring Cardi B Bebe Rexha and Charli XCX on Friday May 11 and was criticized by...”


"In February 2017, Ola appeared on the show" watching what happened on the spot "and told Andy Cohen that she had" only a positive feeling "about Kardashian
The reality TV host later revealed that he attacked Ola online in an attempt to prevent him from taking her back, saying: "I did it just to make her hate me." Things have obviously changed between previous fires - and are getting better and better. "
"Miami, his sisters are trying to explain to him why it's inappropriate to blow her up online..."
"In 2013, Arthur George's designer admitted that he had gained 40 pounds on his date with ora in 2012. He criticized the British pop star on social media and accused her of cheating with nearly 20 men. The incident happened in an episode of Kourtney Kim take..."
“… They've been chasing the Kardashian family for the last ten years... "
"Ola's guilt to say that this song represents my truth to those who feel offended by this song, while at the same time as a recognition of her romantic relationship with women and men, Kardashian's choice to support radioactive singers has not lost these..."
“… Take the emoticons one day later... "
“… In a lengthy post on instagram, she said the message of the tone blind song is dangerous, arouses men's eyes and marginalizes women's love for women. On Monday, May 14, a singer named how we do party apologized for the song. Kardashian forwarded the song and praised... "
“… Some lyrics of fans, including sometimes I just want to kiss girls red wine, I just want to kiss girls, I'm very excited, I'm open-minded, I'm 50 50, I'll never hide it, singer Haley Kiyoko also exploded this song in a... "
"Rob Kardashian showed some support for her former girlfriend Rita ora, who was strongly opposed in 2013 for the controversial lyrics in her new song girls ora 27. On Friday, May 11, rob Kardashian launched a series of programs by Cardi B Bebe Rexha and Charley xcx



**Something goes wrong**
“When you spoke with Zeke before his first season during the interview process, did the subject ever come up in terms of whether he planned to tell players he was trans and how he would handle it if someone brought it up?”
“And check out an exclusive deleted scene at the top of this post.”
“I think the response from the tribe, as it so often does, mirrors what the vast majority of society will feel.”
“I cannot imagine anyone thinking what was done to Zeke was okay on any level, under any circumstances, and certainly not simply because there was a million dollars on the line.”
“But this is a unique situation that falls outside the normal boundaries.”
“In 34 seasons of Survivor, I have rarely, if ever, personally commented on what is said or done in the game.”
“What did you make of what I would describe as their unified disgust at what had happened?”
“It seems everyone on the tribe — Tai, Andrea, Ozzy, Debbie, Sarah — had their moment of telling Jeff in very strong language that what he did was completely unacceptable.”
“This… just… happened.”
“And while they were sharing their feelings with Varner, I was still running it in my head.”


"When you talked to Zeke during his first pre-season interview, was there a topic like this: is he going to tell the players that he is transgender and what will he do if someone mentions him?"
"Look at the exclusive deletion scenario at the top of this article."
"I think the reaction of the tribe, as it often does, reflects the feelings of most societies."
"I can't imagine anyone thinking that everything that has been done to Zeke is good at any level, under any circumstances, and certainly not just because there's a million dollars on the run."
"But this is a special case, beyond the normal limits."
"In the 34 seasons of survivor, I rarely, if any, personally comment on the words and deeds of the game."
"What do you think of what I said about their shared aversion to what happened?"
"It seems that everyone in the tribe - ty, Andrea, Oz, Debbie, Sarah - had told Jeff in very tough language that what he did was totally unacceptable."
"This Just It happened
"When they shared their feelings with Warner, I was still thinking."



**Something goes wrong**
“To celebrate 20 years, here’s an update on what, exactly, the key actors in Bradshaw’s world are doing in 2018 and yes, how they’ve transformed.”
“One thing we know for sure: they’re not working together anytime soon.”
“But what are the main Sex and the City stars up to?”
“Indeed, Sarah Jessica Parker (Bradshaw), Cynthia Nixon (Miranda Hobbes), Kim Cattrall (Samantha Jones), and Kristin Davis (Charlotte York) have all moved on to live lives that don’t include a weekly Sunday brunch plus glamorous trips to Abu Dhabi.”
“RELATED: You Won't believe These Early Reviews of Sex and the City Are RealWhich brings us to 2018.”
“), and while critics didn’t immediately fall head over heels with Bradshaw and her stories, the show's producers eventually found their footing, moving on to release six mega successful seasons plus two movie spinoffs.”
“VIDEO: Sarah Jessica Parker Knows How to Do Sex and the City Without Kim CattrallThe hit HBO show first aired on June 6, 1998 (yep, it’s been 20 years!”
“(If you haven’t decided which of the four girlfriends you’re the most similar to, perhaps it’s time to rewatch the series.)”
“Not to mention, her clan of mostly-loyal best friends: Samantha, Miranda, and Charlotte.”
“The fictional sex columnist had her flaws, but women (and some men) were obsessively drawn to her sexy love life in Manhattan, plus all of those Jimmy Choos.”


"To celebrate 20 years, here's an update on exactly what the key actors in Bradshaw world did in 2018 and, yes, how they transformed."
"One thing we can be sure of: they won't cooperate in the near future."
"But what are the main sex and City Stars doing?"
"In fact, Sarah Jessica Parker (Bradshaw), Cynthia Nixon (Miranda Hobbes), Kim katlar (Samantha Jones) and Christine Davis (Charlotte York) are all starting to live a life that doesn't include a Sunday brunch and a fascinating trip to Abu Dhabi."
"Related report: you won't believe these early comments on sex and the city are true, which brings us to 2018."
Although critics did not immediately fight Bradshaw and her story, the producers of the show finally found a foothold and continued to launch six super successful films, plus two derivative films
"Video: Sarah Jessica Parker knows how to complete sex and the city's hit HBO show, which premiered on June 6, 1998, without Kim Carter (yes, it's been 20 years!"
(if you haven't decided which of your four girlfriends you are most similar to, maybe it's time to revisit the series.)
"Not to mention the most loyal friends in her family: Samantha, Miranda and Charlotte."
"This fictional sex columnist has her faults, but women (and some men) are obsessed with her sexy love life in Manhattan, plus all those Jimmy Choo."



**Something goes wrong**
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it's not clear how long the relationship lasted, because they have broken up."
"The two celebrities made their relationship public on instagram."
"However, it has been confirmed that the rumor of breaking up is not true."
“… One month old... "
“… Photography contributed by Steve granitz Getty in November 2011, jelina was apparently rumored that Gomez dumped a Canadian pop star and began to surface after a Bieber fan claimed that she had sex with him backstage on a show in October 2010 and that he was the father of her four children
"Oh, young love."
“… Photographer Kevin mazul / writer / Getty Mae 2011: Billboard Music Awards: Jenna looks happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards. "
"Aren't they cute?"
"Jon kopaloff photo / filmmagic February 2011: Jelena stepped on the red carpet of the vanity fair Oscar Party. They walked on the red carpet together for the first time and finally realized our dream, thus proving their young love."
"But it wasn't until January 2011 that the two pop stars confirmed their romance by taking part in a big PDA while on holiday in Saint Lucia."



**Something goes wrong**
“Okurrr!”
“Let's take a look at some of Cardi's best moments from the night.”
“And reminded us all that her Cinderella story is only just beginning.”
“From a fire performance of "Finesse" with Bruno Mars to a statement-making debut at Madison Square Garden, Cardi was the belle of the ball.”
“Although the "Bodak Yellow" rapper lost Best Rap Song and Best Rap Performance to hip-hop titan Kendrick Lamar, she won our hearts — and, more importantly, the admiration of her peers (and Bono!).”
“But Cardi's reign didn't stop at the red carpet.”
“After the monumental year she's had, it's only appropriate that she would #bless us all at the music industry's biggest and most star-studded night.”
“It's not like we would expect anything less from the Bronx rapper.”
“...real life angel descended from heaven wings and everything...”
“Getty Images The Bodak Yellow rapper was the belle of the Grammy ball Cardi B Literal Angel Lived Her Best Life At The Grammys New York s own Cardi B stepped onto the 2018 Grammy red carpet looking like a...”


"All right!"
"Let's take a look at some of the highlights of Caddy's night."
"And remind us that her Cinderella story has just begun."
"From a wonderful performance with Bruno Mars to her debut in Madison Square Garden, caddy is the best."
Although the "bodak yellow" rapper lost the best rap song and performance, she won our hearts - and more importantly, the admiration of her peers (and Bono)
"But Kadi's rule did not stay on the red carpet."
"After her immortal year, it's most appropriate for her to bless us all on the biggest and most famous night in the music world."
"Our expectations of the Bronx rappers have not diminished," he said
“… Angels in real life come from heaven, wings and everything... "
"Getty Images, the bodak yellow rapper, is the beauty of the Grammy ball. Cardi B literal Angel spent her best life in her own Cardi B in Grammy New York, and stepped onto the red carpet of the 2018 Grammy. She looks like a..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Cowell, Sam Donnelly, Jason Raff, Trish Kinane and Richard Wallace are the executive producers.”
“Furthermore, “AGT” served as the lead-in to the third-biggest series of the summer, “World of Dance.”“America’s Got Talent” was created by Cowell and is co-produced by FremantleMedia North America and Syco Entertainment.”
“2.”
“1 show and the Wednesday ones were No.”
“The Tuesday episodes were the season’s No.”
“All of those Nielsen numbers include a week of delayed viewing, and made Season 12 the most-watched “AGT” to-date.”
“The Wednesday telecast earned a 2.9 in the main demo and 14.7 million total viewers.”
“Last summer, the show’s Tuesday edition averaged a 3.5 rating in the advertiser-sought 18-49 demographic and had 16.0 million viewers overall.”
“Also Read: 10 Lowest-Rated TV Shows of Summer 2017 (Photos)“Talent” is a TV ratings juggernaut.”
“Child singer Angelica Hale was runner-up.”


"Cowell, Sam Donnelly, Jason Lough, Trish kina and Richard Wallace are executive producers."
In addition, "AGT" is the leading role in this summer's third-largest series, "dance world." America's got talent "was created by Cowell and CO produced by Fremantle media North America and SYCO entertainment
“2.”
"Neither a show nor a show on Wednesday."
"Tuesday's show is the number one of the season."
"All of these Nielsen figures include a week of delayed ratings, making the 12th quarter the most watched 'AGT' so far."
"Wednesday's live television earned 2.9% of the revenue from major presentations, reaching 14.7 million viewers."
"Last summer, the average audience rating of the show's Tuesday edition was 3.5, and advertisers targeted 18-49 people, with a total audience rating of 16 million."
"Also read: in the summer of 2017, the top 10 TV programs with the lowest ratings (picture)," genius "is a TV series with amazing ratings."
"Child star Angelica Hale came in second



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"It's been wonderful," she told reporters.”
“The 36-year-old Angel made two cameos during the show—one wearing the VS x Balmain collab, and another in a red beaded look.”
“The latter marked her VS Fashion Show finale, and she made every step of it count.”
“She even mouthed "I love you forever" from the front of the stage.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Fans were not emotionally prepared to watch the goodbye:This content is imported from Twitter.”
“I still can’t believe this is the last time we’re watching Alessandra doing the VS fashion show  we’re gonna miss her so much #VSFashionShow — Leidy (@itsl8dy) November 29, 2017This content is imported from Twitter.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Great," she told reporters
"The 36 year old Angel guest starred in two roles, one in vs x Balmain lab and the other in red beads."
"The latter marks the end of her vs fashion show, and she makes every step important."
She even said in front of the stage, "I love you forever."
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"The fans are not ready to watch the game. Goodbye: this content is imported from twitter."
"I still can't believe that this is the last time we see Alessandra do vs fashion show. We will miss her very much. Vs fashion show Leidy (@ itsl8dy) on November 29, 2017, this content was imported from twitter."



Number  238
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“No; she was executed, and then everything was back to bad-normal.”
“Oprah is in exile.”
“Her husband confronts her captor in Canada.”
“She delivers her own baby.”
“Even though people died to help her escape at the beginning of the season, she’s determined now to stay in Gilead, because I guess Season 3 has to be about something.”
“One read is that there’s no escaping the suffocation of a subjugating regime.”
“Except within the show, there actually is escaping it — and yet June has decided not to.”
“Season 2 has been dutifully brutal, complete with ample torture, rapes, executions and murders.”
“It gave in to every one of the show’s most tedious instincts, substituting slow stares and endless montage sequences for any actual development or new interiority.”
“Every inch of existence is awful.”


"No, she was executed, and then everything went back to normal."
"Oprah is in exile."
"Her husband confronted her kidnappers in Canada."
"She had children of her own."
"Although people died at the beginning of the season to help her escape, she is determined to stay at Gilead now because I think there will be something in the third season."
"One interpretation is that there is no escape from the suffocation of the regime of subjugation."
"Except in the show, there's actually an escape from it - but June has decided not to."
"The second season is due diligence and cruelty, full of torture, rape, execution and murder."
"It succumbs to every dullest instinct in the play, replacing any actual development or new interior with a slow gaze and endless montage shots."
"Every inch of being is terrible."



Number  239
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Repp was also was detained in Houston in 2016 after he was found at another event Beckinsale was attending.”
“Police say Repp "made a statement to the victim in reference to stabbing her."”
“According to police, Repp had an incident with Beckinsale in Salt Lake City back in 2016 where he allegedly made physical contact with Beckinsale where he touched her in the back.”
“In the police report, cops described Repp as having "an irrational obsession with" Beckinsale and say he has "traveled across the country in an effort to harass her."”
“The State Attorney’s Office tells The Blast that because cops grabbed Repp before he came in contact with Beckinsale, his actions did not proceed far enough to be considered stalking.”
“Repp was arrested on July 29 at the Tampa Bay Comic Con after police spotted him before Beckinsale was slated to speak at a panel.”
“According to court documents obtained by The Blast, the State Attorney’s Office in Florida decided in August not to move forward with the case against Terry Lee Repp.”
“The man arrested for allegedly stalking Kate Beckinsale won't do any time behind bars and had all charges against him dropped.”


"In 2016, Rip was also detained in Houston after he was found at another event attended by beckinsell."
"Police said rip told the victim about the stabbing
"According to the police, rip had an incident with Beckinsale in Salt Lake City as early as 2016. It is said that rip had physical contact with Beckinsale and touched Beckinsale behind his back."
In the police report, the police described rip as having an "irrational obsession" with "Beckinsale" and said he "traveled all over the country trying to harass her."
"The state attorney's office said in the explosion that because police caught rip before he contacted Beckinsale, his behavior was not enough to be considered a stalker."
"On July 29, Rip was arrested at the Tampa Bay comics conference when police found him before Beckinsale was arranged to speak in a group."
"Based on court documents obtained from the explosion, the Florida prosecutor's office decided in August not to advance the prosecution of Terry Lee rip."
"The man arrested for tracking Kate Beckinsale will not go to jail and all charges against him have been dropped."



**Something goes wrong**
“Preview the season, below.”
“I don’t remember life before my son, Soltan.”
“In fact, the Shahs of Sunset mom is open to expanding her family a little more in the future.”
“I m raising my little family and we want to definitely give Soltan a brother or a sister she recently told Parade noting that she is open to traveling the globe with her family parents brother and baby daddy Jermaine...”
“Jackson Jr and all...”
“Since welcoming Soltan into her life, Asa admits that things are a little different from her days B.B.”
“(before baby).”
“"It’s completely and absolutely changed my life.”
“I just don’t feel like the same person anymore.”
“He’s five-and-a-half months and I don’t remember what things were like beforehand," she said.”


"Preview next season."
"I don't remember my son Soltan's life before."
"In fact, sunset mother's kings are open to expanding her family in the future."
"I'm raising my little family. We must give Soltan a brother or sister. She recently told parade that she would like to travel around the world with her parents, brother and baby father Jamie..."
"Little Jackson and everyone..."
"Since Soltan was welcomed into her life, ASA admits that things are a little different from when she was born."
"Before the baby."
"It completely changed my life."
"I just feel like I'm not the same person anymore."
"He's been five and a half months and I don't remember what happened before," she said



**Something goes wrong**
““Then I woke up one morning toward the end of the event, with excruciating pain in a very swollen shoulder and went straight to the emergency room.”From there, Ali said, she underwent a series of tests and biopsies that resulted in a diagnosis three weeks later.”
““I brushed it off as a pulled muscle from cooking,” she said.”
“The host and judge, 47, shared a photo of herself with Chef Fatima Ali on Instagram Tuesday as the chef prepared to head into surgery to remover a cancerous tumour.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’d love it if everyone joins me today in saying a special prayer for our @cheffati who went into surgery a couple hours ago,” Lakshmi wrote in the caption.”
““She was in good spirits when we walked her into OR, and am hoping for a great outcome today.”
“#topchef with the added hashtag of “#f—cancer.”Ali, who is a 28-year-old season 15 contestant on Top Chef, was diagnosed with Ewing’s Sarcoma last fall.”
“The chef also shared a photo of herself on Instagram before her surgery to remove the tumor from her shoulder.”
““Going in for surgery today to get that tumor out of my left shoulder.”
“Feeling content knowing I have so many well wishers and prayers from all around the world.”


"One morning, near the end of the activity, I woke up with a swollen shoulder and unbearable pain, and went straight to the emergency room." From there, Ali said, she had a series of tests and biopsies and was diagnosed three weeks later
"I think of it as a muscle that I pulled when cooking," she said
The 47 year old host and judge shared a picture on instagram on Tuesday with chef Fatima Ali, who was preparing to remove a cancer tumor
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I would be very happy if everyone could join me today in a special prayer for @ cheffati, whom we had surgery on a few hours ago," Lakshmi wrote in the title
"When we sent her to the operating room, she was in good spirits and I hope to have a good result today."
"Topchef" is labeled "f-cancer". Ali, 28, a contestant in Topchef season 15, was diagnosed with Ewing's sarcoma last fall
"The chef also shared a picture of herself on instagram, after which she had a shoulder tumor removed."
"We're going to have an operation today to remove the tumor from the left shoulder."
"It's satisfying to know that I have so many blessings and prayers from all over the world."



**Something goes wrong**
“New episodes air Mondays on Facebook.”
“"It took me 14 months, but I fit into PVC," she told E!”
“"Turns out you can’t lose the 61 lbs you gained during pregnancy by just scrolling through Instagram and wondering why you don’t look like all the bikini models," Lively captioned an Instagram photo of herself and Saladino.”
“This past Monday, she took to Instagram to tell her followers about the past 14 months working alongside Saladino.”
“Lively gave birth to Ines, in September 2016, and several months later, she began working with personal trainer Don Saladino.”
“Jamie McCarthy/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesLively has two daughters with husband Ryan Reynolds: James, who is now 3 years, and Ines, who is 17 months old.”
“If that's not a priority or a goal of yours, then that's fine, too."”
“"But, it's also OK if you don't.”
“News, pointing to her red trench coat.”
“Even though Lively chose to dedicate a lot of time to working out in order to return to the body she felt comfortable in, she has a great message for postpartum mothers who have other priorities.”


"The new episode is on Facebook on Monday."
"It took me 14 months, but I got used to PVC," she told e! "
"It turns out that as long as you roll on instagram, you don't lose the 61 pounds you gained during pregnancy, and you wonder why you're not like all bikini models," lively wrote in a group photo of her and Saladino on instagram
"Last Monday, on instagram, she told fans about her work with Saladino over the past 14 months."
"Lively gave birth to ines in September 2016, and a few months later, she started working with personal trainer don Saladino."
"Jamie McCarthy / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images and her husband, Ryan Reynolds, have two daughters: James, 3, and ines, 17 months old."
"If that's not your priority or goal, it doesn't matter."
"But it doesn't matter if you don't go."
"News, point to her red windbreaker."
"Although lively has chosen to spend a lot of time exercising to restore her comfortable body, she has a good message for postpartum mothers who have other priorities."



**Something goes wrong**
“ET.”
“The Late Late Show With James Corden airs on CBS weeknights at 12:35 a.m.”
“During a 2013 episode of the U.K. game show A League of Their Own, the “Kiwi” singer gave Corden a lengthy smooch on the lips during a scripted kiss cam segment.”
“This isn’t the first time the fellow Brits have locked lips.”
““Wow, I did not expect that for Christmas,” the TV personality said with a laugh.”
“He then leaned in to kiss Corden on the lips, placing one of his hands on the comedian’s cheek and wrapping the other around his head.”
“After singing the tune with his many guests, Corden turned to Styles, 23, and said, “Happy Christmas, Harold.” The former One Direction singer initially stayed silent but smirked slightly.”
““The great thing about this time of year is I feel like it’s the only time we’re not judged for driving to work dressed like this,” quipped the British star, who was clad in a red Santa hat and a Christmas sweater.”
“...with Corden and musician Reggie Watts who leads the Late Late Show s house band cruising around Los Angeles...”
“The late night host 39 enlisted several of his Carpool Karaoke guests from the past year including Pink Miley Cyrus Bruno Mars Sam Smith Kelly Clarkson and Fifth Harmony to sing a fun filled rendition of the Christmas classic Santa Claus Is Comin to Town The holiday sketch kicked off...”


"Wait a minute."
"James Colden's evening program at CBS weeknights is on at 12:35."
In the 2013 episode of the British game show, "Qiwei" singer gave Corden a long kiss in a script kiss clip.
"This is not the first time our British compatriots have closed their lips."
"Wow, I didn't expect Christmas to be like this," the TV celebrity said with a smile
Then he leaned over to kiss cordon on's lips, one hand on the comedian's cheek and the other hand around his head
After singing with many guests, cordon turned to styles, 23, and said, "Merry Christmas, Harold." The former singer was silent at first, but gave a smile
"The best thing about this time of year is that I think it's the only time we're not judged for driving to work in such clothes," quipped the British star in a red christmas hat and Christmas Sweater
“… With Colden and musician Reggie watts who led the late show house band tour of Los Angeles
"The 39 year old late night host invited several car sharing karaoke guests over the past year, including pink Miley Cyrus Bruno Mars Sam Smith Kelly Clarkson and the Fifth Symphony Orchestra, to sing a fun Classic Christmas song" Santa Claus is coming "- the opening of the festival skits..."



**Something goes wrong**
““I now need to shake young Jacob’s hand.””
““And that’s when I started doing the compressions.”“I’m so amazed and impressed by this little [10-year-old] boy’s heroic actions and calm instincts in the middle of that kind of emergency distress,” Johnson wrote.”
““The movie just popped up in my head and I started thinking about that scene,” Jacob, who lives in Michigan, told the Washington Post.”
“After he pulled Dylan from the water, Jacob used CPR to save the child’s life, something he learned from the 2015 blockbuster during a scene where Johnson’s character performs CPR on his daughter.”
“Jacob O’Connor, 10, found his brother Dylan, 2, lying face down in the family pool.”
““This story grabbed my heart,” Johnson wrote on Instagram with a screenshot of the news story.”
“The Rock praises boy who saved drowning brother with help from San AndreasDwayne “The Rock” Johnson is praising a 10-year-old boy who saved his 2-year-old brother from drowning thanks to techniques the older child discovered by watching San Andreas.”


"I'm going to shake hands with little Jacob now."
"That's when I started doing heart compressions." "I was surprised and impressed by this (10-year-old) boy's heroic behavior and calm instinct in this emergency," Johnson wrote
Jacob, who lives in Michigan, told the Washington Post: "the movie suddenly came to me and I started thinking about that scene."
"After pulling Dylan out of the water, Jacob's cardiopulmonary resuscitation saved his child's life. This is what he learned from the 2015 blockbuster, in which Johnson's role was to perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation for his daughter."
"10-year-old Jacob O'Connor found his 2-year-old brother Dylan lying face down in his home swimming pool."
"This story caught my heart," Johnson wrote on instagram, with a screenshot of the news story attached
"Rock praised the boy who saved his drowning brother with the help of St Andreas Dwayne." rock "Johnson praised a 10-year-old boy who saved his 2-year-old brother from drowning by observing the technology discovered by St Andreas



**Something goes wrong**
“For more on Beyoncé’s pregnancy, read Vox’s Constance Grady on the changing demands of celebrity pregnancies, and the ways Jay-Z and Beyoncé use music to control the narrative around their marriage.”
“We have been blessed two times over.”
“The twins, named Sir Carter and Rumi, are “one month old” according to the singer’s post.”
“Assuming they were born in California, that would put their birth date at June 13, 2017.”
“Beyoncé posted a photo of herself with the twins shortly after 10 pm Pacific time.”
“Sir Carter and Rumi 1 month today.”
“❤️ A post shared by Beyoncé (@beyonce) on Jul 13, 2017 at 10:10pm PDTThe post deliberately echoed February’s pregnancy announcement.”
“We would like to share our love and happiness.”
“We are incredibly grateful that our family will be growing by two, and we thank you for your well wishes.”
“The names of Sir Carter and Rumi have been rumored for weeks now, after documents to trademark both names were filed with the government in late June.”


"For more information about Beyonce's pregnancy, read vox's Constance Grady about the changing needs of celebrities for pregnancy, and the way Jay-Z and Beyonce use music to control their marriage narratives."
"We were blessed twice."
According to the singer's post, the twins, sir Carter and rummy, are only one month old
"Assuming they were born in California, their date of birth will be June 13, 2017."
"Shortly after 10 p.m. Pacific time, Beyonce released a picture of herself and her twins."
"Sir Carter and rummy are a month away today."
“ ❤️  Beyonce (@ Beyonce) shared a post on July 13, 2017 at 10:10 p.m. "this post deliberately repeated February's pregnancy statement."
"We are willing to share our love and happiness."
"We are very grateful that our family will triple, and we thank you for your good wishes."
"The names of Sir Carter and rummy have been rumored for weeks, after they submitted their trademark documents to the government at the end of June."



**Something goes wrong**
“So Roseanne saying her performance was better is pretty brutal.”
“Bush, who called it "disgraceful."”
“Afterward, the entire country was outraged, including President George H.W.”
“It's universally known as the worst performance of the "Star-Spangled Banner" that has ever been done since Francis Scott Key put pen to paper in 1814.”
“...grabbed her crotch and purposefully made a mockery of the beloved song known for opening up sports games...”
“Just in case you need a refresher on Roseanne s performance so you know how much of a diss that really was here s what we got On July 26 1990 the sitcom star took to Jack Murphy field shrieked...”
“I think mine was better lowkey."”
“The 65-year-old, who is coming back to TV with a revival of her beloved sitcom Roseanne, wrote, "Who saw Fergie's national anthem performance at the NBA All Star Game?”
“Following the flood of tweets dragging Fergie through the mud, the funny lady, who is known for her brash comedy, hopped on the trashing bandwagon.”
“The sitcom star is even panning the Fergalicious performance.”


"So it's quite cruel for Roseanne to say that her performance is better."
Bush, he called it "shameful"
"Later, the whole country was angry, including President George H.W."
"This is the worst Star Spangled Banner performance since Francis Scott Key started writing in 1814."
“…… Hold on to her crotch and make fun of this beloved song, which is famous for its open sports competition.... "
"Just in case, you need a review of Rosanna's performance so you know how bad it is. That's what Jack Murphy field, the sitcom star we got on July 26, 1990, screamed..."
"I think I'm keeping a low profile."
The 65 year old will be back on TV with her beloved sitcom "rosani." who saw faggie's national anthem at the NBA all star game? "She wrote
"After the torrent of twitter dragged Fergie into the mire, the funny lady, known for her vulgar comedy, jumped into the garbage."
"The sitcom star is even satirizing this passionate performance."



Number  247
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now watch 100 years of acne treatments:”
“She said these are what work best to remove stubborn makeup that's been on all day.”
“For instance, this past spring Kim Kardashian West revealed her full, luxury skin-care routine, which costs $4,500 and includes products from La Mer and Guerlain.”
“That being said, she hasn't held back when it comes to her drugstore favorites either.”
“What's more: Thanks to a recent post on her app, we now know that sister Khloé is a fan of affordable skin care, too.”
“As first reported by People on Wednesday, November 28, the new mom shared the go-to products she uses to keep her complexion clear.”
“And believe it or not, you can snag them at your local CVS.”
“"To get my skin clean, first I wash my face (of course), then use two Neutrogena towelettes to remove any left-over product, including one that's just for eyes since eyeliner and mascara can be so tricky," she wrote of the first step in her routine.”
“Allure editors agree, too, having named them one of the best makeup wipes of all time.”
“Now read more about the Kardashian's skin-care favorites:Done reading?”


"Now let's look at 100 years of acne treatment:
"She said these are the most effective ways to remove stubborn make-up all day long."
"This spring, for example, Kim Kardashian West revealed her comprehensive, luxurious skin care program, which costs $4500, including products from La Mer and Guerlain."
"Having said that, she didn't flinch when it comes to her favorite drugstore."
"More importantly: because of a recent post on her app, we now know that khlo é is also a fan of affordable skin care products."
"On Wednesday, November 28, for the first time, people reported that the new mother shared the products she used to keep her skin color."
"Believe it or not, you can find them on your local resume."
"In order to keep my skin clean, first I wash my face (of course), and then use two Neutrogena towels to remove any remaining products, including one for the eyes, because eyeliner and mascara can be so difficult," she wrote, the first step in her daily work.
The editors of allure agreed, naming it one of the best make-up scarves of all time
"Now read more about Kardashian's skin care favorites: over?"



**Something goes wrong**
““For today, that’s the choice that I’m making for myself.””
“She was charged with disorderly intoxication, battery on an officer, resisting arrest with violence and threatening a public servant; she’s due in court April 13 and faces possible jail time if convicted.”
“...and Has Lost 8 Lbs...”
“Since Getting SoberLuann de Lesseps says her “embarrassing” Christmas Eve arrest was the wake-up call she needed to get her life in order.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Watch the full episode of People Features: Luann de Lesseps: My Battle With Addiction, streaming now on PeopleTV.com, or download the PeopleTV app on your favorite device.”
““I would start with a martini and maybe have two martinis, and then get into the wine at dinner,” de Lesseps, 52, tells PEOPLE in this week’s issue, on stands Friday.”
““Then I’d have a little bit of vodka soda going out.”For more from de Lesseps, pick up this week’s issue of PEOPLE, on newsstands FridayImage zoom Credit: Allison Michael OrensteinEventually, the alcohol wasn’t numbing the pain.”
““I would have the hair of the dog drink the next day, and drink more, and it didn’t feel good.”
“Alcohol just stopped working for me,” she says.”


"Today, it's my choice."
"She has been charged with alcoholism, beating an official, resisting arrest with violence and threatening a civil servant; she will appear in court on April 13 and may face imprisonment if convicted."
“… I've lost eight pounds... "
Lesseps said her "embarrassing" Christmas Eve arrest has sounded a wake-up call for her to keep her life in order since she quit drinking
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Watch character close up: LuAnn de Lesseps:My Battle  Now start playing the people's TV network, or download the peopletv application on your favorite device. “
"I'll have a martini first, maybe two more, and then a drink at dinner," dreiseps, 52, told people in this week's Friday stand magazine
"Then I'll have some vodka and soda." To learn more about dreiseps, check out this week's People magazine, Friday at the newsstand. Image source: Allison Michael Orenstein in fact, alcohol does not paralyze pain
"I let Goumao drink it the next day. If I drink too much, I don't feel very good."
"Alcohol no longer works for me," she said



**Something goes wrong**
“It’s a rough world out there people, try to hang on,” he added.”
““I still can’t believe it.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The Marvelous Mrs Maisel actress Rachel Brosnahan shared a video of her aunt Kate Spade dancing with her husband Andy with a big smile on her face Rachel Brosnahan Shares Video of Kate Spade in Happier Times As She Pays Tribute to Her Aunt Rachel Brosnahan is sharing fond memories...”
“...of her late aunt Kate Spade...”
“On Wednesday, the star of the Amazon series The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel paid tribute to the influential designer, née Katherine Noel Brosnahan, who was found dead at 55 from apparent suicide in her N.Y.C.”
“...apartment one day prior.”
“Brosnahan shared a video of Kate dancing with her husband Andy Spade (brother of actor David Spade) with a big smile on her face as a mariachi band played in the background.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Knowing Katy, this is how she would want to be remembered,” wrote the 27-year-old actress.”


He added: "the outside world is tough and people have to try to stick to it."
"I still can't believe it."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The amazing lady Messer actress Rachel brosnahan shares a video of her aunt Kate Spade dancing with her husband Andy, with a big smile on her face. Rachel brosnahan shares Kate Spade's video in her happy time. She pays homage to her Aunt Rachel brosnahan, who is sharing good memories ……”
“… About her late aunt Kate Spade... "
"On Wednesday, the star of the Amazon series, the great lady Messer, paid tribute to influential designer n é e Katherine Noel brosnahan, who was found dead of suicide in New York City at the age of 55."
“… The apartment of the day before. "
"Brosnahan shared a video of Kate dancing with her husband Andy Spade (actor David spade's brother) in the background of a mariachi band playing with a big smile on her face."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Meeting Katie is the way she wants people to remember her," the 27 year old actress wrote



Number  250
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Thank you to my best friend Petra [Collins] for helping me bring it to life,” she said in a video on her Instagram story alongside the caption, “grateful grateful grateful.”The Disney alum has yet to publicly address the lip-synching rumors.”
“...words can not express how emotional i’m feeling right now.”Later in the night, Gomez thanked her fans for supporting her performance.”
“A second added, “may i remind y’all selena is still recovering from a kidney transplant and she just gave the performance of a lifetime.”
“You did great,” one fan tweeted.”
“We love you Selena.”
“We Selenators are proud of our idol and for how hard she’s worked and everything she’s gone through.”
“Stay pressed.”
“I don’t care what others say.”
““Selena did amazing tonight.”
“...genuinely asking #AMAs #2017.”The “Bad Liar” singer’s legion of fans were quick to clap back.”


"Thank my best friend Petra (Collins) for helping me make it a reality," she said in a video on instagram titled "gratitude.". The Disney alumni has yet to make public the rumor of lip synching
“…… Words can't express my feelings now. " Later, Gomez thanks her fans for supporting her performance
The second added: "I want to remind you that Selena's kidney transplant operation is still recovering. She's just devoted her whole life to the show."
"You did a good job," one fan tweeted
"We love you, Selena."
"We are proud of our idol, of her efforts and all she has experienced."
"Keep the pressure."
"I don't care what people say."
"Serena did a great job tonight."
“…… Sincerely ask # AMAS # 2017. " A large number of fans of the "bad liar" singer soon hit back



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Ryan Lochte's Criminal Charges in Rio Olympic Robbery Scandal Have Been Dismissed This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Watch the video below for more.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Unlike Michael Phelps, Ryan Lochte Will Not Be Swimming With Sharks for Nat Geo WILD's SharkFestMeanwhile, the criminal charges against Lochte from his Rio robbery scandal have been dropped.”
“Hollywood Medium With Tyler Henry airs Wednesdays at 9 p.m. ET/PT on E!”
“Lochte looks on in astonishment as Henry describes what he feels,WATCH: Ryan Lochte Cleared of Criminal Charges in Rio Olympic Robbery ScandalWatch the clip below for more.”
“In this sneak peek of this week's episode of Hollywood Medium With Tyler Henry, the TV medium tells Lochte that he senses the 32-year-old Olympian's late grandfather may have been watching over him during the 2016 Olympics in Rio de JaneIro, Brazil.”
“Tyler Henry doesn't think Ryan Lochte was swimming alone.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Ryan Lochte's criminal charges in the Rio Olympics robbery scandal have been dismissed. This video can't be played because we can't load the sponsor's information. "
"For more information, watch the video below."
Exclusive: unlike Michael Phelps, Ryan rochett will not swim with sharks in Nate GIO Wilder's shark competition. Meanwhile, criminal charges against Lochte's Rio robbery scandal have been dropped
"Hollywood media and Tyler Henry on Wednesday at 9pm EST!"
"As Henry describes his feelings, Lochte looks in surprise. Look: Ryan Lochte has been released from criminal charges in the Rio Olympic robbery scandal. Please see the following clip for more information."
"In this week's Hollywood media episode with Tyler Henry, the television media told Lochte that he felt the late grandfather of the 32 year old Olympian might have been looking after him during the 2016 Olympics in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil."
"Tyler Henry doesn't think Ryan Lochte swam alone."



**Something goes wrong**
“Stop promoting unhealthy body image and eating habits for young girls  — Mikayla (@Mikayla_Jo28) July 29, 2018With this coming months after that appetite suppressant advert gaff you'd think Kim would think twice about putting these kind of harmful comments out into the world, but apparently not.”
“Ahem, little children follow your account.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“In multiple videos Khloé Kardashian and Kendall Jenner discuss the beauty mogul’s 119 pound weight.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Unfortunately, many of their compliments appeared to be centred on her thinness, praising her for looking like she doesn’t eat and having an ‘anorexic’ waist.”
“Whilst attending a poker tournament benefiting City Of Hope, the 37 year-old mother-of-three filmed her sisters praising her gym-honed figure.”
“However, one of Kim Kardashian’s recent series of Instagram stories proves that, whilst they may be good at boosting each other’s morale, their comments aren't always 100% spot on.”
“And, usually, we applaud them for that.”


"Stop promoting unhealthy body images and eating habits for young girls - Mikayla (@ Mikayla è jo28) July 29, 2018 in the next few months, you'll think Kim will think twice and put these harmful comments on the world, but obviously not."
"Ah hum, children follow you."
"This content was imported from twitter."
"In a number of videos, Kardashian and Jenna discussed the 119 pound weight of the beauty tycoon."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Unfortunately, a lot of their compliments seem to focus on her weight loss, her lack of food and her" anorexia "waistline."
"At a poker tournament in favor of the city of hope, the 37 year old mother of three took pictures of her sisters praising her gym figure."
"However, a series of recent reports by Kim Kardashian on instagram show that, while they may be good at boosting each other's morale, their comments are not always 100% accurate."
"And, usually, we applaud them for that."



Number  253
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He described his creation as punk attitude meets Hollywood-New York glamour.”
“This time around, Kors told E!, he wanted her 'to show those curves!'”
“Last year, he had had to dress the actress when she was pregnant with her second child Caleb, whom she and her husband Nnamdi Asomugha welcomed last October.”
“...was the designer himself...”
“Mama mia The Scandal star 40 looked fabulous in the figure hugging Michael Kors number that featured spaghetti straps and a side split Shiny The mother of two added silver sandal heels a silver clutch and a silver statement choker to complete her look Keryr s date for the night...”
“Kerry's new hairstyle framed her pretty face and she added a splash of color with some pink lipstick.”
“She added inches with silver sandal heels and carried a silver clutch.”
“Scroll down for videoStunner: Kerry Washington rocked a bold black and silver dress with a severe bob at Monday night's Met Gala in NYCThe sweetheart neckline flashed a little bit of cleavage and the mom-of-two sported a statement silver choker.”
“The full-length dress was patterned with contrasting panels, embellishments and nude cutouts.”
“The Scandal star, 40, looked fabulous in the figure-hugging Michael Kors number that featured spaghetti straps and a side split.”


"He describes his creation as a combination of punk attitude and the glamour of Hollywood and New York."
"This time, Coles told me! He wanted her to "show those curves!"
"Last year, when the actress was pregnant with her second child, Kaleb, he had to dress her. Last October, Kaleb and her husband, namdi asomga, welcomed the child
“… It's the designer himself... "
"Mama mia, the 40 year old gossip star, looks great hugging the Michael kors number, which features spaghetti shoulder straps and shiny side slits. The mother of two added a pair of silver sandals, high heels, a silver clutch and a silver statement necklace to complete her look. Keryr's date tonight..."
"Keri's new hairstyle set her beautiful face. She painted it with pink lipstick."
"She added inches to the heel of her silver sandal and a silver clutch."
"Scroll down to see the video stunt: at the New York metropolitan party on Monday night, Kerry Washington wore a bold black and silver dress and posed as a serious Bob. Sweetheart's collar is shining a little cleavage, and the mother of two is wearing a silver necklace
"The design of this dress is made of contrasting panels, decorations and nude tailoring."
"The 40 year old gossip star looks great when he hugs Michael Coles' number with spaghetti straps and side panels."



**Something goes wrong**
“Dave appears and reveals himself to Ethan, offering to take him to the art showing so Kevin can be with his family.”
“Kevin offers to help Ethan get over his fear of rejection by taking him to an art show, later realizing this will conflict with Reese's school play.”
“Ava then says that she too is giving up.”
“Ava says she will gather all the other messengers to meet about finding the rest of the righteous, but come meeting time, they are the only two to show up.”
“Yvette meets with Ava, a celestial messenger like herself.”
“Kevin has a vision of a mariachi band.”
“But now that Deb is healthy, she reveals to Kevin that she does not want to get married.”
“3 "Sweet Little Lies" Peter Leto Chris Dingess & Davah Avena October 17, 2017 ( ) 3.26[7]Kevin tries to intervene as a wedding planner for Deb, whose former childhood friend proposed to her when she got cancer.”
“Kevin has a vision of an island surrounded by ocean.”
“They ponder getting back together, but both remember how badly Kevin treated Kristin in the past and decide it's not a good idea.”


"Dave showed up to Ethan and offered to take him to the art show so Kevin could be with his family."
Kevin offered to take Ethan to an art exhibition to help him overcome his fear of rejection, and later realized that it would conflict with Reese's school drama
"EVA said she was going to give up, too."
"EVA said she would call all the other messengers to find the rest of the righteous, but when it came time to meet, only the two of them showed up."
"Yvette met EVA, a heavenly messenger like her."
"Kevin has a vision of a mariachi band."
"But now that DEB is healthy, she tells Kevin she doesn't want to get married."
"3" sweet little lies "Peter Leto Chris dingess & davah Avena October 17, 2017 () 3.26 [7] Kevin tries to get involved in Deb's wedding planning. Deb's former childhood friend proposes to her when she has cancer
"Kevin imagines an island surrounded by an ocean."
"They're thinking about getting back together, but they all remember Kevin's bad treatment of Christine in the past and think it's not a good idea."



Number  255
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Pats’ quarterback shared an Instagram photo of the whole crew, along with the simple but clear caption, “Family and Football ❤️ #gopats.””
“Tomorrow, Brady will lead the New England Patriots against the Philadelphia Eagles during football’s biggest night of the year.”
“Brady’s doting wife brought along their kids, Vivian Lake and Benjamin, and the rest of the footballer’s tight-knit family ahead of tomorrow’s big match-up.”
“But she didn’t come alone!”
“On Saturday, the supermodel stopped by husband Tom Brady‘s practice ahead of his big Super Bowl LII game tomorrow at the U.S. Bank Stadium in Minneapolis, Minnesota.”
“Gisele Bündchen is all about standing by her man!”


Pat's quarterback shared a picture of the team on instagram with a simple but clear title, "family and football" ❤️  #“gopats.”
"Tomorrow Brady will lead the New England Patriots to the Philadelphia Eagles on the biggest football night of the year."
"Brady's doting wife, with their children, Vivian lake and Benjamin, and the football player's family, before tomorrow's big game."
"But she didn't come alone!"
"Last Saturday, the supermodel dropped in on her husband Tom Brady before the Super Bowl LII at Bank of America stadium in Minneapolis
"Giselle bonchen is going to stand beside her man!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
““They’re finally getting everything in order – they don’t need to live in several homes.”
“Joe Jonas Sells His Bachelor Pad As He Prepares To Marry Sophie TurnerNew Life!”
“Joe Jonas Sells His Bachelor Pad As He Prepares To Marry Sophie Turner The singer is engaged to the Game Of Thrones beauty.”
“Joe Jonas is selling his bachelor pad.”
“The actor is engaged to Sophie Turner and it looks like the pair is getting ready to take their relationship to the next stage.”
“A source revealed: “Joe is head over heals for Sophie [Turner].”
“We haven’t seen him this happy in ages – probably since their last time the brothers toured together.”
“It’s certainly safe to say that their wedding is in the horizon!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"They finally got everything in order - they didn't need to live in a few houses."
"Joe Jonas sold his bachelor's apartment because he was going to marry Sophie turner for a new life!"
"Joe Jonas sold his bachelor's apartment when he was about to marry Sophie Turner. The singer is engaged to the beauty in the game of Thrones
"Joe Jonas is selling his bachelor's apartment."
"The actor is engaged to Sophie Turner and it looks like they are going to take their relationship to the next level."
"Joe is treating Sophie (Turner)," a source said
"We haven't seen him so happy in a long time - probably since the last time the brothers toured together."
"To be sure, their wedding is just around the corner!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“For the fifth year in a row, the 27-year-old actress visited a children's hospital in Louisville, Kentucky, during the holidays.”
“This year, Lawrence met patients at Norton's Children's Hospital on Christmas Eve, happily taking pictures as she brought some festive cheer to the kids.”
“"Louisville's own Jennifer Lawrence stopped by Norton Children's Hospital today to visit with patients, families, and staff," the hospital shared on their Instagram page on Sunday.”
“"This visit has become a tradition for Lawrence each Christmas.”
“Thank you, Jennifer!”
“You sure do bring a smile to all!”
“❤❤❤."”
“The mother!”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
The 27 year old actress went to a children's Hospital in Louisville, Kentucky for the fifth consecutive year during the festival
"This year, Lawrence met patients at Norton children's Hospital on Christmas Eve, took pictures happily, and brought some festival joy to the children."
"Louisville's own Jennifer Lawrence came to Norton children's hospital today to visit patients, families and staff," the hospital shared on instagram on Sunday
"This visit has become Lawrence's annual Christmas tradition."
"Thank you, Jennifer!"
"You really bring a smile to everyone!"
“ ❤❤❤ ."”
"Mom!"



**Something goes wrong**
“The Inclusion Rider is an important tool for Hollywood, and other industries, to create workplaces that truly reflect our diverse world.””
“...groups to enter the industry...”
“In a statement to Variety Smith and Kalpana Kotagal one of the lawyers working on the inclusion riders said of the Pearl Street Films announcement It s great to see Matt Damon Ben Affleck and the Pearl Street Films team using their influence to create opportunities for people from underrepresented...”
“Stacy L. Smith, the director of USC Annenberg’s Media, Diversity & Social Change Initiative, first discussed the idea of an “equity rider” in a 2014 column for The Hollywood Reporter as a way to reverse Hollywood’s profound gender imbalance.”
“An inclusion rider is a way for actors and actresses to guarantee projects they work on have a level of diversity, onscreen and off-camera, that matches the location setting of the project.”
“Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri star closed her remarks by mentioning the term...”
“On behalf of Pearl Street Films Matt Damon BenAffleck Jennifer Todd Drew Vinton I will be adopting the InclusionRider for all of our projects moving forward Jordan Affleck and Damon have adopted inclusion riders following Frances McDormand s best actress acceptance speech at the Oscars on March 4 where the...”
““Thank you for always supporting broader representation in the industry,” Fanshen Cox DiGiovanni, head of strategic outreach at Pearl Street Films tweeted in response to Jordan on Monday night.”
“Pearl Street Films, the production company co-founded by Ben Affleck and Matt Damon, will adopt inclusion riders for their projects going forward, following in the footsteps of Outlier Society, the production company started by Black Panther star Michael B. Jordan.”


"The inclusion rider is an important tool for Hollywood and other industries to create workplaces that truly reflect our diverse world."
“… Groups entering the industry... "
"In a statement to variety magazine Smith and Kalpana kotagal, a lawyer involved in the inclusion riders said it was a pleasure to see Matt Damon Ben Affleck and Pearl Street films when talking about the announcement of Pearl Street films Street films) team utilization
"Stacy L. Smith, director of media, diversity & social change initiative at USC Annenberg, was a Hollywood Reporter in 2014 The concept of a "fair rider" has been discussed for the first time in a column written by the reporter as a way to reverse the serious gender imbalance in Hollywood
"Adding additional terms is a way for actors to ensure that the projects they are engaged in are diverse and match the project's location settings, both on the screen and under the camera."
"Three billboards outside starlight avenue in the ebbing state of Missouri ended her speech by mentioning the word..."
"On behalf of the Pearl Street film company Matt Damon benafleck, Jennifer Todd drew Vinton, I will adopt the inclusion clause for all our projects. Jordan Affleck and Damon adopted the inclusion clause after the Best Actress Oscar speech of Frances McDormand on March 4, in which..."
Fanshen Cox DiGiovanni, head of strategic outreach at Pearl Street, said in response to Jordan on his microblog on Monday night: "thank you for supporting wider representation in the film industry."
Pearl Street film company is a production company co founded by Ben Affleck and Matt Damon. It will follow the steps of "the outliers Association" founded by Michael B. Jordan, the Black Panther star, and adopt inclusive knight in its future projects



**Something goes wrong**
““But I also think that shouldn’t cloud the decisions that need to be made for the future.””
“The NBC show currently averages 4 million viewers a morning, a 3 percent drop from 2017 before Lauer’s exit, the Nielsen company said.”
“For much of the past half-century, CBS has been an after-thought in the mornings, a distant third-place broadcast that changed names, formats and personalities as often as an impatient designer changes paint.”
“More: A year after Lauer firing, ex-reporter calls out NBC; Comcast says she's wrong“It just has the strongest DNA out of all the morning shows,” said Shelley Ross, who produced rivals at ABC and CBS.”
“The show launched in 1952 and while it has had missteps – it has never recovered the dominance it enjoyed prior to the ham-fisted departure of Ann Curry a decade ago – “Today” viewers can be confident it will be around tomorrow.”
“The long history of “Today” likely helps it absorb hits.”
“ABC’s “Good Morning America,” the first-place broadcast with 4.1 million viewers, lost 5 percent of its audience.”
“CBS has lost 10 percent of its audience in the same period, to just under 3.2 million.”
“Lauer’s downfall, also due to reports of inappropriate relationships with women, came less than two weeks later.”
“Rose, a skillful interviewer who moonlighted on both “60 Minutes” and his own PBS show, teamed with Gayle King and Norah O’Donnell.”


"But I also don't think that should cast a shadow over future decisions."
"NBC now has an average of 4 million viewers every morning, down 3% from 2017 before Raul left," Nielsen said
"For most of the past half century, CBS has been people's afterthought in the morning, a distant third place broadcast that has changed its name, form and personality as often as an impatient designer has changed the paint."
"More: a year after Raul was fired, a former reporter called NBC; Comcast said she was wrong," says Shelley Ross, a rival producer at ABC and CBS. "It just has the strongest DNA of all morning shows."
"The show was launched in 1952, and although it made mistakes - it never regained its dominance a decade ago before Ann Curry's clumsy departure - today's viewers can believe that it will appear tomorrow."
Today's long history is likely to help it absorb hits
ABC's "Good Morning America" ranked first with 4.1 million viewers, down 5 percent
"CBS lost 10 percent of its audience in the same period, less than 3.2 million."
Less than two weeks later, Raul's downfall was also due to reports of improper relations with women
Rose, a skilled interviewer, worked part-time on 60 minutes and his own PBS program, working with Gail king and Nora O'Donnell



**Something goes wrong**
“Harry had earlier this year admitted to undergoing counseling to cope with the loss of mother Princess Diana.”
“...subject close to his heart...”
“But let s not kid ourselves that the job is done there is much more that we can do at every level to make conversations about mental health as commonplace as those about physical health Mental health awareness is a...”
““I cannot tell you how pleased William, Catherine and I are that the dial seems to have shifted and that there is now a greater understanding, compassion and kindness for anyone who opens up about their struggles.”
“...have spearheaded new mental health campaign Head Together which has initiated important conversation around the country...”
“I m sure we could all be more effective and efficient if we took a moment to process our thoughts rather than rush to the next one Prince Harry along with Prince William and the Duchess of Cambridge Kate Middleton...”
““I read recently that young people check their phones at least 150 times a day,” he said.”
“...over before moving on...”
“Prince Harry There Is Much More We Can Do To Promote Mental Health Awareness Speaking at a panel event entitled Encouraging Happy Young Minds in Leeds the prince suggested that young people need to take a moment to think things...”
“According to Prince Harry, more people should take a break from checking their mobile phones to "process their thoughts" instead of rushing through their day.”


"Prince Harry admitted earlier this year that he had received counseling in response to the death of his mother, Princess Diana."
“… The theme in his heart... "
"But let's not deceive ourselves by saying that this work has been completed. We can do more at all levels to make the conversation about mental health as common as the conversation about physical health. Mental health awareness is a kind of..."
"I can't tell you how happy William, Catherine, and I are. Their dials seem to have changed, and now they have greater understanding, compassion, and kindness for anyone who opens up and talks about their struggle."
“…… They jointly launched a new mental health campaign and launched an important dialogue across the country. "
"I believe that if we take a moment to deal with our ideas instead of rushing to the next movie with Prince William and Kate Middleton, Duchess of Cambridge, we will all be more efficient and efficient..."
"I recently read that young people check their mobile phones at least 150 times a day," he said
“… Before continuing... "
"Prince Harry, in a group activity called" encouraging happy young people "in Leeds, we can do more to improve people's mental health awareness. Prince Harry suggested that young people need to spend some time thinking about problems.... "
"According to Prince Harry, more people should take a break, from checking their mobile phones to 'handling their own ideas' rather than rushing through the day."



Number  261
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Our mission at STYLECASTER is to bring style to the people, and we only feature products we think you’ll love as much as we do.”
“Updated February 2020.”
“), if you do wear a bathing suit or undergarments, wear pieces you don’t mind potentially ruining with rogue tanning solution.”
“While many people decide to get a spray tan or apply self-tanner while wearing nothing (no tan lines!”
“Think about your undergarments.”
“Additionally, avoid using body oil or lotions with oil prior to your tan, as it will cause blotches and prevent the tan from developing.”
“While you’re in the shower, use a body scrub to slough away any dry, flaky skin before so that the pigment will adhere smoothly for the evenest results (as in, least streaky).”
“Remember to always read directions!)”
“(Keep in mind that certain self-tanner products may require waiting a few hours after cleansing to apply.”
“Remove your makeup and take a shower before applying a self-tanner or getting a spray tan.”


"Our mission at stylemaster is to bring fashion to people. We only launch products that we think you will like as much as we do."
"Updated in February 2020."
If you're really wearing a swimsuit or underwear, wear something that you don't mind potentially damaging with rogue tanning fluid
"When many people decide not to wear any clothes (no sunburnt lines) for spray tanning or using self tanning agents!"
"Think about your underwear."
Also, avoid using body oil or grease containing lotion before tanning, as this can cause spots and prevent tanning.
In the shower, wipe off dry, flaky skin with a body scrub so that the pigment adheres smoothly to the skin, achieving a uniform effect (say, minimum streaks)
"Remember to read the manual!"
"(please remember that some self tanning products may need to wait several hours after cleaning before they can be used."
"Remove makeup and shower before using self tanning agent or spray tanning."



**Something goes wrong**
“Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel for fun, exclusive videos with your favorite stars.”
“...who apparently helped the two get together...”
“The actress took to Instagram to casually drop a cute AF Christmas photo on us all, showing off her love, Chris Adkins.”
“"Happy Holidays" she simply wrote in the caption of the picture she shared where the couple looks oh so in love, smiling from ear to ear cuddling up next to each other in front of a Christmas tree.”
“How precious!”
“The grown-ish star then took to her Instagram story to share a cute video of the pair hanging out in the snow together.”
“Seriously so in love!”
“So who is this lucky guy?”
“Well Chris happens to be a cinematographer on the show black ish and since grown ish is the spinoff series of the ABC comedy series it s only natural Francia and Chris met through their mutual connections namely Yara Shahidi...”
“A source told E!”


"Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel and watch interesting exclusive videos with your favorite stars."
“… Obviously, he helped them get together... "
"The actress casually showed us a lovely AF Christmas picture on instagram to show us her love, Chris Adkins."
"Happy holidays" she just wrote in the title of the photo she shared that the couple seemed to be in love, hugging each other in front of a Christmas tree and laughing
"How precious
"The mature star then shared on instagram a lovely video of the two hanging out in the snow together."
"Really so in love!"
"And who is the lucky one?"
"Well, Chris happens to be a cinematographer showing black ISH, because growing ISH is a derivative of ABC's comedy series, and it's the only natural thing for Francia and Chris to do through their mutual connection, namely Yarra shahidi..."
"A source told me!"



**Something goes wrong**
“...not in the competition yet...”
“Date The contestant went on a date and gave out a rose at the rose ceremony.”
“It is a spin-off of the reality television game shows The Bachelor and The Bachelorette, and is a winter counterpart to the summer series Bachelor in Paradise.”
“The show is hosted by Chris Harrison and Hannah Storm of ABC’s sister station ESPN.”
“It has been described by ABC as "an ode to the Winter Olympic Games", and aired as counterprogramming against NBC's coverage of the 2018 Winter Olympics.”
“Ashley Brewer presents the play-by-play and live interviews during the games.”
“[2]The series reunite previous contestants from The Bachelor and The Bachelorette at a winter resort in Manchester, Vermont, where they are competing with contestants from the various international adaptations of the franchise in various winter sports challenges.”
“1 3 Contestants edit Elimination table edit Place Contestant Episode 1 2 3 4 1st Ashley Last In Date Winner Kevin Date In Date 2nd Courtney In In In Runner up Lily In In In Dean In Date Last Runner up Lesley In Date Last Luke Date Date In Runner...”
“...up Stassi In Date In 9 10 Bibiana Date In In Split Jordan N A a In In Split 11 12 Ally In In Out Josiah Last In Out 13 14 Christian In In Split Clare In Last Split 15 Yuki In In Out 16 Michael In In Quit 17”
“Ben In In Quit 18 Tiffany In In Quit 19 20 Jenny In Out Rebecca Date Out 21 Benoit In Quit 22 26 Eric Out Jamey Out Laura Out Lauren Out Zoe Out Key edit The contestant is male...”


“… I'm not in the game yet... "
"The date player went on a date and gave a rose at the rose ceremony."
"It's a derivative of the reality TV game bachelor and single woman and a winter version of the summer series Bachelor in heaven."
"It's hosted by Chris Harrison and Hannah storm of ABC sister station ESPN."
ABC calls it a "Winter Olympics anthem," which runs counter to NBC's coverage of the 2018 Winter Olympics
"Ashley brewer introduced the match and the live interview during the match."
"[2] at a winter resort in Manchester, Vermont, the series brings together contestants from singles and single women who compete with international adaptations of the franchise from a variety of winter sports challenges."
"13 contestants edit elimination table edit competition location Episode 1 Episode 2 Episode 3 Episode 4 first place Ashley last date champion Kevin date second place Courtney date runner up Lily date Dean date last place runner up Leslie date last place Luke date runner up..."
“… Upper Stacey on the date of 9 10 biana on the date of the split Jordan n a on the date of the split 11 12 allies on the outside Josiah on the last outside 13 14 Christianity on the last split Claire on the last split 15 Yuki on the outside 16 Michael on the inside quit 17 "
"Ben in quit 18 Tiffany in quit 19 20 Jenny in out Rebecca date out 21 Benoit in quit 22 26 Eric out Jamey out Laura out Lauren out Zoe out key edit contestant is male..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“The Hollywood Reporter confirmed the death with Bufanda’s rep Kirsten Solem.”
“Solem said that the family is asking for privacy.”
““We are completely devastated for he was an extremely talented young actor and wonderful, caring human being.”
“He was reviving his career having just completed two movies, and we are shocked and saddened by his passing,” Solem told the Hollywood Reporter.”
“Bufanda died Wednesday shortly after midnight, Ed Winter of the Los Angeles County Coroner’s Office told the Hollywood Reporter.”
“He jumped from a building before being found by a transient, officials said.”
“A spokesperson for the Coroner’s Office told People that an autopsy had been completed and the death was ruled a suicide.”
“The spokesperson added that Bufanda died from blunt traumatic injuries related to the suicide.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Hollywood Reporter confirmed the death with representative Kirsten SoLIM of bufanda."
"SoLIM said the family wanted privacy."
"He is a very talented young actor, a very loving person, and we are very shocked by that."
"He has just finished two films and is recovering his career. We are shocked and saddened by his death," SoLIM told the Hollywood Reporter
Ed winter of the Los Angeles County coroner's office told Hollywood reporters that boufanda died shortly after midnight on Wednesday
Officials said he jumped out of a building and was found by a passer-by
"A spokesman for the coroner's office told people that the autopsy had been completed and the death was judged suicide."
"Bufanda died of blunt trauma associated with suicide," the spokesman added



**Something goes wrong**
“My thoughts & prayers r with Kandi, his children & family””
“Burruss reacted to the death with the following messages on her Twitter page:• im just in one of those moods where i dont wanna talk, i dont wanna b held & told its gonna b ok. i just wanna cry myself 2 sleep, alone.”
““It appears he was involved in an altercation in the parking lot and he received a severe blow to the head,” Atlanta Police Lt. Keith Meadows told WSB TV 2.”
“Jewell, who apparently worked at the club, was taken to a hospital where he later died.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Atlanta homicide detectives arrested a suspect on Saturday, according to the Atlanta Journal-Constitution.”
“Fredrick Richardson, who was also hospitalized for injuries from the fight, was charged with voluntary manslaughter and will be jailed upon his release from Grady Memorial Hospital.”
“The victim, known as A.J., appeared regularly on the hit reality show, often clashing with Burruss’s mother, who disapproved of her daughter’s relationship.”
“He and Burrus ended their engagement earlier this year.”
“• I could never n a million years imagine this happening.”


"My thoughts and prayers with condi, his children and family"
"Borough's reaction to death is to leave a message on her twitter page: · I just have an emotion that I don't want to talk, I don't want to hold it and tell it it's going to be OK. I just want to sleep alone crying. "
Atlanta police Lieutenant Keith meadows told WSB television 2: "it seems that he was involved in a parking lot quarrel and received a heavy blow to the head."
"Javier obviously worked for the club and was taken to the hospital to die."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Atlanta homicide detectives arrested a suspect on Saturday, according to the Atlanta constitution magazine
Frederick Richardson, also hospitalized for fighting injuries, was charged with intentional homicide and will be jailed after being released from Grady Memorial Hospital
"The victim's name is A.J., who often appears on popular reality shows and often conflicts with Burroughs' mother who does not recognize her daughter's relationship."
"He and burrows ended their engagement earlier this year."
"I couldn't imagine that for a million years."



**Something goes wrong**
“He loves Gwen's kids, [which has] made him realize he could be a good father.���”
“���Because it���s in the public eye, a lot of people want to have their own bulls**t opinions about it, but I���m, like, there.”
“Adam Levine is finally dishing on Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani.”
“During an interview with Howard Stern on Monday the Maroon 5 frontman opened up about his fellow Voice coaches romance revealing that he first found out about their relationship after witnessing their PDA at dinner We were at dinner they...”
“...kissed or something Levine explained...”
“"They did something crazy!���Something that was a giveaway and I was like 'I f**king knew it!"”
“���They���re so in love it���s disgusting.”
“It���s so funny.”
“They found each other at really interesting times in their lives [after very public splits].”
“It���s really beautiful,��� the 38-year-old singer shared.”


"He loved Gwen's children, which made him realize that he could be a good father."
"Because it's in the public eye, a lot of people want to have their own views on it, but I'm there."
"Adam Levin finally offered wine to Blake Sheldon and Gwen Stephanie."
"In an interview with Howard Stern on Monday, the leader of maroon 5 made public the romance of his colleagues. He said that the first time he found out about their relationship was when we saw their PDAs at dinner. We saw them at dinner..."
“… Kiss or something Levin explains... "
"They did something crazy! Some things are gifts, and I thought, "I knew that a long time ago!"
"They're so in love. It's disgusting."
"That's funny."
"They found each other at a very interesting time in their lives (after the public breakup),"
"It's really beautiful," said the 38 year old singer



**Something goes wrong**
“However, Forbes has also claimed that Prince Harry received between £35,704 and £37,840 while working as a helicopter pilot for the Army Air Corps.”
“While serving as an officer in the Army Air Corps, he was reportedly granted a salary of around £32,134 per year, as stated by Fortune.”
“Last month, thousands of people signed a petition demanding that the royal family fund the wedding themselves and not take any money from the British taxpayer.”
“With that in mind, the net worth of the royal family and Prince Harry have becoming interesting topics of conversation.”
“Here’s everything you need to know about Prince Harry’s age, royal status and net worth as he prepares to welcome Ms Markle into the fold.”
“What’s his royal status and occupation?”
“Prince Harry, who was born Henry Charles Albert David on September 15 1984, is formally known as Prince Henry of Wales.”
“He’s currently 33 years old.”
“He’s sixth in line to the throne behind his father the Prince of Wales, his older brother the Duke of Cambridge, his nephew Prince George, his niece Princess Charlotte and the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge’s third child, who is expected to arrive later this month.”
“Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the News newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick...”


"However, Forbes also claimed that Prince Harry was paid between 35704 and 37840 when he was a helicopter pilot in the army aviation force."
"It is reported that during his time as an officer in the army aviation, he received an annual salary of about 32134, as described in Fortune magazine."
"Last month, thousands of people signed a petition asking the royal family to pay for the wedding itself and not to take money from British taxpayers."
"With that in mind, the net worth of the royal family and Prince Harry has become an interesting topic to talk about."
"As Prince Harry prepares to welcome Ms. markel to the White House, here's all the information about his age, royal status and net worth."
"What is his royal status and occupation?"
Prince Harry was born on September 15, 1984 in Henry Charles Albert David, officially known as Prince Henry of Wales
"He's 33 now."
He is the sixth heir to the British throne, second only to his father, the prince of Wales, his brother, the Duke of Cambridge, his nephew, Prince George, his niece, Princess Charlotte, and the third child of the couple. The Duchess of Cambridge will have their third child later this month
"Please enter your e-mail address please enter a valid e-mail address please enter a valid e-mail address to register thank you for registering the newsletters verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by e-mail please check..."



**Something goes wrong**
“It's possible to think that the dragons are fulfilling some sort of role or duty.”
“There isn't enough evidence to make any sort of theory about the dragons’ purpose.”
“It is unknown whether other dracoliches exist in Greyhawk.”
“Dracolich Dungeons & Dragons An undead dragon called Dragotha,[7] formerly consort to Tiamat, who was given his undead powers by the deity Kyuss.”
“Once a kind benevolent dragon, but was driven mad by the Old Gods and came to inspire fear and contempt.”
“Deathwing, The Destroyer World of Warcraft: Cataclysm, Heroes of the Storm Known as 'the Destroyer' and originally as 'Neltharion the Earth-Warder'.”
“Darby Darby the Dragon A green dragon who bears the title Dragon Prince and goes on a quest to restore his shrunken sister Sparkle.”
“He is the first boss of Epic Mickey 2.”
“Blotworx Dragon Epic Mickey 2 Giant Animatronic Dragon piloted by a Blotling.”
“His destructive MegaFlare can consume multiple cities in one attack.”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“...the Canadian actor wrote.”
“After realizing that he and Ryan Reynolds were both in Japan at the same time, the 11-year-old actor made it his mission to go on a journey to find his role model.”
“And on Wednesday, the Wonder star announced to his fans on Instagram that he was victorious.”
“Tremblay shared an epic pic of himself posing next to Reynolds, captioning it, "I FOUND HIM!!!"”
“"If you can believe it you can achieve it!!!"”
“...he continued.”
“"#TheHuntForDeadpool #MissionAccomplished Thanks @VancityReynolds you are the greatest!"”
“Reynolds reposted the same pic to his own account, accompanying it with a sweet message about his newfound friend.”
“"Vancouver is alive and well in the heart of Tokyo.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
“…… The Canadian actor wrote
"Realizing that he and Ryan Reynolds were in Japan at the same time, the 11 year old actor made it his mission to find his role model."
"On Wednesday, the amazing star announced to his fans on instagram that he won."
Trembray shares an epic photo of him posing next to Reynolds with a caption: "I found him!"
"If you can believe it, you can achieve it!"
“…… He continued
"Kill the pool of death! Task complete thanks @ vancityreynolds, you are the greatest!"
"Reynolds forwarded the same photo to his account with a sweet message about his new friend."
"Vancouver is still alive in the heart of Tokyo."



Number  270
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Blake Shelton Through the Years...”
“Others have offered up their expertise as advisers during various weeks.”
“A number of country artists have appeared as team mentors throughout The Voice's 13-season run, including Luke Bryan, Brad Paisley, Miranda Lambert and the Band Perry.”
“The Voice Season 14 is scheduled to premiere on Feb. 26 on NBC.”
“The trek will run from mid-February through mid-March.”
“Shelton and Adkins will be on the road together this spring as well: Adkins, Brett Eldredge and Carly Pearce are all booked as special guests on Shelton's Country Music Freaks Tour.”
“Additionally, Adkins helped induct Shelton into the Grand Ole Opry in 2010: He tweeted Shelton's invitation to the country star and, a few months later, officially inducted Shelton into the hallowed institution.”
“1 on the country charts and has been certified platinum; it also won Vocal Event of the Year at the 2010 ACM Awards.”
“"Hillbilly Bone" hit No.”
“Released as a single in October of that year, the song -- written by Luke Laird and Craig Wiseman -- appears on Shelton's Hillbilly Bone EP.”


"Black Sheldon, over the years..."
"Others offered their expertise as consultants in different weeks."
"Many country artists have been team mentors in voice's 13 seasons, including Luke Blaine, Brad Paisley, Miranda Lambert and Perry."
"Sound Season 14 is scheduled to premiere on NBC on February 26."
"The long journey will last from mid February to mid March."
"Sheldon and Adkins will be on the road together this spring: Adkins, Brett Eldridge and Carly pierce are all special guests at Sheldon's country music geek tour."
"In addition, Adkins helped Sheldon make the big Opry in 2010: he invited Sheldon to become a country star on twitter, and a few months later, he officially introduced Sheldon to this sacred institution."
"It ranked first in the national charts and won platinum certification; at the ACM awards ceremony in 2010, it also won the best vocal award of the year."
"Countryman's bone" missed
The song, written by Luke laird and Craig Wiseman, was released as a single in October of the same year and appeared in Sheldon's hillbilly bone EP



**Something goes wrong**
“Let’s hope this isn’t one friendship that blows too Hot n Cold.”
“To make things even more baffling, Miley is now allowing her natural dark tresses to show through...perhaps she’s morphing into the old Katy?”
“Celebrity psychologist Honey Lancaster-James said: “It’s common for friends to begin to look like one another as they are influenced by other’s style and mannerisms.”(Image: Getty) (Image: Getty)(Image: Getty)Miley recently claimed that Katy’s song I Kissed A Girl was about her.”
“Both have adopted the luxe look - making feathers and fur part of their look.”
“...by wearing matching outfits on and off stage...”
“She said I so badly want to be Katheryn Hudson that I don t even want to look like Katy Perry sometimes Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto play soon 8 Cancel Play now Katy and Miley have even shown their solidarity...”
“Meanwhile, Katy – real name Katheryn Hudson - says her new look is a bid to connect with her real self to beat mental problems following her split from Orlando.”
“The couple are now back together and - surprise surprise – her long hair is back.”
“(Image: Getty)Miley’s fans blamed the 2013 haircut on her split with Liam, saying it marked the beginning of the end for the couple as she shed her good-girl image.”
“Both chopped off their locks and went out partying amid break-ups, Miley from Liam Hemsworth and Katy from Orlando Bloom .”


"I hope it's not a warm and cold friendship."
"What's more puzzling is that Miley is now showing her natural dark hair Maybe she's old Katie? "
"It's very common for friends to start to look like each other after they are influenced by each other's styles and habits," said the famous psychologist horny Lancaster James
"Both of them are in luxurious style, feathers and fur are part of their style."
“… Wear matching clothes on and off the stage... "
"She said I really want to be Katherine Hudson, and I don't even want to look like Katie Perry. Sometimes video loading video is not available. Click play. Click play video will automatically play soon. 8 cancel play. Now Katie and Miley even show their unity..."
"At the same time, Katie - whose real name is Katherine Hudson - said her new look was to connect with her true self to overcome her mental problems after her separation from Orlando."
"The couple are back together now, and surprisingly, her long hair is back."
(photo: Getty) Millie's fans blame her 2013 haircut on her breakup with Liam, saying it marks the beginning of the end of the couple when she gets rid of the good girl image
"They both cut their hair and went out to a party when they parted, Miley of Liam Hemsworth and Katie of Orlando Bloom."



Number  272
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Scroll through the gallery below to see photos of celebrity kids on their first day of school!”
“Nothing quite like a relatable celebrity moment!”
“That said, these sweet photos of Hollywood’s most familiar little faces holding up their cute signs for their respective grades are so touching.”
“What many fans tend to forget is that many celebs are moms and dads on top of actors and actresses, and, in turn, send their kids off to school every September just like we do!”
“But that’s not all!”
“Your favorite celebrity kids are heading back to school, including the sons of Elton John, the daughters of Jessica Alba, and the daughter of Hilaria Baldwin, for example.”
“It’s that time of year again!”
“Celebrity Kids Go Back To School In The Cutest Pics Shared By Their Famous Parents — See Them Here!”


"Scroll through the gallery below to see pictures of celebrity children on their first day of school!"
"There's nothing like celebrity time!"
"In other words, these sweet pictures of Hollywood's most familiar little faces holding cute signs of their achievements are so touching."
"What many fans often forget is that many celebrities are parents above actors. Conversely, they send their children to school like us every September!"
"But it's more than that!"
"Your favorite star kids are going back to school, like Elton John's son, Jessica Alba's daughter, Hillary Baldwin's daughter."
"It's that time of the year again!"
"When the star children come back to school, they will see them here in the most lovely photos shared by their famous parents!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Considering how often the RHS teens listen, though, the adults might as well be speaking gibberish!”
“For those that don't watch Riverdale, Archie also had a romantic affair with his teacher, although the Riverdale adults are a lot more intelligible than the Peanuts elders.”
“This take on Charlie Brown was a lot closer to KJ Apa's brooding portrayal as Archie Andrews, and yes, that does include writing songs and showing them to friends.”
“Jimmy Fallon played a great modern take on Charlie Brown, although he didn't get insulted nearly as much as the Charlie Brown we all know from back in the day.”
“Whoever wrote up that sketch for The Tonight Show needs a raise ASAP, as that was ridiculously hilarious.”


"However, considering how often RHS teenagers listen, adults might as well talk nonsense!"
"For those who don't watch valley of the river, Archie also had a romantic relationship with his teacher, although the adults in valley of the river are easier to understand than the adults in old peanut."
"Charlie Brown is closer to kjapa's Archie Andrews. Yes, it does include writing songs and showing them to friends."
"Jimmy Fallon played a great modern take on Charlie Brown, although he was not insulted almost as Charlie Brown we all know from the past day."
"Whoever wrote a sketch for the tonight show needs a raise as soon as possible, because that's ridiculous."



**Something goes wrong**
“More: Thomas Rhett & Lauren Akins Pose for Maternity Shoot, & OMG, It’s PerfectTalk about some great news to finish off the week, right?”
“McGraw and Hill released similar album announcements on their social media pages.”
“Now they’ve gone and done the one thing we were hoping they would do, and it’s going to bring such joy to your heart.”
“On Friday, McGraw and Hill announced that they’re releasing an album together.”
“More: We Can All Agree Tim McGraw & Faith Hill Are the Cutest Country Couple EverNow, for those who may not exactly be up-to-date on the movements of McGraw and Hill, you might have already thought they’d made an album together.”
“I mean, it’s understandable.”
“They’ve been together for more than two decades and have appeared as guest vocalists on each other’s singles over the years.”
“A joint album should have materialized by now, logically speaking.”
“But alas, the time has finally come, and a dream has finally been fulfilled.”
“On his Twitter, McGraw released a teaser video of their song “The Rest of Our Life” and this caption: “Excited to announce our new album and new single, The Rest Of Our Life.”


"More: Thomas Rhett and Lauren Akins pose for pregnant women, my God, it's great to talk about some good news at the end of the week, isn't it?"
"McGraw and hill posted similar announcements on their social media pages."
"Now that they're gone, they've done what we want them to do, which will bring such joy to your heart."
Last Friday, McGraw and hill announced that they would release an album together
"More: we all agree that Tim McGraw and Faith Hill are the loveliest country lovers in everno. For those who don't know much about McGraw and Hill's movements, you may have thought they made an album together."
"I mean, it's understandable."
"They have been together for more than 20 years, and they have appeared in each other's singles as guest singers over the years."
"Logically, the joint album should have been realized by now."
"Well, the time has finally come, the dream has finally come true."
On his twitter, McGraw posted a video of their song "the rest of our lives" with the title: "nice to announce our new album and new single" the rest of our lives. "



**Something goes wrong**
“...at the Columbus Zoo Dr Sheldon Cooper named in the show s honor...”
“And some fun facts In addition to centering many of its episodes in the worlds of science and technology The Big Bang Theory enjoys a healthy appreciation and support from the scientific community at large including having a bee species Euglossa bazinga a jellyfish species Bazinga Rieki and a monkey...”
“Despite recent remarks by CBS that it was in talks for more seasons of the highly-rated series, the network, producing studio Warner Bros. TV and executive producer Chuck Lorre just announced that the comedy will end its run in May 2019 with its upcoming 12th season.”
“The Big Bang Theory still will rank as the longest-running multi-camera series in television history per WBTV, spanning 12 seasons and a record-breaking 279 episodes, .”
“Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See All“We are forever grateful to our fans for their support of The Big Bang Theory during the past twelve seasons.”
“We, along with the cast, writers and crew, are extremely appreciative of the show’s success and aim to deliver a final season, and series finale, that will bring The Big Bang Theory to an epic creative close,” WBTV, CBS and Chuck Lorre Productions said in a joint statement.”
“CBS The announcement about The Big Bang Theory coming to an end comes just two weeks after CBS Entertainment president Kelly Kahl said at TCA that we don t believe it s the final season we are in preliminary discussions to renew the show with the studio that produces it...”
“Warner Bros I hear conversations about a possible two year renewal were going on as recently as late last week...”
“Eleven seasons in, The Big Bang Theory remains one of the biggest shows on television.”
“Season 11 averaged 18.9 million viewers, even with Season 10.”


“… At the Columbus Zoo, Dr. Sheldon Cooper was named after the honor of the performance... "
"Some interesting facts, in addition to many events focusing on the field of science and technology, the big bang theory has been appreciated and supported by the broad scientific community, including the bee species euglossa BAZINGA, the jellyfish species BAZINGA rieki and the monkey..."
"Although CBS recently said it was negotiating more seasons for the high ratings series, the station, Warner Bros Bros.TV ）Producer and executive producer chuck Lorre has just announced that the comedy will end in May 2019 with season 12. "
"The big bang theory will still be listed as the longest multi shot Series in the history of every wbtv, spanning 12 seasons with a record 279 episodes."
"Prime time panic your pilot guide and direct series orders see all" we always thank our fans for their support of the big bang theory over the past 12 seasons
Wbtv, CBS and chuck Lorre productions said in a joint statement: "we, as well as the actors, writers and crew, appreciate the success of the show. Our goal is to launch the final season and episode, which will push the big bang theory to an epic climax."
"CBS announced that the big bang theory is coming to an end. Just two weeks ago, Kelly Carr, President of CBS Entertainment Department, told TCA that we don't think this is the last season. We are discussing with the studio that produced the show to continue the show..."
"Warner Bros. I heard that the conversation about a possible two-year extension took place later last week..."
"Since eleven seasons, big bang theory is still one of the biggest shows on TV."
"The average audience in Season 11 was 18.9 million, even in season 10."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"Ur weird i'm weird i like u @bellathorne ," Tana captioned the video.”
“See, they just get each other on another level.”
“For example, licking each other's tongues?”
“Not weird at all for either of them.”
“Actually, they enjoy that sort of thing.”
“Which is why Tana shared a video of Bella licking her tongue yesterday.”
“I'm not talking that kind of tongue tap people do when they're dared to do it or something.”
“I'm talking a nice long LICK.”
“And even though just looking at the still image of the girls preparing for the lick gives me the heebie-jeebies, I gotta respect that this is their thing.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"You're weird, I'm weird, I like you @ bellasone," Tana wrote in the video
"Look, they just get to know each other on another level."
"Like licking each other's tongue?"
"It's no surprise to both of them."
"In fact, they like it a lot."
"That's why Tana shared Bella's tongue licking video yesterday."
"I'm not talking about the audacious tongue beating or something."
"I'm talking about long licks."
"Even if it's just looking at the static images that girls are going to lick, it's ridiculous, but I have to respect that it's their business."



**Something goes wrong**
“Gold increases the elasticity of the skin, thus making it firm and toned.”
“This will further prevent the skin from sagging.”
“Gold Can Lighten The Complexion:As we recollect history, it was rumored that one of the beauty regimes that Cleopatra followed was the use of gold.”
“4.”
“This would prevent the skin from premature aging.”
“Use of gold can reduce the dryness of skin and helps in increasing the metabolic rate.”
“Premature Aging Of The Skin Can Be Prevented:Dryness of skin can lead to its premature aging.”
“3.”
“Gold can help to stimulate the cells and have a healthy skin.”
“This will increase the metabolism of skin cells and secretion of the waste.”


Gold can increase the elasticity of the skin, which makes the skin tight
"This will further prevent skin sagging."
"Gold makes gold lighter and more complicated: as we recall, there is a rumor that one of Cleopatra's beauty systems is to use gold."
“4.”
"This prevents premature aging of the skin."
"Using gold can reduce dryness of skin and help increase the metabolic rate."
"Premature aging of skin may be prevented: dry skin can lead to premature aging."
“3.”
"Gold helps stimulate cells and have healthy skin."
"This will increase the metabolism of skin cells and the secretion of wastes."



**Something goes wrong**
““They were just laughing because they were joking about how they were exhausted and finally it was over.””
““She just slumped in between his legs,” he revealed.”
““The sun is setting right just over the top of Windsor Castle just behind them, it was just the most serene, beautiful light, they’re in love, walking around this beautiful garden.”That’s when he had the idea for them to sit down on the stairs.”
““It was just one of those magical moments, when you’re a photographer and everything falls into place,” he told Reuters.”
“Lubomirski also opened up about capturing the the Duke and Duchess of Sussex laughing on the steps of St. George’s Chapel.”
“The Telegraph reported that their nanny, Maria Borrallo, promised them Smarties after the ceremony if they behaved!”
“They are certainly a favorite with Prince George and Princess Charlotte.”
““As soon as the kids came onto the set, I immediately just shouted out ‘Who likes Smarties?’ and then everybody, hands up, smiles, even some adults put up their hands,” recalled Lubomirski.”
“(Smarties in the U.K. aren’t chalky candies, but rather colorful, sugar-coated chocolate confections manufactured by Nestle.)”
““They were being bribed with one Smartie here, one Smartie there,” the photographer told Reuters in an interview published on Wednesday, May 23.”


"They're just laughing because they're joking about how exhausted they are, and it's over."
"She just fell between his legs," he revealed
"The sun just set on the top of Windsor Castle behind them. It was the most peaceful and beautiful light. They fell in love and walked in this beautiful garden." Then he thought of letting them sit on the stairs
"It's just one of those magical moments, when you're a photographer, it's all in order," he told Reuters
"Lubomirsky also made public the story of catching the Duke and Duchess of Sussex laughing on the steps of St. George's church."
Their nanny, Maria borrallo, promised after the wedding that they would be smart if they did well, the Daily Telegraph reported
"They are, of course, Prince George's and Princess Charlotte's favorites."
"As soon as the kids get to the set, I yell," who likes smart people? "Then everyone, hands up, smiles, even some adults, hands up," lubomirsky recalled
(the smart people in Britain are not chalk candy, but sugar coated chocolate candy made by Nestle.)
"They were bribed by a smart man, a smart man here, a smart man there," the photographer told Reuters in an interview published on Wednesday, May 23



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow her rise to fame here.”
“The "Blank Space" singer even provided a helpful how-to video to guide fans through the process.”
“After announcing her upcoming album, Reputation, which will drop on Nov. 10, Swift released her first single in three years late on Thursday, Aug. 24, 2017 — the revenge-inspired "Look What You Made Me Do."”
“And now, it looks like the 27-year-old singer-songwriter is gearing up to go on tour in 2018!”
“As of now, no dates have been announced.”
“However, as E!”
“News reported on Friday, Aug. 25, Swift is already planning ahead.”
“In collaboration with Ticketmaster, her team has set up Taylor Swift Tix, a ticket-buying initiative which will serve as an interactive portal, ensuring that "verified fans" get priority access over scalpers and ticket bots.”
“To start, you must use your Ticketmaster account to register with the Taylor Swift Tix portal and choose a city in which you could potentially attend a concert.”
“Can't wait until the weekend to see more from Taylor Swift?”


"Follow her to fame here."
The "blank space" singer even provided a useful video to guide fans through the process
"After announcing her album reputation, which will be released on November 10, swift released her first single in three years, revenge, later on August 24, 2017 (Thursday), which inspired her," look what you've made me do. "
"Now it seems that the 27 year old singer songwriter is going on a tour in 2018!"
"So far, no date has been announced."
"But as e!"
"The news report on Friday, August 25, said Swift was already planning ahead."
"In collaboration with Ticketmaster, her team established Taylor Swift tix, a ticketing program that will serve as an interactive portal to ensure that" verified fans "have priority over scalpers and ticketing robots."
"First of all, you must register with the Taylor Swift tix portal using your Ticketmaster account and select a city where you may attend concerts."
"Can't we wait until the weekend to see more about Taylor Swift?"



Number  280
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Here's a look at what Weinstein's accusers are saying on social media.”
“I am proud of and grateful to you all.”
“@rosemcgowan on seeing Harvey Weinstein turn himself into police to face criminal sexual assault charges: "I have a visceral need for him to have handcuffs on."”
“...https://t.co/jjWWJiPCPa pic.twitter.com/UNBWUDfKya — Good Morning America (@GMA) May 25, 2018We got you, Harvey Weinstein, we got you — rose mcgowan (@rosemcgowan) May 25, 2018Today Harvey Weinstein will take his first step on his inevitable descent to hell.”
“We, the women, finally have real hope for justice.”
“...https://t.co/or8qGaNO93 — Asia Argento (@AsiaArgento) May 25, 2018without justice courage is weak.... may justice prevail  — Daryl Hannah (@dhlovelife) May 25, 2018Anyone know where I can get front row seats?!”
“...https://t.co/L3zFjzWdUw — Annabella Sciorra (@AnnabellSciorra) May 24, 2018It’s about time: Harvey Weinstein turned himself in this morning and is in police custody.”
“Today, instead of focusing on him, I will be celebrating all of the powerful women out there.”
“This is just the beginning — Heather Graham (@imheathergraham) May 25, 2018Sending love to all my sisters today who stood up against a monster... so many emotions...”
“Mira Sorvino MiraSorvino May 25 2018 It s been a long time coming and today my fellow victims and I rejoice and pray no one ever underestimates the power of women when we stand together scream the truth WeSpoke MeToo TimesUp LockHimUp https t co eECuU2YEX1 Lauren Sivan LaurenSivan May...”


"Let's take a look at what Weinstein's accuser said on social media."
"I'm proud and grateful for all of you."
"@ Ross McGovern, seeing Harvey Weinstein turn into a policeman and face criminal sexual assault charges, said:" deep down I need him to be handcuffed
“... https://t.co/jjWWJiPCPapic.twitter.com/UNBWUDfKya- Good morning, USA (@ GMA) May 25, 2018, we got you, Harvey Weinstein, we got you - Rose McGowan (@ rosemagowan) May 25, 2018, today Harvey Weinstein will take his inevitable first step to hell. "
"We women finally have real hope for justice."
“... https://t.co/or8q93-Asia  Argento (@ Asia Argento) May 25, 2018 courage without justice is weak.... May justice win - Daryl Hannah (@ dhlovelife) May 25, 2018 does anyone know where I can sit in the front row? "
"... website: https://t.co/L3zFjzWdUw- Annabelle scurra (@ Annabelle Sciorra) May 24, 2018 is the time: Harvey Weinstein surrendered this morning and is currently in police custody. "
"Today, instead of focusing on him, I want to celebrate all the powerful women."
"This is just the beginning - Heather Graham (@ imheathergraham) sent love to all my sisters who stand up against the monster today on May 25, 2018... So many emotions... "
"Mira Sorvino May 25, 2018, it's a long time coming. Today, my fellow victims and I are happy and pray that when we stand together and scream the truth, no one underestimates the power of women. Wespoke metoo timesup lockhimup HTTPS t Co eecu2yex1 Lauren Sivan Lauren Sivan may..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week, a group of people found out on reddit that Gamestop's share price had soared, leading to the ban of a multi billion dollar hedge fund. Read more, peloton's Cody Rigsby explains that his recent absence shows him
"The 24-year-old social star revealed in the latest podcast that he has invested about $50000 in Gamestop stock."
"Today, yellowfin tuna chews 200 hooks at the losunoso resort," Connor wrote in the photo
"Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman's 26 year old son recently shared a rare picture on instagram of him holding a big fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
“… Life... "
"A very famous actor and director in this industry gave me very bad advice, which helped me a lot, because I just read more about Tom Cruise's son, Connor, who posted his own rare photos on instagram. Connor Kidman cruise rarely saw him..."
"Now, the 36 year old actress and director is explaining the policy and revealing to the outside world what prompted her to adopt it in her film set."
“… There was no policy he violated... "
"A few hours ago, Haley Hyde read more and Olivia Wilde explained her ban policy on the set. As you may remember, Olivia Wilde fired Shiite rabov from the movie "don't worry, honey" last year, when there were several reports that she had a... "
"When Haley arrived at the restaurant, she was wearing a black mask and was safe."



**Something goes wrong**
“RELATED CONTENT:Shay Mitchell Posts Her 'Pretty Little Liars' Audition Tape and Shares How She Got the Role'Pretty Little Liars' Stars Ashley Benson and Shay Mitchell Reunite For Girls NightShay Mitchell Says She's 'Never' Weighed Herself...”
“Watch below:See more on Mitchell in the video below.”
““While I wasn’t intending on sharing this video with anybody, I thought, ‘Why the heck not?’” she continued.”
““I can’t tell you how much this means to me to have you guys coming along since when I first started the channel is was uncharted territories and now it’s just a learning experience every single week,” Mitchell said of her big YouTube milestone before stripping down.”
“Mitchell did just that, as her assistant, Sammy filmed her running topless down Sunset Boulevard.”
“In a video titled, "I Ran Naked Through the Streets of LA!"”
“The former Pretty Little Liars star celebrated three million YouTube subscribers by running nearly naked through Hollywood -- and documented the whole thing in a video for her followers.”
“Shay Mitchell had a very special way of thanking her fans for subscribing to her YouTube channel.”


"Related content: Sheffield Mitchell posted her 'beautiful little liar' audition tape and shared how she got the 'beautiful little liar' star Ashley Benson and Sheffield Mitchell reunited girl night. Sheffield Mitchell said she 'never' weighed herself
"Look at the picture below: more on Mitchell's video."
"Although I'm not going to share this video with anyone, I thought, 'why not? "She continued
"I can't tell you what your presence meant to me since I first started this channel, because it's an unknown field, and now it's just a learning experience every week," Mitchell said of her important milestone on YouTube
"That's what Mitchell did. As her assistant, Sammy took pictures of her running naked along Sunset Boulevard."
In a video called "I streaked to the streets of Los Angeles"
"The former pretty little cheater star celebrated 3 million YouTube users in Hollywood streaking and recorded the whole thing for her fans in a video."
"In a very special way, she thanks her fans for subscribing to her YouTube channel."



**Something goes wrong**
“With a West Side Story remake and another Indiana Jones in the works, might he leap over another box office hurdle?”
“In the past year alone, Spielberg took a quick detour from post-production on Ready Player One to direct a little Oscar contender you might know as The Post, and there’s plenty more on the director’s docket in the months ahead.”
“: The Extra-Terrestrial comes in third with $717 million.”
“Indiana Jones and the Kingdom of the Crystal Skull (despite the many skeptics it garnered) comes in second with $786.6 million, and E.T.”
“The original Jurassic Park is still Spielberg’s biggest commercial success with $983.8 million (not adjusted for inflation).”
“The helmer of The Lord of the Rings and The Hobbit films has a lifetime total of approximately $6,502.7 billion, followed by Transformers‘ Michael Bay ($6.451 billion), Avatar‘s James Cameron ($6.139 billion), and Harry Potter‘s David Yates ($5.347 billion).”
“Peter Jackson is about $3 billion behind that milestone.”
“Often hailed as the most commercially successful filmmaker, the visionary’s body of work — which includes Jaws, Jurassic Park, and Indiana Jones — has now collectively crossed $10 billion at the worldwide box office, according to Box Office Mojo, making Spielberg the first director to do so.”
“Ready Player One type MovieReady Player One has grossed an estimated $114.9 million in the U.S. with a global total of $475.1 million after three weeks in theaters, but even more impressive is what this means for director Steven Spielberg.”


"With the remake of west side story and the release of another Indiana Jones, can he overcome another box office hurdle?"
"In the past year alone, Spielberg made a quick detour from the post production of" ready player one "and directed the post, a small Oscar contender you may know. In the next few months, there are still a lot of pending issues for the director."
": alien life ranked third with $717 million."
"Indiana Jones and the Crystal Skull Kingdom (though a lot of people are skeptical about it) ranked second with $786.6 million, E.T."
"The original Jurassic Park is still Spielberg's biggest commercial success, worth $983.8 million (inflation not taken into account),"
"The Lord of the rings" and "the Hobbit" grossed about $6502.7 billion, followed by Michael Bay of "Transformers" ($6.451 billion), "Avatar" ($6.139 billion) and "Harry Potter" ($5.347 billion)
"Peter Jackson is about three billion dollars behind this milestone."
"Often hailed as the most successful filmmaker in business, this visionary director's works - including great white shark, Jurassic Park and Indiana Jones - have now grossed more than $10 billion worldwide, making Spielberg the first director to do so, according to box office magic."
"The box office of ready player one type movierready player one is estimated to be $114.9 million in the United States, reaching $475.1 million in the world three weeks after its release in cinemas, but what's more impressive is what it means to director Steven Spielberg."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know what you think in the comment section below, or on our Facebook page!”
“Or did you think Nicole Kidman looked better before she had all that surgery?”
“Did you recognise those child stars from the 60s, 70s and 80s?”
“We want to hear from you!”
“From Renee Zellweger’s drastic transformation, to a fresh-faced, tattoo-free Angelina Jolie, and a pre-instagram Kim Kardashian – these celebrities are unrecognisable from their younger selves in these throwback celebrity pictures!”
“Take a look at these throwback celebrity pictures of our favourite stars before a stylist got their hands on them!”
“But some of these snaps are pictures the celebrities now would really rather forget!”
“Some celebs never go out of style, and their throwback celebrity pictures prove that age really is just a number!”
“Whether they were child stars who have grown-up out of the limelight, or famous faces who weren’t always so glam, it’s always interesting to see what becomes of A-list Hollywood actresses, award-winning singers and famous TV stars – and where they came from!”
“We love looking back at some of these throwback celebrity pictures!”


"Please tell us what you think in the comments section below or on our Facebook page!"
"Or do you think Nicole Kidman looks better before the operation?"
"Do you know the child stars of the 60s, 70s and 80s?"
"We want to hear from you!"
"From the dramatic transformation of Renee Zellweger to Angelina Jolie without tattoos, to Kim Kardashian before instagram, these celebrities are unrecognizable from their young selves in these retro celebrity photos!"
"Before the stylists do it, take a look at these retro celebrity photos of our favorite stars!"
"But some of the photos celebrities really want to forget now!"
"Some celebrities will never be out of date, and their retro celebrity photos prove that age is really just a number!"
"Whether they're child stars growing up in the spotlight or not always so glamorous, it's always interesting to see the future of Hollywood first-line actresses, award-winning singers and famous TV stars - where they come from!"
"We like to look back at these retro photos of celebrities!"



**Something goes wrong**
“The Thin Blue LineTY: I watched The Thin Blue Line in film school and thought about it for years.”
“That really helped us figure out our structure for Peter and Sam to do some sleuthing of their own.”
“And I just think, ‘How could this guy do that?’” In that moment she’s telling the audience, “I have this bias.”
“There’s a great moment where she’s talking about Adnan and she says, “I look into his eyes and they’re like, big baby owl’s eyes.”
“The way that Sarah Koenig was this unreliable narrator.”
“SerialTY: Our biggest reference is Serial.”
“The cadaver letter was revealed to the guy on camera, so if you wanted an element of someone being surprised by a new piece of evidence, it helps to have somebody like Sam who would be experiencing this for the first time on-camera.”
“To have someone like Sam, who Peter shows all this evidence like the ball hairs to, that was very Jinx-like.”
“Obviously, by the time he’s editing and recording voice-over for that episode, he’s already come to these discoveries.”
“Dan Perrault: It wouldn’t make sense if our main documentarian narrator is discovering things in the midst of voice-over.”


"Thin blue line: I watched" thin blue line "in film school and thought about it for many years."
"It really helps us to understand the structure of Peter and Sam as detectives themselves."
"I thought," how can this guy do this? At that moment, she told the audience, "I have this bias."
"There was a great moment when she talked about Adnan, and she said," I look into his eyes and they're like, big owl eyes baby. "
"Sarah Konig is an unreliable narrator."
"Serialization: our biggest reference is serialization."
"The body letter was revealed to the person under the camera, so if you want to surprise a person with a new piece of evidence, it's helpful for someone like Sam to appear under the camera for the first time."
"It's bad luck to have a man like Sam, and Peter showed him all this evidence."
"Obviously, when he edited and recorded that episode, he had these findings."
"Dan Perrault: if our main documentary narrator finds something in the dubbing, it doesn't make sense."



**Something goes wrong**
“The Bridget Jones star told the Guardian in 2012 that fatherhood has made him “feel like a better person.”’For the latest celebrity news and interviews subscribe to our new podcast ‘In Case You Missed Us’ below!”
“In a cinematic twist, Hong and Eberstein were pregnant with their sons at the same time.”
“The 57-year-old actor’s partner Anna Eberstein gave birth to their third child last week.”
“Though the British dad has his hands full there’s a good chance he may make time for a stern chat with his ex-girlfriend Elizabeth Hurley.”
“She’s the one who broke the news!”
“While promoting her show The Royals, Hurley, 52, let it slip that he had welcomed baby No.”
“5.”
““I’m very lucky that 31 years into our friendship, he’s still my best friend in the whole.”
“He’s really a great guy,” she told E!”
“...on Tuesday, March 6.”


The Bridget Jones star told the guardian in 2012 that being a father made him "feel like a better person." "For the latest celebrity news and interviews, please subscribe to our new podcast 'in case you miss us'!"
In the movie, Hong Huang and eberstein are pregnant with their son at the same time
"Anna eberstein, the 57 year old actor's partner, gave birth to their third child last week."
"Although the British father is very busy, it is likely that he will find time to have a stern conversation with his ex girlfriend, Elizabeth Hurley."
"She let out the news!"
Hurley, 52, inadvertently revealed her welcome to the "no" baby while promoting her show the royal family
“5.”
"I'm very lucky that we've been friends for 31 years and he's still my best friend."
"He's really a great person," she told e! "
“…… Tuesday, March 6. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Christian Schertz said the report was ‘an inadmissible reporting of suspicions in the area of privacy’.”
“Ronaldo posted video telling his followers allegations are 'fake news' and he was a 'happy man'Rather than go through the trauma of a court case she decided to reach an out of court settlement with Ronaldo.”
“Georgina Rodríguez wrote on Instagram that the Juventus and Portugal star was always able to ‘transform the obstacles’ that were put in his path in a message signed off by five heart emojis.”
“She also wrote ‘I love you’ as she posed wearing a mini skirt and black high heels looking at the camera with a raised left eyebrow.”
“Miss Rodriguez posted the picture after an astonishing report in German magazine Der Spiegel alleged Ronaldo had raped Kathryn Mayorga and paid her £287,000 hush money.”
“Cristiano Ronaldo’s girlfriend Georgina Rodriguez has issued a statement in support of himGeorgina Rodriguez's Instagram post in support of her boyfriend, Cristiano RonaldoThe sum was the equivalent of just a week’s wages from Real Madrid, where he was playing at the time.”
“In an Instagram video a relaxed Ronaldo said the reports were ‘fake news’ and suggested Miss Mayorga was trying to make herself famous by associating herself with him.”
“In her Instagram post Miss Rodriguez, a 23-year-old Spaniard, said to Ronaldo: ‘You always transform the obstacles that are put in your way into impulse and strength to show how great you are.”
“‘Thank you for making us enjoy each game.”
“Always more and better.”


"Christian schertz said the report was" an unacceptable report of suspicion in the privacy field. "
"Ronaldo released a video telling his followers that the charges were" false news "and that he was a" happy man "rather than suffering from a court case. She decided to reach an out of court settlement with Ronaldo."
"Georgina Rodriguez wrote on instagram that the Bianconeri and Portuguese star can always" change "obstacles in a message signed by five heart symbols
"Wearing a miniskirt and black high heels, she raised her left eyebrow, looked at the camera and posed, and wrote" I love you. "
"Before MS Rodriguez released this picture, Der Spiegel magazine published an astonishing report accusing Ronaldo of raping Katherine mayoga and paying her 287000 for sealing."
"Cristiano Ronaldo's girlfriend, Georgina Rodriguez, issued a statement supporting his instagram post and her boyfriend Cristiano ronaldoth. The money was only equivalent to a week's salary for Real Madrid, where he was playing
"In an instagram video, a relaxed Ronaldo said the reports were 'fake news' and suggested that miss Mayorga was trying to be famous by associating with him."
"On instagram, the 23-year-old Spaniard, Miss Rodriguez, told Ronaldo: 'you always turn obstacles that hinder your progress into impulses and strength to show how great you are
"Thank you for letting us enjoy every game."
"It's always getting better and better."



**Something goes wrong**
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



**Something goes wrong**
“While Prince George's mom attended the gala on Tuesday evening alone, the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge reportedly attended a charity lunch function at Berry Bros. & Rudd earlier in the day.”
“...to child mental health issues and the important work that the Anna Freud Centre is doing in this space Last week Kate hosted a secret meeting to discuss maternal mental health...”
“The Duchess showed off a hint of her growing baby bump at the gala dinner on November 7 Photo Frank Augstein WPA Pool Getty Images GALLERY THE ROYAL PIECES KATE HAS BORROWED FROM THE QUEEN Kensington Palace noted that Prince William s wife has a continued desire to draw attention...”
“During the reception, Kate met with key supporters of the charity as well as families who benefit from it.”
“The Anna Freud National Centre for Children and Families, of which the Duchess is patron, campaigns for a step change in children’s mental health and believes in the importance of early intervention.”
“...conversed with guests in the Orangery at Kensington Palace...”
“Kate is pregnant with her and Prince William s third child Photo Frank Augstein WPA Pool Getty Images PHOTOS ALL THE TIMES THE DUCHESS OF CAMBRIDGE HAS REWORN LOOKS Kate who recently returned to her royal duties after battling severe morning sickness appeared to be in great spirits as she...”
“The mom-of-two accessorized her look with a Prada clutch, a pair of Queen Elizabeth’s earrings, a diamond cuff bracelet and a patriotic Remembrance Poppy.”
“Kate, 35, completed her elegant ensemble on November 7 by styling her glossy locks down in loose waves.”
“Prince Harry’s girlfriend Meghan Markle owns a shorter, navy version of the Duchess’ DVF gown.”


While Prince George's mother was alone at the celebration on Tuesday night, the Duchess of Cambridge were reported to have attended a charity lunch at the berry brothers and Kevin Rudd earlier in the day
“…… With regard to children's mental health and the important work done by the Anna Freud center in this field last week, Kate hosted a secret meeting to discuss the mental health of mothers.... "
"At the celebration on November 7th, the Duchess showed signs of her growing baby lump. The photo is from Frank ogestan WPA Chi Getty photo gallery. Kate's Royal work borrowed from Queen Kensington Palace points out that Prince William's wife has always been eager to attract people's attention.... "
"At the reception, Kate met with the main supporters of the charity and the families who benefited from it."
Anna Freud's National Center for children and families (the Duchess is the patron of the center) advocates gradual change in children's mental health and believes in the importance of early intervention
“… Talking to guests in the orange garden at Kensington Palace... "
"Kate is pregnant with a picture of her third child with Prince William Frank ogestan WPA Chi Getty the Duchess of Cambridge has been reshaping her face. Kate recently returned to the royal family after struggling with severe morning sickness. She looks energetic because she..."
"The mother of two decorated her look with a Prada bag, a pair of Queen Elizabeth earrings, a diamond cuff bracelet and a patriotic poppy."
On November 7, Kate, 35, finished her elegant overall look with her smooth hair wavy
"Prince Harry's girlfriend Megan markel has a shorter Navy Duchess DVF dress."



**Something goes wrong**
“...that there is more to feeling confident beauty and happy on the inside than just a price tag...”
“I want to be in like a superstar gown … So the designer got a lot of press.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The star faults her stylist for putting her in an affordable dress, saying 'I want to be in a superstar gown'Taryn Manning made headlines Sunday for donning a SAG Awards dress that was only $200 – and available at your favorite department store.”
“But while many were thrilled to see an affordable dress at a major Hollywood awards show, one person wasn’t as happy about it: the Orange Is the New Black star herself.”
“Asked by TMZ about the choice to wear the Adrianna Papell gown, Manning criticized her stylist Chaunielle Brown for the choice.”
““It’s wack that my stylist didn’t tell me that,” she said.”
““Now everyone else can afford it, that’s what’s cool about it, but it still sucks for me.”
“She should pay me a lot of money.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“...caught off guard when all of the press about my dress was about the cost which I knew nothing about and I felt used for someone else s gain She added that she loved the dress and is friends with Brown and concluded I am happy to be the proof...”


“…… Inner confidence, beauty and happiness are not just price tags... "
"I want to dress like a superstar dress So designers get a lot of media attention. "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The star accused her stylist of making her wear an affordable dress, saying 'I want to wear a superstar dress'," said Taryn Manning, who made headlines on Sunday for wearing a $200 sag awards dress, which is on sale at your favorite department store
"But when a lot of people see a cheap dress at a big Hollywood Awards ceremony, one person is not so happy: Orange itself is the new black star."
When asked by TMZ about her choice to wear Adrianna papell dress, Manning criticized her stylist chaunielle Brown's choice
"It's strange that my hairdresser didn't tell me," she said
"Now that everyone else can afford it, it's cool, but it's still bad for me."
"She should have paid me a lot of money." Get news, feature, etc
“…… When all the media about my skirt were talking about the cost that I knew nothing about, and I felt used by others, she suddenly added that she liked the skirt and was Brown's friend, and concluded that I was happy to be the evidence... "



Number  291
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Black Panther’s Chadwick Boseman isn’t the first superhero to be annoyed with fameMORE : Don’t ask Chadwick Boseman to do the Wakanda Forever sign any more...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“Set in Africa, the film’s soundtrack even features African American artists, including Sza and the lyrical wonderman Kendrick Lamar.”
“But for Chadwick Boseman, the success of the film didn’t register until he started promoting the film across the world.”
“In an extensive interview with Esquire, the actor admitted that he initially hadn’t been sure how the world was going to receive the film.”
“‘We premiered the movie in Korea, in London, after the LA premiere, we started to see how the world was going to receive it.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘We knew that a lot of black people were excited about the movie.”
“But I think when we started to see the response overseas, that’s when I started to go, ‘Oh, wow, this is a big deal’.”
“Legendary director Quentin Tarantino gushed about the film, saying it was the ‘kind of movie the whole world was waiting to see’.”
“Black Panther is seen as a phenomenon – a cultural benchmark – and it became the highest grossing superhero ever in the US.”


"More: the Panther's Chadwick Bosman is not the first superhero to be annoyed by farmer: don't let Chadwick Bosman be the vakanda symbol forever..."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
The film is set in Africa, with African American artists including Sasha and lyric Kendrick Lamar on the soundtrack
"But for Chadwick Bosman, it wasn't until he started promoting the film around the world that it was a success."
In an extensive interview with the gentleman, the actor admitted that he was not sure at first how the world would accept the film
"We premiered the film in Korea and London, and after it premiered in Los Angeles, we began to understand how the world would accept it."
"We know a lot of black people are excited about this movie."
"But I think when we started to see overseas reactions, I started to say," Oh, wow, this is a big deal. "
Legendary director Quentin Tarantino talked endlessly about the film, saying it was "a movie the world is waiting to see."
"The Panther is seen as a phenomenon - a cultural benchmark - it's the highest box office superhero of all time in the United States."



Number  292
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I was a little spoiled on the last one I was a part of," Paul said.”
“"I wasn't interested in jumping into another show just yet.”
“He almost turned it down.”
“As for his current role?”
“After Breaking Bad ended, Paul also acted in movies like Triple 9 and Eye in the Sky.”
“"If you have any sort of doubt, you’re a nonbeliever, and are considered weak and thrown out to the curb by the ones you love," Paul told USA TODAY last year.”
“Paul currently stars in Hulu series The Path, in which he plays a cult member struggling with faith.”
“The couple wed in 2013.”
“Lauren Paul also got in on the Instagram fun, sharing her own post that featured an ultrasound of their little one.”
“Just thought it was time I would share this beautiful news with all of you."”


Paul said: "the last time I played, I was a little spoiled."
"I'm not interested in jumping to another program yet."
"He almost refused."
"As for his present role?"
"After bad endings, Paul also appeared in films like March 9 and the eye of heaven."
Paul told USA today last year: "if you have any doubts, you are a non believer, a weak person who is regarded by the people you love and left on the side of the road."
Paul is currently in the Hulu movie series "the road," in which he plays a member of a cult fighting against faith
"The couple got married in 2013."
"Lauren Paul joined instagram and shared her own post, including an ultrasound photo of their baby."
"I think it's time to share the good news with you."



**Something goes wrong**
“RELATED VIDEO: Taylor Swift Surprises Fans At Target Store To Buy Her New Album...”
“[Your] mum told me..”Swift told Stephanie she was going to give her money for her concert ticket but ended up helping “us buy a home and all I needed for my baby,” she continued.”
“But you didn’t.”
“You could have reached out and I would have helped you.”
“Image zoom Credit: The Swift Life“After the show Taylor took us back to her dressing room where she told me, ‘Stephanie, You’ve been in my life for a long time and you’ve never asked me for anything.”
“To add to the stress, during this time [my partner] Matthew lost his job.”While attending Swift’s concert in Manchester, Stephanie says her mother filled in the “End Game” singer about her daughter’s difficult situation and simply asked the star to make her “feel special” that night.”
““What many of you don’t know is that for eight months of my pregnancy I was homeless.”Image zoom Stephanie and Taylor Swift | Credit: The Swift Life“Long story short our first flat was condemned for health and safety reasons and we lost everything.”
““I’ve finally decided to tell you all what Taylor did for me this night,” wrote Stephanie, who accompanied her post with photos of herself backstage with Swift, 28, at her 1989 tour, her house and baby girl.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Sharing her story on the Grammy winner’s new The Swift Life app, the fan named Stephanie prefaced her post by saying she had contemplated whether or not to post about her experience.”


"Related video: Taylor Swift surprised fans in the target store to buy her new album..."
"Mom told me..." Swift told Stephanie that she would pay for tickets to the concert, but in the end she helped "buy us a house and everything my child needed," she continued
"But you didn't."
"You could have helped, and I'll help you."
After the show "zoom credit: a quick life," Tyler took us back to her dressing room and told me, "Stephanie, you've been in my life for a long time and you've never asked me for anything."
Stephanie said her mother told the "end" singer about her daughter's difficult situation when she was in Manchester for her concert in Swift and simply asked the star to make her "feel special" that night
"What many of you don't know is that during my eight months of pregnancy, I was homeless." Image zooming Stephanie and Taylor Swift | credit: Swift's life "to make a long story short, our first apartment was condemned for health and safety reasons, and we lost everything
"I've finally decided to tell you what Taylor did for me tonight," Stephanie wrote, adding to her post photos of herself backstage on a 1989 tour with swift, 28, her house and baby girl
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The fan, Stephanie, who shared the story of the Grammy winner's new" quick life "app, said before posting that she had considered whether to publish her experience."



**Something goes wrong**
“The blond beauty's killer curves are seriously on point as she strikes a smouldering star towards the camera.”
“...star's famous booty is on full display as she covers her breasts with one arm.”
“The E!”
“Caption: Kim Kardashian Wearing just her own body paint and a pair of flesh coloured underwearPhoto Credit: dailymail.coOne steamy snapshot shows Kim naked lying on the ground covered in gold glitter.”
“Scroll to see everything that went on behind-the-scenes, and make sure to shop Ultralight.”
“For my campaign, shot by Marcelo Cantu, Ariel Tejada did my glam and Chris Appleton did my sleek hair.”
“The loose powders can be used as an eyeshadow or as a highlighter—anywhere you need a little extra sparkle.”
“"The collection consists of five lip glosses and five loose powders in the shades Copper, Bronze, Rose Gold, Iridescent and Yellow Gold.”
“Kim wrote on her official app.”
“"I'm so excited about my Ultralight Beams Collection for KKW Beauty!"”


"Blonde's killer curve is a serious point as she hits a smoldering star on the camera."
“… The famous booty of the star is fully displayed because she covers her breast with one arm. "
"That guy!"
"Caption: Kim Kardashian is wearing only her body paint and a pair of flesh colored underwear. Photo: Daily Mail. Coone this steaming snapshot shows Kim Jong Il lying naked on the ground, all covered in gold
"Scroll through what's going on behind the scenes and make sure you buy ultralight."
"In Marcelo canto's my campaign, Ariel Tejada took a dazzling picture of me and Chris Appleton made my hair smooth."
"Loose powder can be used as an eye shadow or as a lighter. You need extra sparks."
"The collection includes five lip gloss and five loose powders in copper, copper, rose gold, rainbow gold and gold."
"Kim wrote on her official app."
"I'm very excited about my super beam series for kkw beauty!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Two months into shooting, he’s acting out of his rom-com leading man comfort zone — and couldn’t be more thrilled, calling the set “sublime.””
“(The 2017 iteration takes place in Lewiston, Maine, from Oct.”
“At least, in Cigna‘s new TV Doctors of America ad campaign promoting preventative care and yearly check-ups to monitor blood pressure, cholesterol, blood sugar and body mass index.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kate’s fun, and her comic timing is amazing,” Dempsey, who left Grey’s fans heartbroken when his charismatic neurosurgeon died in a car crash in season 11, tells PEOPLE of reuniting with the actress.”
“We were always playful on set anyway and then we would get serious but this was fun just to be playful and to make each other laugh Image zoom Credit Vivian Zink ABC via Getty Despite the spot s cheeky tone it conveys an important message about taking control of...”
“...your own health something Dempsey passionately advocates...”
“In 2008, the actor opened the Patrick Dempsey Center for Cancer Hope & Healing in Maine, offering a holistic approach to cancer education and support for those battling the disease and their families.”
“The center is dedicated to his mother, Amanda, who died in 2014 after a long battle with ovarian cancer.”
“Every year, he organizes the Dempsey Challenge, a cycling, running and walking fundraising event.”


"Two months after shooting, he showed the comfort zone of his romcom hero - it's exciting. He called the film" sublime. "
"(the 2017 iteration starts October 1 in Lewiston, Maine."
"At least, in the new" American doctor "TV advertising campaign launched by SINOSURE, we will promote preventive care and annual physical examination to monitor blood pressure, cholesterol, blood sugar and body mass index."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Kate is funny, and her timing for comedy is great," Dempsey told people, saddening Gray's fans when he died in a car accident in Season 11
"Anyway, we always have a good time on the set, and then we get serious, but it's fun, just having a good time, making each other laugh." Vivian Zink ABC via Getty, despite the brazen tone of the scene, conveys an important message about control... "
“… Your own health, what Dempsey passionately advocates... "
In 2008, the actor opened the Patrick Dempsey cancer hope and treatment center in Maine, providing comprehensive cancer education and support to those fighting cancer and their families
"The center is dedicated to his mother Amanda, who died in 2014 after a long struggle with ovarian cancer."
"Every year, he organizes the Dempsey challenge, a fundraising event for cycling, running and walking."



**Something goes wrong**
“Our goal is to encourage husbands and wives to have strong marriages, brothers and sisters to be best friends, and for everyone to find true hope in trusting Jesus Christ!”
“We have a special place in our hearts for families.”
“We have been blessed with 19 children (10 boys and 9 girls), our nephew Tyler, sons- and daughters-in-law, and new grandchildren arriving every year!”
“Fast-forward a few decades, and here we are!”
“It was then that we prayed and asked Him to give us as many children as He saw fit.”
“Through the sorrow of a heart-breaking miscarriage with our second child, we began to read in the Bible that children are a blessing and a gift from God (Psalm 127:1–5).”
“Jim Bob and I were married on July 21, 1984, three months after my high school graduation and three days after Jim Bob’s nineteenth birthday!”


"Our goal is to encourage husbands and wives to have a strong marriage, brothers and sisters to be best friends, and everyone to find real hope in believing in Jesus Christ!"
"We have a special place in our hearts for the family."
"We have 19 children (10 boys and 9 girls), our nephew Tyler, our son and daughter-in-law, and new grandchildren come here every year!"
"Fast forward for decades, here we are!"
"Just then, we prayed and asked him to give us as many children as he thought fit."
"We begin to read in the Bible that children are God's blessings and gifts (Psalm 127:1-5) with the grief of the second child's abortion."
"Jim Bob and I got married on July 21, 1984, three months after I graduated from high school, three days after Jim Bob's 19th birthday!"



**Something goes wrong**
“...her sophomore album Waves last October previously opened up to PEOPLE about how her husband helped inspire her song Collide...”
“I haven t even met yet is going to be my biggest teacher in the world and I cannot wait to learn Image zoom Rachel Platten Credit Neilson Barnard Getty RELATED VIDEO Rachel Platten Opens Up About the Emotional Stories She Receives from Her Fans The Wildfire singer who released...”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“"This is one of my most exciting announcements, but also one of my most vulnerable," singer Rachel Platten began her pregnancy reveal post on WednesdayRachel Platten is pregnant!”
“The “Fight Song” singer, 37, is expecting her first child with husband Kevin Lazan, she announced Wednesday on Instagram, sharing a bare baby-bump photo.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““This is one of my most exciting announcements, but also one of my most vulnerable.”
“So here goes….”
“I am pregnant!”
“!” Platten began in her caption.”


“… Before her sophomore album waves last October, she revealed to people how her husband helped inspire her song "Collete..."
"I haven't even met her, she's going to be my biggest teacher in the world, and I can't wait to learn about image zooming Rachael praten credit Nelson Barnard Getty Related videos Rachael praten opened up the emotional stories she received from her fans wildfire singer who released..."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"This is one of my most exciting announcements, and one of my most vulnerable," singer Rachel praten started her pregnancy revealing post on Wednesday. Rachel praten is pregnant
The 37 year old "fight song" singer announced on instagram on Wednesday that she will have her first child with her husband, Kevin lazan, and share a photo of a naked baby
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"This is one of my most exciting announcements, and one of my most vulnerable."
"OK..."
"I'm pregnant!"
"!" praten starts in her title. "



Number  298
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She told TMZ the show caused “too much stress — unneeded stress.””
“Image zoom Credit: Moses Robinson/BravoReal Housewives of AtlantareunionLeakes called Zolciak-Biermann “racist” and claimed she and her daughter Brielle “don’t like black people.”The Instagram post also comes just days after Zolciak-Biermann said she would “never, never” return to the Bravo series.”
“After a tense confrontation between the longtime rivals on Sunday’s Real Housewives of Atlanta reunion show, the Don’t Be Tardy star, 39, issued an unexpected apology on social media.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I am so sorry for what has happened,” she wrote on Instagram.”
“We both know the truth we both know that if I wanted to I could have a law suit for the lies you have spewed tweeting out fake texts implying I am racist attacking me physically claiming my daughter tweeted negative about you and your home we both know these...”
“...are lies Zolciak Biermann vowed to no longer interact with Leakes online...”
““I have reacted to it publicly and for that I am sorry.”
“I should have risen above it,” she continued.”
““I personally will no longer engage with you on social media and perpetuate the hate.”


She told TMZ that the show created "too much pressure - unnecessary pressure."
Image zooming credit: Moses Robinson / brawarrell housewife of Atlantis calls zorchak Bilman a "racist" and claims that she and her daughter Blair "don't like blacks.". Instagram also posted a few days after zorchak Bilman said she would return to Bravo "forever, forever."
"The 39 year old star made a surprise apology on social media after a tense confrontation with longtime rivals on Sunday's Atlanta Real Housewives reunion show
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'm very sorry about what happened," she wrote on instagram
"We all know the truth, we all know that if I want to, I can sue you for the lies you told on twitter, you tweeted, implied that I was racist, attacked my body, claimed that my daughter tweeted negative comments on you and your home, we all know that..."
“… Zorchak Bilman vowed not to interact with Alex online any more... "
"I have responded publicly to this and I am sorry for that."
"I should have stood up," she continued
"I will no longer personally contact you on social media and perpetuate my hatred."



**Something goes wrong**
“...that she s not Wendy from the hamburger commercials...”
“But the point is when you come up to any of us and say I love you in Arrival it hurts because we weren t in Arrival Fisher concluded the PSA by stating We have totally different names hence we are totally different people She also wanted to remind everyone...”
“When visiting Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...on Thursday, Isla Fisher talked about how fans constantly confuse her with actress Amy Adams.”
“Fisher admitted that she usually tries to correct people, but that she sometimes goes along with the assumption.”
“For instance, she almost got caught in a lie at the Vanity Fair Oscars afterparty.”
“"The crowd parted and there was Lady Gaga and she’s heading right toward me and she says, ‘Thank you.”
“Your performance in American Hustle, Amy….’” The actress is a big fan of the singer and didn’t want to tell her the truth, so she went along with her presumed identity as Amy Adams.”
““So I just gracefully thanked her and bowed my head.” As she continued to fall deeper into the lie, her true identity was almost exposed.”
““I look over her shoulder and there’s Amy Adams walking into the party.” She quickly created a diversion by pointing to Adams and saying, “There’s Isla Fisher.”


“… She's not Wendy in the hamburger ad. "
"But the point is, when you come up to any of us and say I love you, it hurts because we didn't arrive," Fisher said at the end of the PSA. "We have totally different names, so we are totally different people, and she also wanted to remind you that..."
"Visiting Jimmy Kimmel at the scene!"
“…… On Thursday, Isla Fisher said fans always confuse her with actress Amy Adams
Fisher admits that she usually tries to correct people's mistakes, but she sometimes agrees with that assumption
"For example, she was almost cheated at the vanity fair Oscars."
"The crowd broke up, and there was Lady Gaga, who was coming up to me, and she said," thank you. "
"Your performance in the sound of America, Amy..." The actress is a big fan of the singer and doesn't want to tell her the truth, so she agrees that she is considered Amy Adams
"So I just graciously thank her and bow my head." As she continued to lie, her true identity was almost revealed
"I looked back and Amy Adams walked into the party." She pointed to Adams and said, "that's Ella Fisher."



**Something goes wrong**
“A wide range of musical guests will join him onstage, including Chance the Rapper and Lauryn Hill.”
“And I’m going to give him a chance, and we, the historically disenfranchised, demand that he give us one too.”Chappelle is performing at Radio City Music Hall for much of August.”
“It made me feel hopeful and it made me feel proud to be an American and it made me very happy about the prospects of our country.”“In that spirit,” he continued, “I’m wishing Donald Trump luck.”
““These people who had been historically disenfranchised.”
““I saw how happy everybody was,” he recalled.”
“The comedian remembered attending a White House party – where the majority of the revelers were black – during the final weeks of President Obama’s tenure.”
“He’s like a bad DJ at a good party.”Last November, just days after Trump’s election win, Chappelle delivered a remarkable opening monologue on Saturday Night Live.”
““He’s a polarizing dude.”
““I think [Trump]’s gonna make a more informed and better voter,” Chappelle said.”
“And I didn’t even realize how ethics were necessarily supposed to work at that level of government, and he’s putting all this stuff on the forefront.”


"A lot of music guests will come on stage with him, including rappers chance and Lauryn hill."
"I want to give him a chance, and we, who have been deprived of rights in history, ask him to give us a chance as well." Chappelle performed at the Radio City Concert Hall most of August
"It makes me hopeful, it makes me proud to be an American, and it makes me very happy about the future of our country." "In that spirit," he went on, "I wish donald trump the best of luck."
"These people have historically been deprived of the right to vote."
"I saw everyone happy," he recalled
"The comedian remembers that in the last weeks of Obama's presidency, he attended a white house party where most of the revelers were black."
"He's like a bad DJ for a good party." Last November, just a few days after trump won the election, Chappelle delivered a wonderful opening monologue live on Saturday night
"He's a polarized guy."
"I think [trump] will be a better informed and better voter," Chappelle said
"I didn't even realize how morality worked in that level of government, he put all these things at the top of the list."



**Something goes wrong**
“Be sure to check out the movie, in theaters on Wednesday, November 21.”
“Sylvester Stallone, Tessa Thompson, Phylicia Rashad, and more star.”
“Creed II is about going back to basics to rediscover what made you a champion in the first place, and remembering that, no matter where you go, you can’t escape your history.”
“Rocky Balboa is there by his side through it all and, together, Rocky and Adonis will confront their shared legacy, question what’s worth fighting for, and discover that nothing’s more important than family.”
“Facing an opponent with ties to his family’s past only intensifies his impending battle in the ring.”
“Between personal obligations and training for his next big fight, he is up against the challenge of his life.”
“Here’s a synopsis: Life has become a balancing act for Adonis Creed.”
“Michael B. Jordan is starring in the brand new, amazing trailer for Creed II, where he puts his hot shirtless body on display.”


Be sure to go to the cinema on Wednesday, November 21
"Sylvester Stallone, Tessa Thompson, Felicia Rashard, more stars."
"The second tenet is to return to the basics and rediscover what made you a champion. Remember, no matter where you go, you can't escape your own history."
"Rocky Balboa is with him all the way. Rocky and Adonis will face their common heritage together, question what is worth fighting for, and find that nothing is more important than family."
"Facing an opponent connected to his family's history will only intensify his upcoming fight in the ring."
"Between his personal obligations and the training of the next big game, he is facing the challenge of life."
"Here's a summary: life has become an act of balance in Adonis's Creed."
Michael Jordan is starring in a new and amazing trailer for creed 2, in which he shows his sexy shirtless body



Number  302
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His mother posted the remembrance below on Facebook.”
“Lopez also was a U.S. Army veteran.”
“His final film was 2017’s American Made, in which he played a CIA Station Chief opposite Tom Cruise.”
“His film work included Captain America: The Winter Soldier and Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles.”
“Lopez’s other TV credits included guest roles on CSI: Cyber and iCarly.”
“The show consisted of scripted and dramatized re-enactments in which actors “recreated” what were purported to be actual stories of car repossessions in LA’s San Fernando Valley.”
“Lopez appeared on the last two seasons of Operation Repo, which originally aired as a Spanish-language version on Telemundo and later crossed over to English language and moved to truTV in 2008.”
“Officers found Lopez unresponsive and he was pronounced dead at the scene shortly after 8 PM Sunday of a gunshot wound, coroner’s spokesman Ed Winter told Deadline.”
“Officers and paramedics were called to Lopez’s South Hope Street apartment Sunday night on a report of a possible suicide.”
“He was 35.”


"His mother posted the following memories on Facebook."
"Lopez is also an American veteran."
"His last film was made in America in 2017, in which he and Tom Cruise played a director of the CIA."
"His films include Captain America: soldiers in winter and Ninja Turtle
"Lopez's other TV shows include guest roles in crime scene investigation: Cyber and icari."
The play consists of a script and a dramatic replay, in which the actors "recreate" the true story of the recovery of the San Fernando Valley car in Los Angeles
"Lopez appeared in the last two seasons of operation repo, which was first broadcast in Spanish on telemundo, then switched to English and moved to truTV in 2008."
Coroner spokesman ed winter told reporters: "police found Lopez unresponsive, shortly after 8 p.m. on Sunday, Lopez was declared dead on the spot due to gunshot wounds."
"On Sunday night, police and medical staff received reports of possible suicide and rushed to the South Hope Street apartment in Lopez."
"He was 35."



**Something goes wrong**
“The tenor of that last episode was markedly more tense than during the duo’s four-year run, when they injected the show with new energy and relevance after the retirement of Regis Philbin.”
“The final show for Strahan fell on Friday the 13th, last May, and Ripa wore a black dress for the occasion.”
“Saying she had been blindsided, she took several unplanned days off from the show, returning after her fans rallied to show support.”
“Even though it was a move within the same Disney-ABC family, Strahan’s departure for GMA surprised fans and viewers – as well as Ripa herself.”
“In the interim, guest hosts have included Megyn Kelly, Fred Savage, Jerry O’Connell and Anderson Cooper and the show’s ratings have remained fairly steady.”
“Last December, Ripa said there had been an “outpouring of interest” from candidates, but emphasized there was no timetable to fill the seat.”
“Various names have popped up as potential successors to Strahan.”
“New York’s WABC later confirmed that an announcement will be made on tomorrow’s 9 a.m. show.”
“The tweet’s text reads, “We’re going to need a bigger mug.”Ripa appears to be ready to announce her co-host, ending a drama-filled year of going solo after former NFL star Michael Strahan left to join Good Morning America.”
““Tune in tomorrow, trust me,” she says in the clip (watch it below), sipping from a mug inscribed with her name and a large question mark.”


"The tone of the last episode is obviously more intense than that of the pair in the past four years. After Regis phelpin retired, they injected new vitality and relevance into the play."
Last Friday, May 13th, was Strahan's last performance. Ripa wore a black dress
"She said she was blindfolded and took a few days off unexpectedly after fans rallied to show their support."
"Even though it's a move within the same Disney ABC Family, Strahan's departure from GMA surprised fans and audiences, as well as Ripa himself."
"During this period, the guest hosts include Megan Kelly, Fred savage, Jerry O'Connell and Anderson Cooper, and the ratings of the program have remained quite stable."
"In December last year, Ripa said the candidate was" interested "in the position, but stressed that there was no timetable to fill it."
"All kinds of names suddenly appeared to be Strahan's potential successors."
"WABC in New York later confirmed that it would be announced on tomorrow's 9 a.m. program."
"The text on twitter says," we need a bigger cup. " Ripa seems ready to announce her co host, ending a dramatic year of solo career after former NFL star Michael Strahan left to join Good Morning America. "
"Trust me, listen tomorrow," she says in the video clip, sipping from a glass with her name and a big question mark on it



**Something goes wrong**
“Chris Pratt preceded her, while Neil Patrick Harris and Melissa McCarthy will appear Wednesday and Thursday, respectively.”
“Ross is the latest celeb to step in for Jimmy Kimmel while he takes the week off to spend time with his family as his seven month old son recovers from a successful heart surgery performed Monday morning...”
“It s kind of like a children s book for men that is going to make it really simple and bring it back to the basics Watch the clip above to hear Ross explain the basics of what men should not do to women in her book The Handsy Man...”
““Treating another human being with respect isn’t complicated, but it seems a bit confusing for a lot of men out there, so I wrote a book.”
““While I’m not totally surprised by these stories, it seems like quite a few men are,” Ross said.”
“Tuesday, the black-ish star spoke out against the myriad of harassment allegations finally coming to light in Hollywood.”
“Jimmy Kimmel Live Close Streaming OptionsFor those still unclear about sexual harassment, Tracee Ellis Ross has made it quite simple: “If she doesn’t consent — the answer is NO.”While subbing in as guest host of Jimmy Kimmel Live!”


"Before Chris Pratt, Neil Patrick Harris and Melissa McCarthy will appear on Wednesday and Thursday, respectively."
"Ross is the latest celebrity to replace Jimmy Kimmel. He took a week off to accompany his 7-month-old son to recover from a successful heart operation on Monday morning..."
"It's a little like a children's book for men. It will make it very simple, and let it go back to the basics. Watch the above clip, and listen to Ross explain the basics of what men shouldn't do to women in her book handsome guy..."
"It's not complicated to respect others, but it seems a bit confusing to a lot of people, so I wrote a book."
"While I'm not entirely surprised by these stories, there seem to be a lot of men who do," Rose said
On Tuesday, the black star publicly objected to numerous harassment charges that eventually came to light in Hollywood
"For those who don't know about sexual harassment, Tracee Ellis Ross put it very simply:" if she doesn't agree - the answer is no. " At the same time, she appeared as a guest host of the live broadcast of Jimmy Kimmel! "



**Something goes wrong**
“3Jessica Alba, Emma Roberts & More Celebs Who Love Rocking Birkenstock SandalsJessica Alba in Giuseppe Zanotti, Gwyneth Paltrow in Tom Ford & More From the Baby2Baby Gala...”
“Jessica Alba Reveals Gender of Baby No.”
“CREDIT: SplashWatch on FNWant more?”
“Rachel Zoe heads to Jessica Alba’s baby shower carrying a Chanel bag.”
“CREDIT: SplashCeleb guests at the tea-themed party included designer Rachel Zoe, who was spotted wearing a double-breasted blazer with matching trousers for the occasion, and model-actress Molly Sims.”
“The actress and Honest Company founder holds onto a Lady Dior bag.”
“Jessica Alba leaving her baby shower at Ladurée in Beverly Hills, Calif. CREDIT: SplashThe 36-year-old actress, who is already mom to daughters, Honor, 9, and Haven, 6, pulled the look together with bow-embellished headband, a Lady Dior hand bag and black ankle-strap platform pumps.”
“The Honest Company founder, who is expecting a baby boy with husband Cash Warren, stepped out for the occasion in a simple black dress featuring a full skirt and bow shoulder ties.”
“Jessica Alba gathered with friends at Ladurée in Beverly Hills, Calif. yesterday to celebrate her third pregnancy.”
“Jessica Alba celebrates her baby shower at Ladurée in Beverly Hills.”


"3 Jessica Alba, Emma Roberts and more celebrities who like to swing birkenstock sandals, Jessica Alba in Giuseppe Zanotti, Gwyneth Paltrow in Tom Ford and more from baby2baby Gala..."
"Jessica Alba did not disclose the gender of the child."
Credit: does splash watch want more? "
"Rachel Zoe takes her chanel bag to Jessica Alba's baby bathroom."
Credit: celebrities at the tea themed party include designer Rachel Zoe and model actress Molly Sims. Zoe was wearing a double breasted suit with matching trousers
"The actress and the honest founder of the company have a lady Dior bag in their hand."
"Jessica Alba left her baby bathroom in ladur é e, Beverly Hills, California. Photo source: the 36 year old actress is the mother of two daughters, and 9-year-old honor and 6-year-old haven combine the look with a bow decorated headband, a lady Dior handbag and a pair of black ankle strap platform pumps. "
The honest founder and husband, Cash Warren, are pregnant with a baby boy in a simple black dress with a full skirt and bow tie
"Jessica Alba and her friends gathered in radure, Beverly Hills, California, yesterday to celebrate her third pregnancy."
"Jessica Alba celebrates her baby bath in La Doure, Beverly Hills."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“In June, however, O'Donnell's rep told ET that the mother and daughter had reconnected, and just days later, ET learned that Chelsea had filed for separation from Alliegro.”
“Months after the 56-year-old actress' rep told ET that that the two had reconnected following their public spat, O'Donnell is ready to share more about their relationship.”
“While co-hosting Friday's episode of The Talk, O'Donnell revealed that her and Chelsea's tough times have brought them closer together.”
““I think with my relationship with my daughter, Chelsea, it really has [been tested] because we went through some really public troubled times and, you know, she’s doing better now and we’re both communicating with each other,” O’Donnell said.”
“But when somebody does something unforgivable to you and you can forgive them and they can forgive you there s a kind of grace that descends upon the both of you within that The former View co host and her daughter s feud became public after Chelsea was reported missing...”
“...by O Donnell in 2015”
“She was later found at the house of another man.”
“The two exchanged barbs throughout the years, and in a September 2017 interview with the Daily Mail, Chelsea said she was pregnant, expecting her first child with husband Nick Alliegro, and that she didn't want O'Donnell to be a part of her baby's life.”
“Chelsea said she and O'Donnell didn't "have a relationship anymore" and she didn't think "it [could] be mended."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"However, in June, O'Donnell's agent told et that the mother and daughter had reestablished contact, and just a few days later, et learned that Chelsea had applied for separation from allegro
"O'Donnell is ready to share more information about their relationship a few months after the 56 year old actress's representative told et that the two were reconnecting after a public quarrel."
"In CO hosting Friday's talk, O'Donnell revealed that her difficult times with Chelsea have brought them closer
"I think my relationship with my daughter, Chelsea, has really been put to the test because we've had some very public trouble times and, you know, she's doing better now and we're all communicating with each other," O'Donnell said
"But when someone does something unforgivable to you, you can forgive them, and they can forgive you, a kind of grace comes to both of you. After Chelsea was reported missing, the resentment between the former co host and her daughter is made public..."
“… Published by O Donnell in 2015
"Then I found her in another man's house."
"The two have been blaming each other for years. In an interview with the daily mail in September 2017, Chelsea said that she was pregnant and expected to have her first child with her husband Nick alliegro. She did not want O'Donnell to be a part of her child's life."
"Chelsea said that she and O'Donnell" no longer have a relationship ", and she did not think that" this (may) be remediable. "



**Something goes wrong**
“'s "Live from the Red Carpet" signature events keep fans connected to their favorite stars on pop culture's biggest nights.”
“...programming includes popular series "Keeping Up with the Kardashians," "Total Divas," "Botched," "Hollywood Medium with Tyler Henry," "WAGS," and "Fashion Police," as well as the network's scripted series "The Royals" and “The Arrangement.” Additionally, E!”
“Lana struggles to prioritize her life as a newlywed and her new role on SmackDown Live.”
“With Maryse ready to head to Sin City, the two must decide where they will call home.”
“It’s Vegas or bust when Maryse’s husband Mike “The Miz®” Mizanin refuses to leave Los Angeles after their second home burglary.”
“To spend more time twinning, the ladies plan a road trip and head to San Diego for the summer with Brie’s husband, WWE Superstar Daniel Bryan® in tow.”
“While Nikki is celebrating her long-awaited engagement in Cabo San Lucas, her sister Brie Bella is working on balancing the demands of being a new mom to her baby girl Birdie and managing her and Nikki’s burgeoning businesses.”
“Off the heels of her whirlwind engagement to WWE Superstar John Cena®, Nikki Bella gets ready to twist and twirl when she receives an offer from Dancing with the Stars that is hard to refuse.”
“Together, they explore new ventures and contemplate when the best time would be to make their in-ring comeback.”
“Meanwhile, The Bella Twins catch a case of “FOMO” during their time off from WWE.”


On the biggest night of pop culture, the iconic event of "red carpet live" keeps fans in touch with their favorite stars
“… The show includes the popular series "keep up with the Kardashian family", "total Queen", "bad", "Hollywood media and Tyler Henry", "swing" and "fashion police", as well as the network's script series "Royal" and "arrangement". In addition, e! "
"Lana is trying to put her newlywed life and her new role on smakdown live first."
"Maris is going to the city of sin. They have to decide where to call home."
"If Mary's husband, Mike" the Miz, "mizanin, refuses to leave Los Angeles after a second burglary, it's Vegas or bankruptcy."
"In order to spend more time pairing, the women planned a road trip to San Diego for the summer, accompanied by Bree's husband, WWE superstar Daniel Bryan."
"As Nicky celebrates her long-awaited engagement in Cabo San Lucas, her sister, bribella, is trying to balance her demands as a new mother, her baby daughter birdie, and the start-up business that runs her and Nicky."
"After her whirlwind engagement to WWE superstar John cena, Nikki Bella received an invitation to dance with the stars that she couldn't refuse, and she was ready to wiggle."
"They explore new careers together and think about when is the best time for them to come back in the circle."
Meanwhile, Bella twins found a case of "fomo" when they left WWE



**Something goes wrong**
““You don’t know what you want, you’re an indecisive teenager and you’re just becoming a young adult, and there was one thing that your mom knew for sure, and that was you.”Watch the whole video below:”
““When you’re 20 years old, you’re just figuring out your life,” Woods says.”
“Woods confirms that in the video.”
“Friends share how Jenner told them she was pregnant, and another friend says Jenner has wanted a child since she was 15.”
“There are many other big reveals in the video.”
“Her YouTube video shows only a shot of the baby’s arm and leg wiggling around shortly after her birth.”
“Tyler RossJenner didn’t reveal the name of her own baby girl, or a full photo or video.”
“Jenner tells Kardashian she loves the name.”
““I think we’re gonna go with Chicago,” Kardashian says.”
““She’s so little.”Tyler RossA post shared by Kim Kardashian Snapchats  (@kimksnapchats) on Feb 4, 2018 at 3:03pm PSTTyler RossDuring the sweet moment, Jenner’s best friend, Jordyn Woods, asks Kardashian if she’s decided on a name.”


"You don't know what you want. You're an indecisive teenager. You've just become a young adult. There's one thing your mother must know. That's you." Watch the whole video below:
"When you're 20, you're just thinking about your life," Woods said
"Woods confirmed that in the video."
"Friends shared how Jenna told them she was pregnant, and another friend said Jenna had wanted a baby since she was 15."
"There are many other big revelations in the video."
"Her YouTube video shows only one picture of the baby's arms and legs twisting shortly after birth."
"Tyler rosejenner did not disclose the name of her baby girl, nor did she disclose full photos or videos."
"Jenna told Kardashian she liked the name."
"I think we're going to Chicago," said Kardashian
"She's too young." Taylor Rosa published an article at 3:03 pm on February 4, 2018 by Kim Kardashian snapchats (@ kimksnapchats). In this sweet moment, Jenner's best friend, Jordan woods, asked Kardashian if she had decided on a name



**Something goes wrong**
“He didn't win the grand prize of $43k, but he competed on 13 different "missions" over the course of 15 episodes while shooting in Mexico, Costa Rica and the United States.”
“Brian was 23 years old when he competed on "Road Rules."”
“The family says the death was not drug or alcohol related -- and, as far as they know, no substances were found in the home.”
“They believe it was heart failure, and tell us he had a history of arrhythmia.”
“His family tells us he was found dead in his Pennsylvania home last Thursday.”
“Brian appeared on season 7 of "Road Rules" back in 1999.”
“Exclusive DetailsEx-MTV "Road Rules" star Brian Lancaster has died at just 43 years old ... TMZ has learned.”


"He didn't win the $43000 prize, but when shooting in Mexico, Costa Rica and the United States, he took part in 13 different 'mission' competitions in 15 episodes."
"Brian took part in the rules of the road competition when he was 23 years old."
"The family said the death had nothing to do with drugs or alcohol - as far as they know, no substance was found at home."
"They thought it was heart failure and told us he had a history of arrhythmias."
"His family told us that he was found dead at his home in Pennsylvania last Thursday."
"Brian appeared in the seventh season of the road rules in 1999."
"Exclusive details" mtv "road rules" star Bryan Lancaster has died at the age of 43... TMZ has learned. "



**Something goes wrong**
““Originals” and “iZombie” join already-renewed series “Arrow,” “D.C.’s Legends of Tomorrow,” “The Flash,” “Supergirl,” “Jane the Virgin,” “Crazy Ex-Girlfriend,” and “Supernatural.” The network cancelled freshman series “No Tomorrow” and “Frequency.””
“With both renewals, the CW has officially made decisions for every returning show for the 2017-2018 season.”
““The Originals” will head into its fifth season, while “iZombie” will be heading into its fourth season.”
“Created by Julie Plec, “The Originals” is a spinoff of “The Vampire Diaries,” which premiered in 2013.”
“The flagship “Vampire” series signed off this spring, ending its eight season run, so renewing “Originals” keeps the franchise at the network for at least another season.”
““Originals” follows Joseph Morgan’s Klaus Mikaelson and his family in New Orleans.”
“Morgan stars alongside Daniel Gillies, Phoebe Tonkin, Charles Michael Davis, Yusuf Gatewood and Riley Voelkel.”
“Plec serves as executive producer with Leslie Morgenstein.”
“The series hails from Bonanza Productions Inc., My So-Called Company, Alloy Entertainment, Warner Bros. Television and CBS Television Studios.”
“The show has remained relatively stable in its fourth season, which is currently averaging a 0.3 rating in adults 18-49 and 972,000 viewers per episode.”


"The original" and "izobi" have added the updated series "arrow", "the legend of tomorrow in Washington", "flash", "super girl", "virgin Jane", "crazy ex girlfriend" and "supernatural". "No tomorrow" and "frequency" have been cancelled
"After two renewals, CW has officially decided every return show in the 2017-2018 season."
"The original will enter the fifth season, and izombe will enter the fourth season."
The original, created by Julie Pleck, is a derivative of the vampire diaries, which premiered in 2013
The flagship version of the Vampire Series was signed up in the spring this year, ending eight consecutive seasons, so a continuation of the original will at least allow the show to air another season on the network
The original tells the story of Joseph Morgan's Klaus mikelson and his family in New Orleans
"Morgan stars with Daniel Geely, Phoebe tomkin, Charles Michael Davis, Yusuf gatwood and Riley Volcker."
"Pleck is the executive producer of Leslie Morgenstein."
"This series is from bonanza productions Inc., my so-called Company alloy entertainment, Warner Bros. and CBS TV studio."
"The audience rating of the fourth quarter of the play is relatively stable. At present, the average audience rating of adults aged 18-49 is 0.3, and the audience rating of each episode is 972000."



**Something goes wrong**
“The two wed in 1998, and Key filed for divorce on Dec. 31, 2015, a month after they separated.”
“Image zoom Credit: Walter McBride/WireImageKey was previously married to Cynthia Blaise, an actress and dialect coach.”
“The duo also stepped out during 2017 Emmys weekend, as well as this year’s Tony Awards and BAFTA Tea Party event.”
“Key, 46, and Pugliese have kept their romance largely out of the public eye, though the two have attended events together, including the U.S. Open this year and the Rescue Dinner hosted by IRC in New York City earlier this month.”
“She said yes!” he shared on Twitter Tuesday morning.”
“I’m the luckiest man ever.”
““She shows me every day that each one of us has the ability to help make the world a better place.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Key and Peele star is engaged to his girlfriend, Hollywood producer and director Elisa Pugliese, a rep for the actor confirmed to PEOPLE.”
“Keegan-Michael Key was previously married to Cynthia Blaise, an actress and dialect coachWeddings bells will soon be ringing for Keegan-Michael Key.”


"They got married in 1998, and Kay filed for divorce on December 31, 2015 after a month of separation."
"Credit for image zooming: Walter McBride / wireimagekey married actress and dialect coach Cynthia Bryce."
"The pair also appeared at the 2017 Emmy weekend, as well as this year's Tony Awards and BFA tea party."
Kay and puglitzer, 46, have been keeping their relationship out of the way, although they have been involved in a number of events, including this year's U.S. Open and a rescue dinner hosted by the IRC in New York earlier this month
"She said yes! "He tweeted it on Tuesday morning."
"I'm the luckiest person ever."
"She shows me every day that each of us has the ability to help make the world a better place."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The key and skin star is engaged to his girlfriend, Hollywood producer and director Eliza poglitzer, and the actor's representative confirmed this to people magazine
Keegan Michael key was married to actress Cynthia Bryce, and the wedding bell will soon ring for him



**Something goes wrong**
“...calls her daughter a super easy laid back baby who is always smiling and happy and has her dad s personality...”
“I think she has such a sweet expression Image zoom Cameran Eubanks and daughter Palmer Credit Lilly Pulitzer Image zoom Cameran Eubanks and daughter Palmer Credit Lilly Pulitzer RELATED VIDEO Southern Charm s Cameran Eubanks on Why She Stopped Breastfeeding I m Just Plain OVER IT The mother of one...”
““I think we have a new Lilly lover!”The Bravo star’s favorite photo, she says, “is the one of Palmer looking over my shoulder.”
“She seemed to really respond to the bright colors,” Eubanks tells PEOPLE.”
“Image zoom Cameran Eubanks and daughter Palmer | Credit: Lilly PulitzerImage zoom Cameran Eubanks and daughter Palmer | Credit: Lilly PulitzerImage zoom Cameran Eubanks and daughter Palmer | Credit: Lilly Pulitzer“I loved dressing Palmer up in the different outfits.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“They are ‘happy clothes’ that make you feel good when you wear them.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““Who can turn down an opportunity to take pretty pictures with your baby?”She adds, “I’ve always enjoyed Lilly’s designs and fun, bright patterns.”
““I have always been a fan of Lilly,” Eubanks, 34, tells PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


“… Her daughter is a super easy and leisurely baby, always smiling and happy, with her father's personality... "
"I think she has such a sweet expression image zooming Cameron Eubanks and daughter Palmer credit Lily Pulitzer image zooming Cameron Eubanks and daughter Palmer credit Lily Pulitzer related video Southern Charms Cameron Eubanks about why she stopped breastfeeding I'm just a simple mother..."
"I think we have a new lily lover! "Bravo star's favorite picture," she said, "is the one Palmer looked at from my shoulder."
"She really seems to respond to bright colors," Eubanks told people
"Image zooming camera Eubanks and daughter Palmer | credit: Lily Pulitzer image zooming camera Eubanks and daughter Palmer | credit: Lily Pulitzer image zooming camera Eubanks and daughter Palmer | credit: Lily Pulitzer" I like to dress Palmer differently
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"They are 'happy clothes' and they make you feel good." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, and celebrity mom blogs? "
"Who can refuse the chance to take beautiful pictures with the baby? She added: "I've always loved Lily's designs and funny, bright patterns."
"I've always been a fan of lily," Eubanks, 34, told people
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



**Something goes wrong**
“He reposted the video he claims Chyna sent to him.”
“Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors...”
“In 2014, the first person was convicted and sentenced to a year in prison for violating the law.”
“In October 2013, the California Governor signed a bill outlawing so-called revenge porn and levying possible prison time for those who post naked photos of their ex-partners.”
“Knock it off".”
“And in my Mischa Barton case judge agreed it's a form of domestic violence.”
“...suit against an ex to prevent revenge porn images of her from being released weighed in on the furore on Twitter saying Note to Rob Kardashian revenge porn is a crime...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Lisa Bloom the women s rights lawyer who represented Mischa Barton in her recent successful civil...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”
“A number of legal experts have said Kardashian may have potentially violated the state's revenge porn laws.”


"He re released the video he claimed was sent to him by Zina."
"The best movie music TV broadcast of independent cultural communication is sent directly to your mailbox every week. Please enter your email address. Please enter a valid email address. Please enter a valid email address to register. Thank you for registering with verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors..."
"In 2014, the first person was convicted of violating the law and sentenced to one year's imprisonment."
"In October 2013, the governor of California signed a bill to ban so-called retaliatory pornography and impose possible imprisonment on those who publish nude photos of their former partners."
"Stop it"
"In my Misha Barton case, the judge agreed that it was a form of domestic violence."
“… Sue her ex girlfriend to prevent her revenge pornographic pictures from being published. The anger on twitter said that robbing Kardashian of revenge pornographic pictures is a crime... "
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and the latest situation by email. If you would like to be contacted, please check the box to read our complete mailing list of consent terms. This is Lisa bloom, a female rights lawyer representing Misha Barton in her recent successful civil lawsuit... "
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here independent culture newsletters best movie music TV broadcast will be sent directly to your in box every week..."
"Some legal experts said that Kardashian may have violated the state's vengeance pornography law."



**Something goes wrong**
“Beaming: She added a casual element to her look with a crisp white T-shirt tucked into the top of her trousersLovely: Her chic ensemble was complete with a pair of tan suede booties to match a fluffy camel-colored purse...”
“Her chic ensemble was complete with a pair of tan suede booties to match a fluffy camel-colored purse.”
“The famous siblings were pictured in monochrome looks as they sauntered down the catwalk during New York Fashion Week.”
“Gigi, 23, rocked a black cutout gown which featured a sequined bralette attached to a long flowing skirt.”
“Model behavior: Gigi and Bella Hadid ruled the runway for the Michael Kors Spring Summer 2019 catwalk show during NYFW on WednesdayHer blonde locks were styled to look slightly damp and fell in waves around her shoulders.”
“Bella, 21, sauntered down the catwalk in a white blazer and matching shorts, with a long black blouse worn underneath.”
“Her dark tresses were covered in a plain black bandanna.”
“Both models sported a pared down makeup look.”
“Leading the way Gigi 23 rocked a black cutout gown which featured a sequined bralette attached to a long flowing skirt All eyes on her Her blonde locks were styled to look slightly damp and fell in waves around her shoulders Au naturale Both models sported a pared down makeup...”
“...look The monochrome theme show was hosted at Pier 17 and attracted a star studded crowd including Nicole Kidman Sofia Richie Catherine Zeta Jones and Iman...”


"Jubilant: she tucks a fresh white T-shirt into her trouser waist, adding leisure elements to her style: her Chic Dress with a pair of Tan Suede Boots complements the fluffy camel purse..."
"Her fashionable dress, with a pair of Tan Suede Boots, complements her puffy camel purse."
"During New York Fashion Week, famous brothers and sisters were photographed in monochrome as they strolled on the catwalk."
Gigi, 23, wore a black cut-out dress with a sequined bra
"Modeling: Gigi and Bella Hadid dominated the t-channel at the New York television (NYFW) spring / summer 2019 fashion show on Wednesday, with her blonde look slightly damp and wavy around her shoulders."
Bella, 21, strolls on the catwalk in a white coat and matching shorts, wearing a long black shirt
"Her black hair was wrapped in a big black handkerchief."
"Both models show a simple look."
"Gigi, 23, is wearing a black cut-out dress with a sequined bra. All eyes were focused on her. Her golden hair looks a little damp and waves on her shoulders. It's natural. Both models put on light makeup.... "
“…… Look, the monochrome theme exhibition was held at pier 17, attracting a large audience of stars including Nicole Kidman, Sophia Ritchie, Catherine Zeta Jones and Iman... "



Number  315
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I want to see happy Hank again... i miss that.”
“The gals were joined by pals Erin Ziering, Beverley Mitchell, Veena Crownholm, Kimberly Caldwell and Nikki Lund for the event held at the Calabasas Commons shopping center.”
“The ladies goofed around in a series of Instagram videos, trying their hardest to fit all three into the shot.”
“...floral duster with ripped jeans a tight tee shirt and buff booties...”
“The gals were joined by some pals with Beverley Mitchell Tori Spelling Erin Ziering Veena Crownholm Kimberly Caldwell Nicole Levine Nikki Lund Jessica Hall Kendra Wilkinson and Chrissy Kling pictured from left to right at the event Joining them was 90210 alum Tori Spelling who charmed in a dark red...”
“The former girlfriend of Hugh Hefner as overjoyed to see fellow Playboy alum Jessica HallClose: They hugged and took a selfie together before teaming up with the rest of the guestsBig group!”
“Casting her Spell-ing: The Girls Next Door star was joined by 90210 alum Tori Spelling, who charmed in a dark red floral duster with ripped jeans, a tight tee shirt, and buff bootiesOld friend!”
“They hugged and took a selfie together before teaming up with the rest of the guests.”
“The Girls Next Door persona was overjoyed to see fellow Playboy alum Hall, who looked lovely in a long pink dress while catching up with Kendra.”
“Getting back to being Kdub again n feels good.'”


"I want to see happy hank again... I miss it
Also at the Calabasas house of Commons shopping mall were Irene chilling, Beverly Mitchell, wina Cronholm, Kimberly Caldwell and Nicky Lund
"The ladies are sneaking around in a series of instagram videos, trying their best to capture all three."
“… Floral duster and ripped jeans, tight T-shirt and light yellow boots... "
"Some friends joined the girls. Beverly Mitchell Torry spelled Eileen chillin Vina Cronholm Kimberley Caldwell Nicole Levin Nicky Lund Jessica hall Kendra Wilkinson and Chris Kling. The pictures from left to right were 90210 alum Torry spellers. She was wearing a deep red camouflage..."
Hugh Hefner's ex girlfriend was ecstatic to see Playboy alumni Jessica hallclose: they hugged each other, took a picture of themselves, and then worked with other big groups of guests! "
"Cast the spell: girl next door" star is 90210 alumni Tori Sperling, she is wearing a crimson flower duster, jeans holes, tight T-shirt, a pair of light yellow boots, old friend
"They hugged each other, took self portraits, and then worked with other guests."
"The girls next door were overjoyed to see Playboy's alumnus, hall. She was wearing a long pink dress and catching up with Kendra. She looked very cute."
"It's good to be back at kdub."



**Something goes wrong**
“Jackson, 58, wore a black suit that had been tailored during his wardrobe makeover, in addition to a shirt given to him by France!”
“...his big day...”
“We have always loved each other that never stopped whether we were together or not While the fab five Bobby Berk Antoni Porowski Jonathan Van Ness Tan France and Karamo Brown didn t attend the ceremony the groom s appearance on Queer Eye played a part in his attire for...”
“We have been best friends for 12 years and we have known each other for 12 years,” Parr told Us at the time.”
““Thomas and I, we have never really been apart, apart.”
“Following the episode airing, he later announced on Twitter that not only had he and Parr had gotten back together, but they were now engaged!”
““Tom was grinning from ear to ear!”As previously reported, Jackson was transformed on the Netflix reboot of the hit series, during which the demise of his first marriage to Parr was explained.”
“Tom looked happy and excited as I walked down the aisle – I was looking at him looking at me and he was smiling as I walked down the aisle!” the bride, 52 — who wore an Oleg Cassini dress and a matching jeweled headpiece — tells Us.”
“I was marrying the love of my life.”
““I was excited and happy!”


"Jackson is 58 years old. Besides a shirt given to him by France, he is also wearing a black suit customized during the transformation of the wardrobe!"
“… His big day... "
"We love each other all the time, whether we are together or not, and we never stop, while five-year-old Bobbie Burke Anthony Borowski, Jonathan van nistein France and kalamo Brown did not attend the wedding, and the groom's appearance in strange eye played a role in his dress..."
"We've been best friends for 12 years, and we've known each other for 12 years," Parr told us at the time
"Thomas and I, we've never really separated, separated."
After the episode, he later announced on twitter that he and PAL are not only reunited, but they are engaged now! "
"Tom couldn't shut his mouth! "As previously reported, Jackson changed when Netflix restarted the hit show, during which the end of his first marriage with Parr was explained."
"When I walk down the aisle, Tom looks happy and excited - I look at him, I look at me, when I walk down the aisle, he smiles! "The 52 year old bride told us that she was wearing an Oleg Cassini dress and a jewel on her head."
"I married the love of my life."
"I'm excited, I'm happy!"



Number  317
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”
“Be sure to keep up with all of PEOPLE’s royal wedding coverage and don’t forget to check out everything you need to know about Meghan Markle’s perfect style.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Pippa was glowing in a mint green and pink floral “Hepburn” silk dress by The Fold as she held her husband’s hand while walking into the service with mom, Carole Middleton, dad, Michael Middleton and brother, James Middleton.”
“Image zoom Credit: James Gourley/ShutterstockPippa made headlines for the dress she wore to Kate’s royal wedding in 2011.”
“For today’s wedding, the mom-to-be arrived with a barely-there baby bump in a long sleeve mint dress with a drop waist, pleated blush skirt and floral designs.”
“The dress was not a maternity dress, and Charlotte Sutcliffe-Smith, PR for The Fold told PEOPLE, “We are absolutely delighted she has worn it.”She wore her hair in a low bun with a small side braid tucked into it and her makeup natural, as she typically does.”
“Image zoom Credit: Pascal Le Segretain/Getty ImagesIt’s the event of the year!”
“Of course, to top it all off, Pippa accessorized with a dusty rose fascinator with small white flowers, strappy heels and a small clutch of the same shade that perfectly pulled together her elegant look.”
“Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”


"Sign up for our newsletters and get the latest news from Kate Middleton, Megan markel and others!"
"Be sure to keep up with all the coverage of people's royal weddings, and don't forget to check out all the information you need to know about Megan markel's perfect style."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Pippa, wearing a mint green and pink floral "Hepburn" silk dress, clasped her husband's hand and glittered beside the folds as she attended the ceremony with her mother, Carol Middleton, Dad, Michael Middleton and brother James Middleton
"Photo zooming credit: James Gurley / shutterstock Pippa's wedding dress at Kate's royal wedding in 2011 made headlines."
"At today's wedding, the expectant mother wore a low waist long sleeved Mint skirt, pleated skirt and flower patterned blush skirt, and there was almost no baby mass."
"It's not a maternity dress," Charlotte Sutcliffe Smith, a public relations officer at fold, told people. "We're very glad she's wearing it." She wore her hair in a low bun with a small braid on the side and made up naturally, just like she usually did
"Image zooming credit: Pascal Le segreat / Getty Images this is a great event of the year!"
"Of course, most importantly, Pippa's accessories are a dusty rose, white flowers, lace up high heels and a small clutch with the same hue, which perfectly combines her elegant appearance."
"Is there not enough coverage of the royal family?"



Number  318
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You can watch a clip of the drama below:For more great stories, head to INSIDER's homepage.”
““Not sharing this whole experience with my family and my kids, it wouldn’t have felt right,” Kourtney later said of her decision.”
“Kourtney Kardashian didn't want to attend the family Christmas party because Scott Disick would be there, and she wanted to bring then-boyfriend Younes Bendjima.”
“In the end, both Kardashian and Disick ended up attending, and so did Bendjima.”
“This season of "Keeping Up With The Kardashians" has only recently kicked off, but already, there's been major drama among the family — especially where the Kardashian women are involved.”
“After many arguments between Khloe, Kim, and Kourtney have broken out, on Sunday night, Kourtney was wrapped up in the drama again, and this time, it was all about the family's holiday plans.”
“Basically, the argument was about whether or not Scott Disick would be invited to Kris Jenner's annual Christmas party.”
“The rest of the family thought that Disick should obviously be in attendance — even though he and Kourtney are no longer together, he's still Mason, Reign, and Penelope's father and part of their family.”
“But Kourtney wanted to bring boyfriend Younes Bendjima (who she has since broken up with) and thought it might be awkward for him and Scott to be at the same party together… even though Scott swore it wasn't a big deal (for him, at least).”
“Kendall was totally on Kourtney's side, though, especially since Kris originally didn't want to invite Caitlyn Jenner because nobody at the party "would even know how to respond to her," and of course, Kendall wanted to have both of her parents at the party, too.”


"You can see the clip of the play below: for more wonderful stories, please visit the inside home page."
"It doesn't feel right not to tell my family and children about the whole experience," Courtney later said of his decision
"Courtney Kardashian didn't want to go to the family Christmas party because Scott Disick would be there and she wanted to bring her then boyfriend, yones bengima."
"At the end of the day, Kardashian and disik were in, and benjima was in."
"This season's" keep up with Kardashian "has just been on air recently, but it has already put on a big show in the family - especially Kardashian women's participation."
"After many quarrels between Khloe, Kim and Kourtney, Kourtney fell into the play again on Sunday night, and this time, it was all for the family's holiday plan."
"Basically, the debate is whether Scott Disick will be invited to Chris Jenner's annual Christmas party."
"The rest of the family think that Disick should obviously be present - although he and Courtney are no longer together, he is still the father of Mason, Rafe and Penelope and part of their family."
"But Courtney wanted to bring her boyfriend, yones benjima (who later broke up with him), and thought he and Scott might be embarrassed at the same party Although Scott swears it's no big deal (at least for him)
"But Kendall is totally on Courtney's side, especially Chris didn't want to invite Caitlin Jenner, because no one at the party" didn't even know how to respond to her. "Of course, Kendall also wanted her parents to come to the party."



**Something goes wrong**
“DJ Khaled did the introductory honors from a separate stage, where he sat on a couch surrounded by mounds of cash and stacks of gold bullions and.”
“...was ridiculously fun to watch...”
“Although there was no Cardi a black and white video of her rapping came up for her part of the song Lopez decidedly was able to carry things out on her own in a slightly modified version of Dinero that...”
“Billboard Music Awards on May 20”
“A lot of bling a lot of style some kick ass dancing JLo does not disappoint and a whole lotta cash flying around punctured the TV premiere of Jennifer Lopez DJ Khaled and Cardi B s Dinero at the 2018”


"DJ Khalid opened on another stage, sitting on a sofa surrounded by piles of cash, piles of gold bars and gold."
“… It's so interesting... "
"Although there is no black-and-white video of caddy, her rap appeared in her part of the song, and Lopez was able to decisively do things herself in a slightly modified version of dinero, that..."
"May 20 Billboard Music Awards"
"A lot of sparkles, a lot of styles, some first-class dance JLO didn't disappoint, a lot of money flew through the TV premieres of Jennifer Lopez, DJ Khalid and Katie B. S. dinero in 2018"



**Something goes wrong**
“!” Guadagnino wrote on Instagram.”
““But at the same time, we’re just like, it’s gonna be different.”
“...why...”
“Sammi “Sweetheart” Giancola was missing from the lineup for Jersey Shore Family Vacation, and Polizzi believes it’s to put an end to the drama with her ex, Ronnie Ortiz-Magro.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Everyone’s asking why Sammi’s not doing it.”
“You have to ask her that — I’m not gonna speak for her,” the 30-year-old said on a recent episode of her podcast, It’s Happening With Snooki & Joey.”
““But Sammi is just in such a happy place that I feel like she doesn’t want to jump back into that drama if it does happen.”
“And being that there was a lot of Ron and Sam drama when we did film, it was just really hard on both of them.”
“So I just think she doesn’t want that anymore.”Giancola and Ortiz-Magro met when they first headed to Seaside Heights, New Jersey, as the first members of the show in 2009.”


"!" guadanino wrote on instagram. "
"But at the same time, it's like we're going to be different."
“… Why... "
"Sammy 'sweetheart' giankola is missing from the Jersey coast family holiday lineup, and Polizzi believes this will end her farce with her ex boyfriend Ronnie Ortiz Magro."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Everyone's asking why Sammy didn't do it."
"You have to ask her - I won't speak for her," the 30-year-old said in a recent podcast. "It happened to snooky and Joey."
"But Sammy is just in such a happy place. I think if it happens, she doesn't want to jump into that play again."
"And when we were making movies, Ron and Sam had a lot of scenes, which was hard for both of them."
Giankola and Ortiz Magro met when they first went to the highlands by the sea in New Jersey in 2009, when they were the first members of the show



Number  321
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““License To Kill” (Working Title)Produced by Shed Media, a division of Warner Bros. Unscripted & Alternative Television.”
“This series follows the trails of their obsession, and takes a deep dive into the killers’ depraved psyches to reveal their darkest secrets as investigators close in to end the killer’s reign of terror.”
““The Disappearance of Crystal Rogers”Produced by Peacock Productions with Lloyd Fales and Nicole Rittenmeyer serving as executive producers.”
“Having never spoken on camera about their crimes until now, each landmark episode will be built around Piers’ chilling face-to-face interview with a killer.”
“Oxygen will be the home for the US premiere of “Serial Killer with Piers Morgan.” With unprecedented access to some of the most dangerous maximum security prisons in the United States, “Serial Killer with Piers Morgan” will explore the minds of three of America’s most depraved serial killers.”
““Serial Killer with Piers Morgan”Produced by Plum Pictures and Ferret Productions with Piers Morgan, John Ferriter, Will Daws and Stuart Cabb serving as executive producers.”
“For the first time ever, these top defense attorneys share their very personal, and sometimes very controversial, versions of events as they worked alongside some of the biggest monsters of our time.”
“...viewers will look at these legendary trials from a totally different perspective...”
“From Oklahoma City bomber Timothy McVeigh and his defense attorney Chris Tritico who to this day calls Tim his friend to Jodi Arias and her public defense attorney Kirk Nurmi who was willing to give up his entire career half way through the case just to get away from her...”
“This psychologically thrilling crime series explores the complex relationships between notorious criminals and the defense attorneys who represented them in court.”


License to kill (job title) was produced by shed media, a Warner Bros. screenless and alternative TV company
"This series tracks their infatuation, penetrates into the killer's depraved psychology, reveals their darkest secret, and the investigators are close to ending the killer's reign of terror."
The disappearance of crystal Rogers is produced by peacock production with Lloyd Fars and Nicole rittenmeyer as executive producers
"Until now, they have never talked about their crimes in front of the camera. Every landmark episode will focus on Pierce's gruesome face-to-face interview with a killer."
"Oxygen will be the venue for the US Premiere of serial killer with pierce Morgan. With unprecedented access to some of the most dangerous and safest prisons in the United States, "serial killers with pierce Morgan" will explore the ideas of the three most depraved serial killers in the United States. "
"Serial killer and pierce Morgan" is produced by plum pictures and ferret, with pierce Morgan, John ferritt, will dos and Stuart cabe as executive producers
"For the first time in history, these top defense lawyers work with some of the biggest monsters of our time to share their very personal and sometimes very controversial versions of events."
“…… The audience will look at these legendary trials from a completely different perspective... "
"From Oklahoma City bombing killer Timothy McVeigh and his defense lawyer Chris tritico to Jodi Arias and her public defense lawyer Kirk Nurmi To this day, they still call Tim their friend, and Jodie Arias and her public defense lawyer Kirk Nurmi are willing to give up their entire career in the middle of the case just for the sake of the future
"This thrilling crime series explores the complex relationship between the notorious criminals and the defense lawyers who represent them in court."



Number  322
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I just have to take my time to do certain things because my body really can’t take it,” she lamented.”
“My life is not over, you know?”
“...challenging start for Cardi B”
“Shortly after announcing she would not be performing in Bruno Mars 24K Magic World Tour in order to spend more time with her daughter Kulture Kiari and give her body more time to recover after giving birth the 25 year old rapper took to Instagram Live Thursday night to explain...”
“...just how much her current work was cut out for her...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I met my match,” Cardi B told her followers, referring to her 2-week-old baby girl as K.K.”
““She is very demanding.”
“I can’t believe I have a boss.”
“I really have a boss.”“When my baby wanna eat, she wanna eat,” she continued.”


"I can only spend time doing certain things because my body can't stand it," she sighs
"My life is not over, you know?"
“… Challenge cardie B's start
"Shortly after announcing that she will not be on the Bruno Mars 24K magic world tour, the 25-year-old rapper explained on instagram live on Thursday night to spend more time with her daughter, Kulture kiari, and allow her body more time to recover after childbirth..."
“… How much of her present job is left to her... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I met my opponent," Katie B told her followers, calling her 2-week-old baby girl K.K
"She's demanding."
"I can't believe I have a boss."
"I really have a boss." "When my child wants to eat, she wants to eat," she continued



**Something goes wrong**
“Camila is currently in Vancouver shooting season 3 of the hit show Riverdale.”
“I just really need to get out of this industry with someone who is in a stable environment,' she added.”
“The Riverdale star, 24, ended her brief romance with her hometown boyfriend 'very recently' according to E!.”
“'Camila ended things with Victor after ComicCon, when she realized she wasn't ready to be in this relationship anymore,' the source said.”
“The end: Camila Mendes, 24, has split with boyfriend Victor Houston; (pictured August)'Victor was completely blindsided and is very heartbroken,' the insider added.”
“'He has been receiving a lot of backlash from the Riverdale community, even though it was actually Camila's choice to end the relationship.'”
“The couple - childhood friends from Florida - started the romance rumors back in June as they posted messages to each other's social media accounts.”
“Camila spoke to Nylon recently about dating someone outside her Hollywood industry.”
“Reasons:'Camila ended things with Victor after ComicCon, when she realized she wasn't ready to be in this relationship anymore,' a source saidHeartbroken: 'Victor was completely blindsided and is very heartbroken,' the insider added'It’s just dating people in the industry is tough,' she explained.”
“'I did for a little bit.”


"Camilla is currently filming the third season of the hit TV series Riverdale in Vancouver."
She added: "I really need to leave the industry with a person with a stable environment."
The 24-year-old Riverdale star recently ended a brief relationship with her hometown boyfriend
"Camilla ended her relationship with Victor after the komikon incident when she realized she was no longer ready to associate with Victor," the source said
"Outcome: Camilla Mendes, 24, broke up with her boyfriend Victor Houston; (photo taken in August)" Victor was totally silly and very sad, "the person familiar with the matter added
"He has been strongly opposed by the Riverdale Community, even though it was Camilla who actually chose to end the relationship."
"The couple, who are childhood friends from Florida, started the rumor in June when they left messages on each other's social media accounts."
"Camilla recently talked to nylons about her dating outside Hollywood."
"The reason: Camilla and Victor ended their relationship after Comicon, when she realized that she was not ready to continue the relationship," a source said. "Victor was completely blindfolded and very sad," the insider added. "It's hard just to date people in this industry," she explained
"I did a little bit."



**Something goes wrong**
“Belafonte’s lawyers dismissed the claim, arguing that the videos were “consensual.””
“(PEOPLE confirmed in July Brown was ordered to pay Belafonte $40,000 per month in temporary spousal support and pay for $140,000 in attorney fees and forensic fees on Belafonte’s behalf.)”
“The couple, who are ending their marriage after 10 years wed, reached an agreement in the domestic violence portion of their divorce, TMZ reports — with the former Spice Girl agreeing to drop the temporary restraining order she filed in April against Belafonte.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Brown, 42, had accused her ex of physically and emotionally abusing her, alleging in her TRO filing that she was “in fear” for her life and that Belafonte’s alleged abuse ramped up when her career was on an upswing.”
“Belafonte, 42, and Brown — who wed in Las Vegas in June 2007 — also settled a portion of their property division, TMZ reports.”
“A rep for Brown did not immediately return PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Image zoom Melanie “Mel B” Brown and Stephen Belafonte | Credit: Phillip Faraone/GettyThe former couple’s divorce has been a nasty battle since Brown filed in March and asked for joint legal and physical custody of their 6-year-old daughter, Madison.”
“Brown also requested to terminate the court’s ability to award spousal support in her filing.”
“Amid her restraining order filings in April, Brown claimed that Belafonte hired a German exchange student, Lorraine Gilles, to be their nanny and pitted the two women against each other.”


Bellafonte's lawyer dismissed the claim, saying the videos were "consensual"
"(it was confirmed in July that Brown was ordered to pay $40000 a month in temporary spousal support to Belafonte and $140000 in attorney and forensic fees on behalf of Belafonte.)
According to TMZ, the couple, who are about to end their marriage after 10 years of marriage, have reached an agreement on the domestic violence part of the divorce, and the former Spice Girl has agreed to lift the temporary restraining order she imposed on Belafonte in April
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Brown, 42, accused her ex girlfriend of physical and emotional abuse. In her tro file, she said she was" afraid "of her own life, while Belafonte's alleged abuse intensified as her career rose."
Belafonte, 42, and brown, who married in Las Vegas in June 2007, also resolved part of the property split, TMZ reported
"A representative of Brown didn't immediately respond to requests for comment."
Photo zooming Melanie melbrown and Stephen Belafonte | source: Philip Faraoni / Getty the divorce of the former couple has been a fierce battle since Brown filed for divorce in March and asked for joint legal and physical custody of their 6-year-old daughter Madison
"Brown also asked for the termination of the court's right to provide for her spouse in her application."
In a restraining order filed in April, brown claimed that Belafonte had hired a German exchange student, Lorraine Gilles, as their nanny and had the two women compete with each other



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“But I really felt good about it."”
“In a sneak peek clip from an all-new episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians, the 34-year-old reality star gets into an argument with his ex-girlfriend, Kourtney Kardashian, after he learns he wasn't invited to Khloe Kardashian's birthday bash.”
“"F**k, I didn't even get invited to her birthday," Disick says during a heated conversation with Kourtney and Kim Kardashian West.”
“"And I'm family.”
“That was really sweet.”
“That made me feel really good."”
“The clip then jumps to a close-up of Scott, who says there's only one person that would have gotten him "not invited" -- Kourtney.”
“MORE: Scott Disick Says Dating After Kourtney Kardashian Is 'Not Fulfilling'"I highly doubt that Khloe was like, 'The last person I'd want at my surprise party would be Scott,'" he explains in a sarcastic tone.”
“"It's cool.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"But I really feel good."
"In the new episode of follow Kardashian, the 34 year old reality star has an argument with his ex girlfriend Courtney Kardashian after learning that he was not invited to Kardashian's birthday party."
"Well, I wasn't even invited to her birthday," Disick said in a heated conversation with Courtney and Kim Kardashian West
"I'm a family."
"That's great."
"It makes me feel good."
"Then the clip jumps to Scott's close-up, and he says that only one person will make him" uninvited "- Courtney."
"More: Scott Disick says that dating after Courtney Kardashian is' unfulfilled '," he explains sarcastically. "I'm very skeptical that Chloe would say,' the last person I want at my surprise party is Scott. '"
"It's cool."



Number  326
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Macaulay Culkin Says He Wants to Have Kids With Girlfriend Brenda SongMacaulay Culkin Says He Stays Indoors at Christmastime to Avoid Intense ‘Home Alone’ FansParis Jackson Wishes Godfather Macaulay Culkin a Happy Birthday: 'Make 37 Your B**ch'Related Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Macaulay Culkin Opens Up About His Bond With Paris Jackson This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Check out the video below to hear more from the interview.”
“It’s great."”
“When asked simply how Paris is doing, the Home Alone star answered, "She’s tall, and beautiful and smart.”
“"I am a very open book when it comes to things but like with her, she is beloved by me."”
“"I'm going to warn you now, I am very protective of her so just look out," the actor said when Maron broached the subject.”
“Culkin -- who is also the godfather to the King of Pop's two sons, Michael "Prince" Jackson Jr., 21, and Prince "Blanket" Jackson II, 16 -- admitted that he's "very protective" toward the Sound Flowers singer during a conversation with Marc Maron on his WTF podcast back in January.”
“Always."”


"Embedded code restart" content: Macaulay Calkin he said he wanted to have a baby with his girlfriend Brenda Sanger Macaulay Calkin he said he stayed at home at Christmas to avoid nervous "alone at home" fans sparis Jackson happy birthday to Godfather Macaulay Calkin: "make 37 your b * * ch related gallery..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Macaulay Calkin disclosed his relationship with Paris Jackson, and this video can't be played because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"Check out the video below to learn more about the interview."
"Great."
When asked simply about Paris, the lone star replied, "she's tall, beautiful and smart."
"I'm a very open-minded person, but like her, she's my love."
"I'm going to warn you now that I'm very protective of her, so be careful," the actor said when Malone raised the subject
Kalkin, who is also the godfather of the pop king's two sons, 21-year-old Prince Michael Jackson and 16-year-old Prince Jackson II, admitted in a talk with mark Malone on WTF Podcast in January that he was "very protective" of the voice flower singer
"Always."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Rachel Torgerson I'm Cosmopolitan's fashion editor—you can follow me on Instagram at @racheltorgsThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Follow Rachel on Twitter and Instagram.”
“Follow Facebook.com/CosmoBeauty.”
“Get non-boring fashion and beauty news directly in your feed.”
“Not shabby to be compared to Bey, honestly.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“Getty ImagesWhile her looks was definitely ~Kylie-esque~ some were quick to point out a similarity between this dress and Beyoncé's from 2015.”
“Everything [Donatella] does is amazing."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Rachel torgerson, I'm cosmopolitan's fashion editor. You can Instagram@racheltorgst This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide e-mail addresses. "
"Follow Rachel on Twitter and instagram."
"Follow Facebook.com/CosmoBeauty Website. "
"Get non boring fashion and beauty news directly from the feed."
"To be honest, it's not shabby compared with Bei."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from twitter."
"Getty Images although she definitely looks like ~ Kylie esque ~ some people quickly pointed out the similarities between this dress and Beyonce in 2015."
"Everything Donatella does is amazing."



**Something goes wrong**
“ADVERTISEMENTADVERTISEMENT Bad Behaviour But there was another reason for his agitated behavior.”
“In September 2015 he appeared on the British TV show This Morning, but appeared drunk and angrily shouted at the hosts as the audience awkwardly watched.”
“ADVERTISEMENTADVERTISEMENT Tragedy Looms Sadly, tragedy seemed to follow Cassidy.”
“In the corresponding interview he revealed that he was a drug user.”
“Even way back in 1972, when The Partridge Family was still on air, he posed naked for Rolling Stone magazine.”
“He longed to be taken seriously as an adult entertainer, but none of his attempts seemed to work.”
“ADVERTISEMENTADVERTISEMENT Loathed The Image In fact, Cassidy actually spent most of his life trying to shed this teen idol image.”
“But no matter how many girls fell at his feet, and how big his career became he still didn’t seem to be happy.”
“He became the archetypal teen idol, with girls fawning over him and sticking his picture on their bedroom walls.”
“This character would change the course of his entire life.”


"He behaves badly, but there's another reason for his emotional behavior."
"In September 2015, he appeared on British TV this morning, but he seemed to be drunk and yelled angrily at the host when the audience watched awkwardly."
"The tragedy of advertising is approaching tragically, and it seems to follow Cassidy."
"In the corresponding interview, he revealed that he was a drug addict."
As early as 1972, when Partridge Family was still popular, he took nude photos for Rolling Stone magazine
"He aspires to be valued as an adult artist, but none of his attempts seem to work."
In fact, Cassidy spent most of her life trying to get rid of the image of a teen idol
"But no matter how many girls fall at his feet, no matter how big his career is, he still seems unhappy."
"He became a typical teen idol, and the girls all showed him up and put his picture on the bedroom wall."
"The role will change his life."



**Something goes wrong**
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



**Something goes wrong**
“See the full list of winners from the 24th annual Screen Actors Guild Awards here.”
“She beat out her Big Little Lies costars Laura Dern and Reese Witherspoon, as well as Jessica Lange and Susan Sarandon for their work on Feud: Bette and Joan.”
“She won big at the 24th annual awards on Sunday night in Los Angeles.”
““I’m crying.”
“[This] means a lot to me,” Kidman said as she took the stage to accept the award.”
““I’ve been working since I was 14 years old….”
“I’m incredibly nervous because this is reality colliding with fantasy right now.”
“I was working until 1 a.m., which is a fantastic blessing last night, but I have the flu and I’m playing a pretty out-there, raw character right now so I’ve had a little trouble shedding it.”
“But I’m here and I’m incredibly grateful.”
“To receive this at this stage of my life is extraordinary, and at this time in the industry when these things are going on and for this role.”Kidman went on to tip her hat to her fellow Big Little Lies nominees, as well as Jessica Lange and Susan Sarandon.”


"Here you can see the complete list of winners of the 24th Screen Actors Guild Award."
"She beat her little lie stars, Laura Dean and Reese Witherspoon, as well as Jessica Langer and Susan Sarandon, because of their performance in old grudge: Betty and Joan."
"She won the 24th Annual Awards ceremony in Los Angeles on Sunday night."
"I cried."
"It means a lot to me," Kidman said when he came on stage to receive the award
"I started working when I was 14 years old..."
"I'm very nervous because now it's a collision between reality and fantasy."
"I worked until 1 a.m., which was a great blessing last night, but I got the flu and now I'm playing a very primitive role, so I'm a little bit hard to get rid of it."
"But I'm here, and I'm very grateful."
"It's extraordinary to accept this position at this stage of my life, in this industry, when all these things are going on, for this role." Kidman went on to pay tribute to her colleagues, Jessica Langer and Susan Sarandon



**Something goes wrong**
“He stated the stories perpetrated by the media make for good headlines and wishes Lesseps a happy future filled with love.”
“News they “fell in love,” but it ended quickly, and he was “sad” that two people who loved each other are not an item anymore.”
“AdvertisementAs for their relationship, Tom said to E!”
“Celebrity Insider reported last year that Luann fought the police during a drunken endeavor on Christmas Eve morning.”
“Unfortunately, Luann and Tom separated just seven months later, and since then, Lesseps has found herself in serious trouble with the law.”
“It’s the place where they got married during a New Years Eve party, an extravagant one at that.”
“As most fans know, Palm Beach is a special place in the heart of Tom and Luann.”
“It was a matter of protecting his girlfriend, so there’s no remorse.”
“The insider alleged that the reality star said he only regrets spilling his martini.”
“The insider claims him, and his girlfriend left Cucina – the restaurant they were eating at – without problems or confrontations with the police.”


"He said that the reports made by the media made good headlines and wished lessepp a happy future full of love."
"The news of their" falling in love "came to an end soon. He felt" sad "that the two lovers were no longer an object."
"About their relationship, Tom said to e!"
"Celebrity insiders reported last year that Luan an was fighting with the police when he was drunk and fighting on Christmas Eve morning."
"Unfortunately, Luan and Tom separated only seven months later, and since then, Lesseps has found himself in serious legal trouble."
"This is where they get married at the new year's Eve party. It's a luxury place."
"As most fans know, Palm Beach is a special place in Tom and Luan's mind."
"It's to protect his girlfriend, so there's no regret."
"People familiar with the matter said the reality star said he only regretted spilling his martini."
"People familiar with the matter claimed that he and his girlfriend left Cucina, the restaurant where they were eating, without any problems or conflicts with the police."



Number  332
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Or as you’ll more fondly remember him: Thackery Binx.”
“As well as being an actor and occasional goatee-grower, judging by his Instagram he also…Goes to the dentist occasionally.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“And sometimes he has a goatee, so that’s super-fun too.”
“Well, as some of you may already know, 41-year-old Sean has played Timothy McGee in NCIS since 2003, so he’s still an actor, which is fun.”
“So what has lovely Thackery Sean been up to since we last saw him and his billowy white blouse back in the 90s?”
“Walt Disney PicturesWhich as well as starring Bette Midler, Sarah Jessica Parker, Omri Katz as Max and Thora Birch as adorable little Dani, you’ll also recall young actor Sean Murray.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Or you'll miss him more: sacri Binks."
"As an actor and occasional goatee grower, from his instagram, he also Go to the dentist once in a while. "
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Sometimes he has a goatee, so it's fun, too."
"Well, some of you may already know that Sean, 41, has been playing Timothy McKee in NCIS since 2003, so he's still an actor, which is interesting."
"So, what's he been doing since we last saw the lovely sacri Sean and his white shirt in the '90s?"
"In addition to the Walt Disney movies starring Betty Midler, Sarah Jessica Parker, omry Katz as Max and sola Burch as cute little Dany, you'll also think of young actor Sean Murray."



**Something goes wrong**
“...if you re sampling her you better pay for it and added that she s sitting next to you...”
“While Blige noted that Simone could sing anything Waymon who managed her for many years said that it is the oddest thing for you to induct her because Simone is a non conformist a non traditionalist He warned artists that...”
“Tonight the band that agreed to do me a favor stands before you so I can make this reality a dream."”
“"I thank my lucky stars for the time I got to spend with each of you.”
“"It's about time -- that has been the theme of my weekend," Bon Jovi said, looking at his bandmates.”
“But he kept things mostly positive and sentimental.”
“"I've been writing this speech many days, in many ways -- some days, it's the thank you speech, some days the f--- you speech," he noted, acknowledging the group's long and controversial exclusion from the Rock Hall.”
“20 minute aural career history thanking bandmates management record company executives friends and family...”
“Following remarks by each of the band members If I wrote a book it would be called The Best Time I Ever Had said Sambora returning to the ranks after leaving for good in 2013 Bon Jovi delivered a nearly...”
“Bon Jovi was equally expansive and earnest in his acceptance speech.”


“…… If you want to sample her, you'd better pay and add that she's sitting next to you... "
"Although blich points out that Simone can sing anything, over the years, Vermont, who has run her, says that guiding her is the strangest thing for you, because Simone is an unconventional non traditionalist, and he warns artists that..."
"Tonight, the band that agreed to help me stand in front of you, so I can make this dream come true."
"I thank my lucky star for giving me time to be with each of you."
"It's time - it's always been the theme of my weekend," bonjovi said, looking at his band mates
"But he's always optimistic and sentimental."
"I've been writing this speech for many days, in many ways - sometimes it's a thank you speech, sometimes it's a f --- you speech," he said, admitting that the group has long been excluded from the rock concert hall, causing controversy
"20 minutes of professional history of hearing thanks to band partners for managing record company executives, friends and family..."
"After each band member's comments, if I wrote a book, it would be called the best time I ever said. Sambora came back to the team after leaving forever in 2013, and bonjovi published an almost..."
"Bon Jovi was equally cheerful and serious in his acceptance speech."



**Something goes wrong**
“I might be that I can make these things happen that I create these things and concepts and like I m always going to respect you and I m really glad that you have the respect to call me and tell me that this time about the song and It...”
“You didn’t know who I was before that it’s fine.”
“But if you just focus on the work and you don t let those people sidetrack you someday when you get where you re going you will look around and you will know it was you and the people who love you who put you there and that will be...”
“And as the first woman to win Album of the Year at the Grammys twice, I want to say to the young woman out there, there are going to be people along the way who try to undercut your success or take credit for your accomplishments or your fame.”
“She then offered (what many assumed to be) a not so veiled dig at the rapper during her Grammy awards acceptance speech.”
“...released...”
“To view this video please enable JavaScript and consider upgrading to a web browser that supports HTML5 video Back in February last year when the song was released Taylor released a statement condemning Kanye which he responded to by tweeting that Swift had approved the line well before it was...”
“...bitch when Kanye recited the lyrics which technically wasn t heard on the recordings Kim posted to Snapchat...”
“It s obviously very tongue in cheek either way Kendall Jenner Taylor Swift and Gigi Hadid perform The 1989 World Tour onstage during the British Summertime Picture by Dave Hogan TAS Getty Images for TAS Taylor hit back by claiming that she never heard the use of the word that...”
“The reality star released the video of Kanye West on the phone to Taylor where he recited the lyrics to his song Famous and she told him ‘ I mean go with whatever line you think is better.”


"I may be, I can make these things happen, I create these things and concepts, just like I always have to respect you, I'm really glad you have respect to call me and tell me the song and its time..."
"It doesn't matter that you didn't know who I was before."
"But if you just focus on your work and don't let those people throw you away one day when you go to the place you want to go, you will look around and you will know that you and the people who love you put you there, and that will be..."
"As the first woman to win the album of the year twice at Grammy, I want to say to the young women present that along the way, there will be some people trying to undermine your success, or win glory for your achievements or fame."
"Then, in her acceptance speech at the Grammy Awards ceremony, she made a less subtle dig at the rapper."
“… Release
"To watch this video, please enable JavaScript and consider upgrading to a web browser that supports HTML5 video. When the song was released in February last year, Taylor issued a statement condemning Kanye. He responded on twitter that swift approved the song long before it was released..."
“… Whore, when Kanye recited the lyrics, technically speaking, Kim didn't hear it in the recording released to snapchat... "
"It's clear that Kendall Jenner Taylor swift and Gigi Hadid were joking when they performed on the world tour at the 1989 British Summer Film Festival. TAS Taylor retorted that she had never heard of the use of the word.... "
"The reality TV star released Kanye West's video to Taylor over the phone, in which Taylor recited the lyrics of his song" becoming famous. "Taylor told him," I mean, whatever line you think is better, do it. "



**Something goes wrong**
“I can’t wait for forever… Happy Anniversary.””
“Kardashian told PEOPLE in 2014 that “Kanye likes the blonde” and at the time asked her when she “would ever go back to blonde.”
““Went blonde again for my anniversary it’s @kanyewest’s favorite,” the Keeping Up with the Kardashians reality star, 37, announced on social media Thursday, which also marked the couple’s fourth wedding anniversary.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I am back blonde.”
“Kanye’s favorite is blonde so I did it for our anniversary,” Kardashian West also explained on Instagram Story.”
“In January, she tweeted that her rapper husband, 40, preferred her blonde hair more than her dark hair.”
“She also revealed that West often helps her make her style distinct.”
““I always ask his opinion on everything and he always helps me put together my looks,” she wrote.”
“Image zoom Kim Kardashian WestLooking for more style content?”


"I can't wait Happy anniversary. "
"Kardashian told people in 2014 that" Kanye likes blondes "and asked her" when will she come back to blondes? "
"My anniversary has turned into blonde again, which is @ kanyewest's favorite," the 37 year old reality TV star announced on social media on Thursday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'm back, blonde."
Kardashian West also explained on instagram story, "Kanye's favorite is blondes, so I did it on my anniversary."
"In January, she said on her microblog that her husband, a 40 year old rapper, preferred her blonde hair to her black one."
"She also revealed that West often helped her make her style different."
"I always asked him what he thought of everything, and he always helped me put my face in order," she wrote
"Is Kim Kardashian west looking for more fashion content?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Niceness isn’t something Hadid has to fake, but the vampy characters she portrays in editorials require a Sasha Fierce–esque alter ego—and plenty of on-set chips and guac.”
““If you’re not the nicest, most hardworking girl in the industry, there’s going to be someone prettier, nicer, and more hardworking,” says Hadid, sharing a piece of advice picked up from mom, Yolanda.”
“First step: Listen to your parents.”
“There is, of course, more to Hadid than what’s on her Instagram feed, and here she provides insight into exactly how a model makes the move from bit player to superstar.”
“...never cut your own bangs before a campaign shoot trade secrets even supermodels fall asleep in their makeup and even a Taylor Swift playlist...”
“But if Hadid knows the secrets to happiness and success she s not shy about sharing them and at the Gramercy offices of her agency IMG Models she took on a spirited game of 73 Questions offering up practical advice...”
“The three-time Vogue cover girl is living her best life, and has the boyfriend, career, and jet-setting social life to prove it.”
“Gigi Hadid seems to have it all figured out.”


"Good is not what Hardid has to pretend, but the vampire character she portrays in the editorial needs a Sasa like ferocious self, as well as a lot of live chips and guac."
"If you're not the kindest and most diligent girl in the industry, there will be a more beautiful, better and more diligent girl," Hadid said
"Step one: listen to your parents."
"Of course, Hadid has more than instagram, where she provides insight into how a model can become a superstar from a small role."
“… Never cut bangs, trade secrets, supermodel make-up, or even Taylor Swift's play list before shooting a campaign. "
"However, if Hadid knows the secret of happiness and success, she will share it with others. In the grammercy Office of img model in her organization, she played a dynamic game with 73 questions and provided practical suggestions..."
"The girl who has been on the cover of fashion magazine three times lives her best life, as evidenced by her boyfriend, her career and her social life on the plane."
"Gigi Hadid seems to have made everything clear."



**Something goes wrong**
“Watch Lana Del Rey discussing ‘Cola’ at the 12.18 mark below:AdvertisementLana Del Rey released her latest album ‘Lust For Life’ in July.”
“That would be the only right thing to do”.”
““I thought of that right away.” Asked whether she was “retiring” the track, Del Rey replied: “Definitely.”
“I think they’re really brave for doing that.”“Obviously I don’t feel comfortable with it now,” she said of the song.”
“I support the women who have come forward.”
“I thought it was funny at the time, and I obviously find it really sad now.”
““I’m not really sure.”
“...added...”
“Advertisement The singer has now responded to the speculation in an interview with MTV News confirming When I wrote that song I suppose I had like a Harvey Weinstein Harry Winston type of character in mind I envisioned like a benevolent visual like a Citizen Kane or something Del Rey...”
“It was recently claimed that the song’s lyrics “Ah, he’s in the sky with diamonds” were originally penned as “Harvey’s in the sky with diamonds“.”


"Look at Lana Drey talking about coke at 12:18. Below: advertising Lana Drey released her latest album" longing for life "in July
"That's the only right choice."
"I thought about it right away." When asked if she would "retire" from the track, Drey replied, "of course."
"I think they are really brave." "Obviously, I'm not comfortable with this song right now," she said of the song
"I support women who stand up."
"I thought it was funny at the time, but now I obviously feel sad."
"I'm not sure."
“… Add
"The singer responded to this conjecture in an interview with MTV News, confirming that when I wrote this song, I thought I had a Harvey Weinstein Harry Winston character in my mind. What I imagined was a benevolent image, like Citizen Kane or Drey..."
Recently, it was reported that the lyrics of the song "ah, he and the diamond in the sky" were originally written as "Harvey and the diamond in the sky"



**Something goes wrong**
“Opening up The reality star held little back as she talked of her self esteem issues on the show Penultimate episode Kylie Jenner blamed differences with her family members on the stars during Sunday s episode of Life Of Kylie The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star cited astrological reasons...”
“'I'm not like either of them,' Kylie said during a confessional on the show.”
“...more private relationship with the Antidote singer...”
“Young love Kylie was told by the shaman that her current love has good intentions Kris Jenner enjoys some personal time with the shaman during the season closer of her daughter s reality television show She previously dated rapper Tyga on and off for nearly two years before starting a...”
“...referring to Kylie's current boyfriend Travis Scott.”
“Kris can be heard in the background asking, 'Does it start with T?'”
“Kylie looks to her friend and jokingly reassures her friend, 'Inside of me'.”
“He's inside, looking at you,' the shaman said.”
“...life and relationships Yes he has good intentions...”
“Healer The 20 year old reality television personality brings her mother Kris Jenner and best friend Jordyn Wood along to meet with a shaman in Peru and ask him questions about their personal lives Love advice The makeup maven proceeds to ask the healer for some insight into her love...”


"When she talked about her self-esteem in the penultimate episode of the show, the reality TV star hardly flinched. Kelly Jenner blamed the stars for the differences with her family members in Sunday's" Kelly's life ", while the stars in" keep up with Kardashian "cited astrological reasons..."
"I'm not the same as either of them," Kelly said at the show's confessions
“… Have more personal relationships with the antidote singer... "
"Young Kelly is told by the shaman that her love now has a good intention. Chris Jenner enjoys a private time with the shaman in the ratings of her daughter's reality TV show. She has been dating rapper TEGA intermittently for nearly two years before starting a..."
“… Carly's current boyfriend, Travis Scott
"Chris can be heard backstage asking," does it start with a t? "
"Kelly looked at her friend and jokingly comforted her friend," in my heart. "
"He's in there, looking at you," said the shaman
“… Life and relationships yes, he has good intentions... "
"The therapist's 20-year-old reality TV character brought her mother, Chris Jenner, and her best friend, Jordan wood, to meet with the Peruvian shaman and ask him about their personal life. Love's advice. The makeup artist continues to ask for some in-depth understanding of her love therapist..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Last year’s Supporting Actress winner Viola Davis presented the award.”
“But he was a great inspiration and a great theater director.”
“The Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri actor sweetly gave the late Hoffman a shoutout at the end of his speech.”
““This is for my old buddy, Phil Hoffman,” he said.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In the press room backstage, the actor elaborated on why he gave Hoffman the shoutout.”
““He was an old friend of mine.”
“He directed me in a play for public theater.”
“He was very close to me and an inspiration to all of my peers,” he said.”
““People like Jeffrey Wright, Billy Crudup, Liev Schreiber, Mark Ruffalo, Josh Brolin — whoever was in my age range, Phil Hoffman was the guy.”He continued, “He was a great director, he believed in theater.”


"Last year's supporting actress, Viola Davis, presented this award."
"But he was a great inspiration and a great theater director."
At the end of his speech, Missouri actor Hoffman gave a sweet shout on three billboards after the tide had gone out
"It's for my old friend Phil Hoffman," he said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In the press room backstage, the actor explained in detail why he yelled at Hoffman
"He's an old friend of mine."
"He directed a public play for me."
"He is very close to me and is an inspiration to all my peers," he said
"People like Jeffrey Wright, Billy Crudup, Liv Schreber, mark rufaro, Josh broiling - Phil Hoffman is whoever I am at my age." He went on, "he's a great director, he believes in drama."



**Something goes wrong**
“...of the company or fair value for Lewis and Clark s interest payment of salaries bonuses in kind benefits and distributions they would have received as partners...”
“Since the show debuted the suit says Magnolia has grown from a single agent firm to one that employs over 93 real estate agents and a support staff and now operates in nearly every major city in Texas In addition to monetary damages the suit seeks rescission of the sale...”
“I’m not the toughest guy there is, but I can assure you that would not end well for [R]ick,” the text read, according to the suit.”
“And if he’s not ready to do that he better shut his mouth.”
“And when people talk to me that way they get their asses kicked.”
“...buyout the suit alleges Gaines sent a text advising Lewis to tell Clark to be careful I don t come from the nerdy prep school he s from...”
“The suit which also names Magnolia Realty Scripps Networks Interactive Scripps networks LLC and High Noon Entertainment which produces the show claims Gaines pressured Lewis and Clark to sell before they discovered the company s value was radically enhanced by Fixer Upper When Clark balked at the terms of the...”
“"With this insider information in hand, Chip Gaines convinced plaintiffs to sell their membership interests in Magnolia Realty quickly to him before a public announcement that “Fixer Upper” was picked up by HGTV."”
“Gaines bought their shares of Magnolia Real estate for $2,500 each, the suit says.”
“The suit claims Gaines worked out a deal with HGTV for the “Fixer Upper” program without telling his partners and that Gaines planned on featuring the Magnolia brand name.”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“It was our mistake too, and we regret it," the network said in a statement.”
““Those words should not have been aired.”
“TBS also apologized for the off-color comment, but indicated that the quick-snapping host would not face punishment.”
““The language used by Samantha Bee last night is vile and vicious,” White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders said.”
“The "Daily Show" alumna later apologized for her remarks, but not before the White House said "Full Frontal" was "not fit for broadcast."”
“ADVERTISEMENT“You know, Ivanka, that’s a beautiful photo of you and your child, but let me just say, one mother to another: Do something about your dad’s immigration practices, you feckless c---," Bee said.”
“On her Wednesday night show, Bee knocked the first daughter and White House adviser over posting a photo with her young son while the Trump administration separates immigrant families at the border.”
“— Autotrader (@AutoTrader_com) May 31, 2018Autotrader was the first known sponsor of the show to cut ties with Bee, though it was followed soon after by insurer State Farm.”
“As a result, we have suspended our sponsorship of Full Frontal with Samantha Bee.”
“The comments expressed by Samantha Bee were offensive and unacceptable and do not reflect the views of our company.”


"It was also our fault and we regret that," the network said in a statement
"Those words should not have been said."
"TBS also apologized for the dishonorable comment, but said that the DJ would not face punishment."
"The language Samantha bee used last night was mean and vicious," White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders said
"The alumnus of the" Daily Show "later apologized for his remarks, but before that, the White House said that" full positive "was not suitable for broadcasting
"Advertisement" you know, Ivanka, this is a beautiful picture of you and your children, but I just want to say that one mother said to another: do something about your father's immigration, you incompetent C -, "said the bee."
"On Wednesday night's show, when the trump administration was isolating immigrant families at the border, bee knocked down her first daughter and White House adviser because she posted a picture with her young son."
"- autotrader (@ autotrader / u com) on March 31, 2015, autotrader was the first known sponsor of the show to sever its relationship with bee, but it was later acquired by state farm, an insurance company."
"As a result, we suspended full sponsorship with Samantha bee."
"The comments made by Samantha bee are offensive, unacceptable and do not reflect the views of our company."



Number  342
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In regards to the latter two treatments, Rouleau likes Joanna Vargas's Daily Serum (for peptides) and her Pore + Wrinkle Perfecting Serum (for exfoliation).”
“Before going in with foundation she likes Chanel s Ultra Le Teint Velvet because it contains sun protection Rouleau piles on either her brand s Weightless Protection SPF 30 which is made with micronized zinc oxide green tea and licorice...”
“...it to be effective...”
“In fact, in the morning, she only uses four products, including SPF.”
“"My morning go-to cleanser is the Moisture Protecting Cleanser because it's really gentle and low-foaming, so it never leaves my skin feeling tight or dry," she says.”
“"I then apply an alcohol-free toner, which is Shani Darden's Sake Toning Essence, to damp skin and immediately follow with my next product to lock in the hydrating benefits that the toner offer."”
“Next up, Rouleau applies a vitamin C serum — her Vitamin C & E Treatment, to be exact.”
“"It has a lot of antioxidants that are required during the day to defend against environmental damage and it's also great for keeping my summer heat-induced pigmentation under control," she says.”
“...extract or Elta MD s Physical Sunscreen SPF 41”
“"And on the third night, I'll use an exfoliating acid serum to keep my pores clear and the skin even-toned."”


As for the latter two treatments, Rouleau love Joanna Vargas's daily essence (for peptides) and her pores + Wrinkle Essence (for exfoliating).
"Before entering the foundation, she liked Chanel's super telt velvet because it contained sunscreen rouleau or piled on her brand's weightlessness protection SPF 30, which was made from micronized zinc oxide, green tea and licorice..."
“… It works... "
"In fact, she only used four products in the morning, including SPF."
"My morning cleanser is a moisturizing cleansing milk, because it is very mild and low foam, so it doesn't make my skin feel tight or dry," she said.
"Then I moisten the skin with a non-alcoholic toner, that is, the Sally Dalton wine refreshing essence, and then immediately use my next product to lock up the replenishment effect of toner."
"Next, Lulu will use vitamin c serum - her vitamin C & E therapy, to be exact."
"It has a lot of antioxidants that are necessary to protect the environment during the day, and it's also good for controlling my summer heat induced pigmentation," she said
“… Extract or elta MD s physical Sunscreen SPF 41 "
"On the third night, I will use the exfoliating acid extract to keep the pores clean and keep the skin evenly."



Number  343
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Dating from 1953, the vintage choice features European-cut diamond clocks framed by 16 sapphires, and the petals are set with single-cut diamonds.”
“Mary-Kate now lives in New York with her family in a $6.25 million townhouse.”
“Rex FeaturesSpeaking to The Edit, in which she and twin sister Ashley pose for a photoshoot, Mary-Kate said: "I think we’re lucky [working hard] comes quite naturally for us.”
“We don’t need so much time to sit and think and ponder.”
“Advertisement"But then I have a husband, two step-kids and a life; I have to go home and cook dinner.”
“I run on the weekend."”
“She continued: "You find the thing that helps you relax and if you don’t have it, you have to look for it.”
“Or you get burned out and then you’re not productive."”
“Read next As Mary-Kate and Ashley hit Netflix(!”
“), we take a trip down memory lane with the coolest style sisters Celebrity Fashion As Mary-Kate and Ashley hit Netflix(!”


Since 1953, this old-fashioned clock has adopted 16 sapphire inlaid European cut diamond clocks, with single cut diamond inlaid on the petals
"Mary Kate is living with her family in a $6.25 million townhouse in New York."
"I think we're lucky (to work hard) to come to us naturally," Mary Kate said in the clip of Rex feature's photo with her twin sister Ashley
"We don't need that much time to sit down and think and think."
"Advertising" but I have a husband, two stepsons and life; I have to go home and cook
"I run on weekends."
"You find something to help you relax, and if you don't, you have to look for it," she added
"Otherwise you'll be exhausted, and then you'll be inefficient."
"Read Mary Kate and Ashley hit Netflix (!"
"), when Mary Kate and Ashley boarded Netflix, we took the coolest fashion sisters to travel along the road of memory (!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Irma — one of the strongest storms ever recorded on the Atlantic — has killed at least 11 people in St. Martin, St. Bart, Barbuda and Anguilla.”
“Thank you Kristin,” Gad concluded his caption of a selfie with his parents and Bell.”
“I adore you," Gad said to his Frozen costar on TwitterJosh Gad is crediting his Frozen costar Kristen Bell with helping his family stay safe as Hurricane Irma approaches.”
“The Beauty in the Beast star, 36, expressed his thanks to Bell, 37, on Twitter after she helped his family in the midst of Hurricane Irma.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““So @kristenanniebell literally saved my parents and my entire family tonight from #hurricaneirma,” said the Hollywood, Florida native on Friday evening.”
““When they were stranded in Florida, she got them a hotel room at her hotel in Orlando and saved them, my brothers, my sister-in-law and niece and nephew.”
“They don’t make them like this girl.”
“Image zoomMillions are evacuating from Florida but not everyone has been able to get out of the state, Bell and Gad’s family are among them.”
“The highly destructive Hurricane Irma left at least one million Puerto Rico residents without power as it continues to roar through the Caribbean.”


"Elma - one of the strongest storms in Atlantic history - has killed at least 11 people in St. Martin, St. Barthes, Barbuda and Anguilla."
"Thank you, Christine," said GAD, ending his self portrait with his parents and bell
"I adore you," GAD told his frozen partner on twitter. Josh Gade praised his freezing partner, Christine bell, for helping his family stay safe during Hurricane IRMA
The 36 year old star of the beast tweeted thanks to 37 year old bell for helping his family during Hurricane IRMA
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"So @ kristenniebel really saved my parents and my entire family from the hurricane tonight," the Hollywood native of Florida said Friday night
"When they were trapped in Florida, she arranged a room for them at the hotel in Orlando and saved them, my brother, my sister-in-law, niece and nephew."
"They're not like this girl."
"Millions of people are evacuating from Florida, but not everyone can leave the state, and the families of Bell and gard are among them."
"The devastating hurricane IRMA continues to wreak havoc in the Caribbean, leaving at least one million Puerto ricans without electricity."



Number  345
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hollywood Medium airs on Wednesdays at 9:00 PM on E!”
“Brooke Burn also looks to Tyler for some answers about a double tragedy and Tyler finds out something disturbing about Linda Blair’s dog rescue.”
“Also on this episode, Shanola Hampton is given a reading as a gift from her co-star Amy Smart and makes a very deep connection with her late mother.”
“Talking to the camera Brett says: “I kept saying to myself he’s making this up he’s making this up, but he just hit that…pretty amazing.”He goes on to say that Tyler “gave him chills and it was a good feeling”.”
“Sign up for our TV newsletter!”
“He used to teach them how to maintain cars and how to do tasks like changing a tyre.”
“This latter point really nails it for Brett as he tells Tyler he did have a grandfather who ran a gas service station for 40 years.”
“A practical man who is good with his hands and has a knack with cars.”
“However, when he sits down with Tyler his mood seems to change as the medium starts to describe contact with a strong older man, someone who the whole family turns to.”
“This week on Hollywood Medium, Country music star Brett Eldredge is pretty sceptical about the whole idea of contacting the dead.”


"Hollywood on Wednesday at 9:00 p.m. in E!"
"Brooke Bourne also asked Taylor for answers about double tragedies, and Taylor discovered some disturbing things about Linda Blair's rescue of dogs."
"Also in this episode, shanola Hampton receives a book, which is a gift from her partner Amy Smart. She has a deep connection with her late mother."
Brett said to the camera, "I've been talking to myself, he's making it up, but he just hit that It's amazing. " He went on to say that Taylor "made him cold and feel good."
"Sign up for our TV news release!"
"He used to teach them how to maintain their cars and how to do things like changing tires."
"The latter point is very important to Brett because he told Taylor that he did have a gas station that his grandfather had run for 40 years."
"A doer with a good hand and a good car."
"However, when he sat with Taylor, his mood seemed to have changed, and the media began to describe his contact with a strong old man, a person whose family all turned to for help."
"In the Hollywood media this week, country music star Brett Eldredge was quite skeptical about the whole idea of connecting with the dead."



Number  346
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“On the comedy side, new BET series The Comedy Get Down premieres tonight.”
“BET’s scripted series portfolio recently got a boost with two high-profile transfers from VH1, The Breaks and Hit the Floor.”
“The network has ordered a two-hour movie, which will serve as a series finale.”
“It will air in 2018.”
“A series finale movie makes for a full circle, giving Being Mary Jane fitting bookends.”
“The series started with a highly rated TV movie which drew 4 million viewers for its July 2013 premiere jump starting the series which premiered the following January The decision to go with a movie in lieu of a fifth season pickup comes three weeks after Being Mary Jane s...”
“Season 4 finale aired on Sept 19”
“Union, who stars as successful TV news anchor Mary Jane Paul, is set to return for the finale.”
“It is unclear yet who else from the cast will be back, with the movie’s producing team also TBD.”
“For the first three seasons, Being Mary Jane was run by creator Mara Brock Akil who, along with her husband/fellow Being Mary Jane executive producer Salim Akil, left last year for an overall deal at Warner Bros. TV.”


"Comedy," the new bet series comedy "fall" premiered tonight
"Bate's script portfolio has recently been upgraded, with two high-profile transfers of VH1, namely" the breakthroughs "and" the hit the floor. "
"The station has ordered a two-hour film that will be the end of a series."
"It's going to air in 2018."
"The ending of a series, the film has a complete cycle, making Mary Jane the right ending."
"The series started with a high ratings TV movie, and its premiere in July 2013 attracted 4 million viewers. The series premiered in January of the following year. The decision to replace season 5 with a movie came three weeks after becoming Mary Jane
"Season 4 finale broadcast on September 19"
"Union, played by the successful TV news anchor Mary Jane Paul, will return in the final episode."
"It's not clear who will come back from the cast, and the film production team has yet to be determined."
"In the first three seasons, being Mary Jane was directed by Creator Marla Brock Aguirre, who and her husband / partner, Salim Aguirre, executive producer of Mary Jane, left Warner Bros. last year to make an overall deal with her."



Number  347
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...now on Amazon and wherever magazines are sold...”
“We are proud to once again partner with our friends at NBC for this very special look at the trials and triumphs of the Pearson family before the series returns for its highly anticipated third season PEOPLE s new special edition The Complete Guide to This Is Us is available...”
“RELATED VIDEO: Why Milo Ventimiglia Says His ‘Foul Mouth’ Gets Him Into Trouble on Set“Upon its 2016 premiere, This Is Us captured the hearts of viewers and immediately took its place as one of television’s most beloved dramas,” said Maureen J. Reidy, the Paley Center’s President & CEO.”
“Per Deadline, the writers, producers, and stars Milo Ventimiglia, Mandy Moore, Sterling K. Brown, Chrissy Metz, Justin Hartley, Chris Sullivan and Susan Kelechi Watson will all participate.”
“The one-hour special will introduce the new season with clips, cast interviews and a behind-the-scenes look at how the show comes together each week, as well as highlights from the first two seasons.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Tuesday, NBC announced that they will air The Paley Center Salutes This Is Us on Sept. 18 ahead of the season 3 premiere, Deadline reports.”
“The one-hour special will introduce the new season with clips, cast interviews and moreNBC to Air This Is Us Special Ahead of Season 3 PremiereThis Is Us fans, rejoice: The show will be back in our lives sooner than we thought.”


“… Now on Amazon and wherever magazines are sold... "
"It's a great honor for us to work with NBC friends again. Before the release of the much anticipated new special edition of the third season of people, this is our complete guide, we will pay special attention to the test and victory of the Pearson family..."
"Related videos: why Milo Ventimiglia said his" Stinky mouth "got him into trouble on the set," said Maureen J. Reid, President and CEO of Perry center. "When it premiered in 2016," this is us "caught the audience's heart and immediately became one of the most popular TV series."
"According to the deadline, writers, producers and stars Milo Ventimiglia, Mandy Moore, Stirling K. brown, Chris Metz, Justin Hartley, Chris Sullivan and Susan kellich Watson will all attend."
"This one hour special will introduce the new season and highlights of the previous two seasons through editing, actor interviews and weekly behind the scenes observation."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Tuesday, NBC announced that they will broadcast" Pali center salutes us "before the season 3 premiere on September 18."
"The one hour special will introduce the new season through editing, actor interviews and more NBC shows, which will be broadcast before the premiere of the third season. This is our special. This is our fans. Happy: this play will come back to our lives earlier than we thought."



**Something goes wrong**
“Check out who is playing whom in the upcoming movie below, and click here to read about all the live-action reboots in the works at Disney.”
“The film is currently in production, as the actors have been giving updates on social media, and is set for a May 2019 release.”
“The 1992 animated film, featuring voices from Robin Williams, Scott Weinger and Linda Larkin, is being remade by Guy Ritchie, who is serving as co-writer and director of a star-studded cast.”
“Getty Images (Scott, Massoud); Photofest (Stills)Following the recent success of live-action remakes of The Jungle Book and Beauty and the Beast, Disney is rebooting another classic with Aladdin.”


"Check out who is playing who in the upcoming movie below, and then click here to read about the restart of all Disney live action movies."
"The film is currently in production and is scheduled to be released in May 2019 as actors keep up-to-date on social media."
The 1992 animated film, featuring the voices of Robin Williams, Scott Arsene and Linda Larkin, was remade by Guy Ritchie. Guy Ritchie is a co-author and director of a star actor
Following the recent success of the live remake of the jungle book and beauty and the beast, Disney has reinterpreted another classic with Aladdin



Number  349
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The organization is on the front lines of the immigration battle in Texas.”
“— jimmy fallon (@jimmyfallon) June 25, 2018The Refugee and Immigrant Center for Education and Legal Services, or RAICES, is the largest immigration legal services provider in Texas.”
“In honor of the President’s tweet I’ll be making a donation to RAICES in his name.”
“"In honor of the President’s tweet I’ll be making a donation to RAICES in his name," Fallon said, referring to a nonprofit organization that provides free and low-cost legal services to immigrant children, families and refugees in Texas.”
“— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) June 25, 2018Fallon responded on Twitter with a nod to the plight of young immigrants caught up in administration policies.”
“He called & said “monster ratings.” Be a man Jimmy!”
“@jimmyfallon is now whimpering to all that he did the famous “hair show” with me (where he seriously messed up my hair), & that he would have now done it differently because it is said to have “humanized” me-he is taking heat.”
“The president tweeted Sunday:.”
“Fallon's latest comments, however, didn’t appear to sit well with Trump.”
“"But I'm trying not to anyway," Trump replied.”


"The organization is at the forefront of the immigration struggle in Texas."
"Jimmy Fallon (@ jimmyfallon) June 25, 2018 refugee and immigration education and legal services center, or Raices, is the largest provider of immigration legal services in Texas."
"To commemorate the president's tweet, I will donate to rice in his name."
"To commemorate the president's Twitter, I will donate to rice in his name," said Fallon, referring to a non-profit organization that provides free and low-cost legal services to immigrant children, families and refugees in Texas
"- Donald J. trump (@ realDonaldTrump) 2018june 25, Fallon responded on Twitter to the plight of young immigrants obsessed with government policies."
He called and said, "monster ratings.". Be a man, Jimmy
"@ jimmyfallon laments for the famous hairstyle show he and I did together (he seriously messed up my hair) & he will do it differently now, because it is said that he has humanized me and he is warming up."
The president tweeted: "Sunday."
"However, it seems that Fallon's latest remarks are not suitable for trump."
Trump replied, "but I try not to do it anyway."



Number  350
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Mathew Lewis and Angela Jones | Credit: Frazer Harrison/Getty ImagesSince he debuted in the big-screen Harry Potter franchise as Longbottom when he was just 12 years old, Lewis has gone on to land roles in Me Before You and Amazon’s newest series, Ripper Street.”
““She’s American, so we’ve got quite a lot of things to discuss about location and whatnot before we get anywhere,” he said at the time.”
“The happy couple stepped out at the premiere of fellow Harry Potter alum Emma Watson’s Beauty and the Beast just a few month after their engagement.”
“Lewis told PEOPLE in March 2017 that he and Jones hadn’t started planning the wedding just yet.”
“They later started dating in July 2016.”
“The two first met in January of that year at a celebration at the Wizarding World of Harry Potter, where she worked.”
“The two reportedly got engaged in Paris by the Eiffel Tower in November 2016, according to a TMZ screenshot of the event planner’s private Instagram page.”
“He later posted the same picture on Instagram with the American and U.K. flag emojis as the caption.”
“Fuming,” Lewis joked alongside a stunning photo of the two from their wedding.”
““Not only did I miss @ArcticMonkeys in LA but they were performing in Italy at the same time we were there and my wife made me get married instead.”


"Image zooming Matthew Lewis and Angela Jones | source: Fraser Harrison / Getty Images Lewis has played roles in" I'm before you "and Amazon's latest series" Ripper Street "since his 12-year-old debut as Longbottom in the Harry Potter big screen series."
"She's American, so we have a lot of things to talk about before we get anywhere," he said at the time
"Just a few months after their engagement, the happy couple attended the premiere of Harry Potter alumni Emma Watson's beauty and the beast."
"Lewis told people in March 2017 that he and Jones had not yet started planning their wedding."
"They later started dating in July 2016."
"The two met for the first time at a celebration in the wizarding world of Harry Potter where she works."
"It is reported that the two were engaged near the Eiffel Tower in Paris in November 2016, according to the TMZ screenshot of the event planner's private instagram page."
He later put the same picture on instagram with American and British flag emoticons.
Lewis joked and put an amazing picture of their wedding
"Not only did I miss @ arcticmonkeys in Los Angeles, but they were performing as we went to Italy, and my wife married me."



**Something goes wrong**
“Related: Emma Stone and Jennifer Lawrence Became Friends in the Most Millennial WayBrie Larson Ran from Boulders at Her Indiana Jones Themed Birthday Party:”
“After the 2017 Academy Awards, Larson posted a picture to Instagram of her embracing a tearful Stone.”
“Larson spoke with Vanity Fair for its May issue about her friendships with the other A-list actresses, revealing that the trio has become each other’s support system through a group text—which also happens to include Lena Dunham and Amy Schumer.”
“(It keeps getting better.)”
“The actress explained that she began to rely on the women during the grueling and uncomfortable process of promoting her Oscar-winning work in Room.”
““I felt lonely and bad sometimes.”
“I was embarrassed to keep talking about myself,” she said.”
“An unexpected but “beautiful” email from Stone and a text from Lawrence, turned into powerful relationships.”
““That [group of friends] saved my life,” she said.”
““I was able to talk with them about everything that was going on in my life, and it was with people who had been through it before and are also hilarious.”


"Related reports: Emma stone and Jennifer Lawrence ran out of boulders to become the most millennial friends at her Indiana Jones themed birthday party."
"After the 2017 Oscars, Larson posted a picture of her embracing the tear stone on instagram."
In a may issue of vanity fair, Larson talked about her friendship with other first-line actresses and revealed that the three actresses have become a support system for each other through a set of texts, which also happen to include Lena Dunham and Amy Schumer
(things are getting better.)
"The actress explained that in promoting her Oscar winning work in the room, she began to rely on women."
"I feel lonely and sad sometimes."
"I've been talking about myself and I feel embarrassed," she said
An unexpected but "beautiful" email from stone and a text message from Lawrence became a powerful relationship
"Those friends saved my life," she said
"I'm able to talk to them about what's going on in my life, and it's funny to talk to people I've been through before."



**Something goes wrong**
“It notes that the American Music Awards winners are voted entirely by fans.”
“According to a press release, American Music Awards nominees are based on key fan interactions as reflected in Billboard Magazine and on Billboard.com, including album and digital song sales, radio airplay, streaming, social activity and touring.”
“Voting for all other editorial categories closes on Monday, Nov. 13 at 8:59:59 a.m. PST.”
“Voting for Artist of the Year opened today and will close on Thursday, Nov. 16 at 8:59:59 p.m. PST.”
“Kendrick Lamar and Ed Sheeran...”
“As the kickoff to this year s highly anticipated show Ciara today announced six categories from the 2017 American Music Awards nominees live on ABC s Good Morning America Related Content 2016 American Music Awards Winners Updated List The Artist of the Year nominees are Bruno Mars The Chainsmokers Drake...”
“The Chainsmokers, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, Ed Sheeran and The Weeknd each have five nominations, while Justin Bieber, Daddy Yankee and Luis Fonsi each received four.”
“Bruno Mars leads the nominations for the 45th annual American Music Awards, which take place at the Microsoft Theater in Los Angeles on Sunday, Nov. 19 at 8 p.m. on ABC.”


"It points out that the winners of the American music awards are entirely voted by fans."
"According to a press release, the American Music Awards nomination is based on key fan interactions reflected in billboards, magazines, etc Billboard.com Website, including album and digital song sales, broadcast, streaming, social events and tours. "
"Voting for all other editorial categories will close at 8:59:59 am PST on Monday, November 13."
"The annual artist vote starts today and ends at 8:59:59 PM PST on Thursday, November 16."
"Kendrick Lamar and ED Sheeran..."
"As the launch of this year's much anticipated show, Ciara today announced six categories in the nominations list for the 2017 American Music Awards. ABC's "Good Morning America" related content 2016 American Music Award winners update list the best artist of the year nomination list is Bruno Mars, Drake... "
"Chain smoker, Drake, Kendrick Lamar, ed Sheeran and weekend each received five nominations, while Justin Bieber, Yankee dad and Louis fonsey each received four."
Bruno Mars is nominated for the 45th annual American Music Awards, which will be held on November 19 (Sunday) at 8 p.m. at ABC's Microsoft theater in Los Angeles



**Something goes wrong**
“What’s a journey without a few bruises along the way.””
“Why not share that?”
“So, you know what?”
“I can t do what they did Auli i adds I love dancing in the comfort of my own home...”
“I don t know how they do it I was thinking about it in my trailer I was like I could and then I hit my hand into the wall and I m like Clearly not I can sing but...”
““I actually get to be somewhat of a normal 16-year-old and it’s all I can ask for right now.”But, before she leaves, we have to know — is Dancing With The Stars in the cards for her?”
“Auli’i adds that she’ll be attending her first prom, too!”
““I’m really excited to be back on my home island, and to see my family, my friends, to see my cat,” she shared just after performing on Dancing With The Stars earlier this week.”
“Performing at the Oscars and working on a new pilot are pretty exciting things, however, Auli’i Cravalho is more excited about going home.”


"It's a journey without a few bruises along the way."
"Why not share?"
"Well, you know what?"
"I can't do what they do, I added that I like to dance comfortably in my own home..."
"I don't know how they did it, what I thought in the trailer, I thought I could do it, and then I hit my hand against the wall, I obviously can't sing, but..."
"In fact, I've become a normal 16-year-old, which is the only thing I can ask for now." But before she leaves, we have to know - is she dancing with the stars on the card? "
Ollie added, "she's going to her first dance, too!"
"I'm really happy to go back to my hometown and see my family, my friends and my cat," she said after performing dance with the stars earlier this week
"It's very exciting to perform at the Oscars and work for a new pilot, but Ollie crevalho is even more excited about going home."



**Something goes wrong**
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“...const FP = tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's what I'd like to know. What I'd like to know before I buy my first book is that it's famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers."
“… Const FP = tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Experts who have learned a lot from the whole process of purchasing my first house have acquired the skill of starting a side push. "



**Something goes wrong**
“While we’re not sure what inspired Joe to reach out to the teenager, we’re glad to see that he’s making an effort.”
“Wow, Blanket has really grown up!!”
“Adios.”The controversial talent manager also took to Twitter to share a sweet pic of himself and Blanket (below).”
“Take care man, be good and I see you next time I come to LA, OK?”
“Above all, I love you all.”
“Nonetheless, Joe did leave Blanket with some words of support, as he concluded:“Be like me: Be tough, be tough in a good way and you’ll live a long time.”
“Still, it wouldn’t be the first time a grandparent has confused facts regarding their grandkids.”
“Not to mention, it was 20-year-old Prince who ended up in the hospital after a motorcycle accident.”
“...seem a bit confused as he urged Blanket to stay off bikes and to tell his brothers he said hello For starters Blanket has a brother Prince Jackson and a sister Paris Jackson...”
“Enjoy life see lots of good movies stay healthy and remember I do love you The industry vet expressed a similar sentiment in his rambling video as he elaborated as to why the Thriller s singer tried to disguise him as much as possible Although the 89 year old does...”


"Although we're not sure what prompted Joe to come into contact with the teenager, we're happy to see that he's trying."
"Wow, the blanket has really grown up!"
"Goodbye." The controversial talent manager also shared a sweet picture of himself and the blanket on twitter (see below)
"Take care, man. I'll see you next time I come to Los Angeles, OK?"
"Most of all, I love you."
Even so, Joe left some supportive words on the blanket, concluding: "just like me: be strong, be strong, and you'll live a long life."
"Nevertheless, this is not the first time grandparents have confused the facts about their grandchildren."
"Not to mention the 20-year-old prince who was admitted to the hospital after the motorcycle accident."
“… It seems a little confused because he urged the blanket to stay away from the bicycle and told his brother that he said hello, first of all, the blanket has a brother Prince Jackson and a sister Paris Jackson... "
"Enjoy life, watch a lot of good movies, keep healthy, and remember that I really love you. The veteran of this industry expressed similar feelings in his rambling video. He explained in detail why the thriller singer tried to disguise him as much as possible, even though the 89 year old singer did..."



**Something goes wrong**
“All times are Eastern/Pacific.”
“The Flash premieres October 9 at 8 p.m., Supergirl premieres October 14 at 8 p.m., Arrow premieres October 15 at 9 p.m,, and Legends of Tomorrow premieres October 22 at 8 p.m. on the CW.”
“If that weren’t enough, it was announced at Comic-Con that The Flash is getting another queer character this season, but just who that will be is top secret so far.”
“The Flash’s queer characters include Wentworth Miller’s Citizen Cold, who appeared on Legends for a time but will return to Star City for a few episodes this season, where he won’t be the only out character, considering Police Captain David Singh (Patrick Sabongui) is gay and married.”
“But even before Supergirl and Black Lightning, Berlanti’s shows with masked and/or caped characters already featured plenty of LGBTQ characters including Legends of Tomorrow’s Sarah Lance (Caity Lotz), who began her stint on Arrow, which now features a married gay superhero with Mister Terrific (Echo Kellum).”
“Last season, the CW’s outstanding Black Lightning introduced a lesbian superhero of color in Anissa Pierce (Nafessa Williams), whose superhero name is Thunder.”
“This season, the series introduces TV's first transgender superhero with Nia Nal, or Dreamer (played by trans actress Nicole Maines).”
“Season 2 of Supergirl saw Supergirl Kara Danvers’s sister Alex (Chyler Leigh) come out and fall in love with a woman.”
“Super-producer Greg Berlanti and the CW continue to provide some of the most forward-thinking queer representation in television with the ever-growing list of LGBTQ characters on the superhero-themed shows.”


"All the time it's East / Pacific."
"Flash" premiered at 8 p.m. on October 9, "super girl" premiered at 8 p.m. on October 14, "arrow" premiered at 9 p.m. on October 15, "Legend of tomorrow" premiered at 8 p.m. on October 22 at CW
"If that's not enough, it was announced at the comics conference that flash will get another queer character this season, but so far, who will be the top secret."
"Flash's homosexual roles include Wentworth Miller's citizen cold, who appeared in legend for a while, but will return to star city for several episodes this season. Considering that police captain David Singh (Patrick sabangie) is gay and married, he will not be the only one to play."
"But even before super girl and black lightning, there were many LGBTQ characters in brandy's mask and / or cape, including Sarah lance (Katie Lotz) in legend of tomorrow. She started her life in arrow, now starring a married gay superhero and echo Kellum)
"Last season, CW's outstanding black lightning introduced a lesbian of color superhero named thunder into Anisha Pierce (nafesa Williams)
This season, the show will launch its first transgender superhero on TV, CO starring with NIA nal or dreamer (played by transgender actress Nicole Maines)
"Super Girl Season 2 sees super girl Carla Danvers' sister Alex (Shiller Lee) come out and fall in love with a woman."
"Super producers Greg brandy and CW continue to provide some of the most forward-looking gay representatives on TV, and the list of LGBTQ characters on superhero theme shows is growing."



**Something goes wrong**
“As for Archie breaking up with Veronica, don't worry: This isn't the true end of Varchie.”
“He is kind of just spiraling into a dark kind of place, but is saved by a person and by music."”
“"They have to go their separate ways at some point.”
“"Eventually, they end up finding themselves [at] the fork in the road," Apa reveals.”
“But the fun times don't last forever, unfortunately.”
“Both Sprouse and Apa say that filming Archie and Jughead's road trip was some of the most fun that they've had on this show so far, and that's going to translate onscreen as well.”
“Now that's a relief!”
“"By the time [Jughead] goes with Archie, [his obsession with Gryphons and Gargoyles] is pretty much gone."”
“The CWSprouse then drops even better news.”
“It's really just Archie and Jughead for a little bit and it's a lot of fun and they’re on the lam and they're running away, kind of Stand By Me."”


"As for the breakup between Archie and Veronica, don't worry, it's not the real ending for watts."
"It's kind of like he went into a dark place, but he was saved by a man and music."
"They're going to go their separate ways one day."
"In the end, they found themselves (at) a fork in the road," APA revealed
"But unfortunately, happy times don't last forever."
"Both sprout and APA said that shooting Archie and juhaide's road trip is the most interesting part of their show so far, which will also be reflected on the screen."
"Now it's a relief!"
"By the time [PigHead] goes with Archie, (his obsession with Gryphon and Gargoyle) is almost gone."
"Then cwsproouse will post better news."
"It's really just Archie and Jughead for a while. It's fun. They're running away and supporting me a little bit."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"They start the show as a united front, entering together from above the stage.”
“It's been almost a year since the couple welcomed daughter Rumi and son Sir, and they may have finally shared new pics of their bundles of joy during their On the Run II tour kickoff in Cardiff, Wales, on Wednesday.”
“Fans quickly took to social media to share pics of the screens at the beginning of the concert, which show the proud parents cradling two babies.”
“In one pic, Beyonce wears her hair in braids and dons a cream dress while, on the opposite side of the stage, her rapper husband is in the same pose.”
“In between the two are the phrases, "Love Is Universal" and "Love Never Changes."”
“But just as fans were getting worked up, ET learned that the babies in question were not actually Rumi and Sir.”
“JAY-Z & Beyoncé with The Twins Sir & Rumi Carter.”
“ pic.twitter.com/FzsFRf6hJC — BEYONCÉ DIVA (@BEYDlVA) June 6, 2018However, later on in the show, the real Carter twins appeared along with Blue Ivy during what appears to be an intimate vow renewal ceremony.”
“Beyonce's mother, who is also seen in the holding Rumi in the footage, confirmed these were in fact the real twins when she shared the pic on Instagram along with the caption, "My babies."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"They started acting as a united front, coming together from above the stage."
"It's been almost a year since the couple welcomed their daughter, rummy, and their son, sir. At the" run II "tour in Cardiff, Wales on Wednesday, they may finally share their new photos and their happiness."
"Fans were quick to share on social media the pictures on the screen at the start of the concert showing proud parents holding two babies."
In one photo, Beyonce is braided and dressed in a cream skirt, while on the other side of the stage, her husband, a rapper, is in the same position
Between the two words is "love is universal" and "love never changes."
"But just when the fans got excited, et knew that the baby in question was not Rumi and Mr. Wang."
"Jay-Z and Beyonce and Mr. twins and rummy Carter."
“  pic.twitter.com/FzsFRf6hJC -Beyonc É Diva June 6, 2018, however, later on the show, the real Carter twins appeared with blue ivy in a seemingly intimate oath renewal ceremony
"Beyonce's mother also appeared in the video with rummy in her arms. She shared the photo on instagram and attached the title" my baby ", confirming that the twins are real



Number  359
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They later married in a surprise and secret ceremony on August 5, 2015 — just a few days before Theroux’s 44th birthday.”
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship.”
“Justin Theroux seems to be laying low following his split from Jennifer Aniston.”
“The Leftovers actor will no longer be making a previously scheduled appearance on Tuesday’s episode of The Late Show with Stephen Colbert, according to a new guest lineup released by the show.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Theroux was announced as Tuesday night’s guest on Valentine’s Day, but his name was absent from an updated roster released by the show on Monday.”
“Senator Kirsten Gillibrand, who was slotted to appear after Theroux, has been bumped up to the evening’s first slot, and actor Chris Gethard is filling in as a second guest.”
“Image zoom Justin Theroux and Jennifer Aniston Credit Broadimage REX Shutterstock Theroux and Aniston announced their split after seven years together and two and a half years of marriage with a statement released by Aniston s longtime publicist on Thursday In an effort to reduce any further speculation we have...”
“...decided to announce our separation...”
“This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”


"They later had a surprise and secret wedding on August 5, 2015 - just a few days before Cyrus' 44th birthday."
"We are two best friends and decided to go our separate ways, but we are looking forward to continuing our cherished friendship."
"Justin Cyrus seems to be keeping a low profile after breaking up with Jennifer Aniston."
"According to the show's new guest cast, the leftover actress will no longer appear on Tuesday night's show with Stephen Colbert as planned."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Cyrus was announced as a guest on Tuesday night on Valentine's day, but his name was not on the latest list released on Monday's show
Senator Kirsten Gillibrand, originally scheduled to appear after Theroux, has been scheduled for the first part of the evening, with actor Chris gethard as the second guest
"Justin seru and Jennifer Aniston have been together for seven years. After two and a half years of marriage, they announced their breakup. Aniston's long-term PR released a statement on Thursday to try to reduce our further speculation..."
“… Decided to announce our separation... "
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."



**Something goes wrong**
“I’m very happy for him and the success he’s having.””
“With Regis and Kelly in March 2011 — surprising her on air.”
“...the Stars the hit ABC dancing competition that made her a household name...”
“But though her professional life has continued to score high marks, Inaba’s romantic life has had its fair share of stumbles in the spotlight.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Just when I think I’ve learned the way to live, life changes,” Inaba said in a quote on Instagram on Sept. 7, captioning the graphic with prayer hands and a broken-heart emoji.”
“Image zoom Carrie Ann Inaba and Robb Derringer | Credit: Kathy Hutchins/NewscomIt was a sad end to a romance that seemed to blossom immediately.”
““I knew after our first romantic date, that if she felt for me what I felt for her, then it was something that was going to be significant and life changing and lasting,” Derringer, 50, told PEOPLE when announcing their engagement.”
““There was just a powerful and palpable sense of destiny that I could not deny.”“As a young girl, I had always dreamed about going on a date like the first date I shared with Robb,” Inaba added at the time.”
““Somehow, he instinctively knew what that was and went to great lengths to surprise me with the most romantic night ever.”


"I'm happy for him and his success."
"With Regis and Kelly in March 2011 - she was surprised on the show."
“…… The stars shine in the ABC dance competition, making her a household name.... "
"However, although Inaba's career continues to get high marks, her romantic life also has a lot of stumbling under the spotlight."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
On September 7, Mr. Inaba quoted a sentence on instagram, adding subtitles to the picture with a praying hand and a heartbroken expression: "just when I think I've learned the way of life, life has changed."
"Image zooming Carrie Ann Inaba and rob delinger | image source: Kathy Hutchins / news agency the end of this love affair is so tragic that it seems to be bearing fruit soon."
"After our first romantic date, I knew that if she felt the same about me as I felt about her, it would be a significant, life changing, lasting thing," 50 year old delinger told people when announcing her engagement
"At that time, I had a strong and obvious sense of fatalism, which I can't deny," he said "As a young girl, I've always dreamed of going out with rob, just like my first date with rob."
"Somehow, he knew instinctively what it was, so he spared no effort to surprise me with the most romantic night."



Number  361
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click here to learn more about “The Wizarding World of Harry Potter” at Universal Studios Hollywood.”
“...already packed menu of Butterbeer related offerings at Harry Potter land which includes Butterbeer Potted Cream and Butterbeer Fudge...”
“Park officials said Reminiscent of butterscotch and shortbread Butterbeer ice cream is perfectly fine tuned as a cool Hogsmeade treat and will be served at various carts located within Hogsmeade and at Three Broomsticks The special ice cream joins an...”
“Inspired by the popular Butterbeer beverage from the Harry Potter books and movies, fans can now get a scoop of Butterbeer ice cream exclusively at the park.”
“(KGTV) - Visitors to The Wizarding World of Harry Potter at Universal Studios Hollywood this summer are in for a very sweet treat.”


"Click here to learn more about the magic world of Harry and Potter at Universal Studio Hollywood."
“…… The menu of Butterbeer related products in Harry Potter park is full, including Butterbeer canned cream and Butterbeer fudge... "
"Park officials say reminiscent of butterscotch and shortbread, cream beer ice cream is perfect for fine tuning as a cool Hogsmeade treat and will be located in Hogsmeade and three brooms in three special ice cream will be added to one..."
"Inspired by the popular Butterbeer drinks in Harry Potter books and movies, fans can now get an exclusive scoop of Butterbeer ice cream in the park."
This summer, Universal Studios Hollywood's Harry Harry Potter world (Harry Potter) will have a very sweet feast.



Number  362
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Can you take the Al Franken thing, Sugarplum?””
““I think I can handle the Mega Bloks and the Lazer Tag.”
““O.K., wow, let’s see,” he said.”
““And,” the boy added, “can you tell me, what did Al Franken do?”Mr. Thompson was understandably taken aback.”
“The show’s pointed and effective opening sketch, which featured Kenan Thompson as the would-be Santa and Kate McKinnon as his elfin assistant, began with a boy asking Mr. Thompson for traditional gifts like Mega Bloks and Lazer Tag.”
“...would resign his seat as he faced allegations from at least six women of groping and improper advances...”
“Indeed the first half of the show frequently returned to the many sexual misconduct scandals roiling powerful men and the institutions that once protected them including Senator Al Franken the S N L alumnus who said on Thursday that he...”
“That, at least, was the twisted Christmas spirit of the “Saturday Night Live” cold open this weekend, in an episode hosted by James Franco and featuring the musical guest SZA.”
“...the sexual misdeeds of some prominent men and accusations against others...”
“There is no safe space in America where the country s culture wars aren t being waged not even the make believe workshop of a shopping mall Santa Claus and no ears so innocent that they haven t heard about...”


"Can you take care of Al Franken, sweetheart?" "
"I think I can handle the big guys and Lazer labels."
"Well, wow, let me see," he said
"And," the boy added, "can you tell me what Al Franken did?"? "Mr. Thompson was understandably surprised."
"The opening skits of the show are sharp and effective, with Kennan Thompson as Santa Claus to be and Kate McKinnon as his elf assistant. At the beginning, a boy asks Mr. Thompson for traditional gifts, such as Mega Bloks and Lazer tag."
“…… He will resign as he faces at least six female charges of sexual harassment and improper sexual conduct... "
"In fact, the first half of the show often goes back to a number of sexual misconduct scandals that upset powerful men and institutions that once protected them, including Senator Al Franken, who said on Thursday that he
"At least, this is the twisted Christmas spirit of this weekend's" Saturday night live "cold open, hosted by James Franco and starred by musical guest SZA."
“… Sexual acts of some celebrities and charges against others... "
"In the United States, there is no safe place not to launch a national cultural war, not even a Santa Claus workshop in a shopping mall, and not an ear is so innocent that they have never heard of..."



Number  363
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““If I have to take a knock, because I am not going to try and actively refute things, then I will, because I believe in it that much.””
““I have my own side of this story, but I believe in these people that have been underrepresented getting their stories out, enough that I will hold back things that I could say, just because I believe in it that much,” Franco told Meyers.”
“The allegations, which have been reported by the Los Angeles Times, include claims that Franco engaged in inappropriate or sexually exploitative behaviour by the women, four of whom were coached by him at his film and acting school, Studio 4.”
“Two of the women featured, actors Violet Paley and Sarah Tither-Kaplan, expanded on claims they had made on Twitter in the wake of Franco’s Golden Globes victory for his performance in his latest film, The Disaster Artist.”
“Both women were critical of the actor’s decision to wear a badge supporting the Time’s Up movement at the ceremony.”
“Franco was later forced to deny the rumours during an interview with The Late Show host Stephen Colbert, describing the claims as “not accurate”.”
“01 38 James Franco discusses recent sexual misconduct allegations video Tither Kaplan who has starred in several films directed by Franco told the LA Times that the actor director had engaged in an abuse of power on the set of his films alleging that during one sex scene Franco removed...”
“...protective plastic guards covering the genitalia of female actors while simulating oral sex with them...”
“Tither-Kaplan also claimed that one actor was sent home from a film set after balking at appearing topless in a scene.”
““I got it in my head pretty quickly that, OK, you don’t say no to this guy,” she said.”


"If I have to be beaten because I won't try and actively refute things, then I will, because I believe it very much."
Franco told Meyers: "I have my own opinion on this story, but I believe that these underrated people will make their story public so that I will hide what I can say because I believe it."
The Los Angeles Times reported on the charges, including charges by Franco of inappropriate or sexual exploitation of the women, four of whom were directed by him in Studio 4 of his film and acting school
The two leading actresses, violet Perry and Sarah tiser Kaplan, tweeted after Franco won the Golden Globe for her performance in his latest film, the disaster artist
"Both women criticized the actor's decision to wear a badge supporting the progress of the times at the award ceremony."
"Franco was later forced to deny the rumor in an interview with the late host, Stephen Colbert, and described it as" inaccurate. "
"01 38 James Franco discusses the recent sexual misconduct accusation video. Tiser Kaplan has starred in several films directed by Franco. He told the Los Angeles Times that the actor and director abused his power in his film set, claiming that Franco was removed in a sexual scene..."
“… In the simulation of oral sex with female actors, the plastic protective cover covering female actors' genitals... "
"Tiser Kaplan also claimed that an actor who hesitated to appear topless in a scene was sent home from the set."
"I soon learned that, well, don't refuse this guy," she said



Number  364
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Podcast edited by Nick Offenberg.”
“So these things are all being discussed and we were like, ‘Ah, they’re gonna cut all this out.’... [But] it’s relevant, it’s topical.”
“I think her mission was to write something funny and cheesy.”ABC Ben Higgins and Luke Pell on "The Bachelor Winter Games."”
““Chris Harrison introduced her [at the opening ceremonies] ...”
“They did not give it to her,” said Michael.”
““That was a local high school student who wrote the song herself.”
“The “Bachelor” anthem was written by the high-school girl who sang it!”
“I jokingly tweeted this, but feel like my role there was to improve United States diplomatic relations with our foreign allies.”2.”
“We were, at one point, sitting around the island in the kitchen and there was a big talk with everyone, and basically they denoted me to be the speaker on behalf of apologizing for the United States and explaining what was going on.”
“That was also when Trump tweeted basically admitting to obstructing justice...”


"Podcast editor Nick offenberg."
"So these things are all under discussion, and we say," ah, they're going to delete them. "... [but] it's relevant, it's topical. "
"I think her job is to write something interesting and tacky." ABC Ben Higgins and Luke Pell said at the singles Winter Games
"Chris Harrison introduced her (at the opening ceremony),"
"They didn't give it to her," Michael said
"It's a song written by a local high school student."
The "Bachelor" song was written by the high school girl who sang it
"I jokingly tweeted that, but I think my role there is to improve the diplomatic relations between the United States and its foreign allies."
"Once, we were sitting around the island in the kitchen and talking to you. Basically, they referred to me as the spokesperson who apologized and explained things on behalf of the United States."
"That's when trump basically admitted on twitter that he was obstructing justice..."



Number  365
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WATCH: Ben Affleck Surprises 'Justice League' Fans at CinemaCon in First Appearance Since Rehab Stint...”
“To support or seek help, please know there are places such as https://t.co/LUw6woJElo and https://t.co/OW50Kobpzz that are doing great work.”
“The 51-year-old director took to Twitter on Tuesday to show his appreciation for the "outpouring of support" he and his family have received since he announced that he was taking a step back from helming Justice League following his daughter's suicide.”
“RELATED: Zack Snyder Steps Back From 'Justice League' to Grieve the Tragic Death of His Daughter"Thanks for the outpouring of support.”
“I can't express how much it means to Debbie & I and Autumn’s mother, Denise, at such a difficult time," Snyder wrote.”
“Thanks for the outpouring of support.”
“I can't express how much it means to Debbie & I and Autumn’s mother, Denise, at such a difficult time.”
“— Zack Snyder (@ZackSnyder) May 23, 2017"To support or seek help, please know there are places such as http://afsp.org and http://JEDfoundation.org that are doing great work," he added.”
“— Zack Snyder (@ZackSnyder) May 23, 2017RELATED: Director Zack Snyder To Helm 'Justice League' MovieSnyder revealed that his daughter, Autumn, committed suicide in March at the age of 20 during an interview with The Hollywood Reporter on Monday.”
“Joss Whedon will direct any additional necessary scenes before Justice League hits theaters on Nov. 17.”


"Watch: Ben Affleck appeared in cinemacon for the first time after his recovery period, which surprised the fans of justice Alliance..."
"To support or seek help, please know that there are such places https://t.co/LUw6woJElo as well as https://t.co/OW50Kobpzz They do a good job. "
The 51 year old director tweeted his thanks on Tuesday for the "overwhelming support" he and his family have received since he announced that he would step back from running the Justice League after his daughter committed suicide
"Related report: Zach Snyder retired from justice alliance to express his grief for his daughter's unfortunate death." thank you for your support
"At such a difficult time, I can't express what it means to Debbie, to me and to Qiu's mother Denise," Snyder wrote
"Thank you for your support."
"At such a difficult time, I can't express what it means to Debbie and me and to Qiu's mother Denise."
"- Zack Snyder (@ Zack Snyder) May 23, 2017" to support or seek help, please know http://afsp.org and http://JEDfoundation.org "We did a good job," he added
"- Zack Snyder (@ Zack Snyder) May 23, 2017 related report: Zack Snyder, director of justice alliance, revealed in an interview with Hollywood Reporter on Monday that his daughter Qiu committed suicide in March when she was 20 years old."
"Before the Justice League opens on November 17, Jos Wheaton will direct any other necessary scenes."



**Something goes wrong**
“Matt Lauer Sexual Misconduct Allegations...”
“See photos of Savannah Guthrie and Matt Lauer together RELATED CONTENT Willie Geist Raves About Hoda Kotb s Today Promotion Says He s Been In Touch With Matt Lauer Exclusive Ann Curry Finally Speaks Out About Leaving the Today Show in 2012 Ann Curry Says She s Not Surprised by...”
““The thing about the Olympics is there’s no other place on earth where you can sit there and watch a kid you’ve never heard of before and in that instant you get to watch their life change,” she said.”
“Kotb, who recently had a life-changing moment herself thanks to her new position, remarked on how special the event can be.”
“And I think that’s where we’re focused.”And now the ladies are teaming up for the Winter Olympics in China next month.”
““But something really lovely and positive has happened.”
“Kotb admitted, “It was a difficult time for the show, no question.”“Yeah, it was hard, and like everyone saw, we went through it,” Guthrie added.”
“And we’re so happy.”See photos of Hoda Kotb and Savannah Guthrie together:The duo also touched on Lauer’s sudden exit after 20 years on the show.”
“It just clicked, and it felt so good.”
“It worked.’ I think we had an instant thing”Guthrie agreed, joking, “Hoda said it was like a first date, and I was like, ‘and I’m easy and desperate,’ so no problem!”


"Matt Raul's sexual misconduct charges..."
"Seeing the photos of Savannah Guthrie and Matt Raul together, Willie gaster praised Hoda koteb's" today "campaign, saying that he had been contacting Matt Raul for an exclusive interview with Ann curry, and finally said that she would leave" today "in 2012. Ann curry said that she was right about I'm not surprised. "
"The point of the Olympics is that there's no other place on earth where you can sit and look at a child you've never heard of, and at that moment you can see their lives change," she said
"Due to her new position, kotbe has recently experienced a life changing moment for herself. She said how special the event was."
"I think that's what we're focused on." Now the ladies are working together for the Winter Olympics to be held in China next month
"But something very lovely and positive happened."
"There is no doubt that this is a difficult time," Kotb admitted "Yes, it was tough, as everyone saw, and we went through it," Guthrie added
"We are so happy." See photos of Hoda Kotb and Savannah Guthrie: the duo also talked about Raul's sudden exit after 20 years on the show. "
"It's nice to have a click."
"It worked. I think we have a moment, "Guthrie agreed, joking." Hotan said, it's like a first date, and I'm like, 'I'm easy and desperate,' so no problem! "



**Something goes wrong**
“Also Read: WWE's Daniel Bryan on Everything He's Doing to (Possibly) Return to Wrestling ActionSee Bryan tonight on USA Network’s “SmackDown Live,” which airs at 8/7c, and *probably* April 8 at WrestleMania 34 in New Orleans.”
“But there’s nothing to say that if something else happens, something bad couldn’t happen.”“So, that kind of liability when it’s a billion dollar company with lots of people who work there — they don’t want to see that happen to me, with my family.”
“The fan favorite and current “SmackDown Live” general manager has been medically cleared by WWE to wrestle again — and just in time for WrestleMania 34.”
“Bryan does not yet have an opponent for next month’s WrestleMania 34, but you better believe Vince McMahon & co. are scrambling to make that happen.”
“The undersized Bryan’s in-ring career was shut down two years ago following a series of concussions.”
“Now, he’s got the thumbs-up from numerous neurologists, WWE says.”
“Also Read Charlotte Flair Says Ronda Rousey Signing With WWE Raises Everyone s Game Video Following more than two years of extensive evaluations WWE Superstar Daniel Bryan has been medically cleared to return to in ring competition by leading neurosurgeons neurologists and concussion experts including Dr Robert Cantu Dr Javier...”
“Cárdenas and Dr Jeffrey Kutcher WWE said in a statement on Tuesday...”
““Bryan underwent a full review of his medical history and received comprehensive neurological and physical evaluations independent of WWE.”
“He was cleared by each doctor as well as WWE’s Medical Director, Dr. Joseph Maroon.”Also Read: WWE 'Raw': Watch Brock Lesnar Beat the Hell Out of Roman Reigns With a Steel Chair (Video)TheWrap spoke with Bryan last June about his battle to return to in-ring action.”


"Read at the same time: WWE's Daniel Bryan about what he's doing (possibly) back to wrestling. Watch Bryan's" smashdown live "on the US network tonight, which is broadcast at 8 / 7 degrees Celsius, * possibly * wrestling frenzy 34 in New Orleans on April 8."
"But there's nothing to say. If something else happens, nothing bad will happen." "So when it's a multi billion dollar company with a lot of people working there, it's a responsibility - they don't want to see this happen to me, to my family."
"Fans' favorite, the current general manager of" smashdown live "has been allowed to wrestle again by WWE medicine - just in time for wrestling mania 34."
"Brian doesn't have a single competitor in next month's wrestling contest, but you'd better believe Vince McMahon is trying to achieve that."
"The short Bryan quit his career two years ago because of a series of concussions."
"Now, he's got a lot of praise from neuroscientists," WWE said
"Charlotte fryer also said that Rhoda Rossi's contract with WWE has improved everyone's game video. After more than two years of extensive evaluation, WWE superstar Daniel Blaine has been medically approved by major neurosurgeons, neuroscientists and brain concussion experts (including Dr. Robert canto and Dr. Havel) to return to the game circle..."
"Cardenas and Dr. Jeffrey Kutcher said in a statement on Tuesday
"Brian conducted a comprehensive review of his medical history and received a comprehensive neurological and physiological assessment independent of WWE."
"He was cleared by every doctor and by Dr. Joseph Malone, WWE's medical director." "WWE 'primitive': watching Brooke lessner defeat Rome with a steel chair (video). The wrap talked to Brian last June about his return to boxing



**Something goes wrong**
“Perineal tears are also likely during the birth so that the body can push the baby out of the birth canal.”
“The discharge can last for several weeks as the uterus begins to heal.”
“A mother will also experience some lactation from her breasts for a few weeks after giving birth even when she is not breastfeeding.”
“Since the breasts grow at a rapid pace, this can cause stretch marks to appear around the edges.”
“But then once the baby comes and he or she starts breastfeeding, the breasts will slowly deflate to a size closer to what they used to be before pregnancy.”
“These hormones inform the body it needs to begin producing breast milk from the milk ducts.”
“By the third trimester, the body increases its production of hormones such as prolactin, estrogen and progesterone.”
“The breasts will feel fuller and the nipples and the dark area around it, known as the areolae, will enlarge.”
“This begins for the mother at about the fifth or sixth week of pregnancy.”
“Breasts enlarge and shrink drasticallyBreasts enlarge during pregnancy because of weight gain and preparation for breastfeeding the baby.”


"There may also be a perineal tear during delivery so that the body can push the baby out of the birth canal."
"As the uterus begins to heal, secretions can last for weeks."
"In the weeks after delivery, even if the mother does not breastfeed, she will experience some breast milk."
"Because the breast is growing very fast, it can lead to stretch marks on the edge of the breast."
"But once the baby is born and breast-feeding begins, the breasts slowly shrink to the size they were before pregnancy."
"These hormones inform the body that it needs to start producing breast milk from the milk tube."
In late pregnancy, the body increases the secretion of hormones such as prolactin, estrogen and progesterone
The breasts will feel fuller and the nipples and the black area around them (called areola) will expand
"It starts in the fifth or sixth week of a mother's pregnancy."
"Due to weight gain and preparation for breastfeeding, breasts rapidly grow and shrink during pregnancy."



Number  369
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related: Dance Moms' Abby Lee Miller Has Been Sentenced to a Year in PrisonCheck this out:”
“Abby reportedly must turn herself in to prison within the next 44 days.”
“ET:As former Dance Moms coach Abby Lee Miller prepares for her yearlong prison sentence, she's determined to keep busy.”
“In an exclusive interview with Entertainment Tonight, Abby revealed exactly how she plans to occupy her time while in jail: by working on a new series.”
“The former coach told ET that she plans on "pitching a new show," adding, "I have been so very successful — maybe that'll be some time to work."”
“As for what type of show she has in mind?”
“Naturally, "there's dancing in it," she hinted.”
“It'll definitely be interesting to see what Abby comes up with and whether her time in prison will play a role in this future project.”
“Previously:Yesterday (Tuesday, May 9), former Dance Moms coach Abby Lee Miller was sentenced to 366 days in prison following charges of bankruptcy fraud.”
“Abby had been accused of hiding $775,000 of her income, as well as bringing $120,000 of Australian currency into the United States without reporting the amount.”


"Related report: Abby Lee Miller of" dancing mother "was sentenced to one year in prison. Look at this:
"It is reported that Abby will have to turn himself in and go to jail within the next 44 days."
"Et: Abby Lee Miller, the current dance mom coach, is determined to stay busy as she prepares to serve a year in prison."
"In an exclusive interview with entertainment tonight, Abby revealed her specific plan in prison: to make a new series."
The former coach told et that she planned to "launch a new show" and added, "I've been very successful and maybe it will be a period of work."
"What kind of show does she want?"
"Of course," she hinted, "there's dancing in it."
"It's going to be interesting to see what Abby thinks about and whether her time in prison will play a role in this future project."
"Yesterday (Tuesday, May 9), Abby Lee Miller, a former dance mom coach, was convicted of bankruptcy fraud and sentenced to 366 days in prison
"Abby has been accused of concealing $775000 in income and bringing $120000 in Australian dollars into the United States without reporting the amount."



**Something goes wrong**
“Directed by brothers Anthony and Joe Russo, "Avengers: Infinity War" opens on April 25 in Australia, April 27 in the UK and May 4 in the US.”
“Blink and you might miss a few familiar faces, including Doctor Strange (Benedict Cumberbatch), the entire Guardians of the Galaxy crew, Loki (Tom Hiddleston), Black Panther (Chadwick Boseman) and more.”
“This trailer is jam-packed with Marvel superheroes.”
“In the new trailer, we see the Avengers and their superhero allies team up to fight against the powerful Thanos (Josh Brolin) before he can destroy the universe.”
“The first trailer for "Avengers: Infinity War" dropped during Super Bowl LII Sunday, and it's geektastic.”


Directed by Anthony and the Joe Russo brothers, Avengers: the Infinite War is shown in Australia on April 25, in Britain on April 27 and in the United States on May 4
In the blink of an eye, you may miss some familiar faces, including Dr. strange (Benedict Cumberbatch), the guardian of the whole galaxy, rocky (Tom sidleston), panther (Chadwick Bosman), etc
"This trailer is full of Marvel superheroes."
"In the new trailer, we see the Avengers and their superhero allies working together against the powerful SANOS (Josh Brolin), and then he can destroy the universe."
The first trailer for Avengers: Infinite War, which was aired on Super Bowl LII Sunday, is geektastic



Number  371
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I am not responsible for supporting [Martin’s] parents and his children from another relationship which he lists as ongoing monthly expenses,” Blige stated in the court documents.”
“While the couple does not have any children together, Blige has been a stepmother to Kendu’s children – Briana, Jordan and Nas – from a former relationship since they wed in 2003.”
“...she had long been the only bread winner in the family and that she is burdened with more than 10 000 000 in debt...”
“Blige also claimed that Isaacs drives a Mercedes that she pre paid the lease on and that he refuses to turn over possession of her Grammy and other achievement awards WATCH Hillary Clinton Talks to Mary J Blige About the Difficulties Women Face Being Tough and Likable The singer said...”
“In April, Blige claimed in court documents obtained by PEOPLE that Isaacs spent more than $420,000 during their marriage on “travel charges” that involved his girlfriend, not her.”
“Isaacs originally requested for $129,319 per month, but a judge ordered a lot less be paid.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Online.”
“Despite Blige’s attempts to argue that their prenuptial agreement waived any spousal support, she’ll have to pay Isaacs dating back to September, according to E!”
“The singer, 46, filed for divorce in July 2016 after 12 years of marriage.”


"I'm not responsible for supporting (Martin's) parents and his children from another relationship that he listed as ongoing monthly expenses," blich said in court documents
"Although the couple didn't have any children together, Blige has been the stepmother of kendu's children, Briana, Jordan and NAS, since they got married in 2003."
“…… She has always been the only winner in the family. She has more than 10000 pounds in debt... "
"Blige also claimed that Isaacs was driving a Mercedes Benz, she prepaid the rental fee, and he refused to hand over the ownership of her Grammy Awards and other achievement awards. Watching Hillary Clinton and Mary J. Blige talk about the difficulties women face in becoming strong and likable, the singer said
In April, blich claimed in court documents that Isaac spent more than 420000 dollars on "travel expenses" during his marriage, which involved his girlfriend, not her
"Isaacs initially asked for $129319 a month, but the judge ordered a lot less."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Online."
"Although Blige tried to argue that their prenuptial agreement gave up any alimony, according to e!"
"The 46 year old singer filed for divorce in July 2016 after 12 years of marriage."



Number  372
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux Separately Attend Jimmy Kimmel's Son's Birthday PartyJennifer Aniston Goes Casual Chic at First Carpet Appearance Since Justin Theroux SplitInside Justin Theroux's Life Following Jennifer Aniston Split (Exclusive)”
“See more in the video below.”
“She wasn't happy [in New York]."”
“It's an eclectic group and he doesn't have that type of network in L.A."And while Aniston grew up in New York and started her career there, ET's source said that she "just never really could get settled in.”
“"He's friends with people in the restaurant world, writers, comedians, artists, tattoo artists.”
““Justin has a very diverse friend group, and he likes that they're not all 'in the industry,'" the source continued.”
“...and that his friends and social group which Theroux holds close to his heart are all based in the city...”
“Embed Code Restart Why Justin Theroux and Jennifer Aniston Announced Their Split When They Did He much prefers being in New York and that s been a major issue for them for a long time the source said adding that the actor s roots are deep in the Big Apple...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Why Justin Theroux and Jennifer Aniston Announced Their Split When They Did This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”


"Related content: Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru attend the birthday party of Jimi Kimmel's son respectively. Jennifer Aniston becomes casual and chic when she first appears on the carpet after the breakup of Justin seru. The life of Justin seru after the breakup of Jennifer Aniston (exclusive)
"Please see more in the video below."
"She's not happy (in New York),"
"It's an eclectic group, and he doesn't have that kind of network in Los Angeles." Although Aniston grew up in New York and started her career there, et sources said she "just never really settled down."
"He's friends with people in restaurants, writers, comedians, artists, tattoo artists."
"Justin has a very diverse group of friends and he likes that they are not all 'in the industry'," the source continued
“… His friends and social groups, seru firmly hold his heart on the basis of the city... "
"Why Justin Cyrus and Jennifer Aniston announced their breakup when they broke up, and he preferred to stay in New York, which has been a major problem for a long time. The source added that the actor's roots are deeply rooted in big apple..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"It's not clear why Justin seru and Jennifer Aniston announced their breakup while filming this video, because we can't load the sponsor's information."



**Something goes wrong**
“Read the full interview with Knightley here.”
“That's why I have started to use oils and moisturisers over the past few years."”
“Since having a baby and being over 30, it's also getting dry for the first time.”
“I think it needs a break every now and again to be able to breathe.”
“When I'm filming, I always have a breakout as we have to cake the make-up on.”
“That's also why I always want to wear as little make-up as possible when I am not working.”
“Then one day I thought I would try to leave it and that's what suited it better.”
“"I had really bad skin until I was 24 and up until then I did everything under the sun to it.”


"Read the full interview with Knightley here."
"That's why I've started using essential oils and moisturizers in the past few years."
"It's dry for the first time since I've had a baby and I'm in my 30s."
"I think it needs a break from time to time to breathe."
"When I shoot, I always have a breakthrough because we have to put makeup on the cake."
"That's why I always want to make up as little as possible when I'm not working."
"Then one day I thought I would try my best to leave it, which is more suitable for it."
"I had very bad skin before I was 24, and so far I've done everything in the sun."



**Something goes wrong**
“...children being separated from their parents and sent to detention facilities...”
“What I was trying to do when I suddenly couldn t say do anything was read this lede 1 6 Rachel Maddow MSNBC maddow June 20 2018 The AP s report comes amid intensifying backlash over the Trump administration s zero tolerance policy which has resulted in thousands of migrant...”
“If nothing else, it is my job to actually be able to speak while I'm on TV.”
““Not the way I intended that to go, not by a mile.”Ugh, I'm sorry.”
““If nothing else, it is my job to actually be able to speak while I’m on TV.”“I apologize for losing it there for a moment,” she added.”
““Ugh, I’m sorry,” she wrote.”
“Maddow apologized later in a Twitter thread and shared the story again.”
“The government is reportedly planning to open a fourth “tender age” detainment shelter in Houston as the number of separated children grows.”
“...holding hundreds of crying babies and toddlers...”
“Rachel Maddow chokes up and cries on air as she struggles to deliver news that migrant babies and toddlers have been sent to tender age shelters pic twitter com O6crm8cvyR Justin Baragona justinbaragona June 20 2018 The AP reported Tuesday that at least three Texas facilities are currently operational and...”


“…… Children separated from their parents and sent to detention... "
"When I suddenly can't say what to do, what I want to do is read this Lede 16 Rachel Maddow MSNBC Maddow report of the associated press on June 20, 2018, the trump administration's zero tolerance policy has led to thousands of immigrants..."
"If nothing else, my job is to be able to talk on TV."
"Not as I thought, not a mile." Oh, I'm sorry
"If nothing else, my job is to speak on TV." "I'm sorry I lost it on TV for a while," she added
"Ah, I'm sorry," she wrote
"Mado later apologized in a twitter post and shared the story again."
According to reports, as the number of separated children increases, the government plans to open a fourth "juvenile" detention center in Houston
“… Holding hundreds of crying babies and toddlers
"Rachel Maddow sobs on the radio as she tries to pass on news that immigrant babies and toddlers are being sent to child care homes. Photo: Twitter com o6crm8cvyr Justin baragona justinbaragona June 20, 2018 the Associated Press reported on Tuesday that at least three facilities in Texas are currently in operation, and..."



Number  375
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s no wonder that the Kardashian sisters are going for such a procedure of facial rejuvenation.”
“AdvertisementThe results can last up to two years and they will turn out to be some of the most beneficial ones with a series of treatments.”
“...texture and also treating the delicate areas on the face where the skin is much thinner...”
“The face will look immediately brighter and refreshed and because of the platelets within the PRP the skin continues to improve for up to three months after the procedure The PRP facial will result in improving the facial wrinkles filling facial hollows improving the skin tone softening the skin s...”
“After the PRP is prepared, Dr. Diamond injects it into the face to brighten the complexion and rejuvenate the appearance.”
“Microneedling is a procedure that can also be done on other parts of your body and the doctor explains it best:‘The PRP facial begins with drawing blood from the arm to produce PRP.”
“The whole procedure lasts about an hour, and the results are typically seen up to six weeks later, and they last over a year.”
“She said that she loved trying anything that makes you look and feel beautiful.”
“A post shared by Kourtney Kardashian Snapchat (@kourtneysnapchat) on Jun 17, 2017 at 9:02am PDTK=Her sister, Kim Kardashian, has undergone the same procedure back in 2013 on an episode of Kourtney and Kim Take Miami.”
“The video shows the medical assistants cleaning Kourtney’s face.”


"It's no wonder the Kardashian sisters do this facial rejuvenation surgery."
"Advertising results can last two years, after a series of treatment, the results will be the most beneficial."
“… Texture and treatment of facial skin thinner sensitive parts... "
"Because of the platelets in PRP, the face will immediately become brighter and fresher. Within three months after surgery, the skin will continue to improve. PrP will improve facial wrinkles, fill facial depression, improve skin tone and soften the skin..."
"When PrP is ready, Dr. diamond will inject it into the face to brighten the complexion and restore the appearance."
"Microneedle injection is a kind of operation that can also be performed in other parts of the body, and the doctor explains it best:" PrP is produced by drawing blood from the arm on the face. "
"The whole process lasts about an hour, and the result is usually seen after six weeks, and it lasts more than a year."
"She said she likes to try anything that makes you look and feel beautiful."
"Kourtney Kardashian snapchat (@ kourtneysnapchat) shared a post pdtk = her sister Kim Kardashian went through the same process in a 2013 episode of" Kourtney and Kim occupy Miami. "
"The video shows medical staff cleaning Courtney's face."



Number  376
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...stutter stop room floating in a box in space isn t the only instance of non linear continuity we re seeing...”
“From the way that Matthew Lillard s suspected murderer experienced the real killing as a dream unspooling at a different hour to the way the various gangs tracking Dougie seem to mirror one another there are ways this show is playing with time that imply Cooper s journey to the...”
“If you were looking for deeper meaning in Dr. Jacoby’s golden shovels, you might be disappointed to find out they’re an Alex Jones-style scam meant for the proper digging and depositing of excrement.”
“In fact, as much as there is to pick apart in “Part 5,” I think it thumbs its nose at the people watching the show as amateur sleuths.”
“As Emily L. Stephens reminds us in her latest review, one of Twin Peaks’ signature images—Bob in the mirror behind a screaming Sarah Palmer—was a happy accident, so I have to wonder about the creators intentionally sticking any clues to their mystery in the background.”
“AdvertisementIt’s hard to tell if that chunk of car (or whatever) wound up in the frame on purpose or by accident.”
“And if that’s the case, whoever these people are, they keep creating new Lynchian tableaux of horror within the banal: first the scene in Ruth’s bed and then this shot of the neighborhood kid running home, past a single, noticeable shot of flaming wreckage.”
“And if that’s the case, does that mean there was a fourth party targeting our ill-fated insurance agent, in addition to Doppel-Cooper, the hoods who booby-trapped his car, and the other hoods who tripped the explosives?”
“Does that mean the corpse is the body of the real Dougie?”
“[UPDATE: The original draft of this article conflated Dougie’s wedding band with The Owl Cave ring.]”


“… The space floating in the box in space is not the only example of the nonlinear continuity we see... "
"From Matthew Lillard's murderer suspects going through a fantastic killing at different times to the way that the gangs following Dougie seem to mirror each other, this play is playing with time, suggesting Cooper's journey..."
"If you want to find a deeper meaning in Dr. Jacoby's gold shovel, you may be disappointed to find that it's an Alex Jones type scam to dig and store feces correctly."
"In fact, although there's a lot to mention in part five, I think it scoffs at people who watch as amateur detectives."
"As Emily L. Stephens reminds us in her latest comments, one of the iconic images of twin peaks is the screaming Sarah Palmer Bob in the mirror behind Palmer is a happy accident, so I have to doubt whether the creators deliberately post any clues in the background to reveal their mystery. "
"It's hard to say whether the car (or something) fell onto the frame intentionally or accidentally."
"If so, no matter who these people are, they always create a new Lynch horror scene in mediocrity: first, the scene on Ruth's bed, then the scene of the neighbor's children running home, after an obvious burning debris scene."
"If so, does that mean that besides doppel Cooper, the hoodlums who trapped his car and other hoodlums who tripped over explosives, there are also the fourth party's ill fated insurance agents against us?"
"Does that mean the body is Doug's body?"
"[update: the original version of this article confused Doug's wedding ring with the owl hole ring. ]”



Number  377
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The singer recently made a cameo in Childish Gambino’s “This Is America” music video which debuted earlier this month.”
“Great !!!!!!!!!!!!!!”
“RELATED VIDEO: SZA on Her Massive 2017: ‘It’s Too Much to Understand’A rep for SZA did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“-Top Dawg,” the statement concluded.”
“As for the dates she missed, we’ll figure out a way to make it up to you guys.”
““We been monitoring her close and this is the reason she missed the Arizona and New Mexico dates.”“She’ll see the doctor again in a few days and I’ll update you guys on her status.”
“I have to take SZA off for a few days on the tour.”“Her vocal chords [sic] are swollen and she have [sic] to rest her voice to prevent any permanent damage,” the statement continued.”
“!’n.”Last week, her label, Top Dawg, announced she’d be taking time off the tour on Instagram, writing, “I got some bad news.”
“YAYYYYYUUYH!!!!!!”
““My voice is permanently injured.”


The singer recently made a guest appearance in the naive Gambino's "this is America" music video premiered earlier this month
"That's great ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
"Related video: SZA said at a large press conference in 2017," it's too hard to understand. "A representative of SZA didn't immediately respond to requests for comment."
"Man," the statement concluded
"As for the date she missed, we'll try to make it up to you."
"We've been watching her closely and that's why she missed the date in Arizona and New Mexico." "She'll see the doctor again in a few days, and I'll update you on her."
"I have to give SZA a few days off on tour." "Her vocal cords (SIC) are swollen and she has to rest her voice (SIC) to prevent any permanent damage," the statement continued
"! last week, her brand top dawg announced that she would take a vacation on instagram and wrote," I have some bad news. "
"Yeah ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
"My voice is hurt forever."



Number  378
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Neither she nor Harry have responded to criticism aired by other members of her family, which has recently dominated the media, and it is clear they have no intention of doing so.”
“But by Thursday Markle felt she owed it to the public to clarify the situation.”
“In a public statement the American actor spoke of her sadness that Thomas Markle Snr, 73, who is said to have undergone heart surgery on Wednesday, would miss her wedding on medical advice.”
“Within hours, however, the wedding show was back on track, with the royal couple seen arriving at Windsor Castle to have tea with the Queen.”
“Markle s mother Doria Ragland 61 who is now favourite to walk her daughter to the altar at St George s chapel is expected to meet the Queen on Friday and is understood to have had a private meeting with Prince Charles and the Duchess of Cornwall on Wednesday after...”
“...flying in from Los Angeles...”
“In her statement released by Kensington Palace, the bride-to-be said: “Sadly, my father will not be attending our wedding.”
“I have always cared for my father and hope he can be given the space he needs to focus on his health.”
““I would like to thank everyone who has offered generous messages of support.”
“Please know how much Harry and I look forward to sharing our special day with you on Saturday.”Planning for the wedding is entering its final day.”


"Neither she nor Harry has responded to criticism from other family members who have recently dominated the media, and it is clear that they have no intention of doing so."
"But on Thursday, markel felt that she should clarify the situation to the public."
"In a public statement, the American actor spoke of her grief at the 73 year old Thomas Markle SNR, who is said to have undergone heart surgery on Wednesday, for missing his wedding because of medical advice."
"A few hours later, however, the wedding was back on track, and people saw the royal couple come to Windsor Castle to have tea with the queen."
"Doria ragland, Mark's 61 year old mother, is now the favorite to take her daughter to the altar of St. George's church. She is expected to meet with the queen on Friday. It is understood that on Wednesday, she was with Prince Charles and the Duchess of Cornwall in Then there was a private meeting. "
“… From Los Angeles... "
In a statement issued by Kensington Palace, the bride to be said: "unfortunately, my father will not attend our wedding."
"I always care about my father and hope to give him enough space to pay attention to his health."
"I want to thank all those who have been generous in their support."
"Please know how Harry and I are looking forward to sharing our special day with you on Saturday." The wedding plan has entered the last day



Number  379
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Throw the whole app-oligy away,” she added about the ad, which was pulled from the app on Tuesday.”
“!” mom Kris Jenner wrote on Instagram after the video was released.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“"I'm gonna understand the inner workings of a woman," the reality star sings — as Lil Dicky — in the rapper's new videoKendall Jenner … the rapper?”
“In Lil Dicky’s new NSFW music video (which features explicit language) for his song “Freaky Friday” featuring Chris Brown, the reality star and model makes a surprise cameo in the last 20 seconds of the song.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After morphing into Ed Sheeran and DJ Khaled, Lil Dicky transforms into Jenner in the video, which pays homage to the classic film Freaky Friday (in which a mother and daughter swap bodies for a day).”
““I’m Kendall Jenner / I got a vagina / I’m gonna explore that right now / Holy s— I got a vagina / I’m gonna learn / I’m gonna understand the inner workings of a woman,” the 22-year-old Keeping Up with the Kardashians star raps as Lil Dicky.”
“Image zoom Kendall Jenner in “Freaky Friday” music video“Kendall!!!”
“This is so amazing!!”


"Throw away the whole app strategy," she added, adding that the ad was removed from the app on Tuesday
"!" Mom Chris Jenner wrote on instagram after the video was released. "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"I want to understand the inner workings of a woman," reality show star singer - little Dick - in rapper's new video Kendall Jenner Rapper
"In lil Dicky's new nsfw music video for his song" fresh Friday, "reality TV star and model Chris Brown made an unexpected guest appearance in the last 20 seconds of the song."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After transforming into ed Sheeran and DJ Khalid, Lily Dick transforms into Jenner in the video to pay homage to the Classic Movie Monster Friday, in which a mother and daughter exchange bodies for a day."
"I'm Kendall Jenner / I have a vagina / I'm going to explore now / St. S. - I have a vagina / I'm going to learn / I'm going to understand a woman's inner workings," the 22-year-old plays Lily dick on Kardashian's star rap show
Picture zoom Kendall Jenner in "freak Friday" music video "Kendall!!"
"It's amazing!"



Number  380
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sophie Turner sophiet on Sep 21 2015 at 9 11pm PDT Follow htshowbiz for more...”
“...by Maisie Williams maisie_williams on Jan 22 2016 at 3 42pm PST Babe A post shared by Maisie Williams maisie_williams on Dec 3 2014 at 1 43pm PST mophie A post shared by Maisie Williams maisie_williams on Jul 31 2015 at 12 34pm PDT phuckwitus mophie A post shared by...”
“8 01am PST everyone loves a hash brownie A post shared by Maisie Williams maisie_williams on Oct 31 2016 at 11 55am PDT itty bitty titty committee A post shared by Maisie Williams maisie_williams on Apr 11 2016 at 8 11am PDT Hold tight my London Krewwwww A post shared...”
“In a perfect world we would have been watching the eighth season of Game of Thrones by now but today we will have to make do with these cute pictures of Mophie there were never such devoted sisters A post shared by Maisie Williams maisie_williams on Jan 8 2017 at...”
“They are the two coolest celebrity best friends and adored by their fans to bits.”
“Since then, Sophie and Maisie have had several sleepovers, posted hundreds selfies together on social media, attended scores of red carpet events with each other and more.”
“The two bonded so incredibly over time that they now have matching tattoos, marking the date they first met, on August 7, to precise.”
“Sophie, who plays Maisie’s elder sister Sansa Stark on the show, instantly fell in love with her.”
“On the sets, she met her new best friend, Sophie Turner.”
“She was chosen from 300 girls and it was her first acting role ever.”


"Sophie Turner sophiet followed htshowbiz at 9:11 p.m. on September 21, 2015. Learn more..."
“… An article shared by Maisie Williams Maisie य़ Williams at 3:42 p.m. on January 22, 2016 at 1:43 p.m. Pacific Standard Time on December 3, 2014 at mophie by Maisie Williams Maisie य़ Williams at 12:34 p.m. on July 31, 2015 at phukwitus mophie by Maisie Williams
"Everyone likes a pancake at 8:01 a.m. pacific standard time an article by Brownie Maisie Williams at 11:55 a.m. on October 31, 2016 an article by little Title Committee Maisie Williams at 8:11 a.m. on April 11, 2016 an article by hold tight my London krewwow..."
"In a perfect world, we are now watching the eighth season of game of thrones, but today we have to make do with these lovely pictures of Murphy. We have never been so loyal sisters. This is a post published by Maisie Williams on January 8, 2017..."
"They are two of the coolest celebrity friends, and their fans love them."
"Since then, Sophie and Messi have slept several nights, posted hundreds of selfies on social media, participated in dozens of red carpet events and so on
"Over time, the two have been very close together, and now they have matching tattoos, to be exact, the date of their first meeting on August 7."
"Sophie plays Messi's sister, Sansa stark, and she immediately falls in love with her."
"On the set, she met her new friend Sophie Turner."
"She was picked out of 300 girls, her first acting role in history."



Number  381
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch Eminem’s greatest songs below.”
“The best from the bloody, bombastic, brilliant career of the hip-hop troublemaker.”
“Revival, due out December 15th, features guests like Ed Sheeran, Pink and Alicia Keys as well as “Walk on Water” collaborator Beyonce.”
“...unfurled American flag...”
“So they call it a Kaepernick tantrum if you don t stand for the national anthem In addition to Untouchable Eminem also unveiled the album cover for Revival with the rapper ruefully burying his head in his hand behind an...”
“...good cops Just keep marching til we reach Congress But they gonna say you re tying to take an irrational stance cause you try to slander the flag But somebody has to be the sacrificial lamb Eminem said...”
“...delivers a sprawling narrative from the perspective of the black community Why is there black neighborhoods Cause America segregated us Designated us to an area Separated us Section eight d us and criticized bad cops who fuck it up for...”
“Throughout history African Americans have been treated like shit And I admit there have been times where it s been embarrassing to be a white boy In the third verse of Untouchable after the energetic Cheech Chong sample subsides Eminem...”
“...mixed reactions As this beat backspins It like we re drifting back into the Sixties Having black skin is risky cause this keeps happening Eminem says...”
“The song was produced by Mr Porter and built around a sample of Cheech Chong s rock pastiche Earache My Eye Feels like we re stuck in a time warp to me As I kick these facts and get these...”


"Look at Eminem's greatest song below."
"The best comes from the bloody, exaggerated and brilliant career of hip-hop troublemakers."
"Renaissance" will be released on December 15, featuring ed Sheeran, Pinker and Alicia case, as well as "water walk" co-author Beyonce
“… The unfolding American flag... "
"So they call it capernak fury if you don't represent the national anthem, apart from being untouchable, Eminem also released the album cover revival and rap singer sadly buried behind his hand..."
“…… Good police have been marching until we get to Congress, but they will say that you are bound to take an irrational position because you are trying to defame the flag, but someone has to sacrifice the lamb, Eminem said
“… From the point of view of the black community, this article gives an overwhelming account of why there is a black community leading to the isolation of the United States. We assign us to a district to separate us. Section 8 d we criticize the bad police who messed up... "
"Throughout history, African Americans have been treated as poop, and I admit that, after the energetic sample of Kiki clock faded, in the third episode of untouchable, when a white boy, he sometimes felt embarrassed..."
"When it happens, people react differently, like we're back in the '60s, and it's dangerous to have dark skin because it's happening all the time," Eminem said
"This song was created by Mr. Porter and revolves around a rock sample of qiqizhong. My eyes feel that we are trapped in a time warp. I kick these facts and get these..."



**Something goes wrong**
“"kind of weird: a tribute to the dearly departed from a band that can treat its living like trash" __________________”
“We were never able to do that since 1975 because certain people in the band werent interested in doing that, she said.”
“Earlier this month, the band announced it would tour without the veteran guitarist and part-vocalist and replace him with Mike Campbell of Tom Petty & The Heartbreakers and Neil Finn of Crowded House.”
“Rolling Stone reported at the time that Fleetwood Mac had let Buckingham go after a disagreement over the tour.”
“Words like fired are ugly references as far as Im concerned, drummer and co-founder Mick Fleetwood told the magazine in comments posted on Wednesday, the bands first remarks about Buckingham since their shocking announcement.”
“Not to hedge around, but we arrived at the impasse of hitting a brick wall.”
“This was not a happy situation for us in terms of the logistics of a functioning band.”
“To that purpose, we made a decision that we could not go on with him.”
“Majority rules in term of what we need to do as a band and go forward.Fleetwood also called Buckinghams ousting business as usual, the outlet said.”
“Buckingham did not respond to Rolling Stones multiple requests for comment.”


"It's a little strange: salute the dead of a band that can trash life"
"We haven't been able to do that since 1975 because some people in the band aren't interested in it," she said
"Earlier this month, the band announced that they would be touring without the veteran guitarist and half voice singer, replacing Tom Patty's Mike Campbell with heartbreak and Crowded House's Neil Finn."
"Rolling stone reported at the time that flywood MAC let Buckingham Palace go after a disagreement on the tour."
"As far as I'm concerned, words like 'fired' are a bad reference, and this is the band's first review of Buckingham Palace since the shocking announcement," drummer and co-founder Mick Fleetwood told the magazine in a comment on Wednesday
"It's not to avoid, it's to get stuck."
"In terms of the logistics of a functioning band, it's not a happy situation for us."
"For this reason, we have made a decision that we cannot continue to be with him."
"The majority decides what we need to do as a band and move on." Flitwood also said Buckingham Palace will, as always, step down, the media said
"Buckingham Palace did not respond to rolling stone's repeated requests for comment."



Number  383
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the hilarious — and truly amazing — moment above!”
“Foxx also has five studio albums to date.”
“Foxx earned his first Oscar for portraying Ray Charles in the 2004 musical biographical movie Ray.”
“The actor is no stranger to singing.”
“Foxx was up next and performed “Who Let the Dogs Out?” as a Broadway musical, but it was his rendition of Rihanna’s “Bitch Better Have My Money” as an opera song that should have him winning another award.”
“Fallon went first and took on the challenge of performing The Weeknd’s “Can’t Feel My Face” as a ‘50s crooner.”
“As explained by the talk-show host, the game pairs a hit song with a random musical genre that the player then has to attempt to perform.”
“The Oscar winner completely nailed Jimmy Fallon’s hilarious Random Genre Generator music game during an appearance on The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon on Thursday, May 25.”
“Jamie Foxx can do no wrong.”


"Look at the funny - and really amazing - moments above!"
"So far, Foxx has five studio albums."
"Fox won his first Oscar for playing Ray Charles in the 2004 music biography ray."
"Actors are no stranger to singing."
Fox then performed "who let the dog out?"? As a Broadway musical, but it was his performance of Rihanna's "whores better have my money" as an opera song that won him another award
"Fallon went first. As a singer in the 1950s, he accepted the challenge and performed this week's" can't touch my face. "
As the talk show host explained, the game matches a popular song with a random type of music, and then the player has to try to perform that type of music
On Thursday, May 25, on the tonight show, starring Jimmy Fallon, the Oscar winner completely amused Jimmy Fallon's random type generator music game
"Jamie fox can't do anything wrong."



**Something goes wrong**
“Elsa and Chris tied the knot in 2010, and share three children, daughter India Rose, six, and twins Tristan and Sasha, four.”
“Instagram page to document their journey...”
“But Chris Hemsworth and wife Elsa Pataky kept things low-key as they stepped out on a coffee date at a branch of Gail's bakery in the capital on Friday morning.”
“The Australian action hunk, 35, and the Spanish actress, 42, looked happy and relaxed as they chatted away while enjoying an al fresco caffeine fix and tucked into a shared pastry.”
“Caffeine fix Chris Hemsworth and wife Elsa Pataky kept things low key as they stepped out on a coffee date at a branch of Gail s bakery in London on Friday morning Elsa kept things casual for her outing opting for a loose fitting grey sweater with a red New...”
“York slogan across the chest teamed with tight grey workout leggings...”
“The mother-of-three wore her blonde locks scraped back from her face in a loose bun and went make-up free for her morning in London.”
“Elsa completed her outfit with a black leather Fendi satchel bag with gold detailing, and comfortable-looking Nike trainers in black and blush.”
“Chris looked casual in a grey T-shirt and khaki button-down shirt, teamed with indigo jeans and tan suede lace-up shoes.”
“Couple goals The Australian action hunk 35 and the Spanish actress 42 looked happy and relaxed as they chatted away while enjoying an al fresco caffeine fix On Thursday the Thor star and his wife of eight years enjoyed a ride on the London Eye with Elsa taking to her...”


Elsa and Chris got married in 2010 and have three children. Their daughter is 6-year-old Indian rose, and twins Tristan and Sasha are 4 years old
"Instagram page records their journey..."
"But Chris Hemsworth and his wife Elsa Pataky kept a low profile when they went out for coffee on Friday morning at Gail's bakery in the capital."
The 35 year old Australian action superstar and the 42 year old Spanish actress look happy and relaxed as they chat, enjoy a cup of alfresco coffee and share a common pastry
"Caffeine fix Chris Hemsworth and his wife Elsa Pataki keep a low profile as they go out for a coffee date at Gail's bakery in a branch of London on Friday morning, Elsa keeps a casual thing, and her outing chooses a loose grey sweater with a new red..."
"York slogan on chest with tight grey sports tights..."
"The mother of three had her blonde hair shaved off her face in a loose bun and made up for free in London mornings."
"Elsa finished her costumes with black leather Fendi satchel gold details, and comfortably looking for black and blush Nike sneakers."
"Chris looks casual in a grey T-shirt and khaki button down shirt, with indigo jeans and Tan Suede lace up shoes."
"On Thursday, the Australian action superstar, 35, and the Spanish actress, 42, chatted happily and looked relaxed while enjoying the al fresco coffee set meal. The Raytheon star and his wife of eight years enjoyed a trip in the eye of London. Elsa took her with her... "



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Rose McGowan Questions If It's Time to 'Stop Fighting' During Therapy Session on 'Citizen Rose' (Exclusive)Bill Cosby Guilty Verdict: Rose McGowan, Elizabeth Banks and More Celebs ReactRose McGowan Tells All in New Memoir ‘Brave’: 14 Shocking Allegations...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“"INDICTED.”
“FINALLY," the actress wrote.”
“"I’ve been indicted by the media he’s bought out for years to trash me.”
“Now it is a new chapter for both of us."”
“McGowan is one of many women who has accused the former movie producer of sexual misconduct -- which he has denied -- and has been a vocal advocate for women who have gone public with their own stories of abuse and harassment in recent months.”
“The actress now stars in the E!”
“...docu-series Citizen Rose, which examines her experiences with sexual assault in Hollywood and her role in the Me Too movement.”
“Rose's comments regarding Weinstein were shared alongside a promo for her new series, where she wrote about the backlash she feels she's faced from the mainstream media after speaking out against abuse in show business.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Rose McGowan questions whether it's time to "stop fighting" during the treatment of "citizen rose" (exclusive) Bill Cosby's guilty verdict: Rose McGowan, Elizabeth Banks and more celebrities tell all about it in their new memoir brave: 14 shocking charges... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Charged."
"Finally," the actress wrote
"I was sued by the media, and over the years he bribed me for rubbish."
"This is a new chapter for us all."
"McGovern is one of many women who have accused the former filmmaker of sexual misconduct, but he denies that, and she actively supports women who have publicly abused and harassed themselves in recent months."
"The actress is now in E!"
“…… Docu Series citizen rose, which examines her experience of sexual abuse in Hollywood and her role in the "me too" movement
"Ross's comments on Weinstein are shared with her new series of promotional films, in which she wrote that after she publicly opposed the abuse in the performing arts, she felt strongly opposed by the mainstream media."



Number  386
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Johnny Depp must be proud of his talented daughter.”
“She still is young, but she looks amazing.”
“I had just turned 18, so I was ready to up the ante."”
“Lily-Rose commented on the shoot, 'This time I got to show a little more skin and be a little more sexy.”
“She looks flawless!”
“Again, her hair is slicked back, and she is giving the camera an intense stare down.”
“News (@enews) August 23, 2017Another photo from the shoot is Lily-Rose completely topless, using her arms and hands to cover herself.”
“...https://t.co/JznupZn4oc — E!”
“Add Lily-Rose Depp to the long list of names of celebrity children breaking their way into the fashion world.”
“The latest theme of the magazine is the year 1999, when the young star was born.”


"Johnny Depp must be proud of his talented daughter."
"She's young, but she looks charming."
"I've just turned 18, so I'm going to raise the stakes."
"Lily Rose commented during the shoot that this time I'm going to show more skin and be more sexy."
"She looks perfect!"
She combed her hair back again, staring nervously at the camera
News (@ eNews) another photo taken on August 23, 2017 shows Lily Rose naked, covering herself with her arms and hands
“... https://t.co/JznupZn4oc-E ！”
"Add Lily Rose Depp to a long list of children of celebrities who break into fashion."
"The latest theme of this magazine is 1999, when the young star was born."



Number  387
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can watch the full clip of Elba getting his karaoke jams on up top.”
“But get you a man who can do both, as the kids say these days.”
“I don’t think you'll be seeing much of this side of Elba when The Dark Tower drops on Friday, Aug. 4—his character is a certified badass in that movie.”
“Elba even decided to ad-lib at the end after the lyrics stopped flowing, improvising and telling the crowd how much he loves them.”
“The better performance, however, comes at the end of the clip, when Elba and Fallon bust out a duet version of Boyz II Men's "I'll Make Love To You," which is just as amazing as it sounds.”
“This is just a guess, but you should do yourself a favor and not ever refer to the love of your life's backside as a large sapling.”
“The first song, Sir Mix-a-Lot’s "Baby Got Back," was hilariously incoherent, with the big butt talk from the original song being converted to "large saplings."”
“But there was an important twist: the songs were first run through Google Translate, from English to another language then back to English, warping the original version of the tunes until they were almost unrecognizable.”
“To help promote his latest venture, a starring role in the film adaptation of Stephen King’s The Dark Tower, Elba sat alongside Fallon and ran through a couple of songs, karaoke style.”
“During an appearance on The Tonight Show with Jimmy Fallon, Elba showed off some of the charisma that has made him a fixture in big-budget movies over the last half decade or so.”


"You can see the whole footage of Elba blocking his karaoke."
"But find someone who can do both things at the same time, as the kids say now."
"On Friday, August 4, when the tower of darkness collapsed, I don't think you'll see a lot of things on this side of Elba - his character is a recognized villain in that movie."
"Elba even decided to improvise at the end after the lyrics stopped flowing, telling the audience how much he loved them."
"However, the better performance is at the end of the clip. Elba and Fallon played the duet version of Boyz II men's" I want to make love with you ", which sounds amazing."
"It's just a guess, but you should do yourself a favor and never call the love behind your life a big sapling."
"The first song, sir mix-a-lot's" baby's back ", is funny and incoherent. The big bullshit of that song was changed to" big sapling. "
"But there was an important twist: the songs were first translated from English to another language through Google translation, and then into English, distorting the original version of the songs until it was almost unrecognizable."
To promote his recent career, Elba starred in Stephen King's film the tower of darkness. He sat next to Fallon and sang a few karaoke songs
"During his time with Jimmy Fallon on the tonight show, Elba showed some glamour that has made him a regular guest of big budget movies in the past five years or so."



**Something goes wrong**
“...when the timing is right we will find our way to each other In the end Grimaldi came out of this a stronger person and wants nothing but the best for Viall...”
““It wasn’t the distance that was ever an issue.”
“...moving past her heartbreak...”
“Six months ago, fans of ABC’s The Bachelor watched Nick Viall and the Canada native fall in love and get engaged on last season’s finale.”
“Five months later, the duo announced their split, saying in a statement, “We gave this relationship our all and we are saddened that we did not get the fairytale ending we hoped for.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Now, the 29-year-old is opening up about why things didn’t work out and how she plans on moving forward.”
““My relationship with Nick and experience on The Bachelor has given me so many amazing and memorable moments in my life, and I am forever grateful,” Grimaldi exclusively tells PEOPLE in this week’s issue.”
““Nick and I were always transparent about the challenges in a relationship.”
“We certainly had ours.”
“I fell for him hard and when you fall in love that hard your heart breaks even harder Image zoom Credit David Crotty Patrick McMullan via Getty Images In the end as much as we loved each other and tried to make it work we just realized we were different...”


“…… When the time is right, we will find our way to each other. Finally, Grimaldi will come out of this and become a stronger person. He just wants to fight for the best thing for Villar.... "
"Distance is never an issue."
“… Over her heartbreak... "
"Six months ago, fans of ABC's Bachelor saw Nick Villar fall in love and get engaged with this Canadian native in the finale of last season."
Five months later, the two broke up and said in a statement: "we've given everything for this relationship and we're sad that we didn't get the fairy tale ending we wanted." Get news, feature, etc
"Now, at 29, she's starting to say frankly why things didn't work out and how she plans to move on."
"My relationship with Nick and my single experience have given me many amazing and unforgettable moments in my life, and I will always be grateful," Grimaldi told people exclusively in this week's People magazine
"Nick and I are always transparent about the challenges in love."
"Of course we have our own."
"I'm deeply in love with him. When you fall in love, your heart breaks even more. Finally, David crotti Patrick McMullen thanks through Getty Images, just as we love each other and try to make them work, we just realize that we are different... "



Number  389
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is a vocal member of the MeToo and Time s Up movements believes that the moment was indicative of the discrimination that women face in Hollywood to be shut out of certain opportunities if they don t meet the industry s beauty standards...”
“And at that time I was like 21 years old so if you look at that and use that as an example and imagine that for over two decades forms of that from when you re a child to all the way up it does something to you Tamblyn who...”
“You can either be Nicole Kidman or you can be a character actress,'” Tamblyn said.”
“I remember my agent saying to me and she was a woman, ‘You have a real choice here.”
““I think at that point I was 128 pounds and I’m 5-7.”
“Specifically, Tamblyn recalled one conversation with her agent who was told by a Warner Bros. executive that Tamblyn had the chance to become a huge star after 2008’s “The Sisterhood of the Traveling Pants 2″—if she lost weight.”
“In an interview with The New York Times writer Jodi Kantor on Tuesday, the 35-year-old actress and activist opened up about her experience with size discrimination in the entertainment industry.”
“Now, Amber Tamblyn, best known for her role in The Sisterhood of the Traveling Pants movies, is adding her name to the growing pack of actresses who are done with Hollywood’s unfair beauty standards.”
“From Jennifer Lawrence to Julianne Hough, the list of women in Hollywood who have been told to lose weight to become successful is never-ending.”


“…… As a voice member of metoo, the progressive movement of the times believes that this moment shows the discrimination faced by Hollywood women. If they do not meet the beauty standards of the industry, they will be excluded from certain opportunities... "
"I was only 21 years old at that time, so if you take it as an example, imagine that in more than 20 years, from being a child to growing up, it will have an impact on you, tambrin, who..."
"You can be either Nicole Kidman or a role actress," tambrin said
"I remember my agent saying to me that she was a woman," you have a real choice here. "
"I think I was 128 pounds and I was 5-7 years old."
To be specific, tambrin recalled a conversation with her agent when a Warner Bros. executive told her that tambrin had a chance to become a superstar after 2008's panties 2 - if she lost weight
"In an interview with New York Times writer Jodi Kantor on Tuesday, the 35 year old actress and activist made public her experience of somatotype discrimination in the entertainment industry."
"Now, amber TAMBLYN, known for her role as a sister in the panties series, is adding names to a growing number of actresses who are tired of Hollywood's unfair standards of beauty."
"From Jennifer Lawrence to Julian Hoff, Hollywood's list of women told to lose weight to succeed is endless."



Number  390
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I just want to make her proud.””
“She’s pushing me hard I’m working hard.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“While host Erin Andrews interviewed competitors Nick Viall and Peta Murgatroyd, Twitter users caught the 29-year-old bull rider absentmindedly putting his arm around his dancing partner’s waist as he gazed upwards at a screen.”
“His hand fell between Burgess’ thighs before she quickly and discreetly relocated it.”
“Speaking to Entertainment Tonight, Bolton swore the “hand placement that went south, so to speak” was “totally unintentional.”“I was just stargazed by Nick and Peta’s performance and I was looking at the TV screen,” Bolton explained.”
““I felt her bump into me yet I wasn’t really looking at what was bumping into me.”Image zoom Credit: Eric McCandless / ABC Via Getty ImagesSpeaking to PEOPLE after Monday’s season premiere, the hot pair didn’t deny that sparks were flying.”
““I was telling her before we started tonight, ‘I can’t look at you for too long.”
“I might get distracted.”
“That’s why I might miss some of my steps,’ ” Bolton said.”


"I just want to make her proud."
"She's pushing me. I'm working hard."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
When host Irene Andrews interviewed competitors Nick viall and PETA murgatroyd, Twitter users found the 29 year old bull rider with his arms around his partner's waist and staring up at the screen
"His hand fell between Burgess's thighs, and she repositioned it quickly and carefully."
Bolton vowed in an interview with entertainment tonight, "it can be said that it was totally unintentional for his hands to go south." "I was stunned by Nick and PETA's performance, and I was watching the TV screen," Bolton explained
"I feel like she hit me, but I'm not really looking at what hit me." Credit for image zooming: Eric McCandless / ABC told people after Monday's premiere of Getty Images that the hot couple didn't deny the sparkle
"Before tonight I told her, 'I can't see you too long.'"
"I might be distracted."
"That's why I might miss some of my steps," Bolton said



Number  391
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Just the three of us, no visitors, and we’re turning off our phones too, so there’s no expectation for us to communicate.”The couple tied the knot in April 2015 after nine months of dating.”
“...is my hot date...”
“Nikki Reed is finished taking her placenta pills after welcoming her first child over the summer.”
“Celeb Moms Who Ate Their Placenta“Last day of placenta pills,” the Twilight actress, 29, captioned a photo of herself on Thursday, October 19, appearing to look upset about her nearly empty jar.”
““Not ready to say goodbye!!!!”
“!”Last day of placenta pills.”
“Not ready to say goodbye!!!!!”
“A post shared by Nikki Reed (@iamnikkireed) on Oct 19, 2017 at 12:05pm PDTMany other stars have chosen to eat their placenta after giving birth, including January Jones, Mayim Bialik, Blac Chyna, Alicia Silverstone and Kourtney Kardashian.”
“In December 2015, Kim Kardashian wrote in a blog post: “Every time I take a pill, I feel a surge of energy and feel really healthy and good.”
“I totally recommend it for anyone considering it Nikki and Ian s Whirlwind Romance Last week Reed also joked about bringing her breast pump along for the ride to Variety s Power of Women Luncheon in L A On my way to present at variety s powerofwomen luncheon and this...”


"There were only three of us, no visitors, and we turned off our cell phones, so no one expected us to communicate." The couple married in April 2015 after nine months of dating
“… I'm in love with... "
"Nicky reed had her first child in the summer, and she had finished her placenta pills."
The 29 year old Twilight actress wrote in a photo on October 19 (Thursday) that famous mothers who ate placenta "the last day of placenta pills" seem to be uneasy about her nearly empty jar
"Not ready to say goodbye!!"
"!" the last day of placental pill. "
"Not ready to say goodbye!!"
"Nikki reed (@ iamnikired) shared a post at 12:05 p.m. on October 19, 2017. Many other stars choose to eat placenta after childbirth, including January Jones, Mayim bialik, blac Chyna, Alicia Silverstone and Kourtney Kardashian."
"In December 2015, Kim Kardashian wrote on her blog:" every time I take one pill, I feel energetic and really healthy and good. "
"I fully recommend it to all who have thought about it. Nicky and Ian's whirlwind love affair. Last week, reed joked that he would take her breast pump to the women's power luncheon of variety in Los Angeles. On my way to the women's power luncheon of variety, this..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Submit...”
“The finale also reiterated Glassman's promise in the premiere episode that he will give up his job as the president of the hospital if Shaun will not live up to the expectations.”
“'The Good Doctor' Season 2 News: Will Shaun Return to Practice After His Surgical Mishap?”
“Email Print Img No-img Menu Whatsapp Google Reddit Digg Stumbleupon Linkedin CommentAfter his major surgical mishap at the end of season 1, Dr. Shaun Murphy (Freddie Highmore) is expected to go through a lot of changes when "The Good Doctor" returns for season 2.”
“In the first season finale, Shaun accidentally hit a patient's aortic wall in the middle of a surgery because he was thinking about the toy scalpel that his late brother Steve gave him, which he thought he lost.”
“The incident almost caused the patient's life.”
“But even if the patient survived, Shaun opted to admit his mistake to San Jose St. Bonaventure Hospital's chief of surgery Dr. Marcus Andrews (Hill Harper).”
“This will put his and his mentor Dr. Aaron Glassman's (Richard Schiff) licenses in danger.”
“In an interview with TVLine, showrunner David Shore talked about the Shaun and Glassman's fate in "The Good Doctor" season 2.”
“According to Shore, they have always planned for the ending since the pilot of the show.”


Submit
"The final episode also restates Grassman's promise in the premiere that if Sean doesn't meet his expectations, he will give up his job as hospital director."
"Good doctor Season 2 news: will Sean come back after surgery failure?"
Email print img no img menu WhatsApp Google reddit digg stumply LinkedIn comments Dr. Freddie Highmore is expected to experience a lot of changes when the second season of good doctor returns after his major surgical accident at the end of the first season
"In the season one finale, Sean accidentally bumped into a patient's aortic wall during an operation because he thought his late brother Steve had given him a toy scalpel and he thought he had lost."
"It almost destroyed the patient's life."
"But even if the patient survived, Sean still chose to admit his mistake to Dr. Marcus Andrews (Hill Harper), the surgical director of St. bonavent hospital in San Jose."
"It's going to put the licenses of him and his mentor, Dr. Richard Schiff, at risk."
In an interview with tvline, host David shore talked about the fate of Sean and Glassman in the second season of good doctor
"According to Shaw, they've been planning the ending since the show started."



**Something goes wrong**
“ET.”
“You’re just not present.”Meanwhile, Kourtney tries to defend herself asking, “I had a 10 minute conversation with Sarah and that’s offensive?” To which both of her sisters respond, “Yeah.”Khloé — who is pregnant with her first child — continues to rant: “Yes, because we’re only here once.”
“Khloé Kardashian is speaking her mind about sister Kourtney’s phone addiction in a promo for the Sunday, March 4, finale episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“In the clip, the two sisters — along with middle sis Kim — are aboard a boat during their trip to San Francisco’s Alcatraz prison when the 33-year-old Strong Looks Better Naked author loses her patience with her oldest sibling.”
““What the f—k are you here for?” Khloé fumes as she calls Kourtney out for taking a phone call.”
““You’re like a waste of space in my meter right now.”“I’m looking at everything,” the 38-year-old reality star responds, which ultimately just sets Khloé off even more.”
““You’re annoying as f–k now when we’re together,” Khloé replies.”
““This is what you do, you’re on your phone the whole time.”
“When are we ever gonna go back to Alcatraz?”
“Sundays at 9 p.m.”


"Wait a minute."
"You're just not there." Meanwhile, Courtney tried to defend himself by asking, "I talked to Sarah for 10 minutes. Is that offensive? In response, both of her sisters said, "yes." With his first child, khlo é continued to roar, "yes, because we've only been here once."
Kardashian talked about her views on sister Courtney's cell phone addiction in a promotional video for the final episode of "keep up with Kardashian" on Sunday, March 4
In the video, the sisters and sister Kim in the middle are on the boat on their way to San Francisco's Alcatraz prison when the 33 year old strong naked writer loses patience with his brother
"What are you doing here? "Khlo é called her because she called Kourtney, and she was furious."
The 38 year old reality TV star replied, "you're wasting the space in my meter right now." "I'm looking at everything," which will only make Heroe more excited in the end
"When we're together, you're as annoying as F-K now," khlo é replied
"That's what you do. You keep calling."
"When are we going back to Alcatraz?"
"Nine o'clock Sunday evening."



**Something goes wrong**
“Pretty please?”
“Jason LaVeris/FilmMagic/Getty ImagesOK, but can we cast Alexander as the grown-up Bill Denbrough in the It sequel?”
“Just ask his older brother Alexander.”
“The younger Skarsgård made his big debut at at the Hollywood premiere of Andy Muschietti's It, in which he portrays the creepy sewer-dwelling Pennywise the Dancing Clown, and his older brothers Alexander, 41, and Gustaf, 36, were there to cheer him on.”
“Just look how proud they are of their little bro.”
“ROBYN BECK/AFP/Getty ImagesThey are presenting him to the Hollywood elite as if he's the heir to the Skarsgård throne.”
“(Sorry, Valter.”
“You're still my underrated fave.)”
“JB Lacroix/ WireImage/ Getty ImagesBut Alexander, whom you probably know from True Blood or Tarzan or Big Little Lies, also took the opportunity to try and "scare" his baby brother on the red carpet.”
“After all, as the oldest Skarsgård (there are six of them), it is his duty to terrorize his younger siblings, especially at fancy Hollywood functions.”


"Beautiful?"
"Jason Raffles / movie magic / Getty igsok, but can we have Alexander play the adult bill denbru in the IT sequel?"
"Ask his brother Alexander."
Young scarsgarde made his debut at the Hollywood premiere of Andy mascheti's film it, in which he played a creepy dancing clown living in a sewer. His brother, Alexander, 41, and Gustav, 36, also cheered him on
"See how proud they are of their little brother."
"Robbin Beck / AFP / Getty Images they presented him to the Hollywood elite as if he were the heir to skass' third throne."
"I'm sorry, Walter."
"You are still my underrated favorite."
"JB Lacroix / WireImage / Getty Images, but Alexander, you may know him from true love like blood or Mount Tai or big and small lies, and take this opportunity to" scare "his little brother on the red carpet."
"After all, as the oldest scasgold (six in all), it's his responsibility to intimidate his younger brother and sister, especially at Hollywood's high-end parties."



**Something goes wrong**
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



**Something goes wrong**
““There are undoubtedly facets that I might love to hunt out—principally simply being challenged and dealing on artwork for the sake of artwork.”
“Going ahead, he hopes to duplicate the expertise he had engaged on the indie.”
“'” Although his daughter will not be sufficiently old to grasp what a milestone that is, the 31-year-old actor positive is.”
“OK…Can I’ve pancakes for breakfast?”
“Daddy received nominated for a Golden Globe!’ She’ll go, ‘Oh.”
“She’s going to come back downstairs, and I’ll say, ‘Harper!”
““However I can inform you how the dialog goes to go.”
““I’ve to speak quietly, as a result of Harper remains to be sleeping,” the actor stated apologetically.”
““It is all the time an excellent factor when your day peaks at 5:45 within the morning.”Because it turned out, Hammer was already awake, as he has two younger youngsters at house.”
““It has been good,” he laughed.”


"No doubt, there are some aspects I may like to look for, mainly to accept challenges and deal with works of art for the sake of art."
"Going on, he wants to replicate his expertise in indie music."
"Although his daughter is not old enough to understand what an important milestone this is, the 31 year old actor is positive."
"Well Can I have pancakes for breakfast? "
"Dad was nominated for the golden globe! "She'll go," Oh. “
"She's coming down, and I'll say, 'Harper!"
"But I can tell you about the progress of the dialogue."
"I have to say it quietly because Harper is still sleeping," the actor said apologetically
"When your day peaks at 5:45 a.m., it's always a great factor." Because it turns out that hammer is awake because there are two young people in his family
"Good," he said with a smile



Number  397
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: BACKGRIDDo you think Scott and Sofia will get married next year?”
“Could this relationship be heading down the aisle as they embark on a new year with one another?”
“...vibe Source BACKGRID They touched down in Aspen yesterday where the couple looked absolutely smitten with one another as Scott playfully spins her and they both played in the snow...”
“Sofia and Scott shared their journey to Aspen all over social media with her posting a pic outside a private jet with the caption Ready for 2018 Article continues below advertisement He followed suit inside the jet posting a pic with the caption I m on a whole new year...”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDIt’s a big upgrade from how they spent Christmas Eve, where the couple was seen going through a McDonald’s drive-thru window as she didn’t attend the annual Kardashian Christmas party whereas Scott was and went later on that night.”
“Source: BACKGRIDThey have been sporting their PDA all around the world, from Miami to Calabasas, so it comes as no surprise that they will be finishing their year off in another fabulous city like Aspen.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDScott and Sofia have been getting hot and heavy with one another since they were first romantically linked in May of 2017.”
“Click-through for all the details!”
“Scott Disick and Sofia Richie will be enjoying some pretty snow all around them once the clock strikes midnight on New Year’s Eve, as they have chosen to spend the holiday in the beautiful city of Aspen, Colorado!”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
Do you think Scott and Sophia will get married next year? "
"Will this relationship go down as they start the new year?"
“… In the background music of their landing in Aspen yesterday, when Scott twirled her playfully and they were playing in the snow, the couple seemed completely fascinated by each other... "
"Sofia and Scott shared their journey to Aspen on social media. She posted a picture outside a private plane titled" ready for 2018. "The article continues in the following advertisement. He followed up with a picture inside the plane titled" I'm living a new year... "
"The article continues with the following advertising source: backgrid, which is a big upgrade from how they spend Christmas Eve, where the couple were seen through McDonald's drive in window because she didn't attend the annual Kardashian Christmas party, while Scott was, and went later that evening."
"Source: backgrid they've been using handheld computers all over the world, from Miami to Calabasas, so it's not surprising that they're going to end their year's vacation in another magical city like Aspen."
"The article continues with the following advertising sources: backgridscott and Sofia have been passionate since their first romantic love in May 2017."
"Click to see all the details!"
"When the clock strikes midnight on New Year's Eve, Scott Disick and Sophia Ritchie will enjoy the beautiful snow around them because they choose to spend their holiday in the beautiful city of Aspen, Colorado!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Poll: A third of women say they’ve been sexually harassed or abused at work...”
“The woman said she complained to PBS management and was told that Rose was harmless.”
“The Washington Post said that on least three occasions prior to that, women reported discomfort about Rose’s actions to superiors.”
“Rose was fired as “CBS This Morning” anchor and PBS cancelled his interview show after an earlier Post report on women who said he groped them, made lewd remarks or walked around naked around them.”
“In one new allegation, a former research assistant said Rose exposed his penis and touched her breasts when they worked at NBC News’ Washington bureau in 1976.”
“The Post said Rose, 76, told the newspaper in an email that its story was inaccurate and unfair.”
“Since Rose was fired, CBS News said it has taken steps to ensure a safer workplace, including mandatory misconduct training.”
“Network news President David Rhodes and other key managers have said they were unaware of Rose’s actions.”
“Yet the Post outlined three episodes where word had reportedly spread:Annmarie Parr was a 22-year-old news clerk in 1986 when she handed Rose a script and he asked whether she enjoyed sex and how often she liked to have it.”
“She told a senior producer about it and said she didn t want to be alone with Rose and said her boss laughed and said Fine you don t have to be alone with him anymore In 2011 a woman who worked at CBS This Morning said Rose forcibly kissed...”


"Opinion poll: one third of women say they have been sexually harassed or abused at work..."
"The woman said she complained to the management of the public broadcaster that rose was harmless."
Before that, at least three times, women reported discomfort with Rose's behavior to their superiors, the Washington Post said
Ross was fired as anchor of CBS this morning, and PBS canceled his talk show because of an earlier post reporting that he touched them, made obscene remarks, or walked naked around them
In a new charge, a former research assistant said that in 1976, while working for NBC's Washington bureau, rose exposed her penis and touched her breast
"The Post said Ross, 76, told the paper in an email that his report was inaccurate and unfair."
"Since Rose's dismissal, CBS News said it has taken measures to make the workplace safer, including mandatory misconduct training."
"David Rhodes, President of Internet news, and other major managers said they didn't know what rose was doing."
However, this article outlines three plots that have been reported to have spread news: Anne Marie Parr, a 22-year-old journalist, handed rose a script in 1986 and asked if she liked sex and how often she liked it
"She told a senior producer that she didn't want to be alone with rose, and her boss laughed, saying that it's good that you don't have to be alone with him in 2011. A woman working in CBS said this morning that rose was forced to kiss..."



**Something goes wrong**
“We can't wait until the baby photos start coming!”
“Conrad shared another pretty shot to show off some pieces from her new maternity line.”
“Conrad announced the happy news on Instagram Wednesday evening, writing, "He's here!”
“We're so excited to welcome Liam James Tell into the world!"”
““We are thrilled to share that we welcomed our son Liam James Tell into our family,” the couple told People.”
““Mom, Dad and baby are doing well.”
“We’re already in love!”Lauren Conrad and musician William Tell attend the "Lauren Conrad Celebrate" book launch party at Kohl's Showroom on March 23, 2016 in New York City.”
“Larry Busacca Getty Images for PMK BNC The reality star turned fashion designer revealed her pregnancy on Instagram back in January with a photo of herself holding a sonogram writing I have a feeling 2017 is going to be the best year yet In June the 31 year old announced...”
“...the baby s gender with an adorable illustration of a little boy driving a car...”
“"I found this adorable birth announcement while helping my grandma move and I thought it was the perfect way to share that William and I are expecting a baby boy," she wrote in the Instagram caption.”


"We can't wait for the baby's picture to come!"
"Conrad shared another beautiful picture showing some of her new pregnant women series."
Conrad announced the good news on instagram on Wednesday night, and wrote: "he's coming!"
"We are very happy to welcome Liam James tell to this world!"
"We are happy to tell you that we welcome our son Liam James to tell our family," the couple told the people
"Mom, dad and baby are fine."
"We are in love! "Lauren Conrad and musician William Tell attended the Lauren Conrad celebration book launch on March 23, 2016 at the cole hall in New York City."
"Larry Busacca Getty Images, a fashion designer who started as a reality TV star, revealed her pregnancy on instagram in January this year. In the photo, she took an ultrasound photo and wrote," I have a feeling that 2017 will be the best year so far. At the age of 31, she announced that in June... "
“… The baby's gender with an illustration of a cute little boy driving a car
"I found this lovely birth announcement while helping my grandmother move, and I think it's the perfect way to share William and I'm having a baby boy," she wrote in the title of instagram



**Something goes wrong**
“The couple announced that they were expecting in October 2017 followed by an adorable video that same month that revealed they would be welcoming another boy.”
“We are SO excited to meet him,” she wrote on Instagram along with an update on her growing bump.”
“Jessie James Decker and her NFL star husband Eric Decker welcomed their third child, son Forrest Bradley Decker, on Saturday, March 31, she announced Monday on Instagram.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We are so in love,” the new mom, 29, captioned her birth announcement featuring her holding her newborn son, who weighed in at 9 lbs.”
“The couple, who wed in 2013, is already parents to 4-year-old daughter Vivianne “Vivi” Rose and 2½-year-old son Eric “Bubby” Thomas Jr.“Welcome to this world Forrest Bradley Decker!”
“My heart is full!”
“#wolfpack completed with a 9lb lean, eating machine (& a Decker bucket head)!”
“Mommy sure knows how to grow some babies!”
“!” the new dad shared on Instagram.”


"The couple announced that they would welcome another boy in October 2017, with a lovely video showing that they would welcome another boy the same month."
"We're happy to meet him," she wrote on instagram, updating her growing lump
"Jessie James Decker and her NFL star husband Eric Decker have their third child, Forrest Bradley Decker, on Saturday, March 31," she announced on instagram on Monday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We love each other so much," the 29 year old new mother wrote in her birth announcement, carrying her 9-pound newborn son
The couple, who married in 2013, are the parents of their 4-year-old daughter Vivian "Vivian" Ross and their 2-and-a-half-year-old son Eric "Bubby" Thomas Jr. "Welcome to the world, Forrest Bradley Decker!"
"My heart is full!"
"Wolfpack is equipped with a 9-pound lean meat machine and a Decker bucket head!"
"Of course mother knows how to raise a child!"
"!" New Dad shared it on instagram. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Sarah Jessica Parker on the red carpet (Getty)Scarlett Johansson looked beautiful, but her outfit was forgettable, as it had nothing to do with the theme.”
“Featuring an over-the-top gold headpiece and equally busy dress, the usually-fashionable actress's outfit was a lot to take in.”
“Couture red ballgown AFP Getty Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Ariana Grande poses alongside Vera Wang the designer of the singer s debut Met Gala gown Rex Features Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Nicki Minaj wears a red Oscar de la Renta gown and bejeweled headpiece PA Met Gala 2018”
“...with a mantilla veil Getty Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Vogue editor Anna Wintour wears a custom Chanel gown featuring a halter neck and intricate beading Getty Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Frances McDormand wearing a Versace gown and Philip Treacy headpiece Pierpaolo Piccioli and Anne Hathaway sporting a Valentino...”
“...for a structural black Iris van Herpen dress and a halo headpiece with a black du rag Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Lily Collins wears a black Givenchy gown and coordinating gothic makeup Getty Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Kate Bosworth wears an ethereal Oscar de la Renta gown topped...”
“...thigh high boots Getty Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Black Panther s Chadwick Bosemanan wears an all white Versace outfit with religiously inspired embellishments gold shoes and a cape Getty Images Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Priyanka Chopra wears Ralph Lauren Getty Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Solange Knowles opted...”
“Met Gala gown AFP Getty Images Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Supermodel Bella Hadid wears a glossy latex corset by Chrome Hearts Official x Gareth Pugh topped with a sculptural cape Getty Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Katy Perry incorporated the theme with oversized wings a Versace chainmail dress and...”
“Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Show all 50 1 50 Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Rihanna went all in on the Catholicism theme wearing custom Maison Margiela AFP Getty Met Gala 2018 Heavenly Bodies Madonna poses alongside Jean Paul Gaultier the designer of her gothic...”
“Priyanka Chopra on the red carpet (Getty)But, as with any red carpet, there are some ensembles that just don't come together.”
“...in Vera Wang Amber Heard who turned heads in a stunning red gown and Priyanka Chopra in a Ralph Lauren red velvet dress and gold chain mail headdress...”


"Sarah Jessica Parker (Sarah Jessica Parker) on the red carpet Scarlett Johnson looks beautiful, but her dress is forgotten because it has nothing to do with the theme."
"This usually fashionable actress's costume is very popular. She wears a super high gold headdress and is equally busy."
"Custom red ball dress AFP Getty met Gala 2018 celestial body Ariana Grande and Vera Wang are photographed together. Vera Wang is the designer of the singer's debut met gala dress. Rex is the close-up of met Gala 2018 celestial body. Nicki Minaj is wearing a red Oscar de la Renta dress and a jewel headdress PA met Gala 2018."
“… Wearing a Mantilla veil, Anna Wintour, editor of Astro fashion magazine 2018, wears a custom Chanel dress with a sling neck and complicated beads. Frances McDormand, editor of Astro fashion magazine 2018, wears a Versace dress and Philip Tracy, editor of Astro fashion magazine 2018 Pierpaolo piccioli and Anne Hathaway（
“… For a black structured iris van Herpen dress and a halo headdress with black Durag met Gala 2018 celestial body, Lily Collins wears a black Givenchy robe and Getty met Gala 2018 celestial body coordinating Gothic make-up, and Kate Bosworth wears a flowing Oscar de la Renta robe... "
“… Thigh high boots Getty blind date 2018 celestial Panther s Chadwick bosemann wearing all white Versace clothing with religious inspiration embellishment gold shoes and Cape Getty photo blind date 2018 celestial Priyanka Chopra wearing Ralph Lauren Getty blind date 2018 celestial Solange Knowles choice... "
"The met gala dress AFP Getty Images met Gala 2018 supermodel Bella Hadid wears a smooth latex corset designed by the official x Gareth Pugh with a chrome plated red heart. The top is decorated with a sculpture like Getty met Gala 2018 celestial body. Katy Perry integrates the theme into the oversized wing Versace chain dress and..."
"Met Gala 2018 celestial show all 50 1 50 met Gala 2018 celestial body Rihanna wears a custom Maison Margiela AFP Getty met Gala 2018 celestial body Madonna and her Gothic designer Jean Paul Gaultier..."
"Priyanka Chopra is on the red carpet (Getty), but, like any red carpet, some ensembles are just out of tune."
“…… In King Vera, amber hears Priyanka Chopra in a stunning red robe, Ralph Lauren's red velvet dress and gold chain mail headdress



**Something goes wrong**
“I just want to flush this damn poop story right down the toilet (pun intended).”
“This was the saddest part of all of this mess and it let me know where our friendship REALLY was.”
“Listen, I didn’t want Brandi to pee on the bus.”
“LOL.”
“I think I’d like to address the pee-on-the-bus incident.”
“Speaking of messy...”
“To let them really see the core of me, which they did until things got messy.”
“I was really hoping that this would be a chance for me to actually be vulnerable, to let those walls down and be the raw LeeAnne that I am with Tiffany.”
“I thought this was going to be an opportunity for all of us to let our hair down and really connect on a personal level without any facades and just keep it real.”
“Going into the trip, I was really excited.”


"I just want to flush this shit story straight into the toilet."
"It's the saddest part of the mess, and it shows me where our friendship is."
"Look, I don't want brandy peeing in the car."
"Ha ha."
"I think I want to talk about urinating on the bus."
"Speaking of disorder..."
"Let them really see the core of me until things get messy."
"I really hope this is an opportunity to make me really vulnerable, to let those walls down and become the original Lian, me and Tiffany."
"I think it's going to be an opportunity for all of us to put down our hair and really connect on a personal level, without any facade, just to be real."
"I'm really excited when I travel."



**Something goes wrong**
““It’s just like, you know …””
““I feel like on social media lately everyone takes themselves so seriously, and I’m over it.”Kardashian then asks about how Disick, 34, was doing while she was away.”
“...she adds...”
“He needs to get a f ing life and leave me alone All he does is try to make everybody else feel bad for him and try to make me look like the bad guy in the situation when clearly I m not from 10 years of this going on...”
“I can’t even go anywhere.”
““It’s just like, I can’t even live my life.”
““Because you were having fun, spending time with other people.”“Well, that’s really not fair,” Kardashian fires back.”
““I think he was jealous,” Jenner admits.”
“It was so funny,” Kardashian says.”
““You always want what you can’t have,” warns Jenner.”


"Like, you know..."
"I feel like everyone has taken themselves so seriously on social media these days. I'm over it." Kardashian then asked, how was it when 34 year old Dick was away
“… She added
"He needs to live a happy life and leave me alone. All he does is to make others feel sorry for him and make me look like a bad person in that situation. Obviously, I'm not the person I was 10 years ago..."
"I can't go anywhere."
"Like, I can't even live my life."
"Because you have a good time and spend time with others." "Well, that's really unfair," Kardashian replied
"I think he's jealous," Jenner admitted
"It's so interesting," said Kardashian
"You always want what you can't have," Jenner warned



Number  404
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She s a Caribbean queen purveying the Latin trap sound see her Top 10 hit and song of the summer candidate I Like It she s an ex stripper with butt injections who s after your money she s a...”
“Once positioning herself as little more than a “regular, degular, shmegular girl from the Bronx,” she’s transformed into a multimedia artist with powerful facets to her personality both on and off the stage.”
““I haven’t even sent the invitations.” Her eyes dart around the room.”
““I’ve got to buy mad flights for my friends from New York,” she says, jiggling her leg, a childhood habit that she indulges in when she’s nervous.”
“Right now, she’s worrying about the upcoming baby shower for the girl inside her tummy, which she still hasn’t planned.”
“...plagued introvert...”
“In her songs she may seem like a 24 7 bad bitch but today her face scrubbed clean of makeup and unbrushed Rapunzel like blond wig hanging to her waist she s a curious combination of raunchy extrovert and angst...”
“But being Cardi, she can’t quite do that.”
“All she needs to do is enjoy the next seven weeks before she becomes a mom.”
“The exhausting pace of the past months – spent recording songs, perfecting a raft of lush videos and hiding her belly from the paparazzi – is receding now.”


"She's the queen of the Caribbean. She's Latin trap music. Look at her top 10 hits and summer candidate songs. I love that she's a former stripper, with an ass shot, chasing your money. She's a..."
She once defined herself as "a common, personalized and shy girl in the Bronx". Now she has become a multimedia artist. Her personality has a strong side both on and off the stage
"I haven't even sent the invitation." Her eyes were rolling around the room
"I have to buy crazy flights for my friends from New York," she said, shaking her legs, a habit she developed when she was nervous as a child
"Now, she's worried about the baby baptism for the girl in her belly. She hasn't planned yet."
“… Tormented introverts... "
"In her songs, she looks like a 24-hour bad bitch, but today her face is clean, and she has a blonde wig like a princess with long hair hanging around her waist. She is a strange combination of vulgarity, extroversion and anxiety..."
"But as caddy, she can't do that."
"All she needs to do is enjoy the next seven weeks before she becomes a mom."
"The exhausting rhythms of the past few months - the time spent recording songs, perfecting a bunch of lush videos, and hiding your stomach in front of the paparazzi - are fading."



Number  405
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But I believe in doing whatever it takes to find love.”Both beautiful in their own right, here’s hoping Burnham’s ring gets a bit more use than Kufrin’s did!”
“...with...”
“But that doesn t mean it s any less dazzling designer Lane released a statement saying this is one of the most intricate ring designs I have ever done for The Bachelor which is appropriate as this is also the most intricate and intriguing finale I ve ever been involved...”
“While Burnham’s bling certainly looked blinding on TV, these subtle differences mean it is likely worth less than the $80,000 Kufrin’s was estimated to cost.”
“There are also micro-pave stones akin to chips laid into the band — about 170 in total — but they don’t go all the way around.”
“Sources tell Us that Burnham’s rock, meanwhile, features a cushion cut diamond accented by two baguette stones with tiny gems surrounding it on all sides.”
“The band was also completely covered in diamonds.”
“As Us Weekly previously reported, Kufrin’s sparkler — which she returned to Luyendyk when he blindsided her with a breakup in January — was a platinum set diamond halo ring that featured an additional set of smaller diamonds surrounding the center stone.”
“While we didn’t see the Bachelor star meet with Lane for his second go around, we know the ring he presented to Burnham weighed in slightly smaller at 3.65 carats.”
“...his original proposal to Kufrin in Peru Luyendyk met with celebrity jeweler Neil Lane to select a 4 carat ring...”


"But I believe that no matter what I do, I can find love." Both of them are beautiful. I hope Burnham's ring will be more useful than Coughlin's ring! "
“… With... "
"But that doesn't mean it's not as dazzling as the designer Ryan said in a statement that it's one of the most complex ring designs I've ever done for a bachelor, which is appropriate, because it's also the most complex and interesting ending I've ever been involved in..."
"While Burnham's jewelry does look dazzling on TV, these nuances mean it may be worth less than the $80000 kuflynn estimates."
"There are microchip like paving stones in the band - about 170 in all - but they're not everywhere."
"Sources tell us that Burnham's rock, at the same time, is surrounded by two French bread stones with a buffer Cut Diamond Accent and tiny gems."
"The band is full of diamonds, too."
"As previously reported by us weekly, kuflin's glittering ring is a platinum diamond ring with a smaller set of diamonds around the center stone. When kuflin broke up in January, kuflin returned to luyandik."
"Although we didn't see the bachelor star meet Ryan for the second time, we knew that the ring he gave Burnham was a little smaller, only 3.65 carats."
“…… When he first proposed to couverin in Peru, luyandick met with the famous jeweler Neil lane and chose a 4-carat ring.... "



Number  406
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I apologised for my behaviour, and that's the entire story.'”
“Mara also shared a number of sweet family snaps of the trio and her mother posing at the event.”
“And Jonathan Rhys Meyers was enjoying a rare night out with his glamorous wife Mara Lane and their son Wolf, one, at a charity event in Los Angeles on Sunday.”
“The 41-year-old actor cut a dapper figure as he arrived at the Elizabeth Glaser Pediatric AIDS Foundation's 30th Anniversary for A Time For Heroes Family Festival alongside his loved ones.”
“Happy families Jonathan Rhys Meyers was enjoying a rare night out with his glamorous wife Mara Lane and their son Wolf one at a charity event in Los Angeles on Sunday Jonathan looked happy and healthy as he graced the red carpet in a grey ripped T shirt and a...”
“...smart blazer...”
“Mara donned a low-cut sundress with fastening detailing on the bodice and a short hemline.”
“She wore her hair down in loose waves and completed her look with brown leather sandals.”
“Little Wolf looked adorable in a pair of silk trousers, a skeleton print hoodie and mini Gucci trainers.”
“Back to his best: Jonathan looked happy and healthy as he graced the red carpet in a grey ripped T-shirt and a smart blazerMara took to her Instagram account to raise awareness for the charity event, supporting children and families affected by HIV.”


"I apologize for my behavior, and that's what happened."
"Mara also shared some sweet family photos of the three taking group photos with her mother at the event."
"Jonathan Reese Meyers spent a rare evening with his charming wife, Mara lane, and their son, wolf, at a charity event in Los Angeles on Sunday
"The 41 year old actor was dashing when he attended the 30th anniversary of the founding of the Elizabeth Glaser children's AIDS Foundation and attended the heroic family day with his loved ones."
"Happy family Jonathan Rhys Meyers spent a rare night with his charming wife, Mara lane, and their son, wolf one, at a charity event in Los Angeles on Sunday. Jonathan wore a gray T-shirt with holes and a white shirt
“… Beautiful coat... "
"Mara is wearing a low cut sun skirt with fastener details and a short hem."
"She combed her hair into loose waves and put on brown leather sandals to complete her look."
"Wolf looks cute in silk pants, skull print Hoodie and mini Gucci sneakers."
"Back to his best: Jonathan walked down the red carpet in a gray T-shirt with holes and a beautiful blazer, looking happy and healthy. He has raised the profile of charitable activities on instagram's account, supporting children and families affected by AIDS. "



Number  407
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lamar Odom...”
“RELATED CONTENT EXCLUSIVE Khloe Kardashian Is Keeping the Peace With Tristan Thompson for Sake of Their Daughter Exclusive NEWS Khloe Kardashian s Ex Lamar Odom Genuinely Feels Bad After Hearing of Tristan Thompson s Alleged Cheating NEWS Kanye West Returns to Twitter Shares Emotional Memory With Khloe Kardashian s Ex...”
“See more on the famous family below.”
“Embed Code Restart Kris Jenner Keeping Khloe Kardashian's 'Spirits High' Amid Cheating Scandal (Exclusive)As their bromance plays out on social media, Kardashian is meanwhile dealing with cheating allegations against her boyfriend, Tristan Thompson, which surfaced just two days before she welcomed the couple’s baby girl, True.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...was worth it LAMAR ODOM RealLamarOdom April 16 2018 Kris Jenner Keeping Khloe Kardashian s Spirits High Amid Cheating Scandal Exclusive This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“It was a big stage 2 be on after everything I went thru but it was worth it kanyewest Glad I could be there 4 u bro like u came thru 4 https t co p3ZuCAIfv9 was a big stage 2 be on after everything I went thru but it...”
““Glad I could be there 4 u bro like u came thru 4 me,” Odom wrote on Twitter.”
“Odom responded on Monday, thanking West for his support.”
“"Then we walked into the arena together."”


"Odom..."
"Exclusive report on Khloe Kardashian's peace with Tristan Thompson for his daughter's sake exclusive report on Khloe Kardashian's predecessor Lamar Odom, who was really sad after hearing that Tristan Thompson was suspected of cheating, Kanye West returned to Twitter to share emotional memories with Khloe Kardashian's predecessor..."
"See more about this famous family below."
"Kris Jenner kept Khloe Kardashian in high spirits during the fraud scandal (exclusive) because their marriage was on social media and she was dealing with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson Thompson), which came to light just two days before she welcomed the couple's baby girl
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
“…… It's worth mentioning that Lamar Odom reyaramarodom on April 16, 2018, Chris Jenner kept Khloe Kardashian in a high mood in the cheating scandal. The exclusive video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information... "
"It's a big stage 2 after I've experienced everything, but it's worth it kanyewest is happy I can be there 4 your brother like you through 4 HTTPS t Co p3zucaifv9 is a big stage 2 after I've experienced everything, but it..."
"I'm glad I'm here with you, just like you walk past me," Odom tweeted
"Odom responded on Monday, thanking the West for its support."
"Then we went into the arena together."



**Something goes wrong**
“On Sunday, Weinstein was fired from his namesake company.”
“The now-disgraced Hollywood titan has received widespread condemnation, including from former President Barack Obama.”
“More than a dozen women have come forward, including three who have accused him of rape.”
“— terrycrews (@terrycrews) October 10, 2017The actors’ allegations follow damning reports in The New York Times and The New Yorker detailing decades of Weinstein’s alleged misconduct.”
“(5/cont.)”
“Black Man stomps out Hollywood Honcho” would be the headline the next day.”
““240 lbs.”
“— James Van Der Beek (@vanderjames) October 12, 2017“Brooklyn Nine-Nine” star Terry Crews shared a similar story on Tuesday, recounting when a “high level” executive “groped my privates.” He said he didn’t speak out at the time for fear of losing job opportunities.”
“I applaud everybody speaking out.”
“What he’s admitted to is unacceptable - in any industry.”


On Sunday, Weinstein was fired by his namesake company
The Hollywood superstar is now in disrepute and has been widely denounced, including former President Barack Obama
"More than a dozen women have come forward, three of them accusing him of rape."
"- terrycrews (@ terrycrews) on October 10, 2017, the actor's charges came after the New York Times and the new Yorker's condemning reports detailing Weinstein's decades old alleged misconduct."
"(5 / continued)"
"Black stepping out of Hollywood boss" will be the headlines of the next day
"240 pounds."
"- James vanderjames (@ vanderjames) October 12, 2017" Brooklyn 99 "star Terry crews shared a similar story on Tuesday, telling the story of a" senior "executive" touching my privacy ". "He said he didn't speak because he was afraid of losing his job."
"I applaud everyone's speech."
"What he admits is unacceptable in any industry."



Number  409
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“﻿ ﻿”
“Watch the video below.”
“...down one player...”
“Chauncey Leopardi who played Squints confessed that his daughter thinks I m just kind of a dork See Video The Sandlot Famed Scene Gets Milwaukee Brewers Treatment After reminiscing about the good old days the team took the field again and NBC correspondent Gadi Schwartz stepped up since they were...”
“...son for the first time but he s really big on Moana unfortunately...”
“Also Read The Sandlot at 25 Why the 90s Cult Classic Will Live For Ev Ver According to David Mickey Evans who wrote directed and narrated the film shooting the film was the greatest summer of our lives Patrick Renna who played Ham said he showed the film to his...”
“I can’t walk through a Las Vegas casino without someone yelling ‘Yeah-Yeah!”
““I mean, it definitely gets you in places for free.”
““It’s been crazy,” Marty York, who played Alan “Yeah-Yeah” McClennan, said.”
“Smalls, Ham, Squints, DeNunez, Yeah-Yeah, Timmy, Bertram and Repeat all ventured back onto a baseball field on Thursday.”


“﻿ ﻿”
"Watch the video below."
“… Knock down a player... "
"Chamcy Leopardi, who plays the squint, admits that his daughter thinks I'm just a nerd. After watching the video, she recalled the good time when the team played again. Sandlot's famous scene was treated by Milwaukee brewery, and NBC reporter Gadi Schwartz stood up because they..."
“… It's my son's first time, but he's really unhappy with Mona... "
"Also read the 25-year-old battlefield, why the 90's cult classics will live in ever, according to David Mitch Evans, who wrote, directed and narrated the film shooting. This film is the greatest summer of our lives, Patrick Reiner, who plays ham, said he gave this film to him..."
"I can't go through the casinos in Las Vegas without being yelled 'Yeah, yeah!"
"I mean, it definitely gives you free access to some places."
"It's crazy," says Marty York, who plays Alan
"Smalles, ham, squint, Denise, yes, yes, Timmy, Bertram and repeat all the adventures back to the baseball field on Thursday."



**Something goes wrong**
“Picture Perfect / Splash NewsRelated: Justin Bieber and Bella Hadid Wore the Same, Exact Plaid ShortsCheck this out:”
“In the meantime, we hope he’s doing well and getting the rest he needs.”
“Justin has yet to make any follow-up statements about a future tour or concert series.”
“He seemed genuinely apologetic — but firm about prioritizing his mental health — and it seems highly unlikely that he would follow that statement by taunting fans with a Purpose Tour outfit.”
“One person said it perfectly when they wrote, “someone has to wear the remaining shirts.”Last week, Justin told his fans that he’s been on tour for the last two years and it was time for him to stop and regroup.”
“...it's kind of a huge slap on our faces.”Now, it’s likely that Justin has plenty of Purpose Tour merch tees (it was his tour after all) and maybe he just needed a clean tee to step outside in.”
“One fan account put it bluntly, “stop wearing purpose tour merch.”
“But this week, when Justin was seen out in Los Angeles wearing the very Purpose Tour merch that fans were hoping to get at his upcoming shows, they didn't respond kindly.”
“On top of understandable disappointment, most fans offered support and well wishes to their favorite singer, hoping that he gets the rest that he needs.”
“It’s been about a week since Justin Bieber abruptly canceled his Purpose Tour, citing a need to relax.”


"Perfect picture / splash newsrelated: Justin Bieber and Bella Hadid are wearing the same plaid shorts. Look at this:
"At the same time, we want him to perform well and get the rest he needs
"Justin hasn't made any follow-up statements about his future tour or concert series."
"He seems really sorry - but firmly prioritizes his mental health - and it seems highly unlikely that he will follow this statement and ridicule the fans with a purposeful tour costume."
"It's perfect when one says, 'someone has to wear the rest of the shirt.'" Last week, Justin told his fans that he's been on tour for two years and now it's time for him to stop and regroup
“…… It's a big slap on our face. " Now, Justin probably has a lot of purposeful tour merch T-shirts (this is his tour after all), maybe he just needs a clean T-shirt to go out
One fan said bluntly, "stop wearing purposeful tour clothes."
"But this week, when Justin was seen in Los Angeles wearing the very purposeful tour fans wanted to see on his upcoming show, they didn't respond kindly."
"In addition to the understandable disappointment, most fans also express their support and best wishes to their favorite singer, hoping that he can get the rest he needs."
"It's about a week since Justin Bieber suddenly cancelled his destination trip because he needed to relax."



**Something goes wrong**
“Following two appearances on the television show Signed, Sealed, Delivered in 2014, she retired from acting.”
“Reese was plagued with health problems later in life, including a battle with diabetes which she blamed on poor diet and exercise.”
“She leaves behind sons James, Franklin and Dominique, as well as husband Franklin Lett.”
“She was predeceased by daughter Deloreese.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““On behalf of her husband, Franklin Lett, and all her friends and family, I share with you the news that our beloved Della Reese has passed away peacefully at her California home last evening surrounded by love.”
“She was an incredible wife, mother, grandmother, friend, and pastor, as well as an award-winning actress and singer.”
“Through her life and work she touched and inspired the lives of millions of people,” her costar Roma Downey confirmed to PEOPLE in an exclusive statement.”
““She was a mother to me and I had the privilege of working with her side by side for so many years on Touched By an Angel.”
“I know heaven has a brand new angel this day.”


"She retired from the performing arts industry after appearing twice on the TV show signature, seal and publication in 2014."
"Reese suffered from health problems in her later years, including the fight against diabetes, which she attributed to improper diet and exercise."
"She left her sons James, Franklin and Dominic, and her husband Franklin Wright."
"Her daughter, Delores, died long ago."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On behalf of her husband, Franklin Wright, and all her friends and family, I have a message for you: our beloved della Reese died peacefully last night in her California home surrounded by love."
She is a great wife, mother, grandmother, friend and pastor, as well as an award-winning actress and singer
"Through her life and work, she has moved and inspired the lives of millions of people," her partner Roman Downey confirmed to people in an exclusive statement
"She's my mother. I've been lucky to work with her for so many years. I'm moved by the angels."
"I know heaven has a new angel today."



**Something goes wrong**
“Actress Nazanin Boniadi was reportedly selected and was in a relationship with the actor from November 2004 to January 2005.”
“According to a Vanity Fair article published in 2012, Scientology members underwent an audition process to see if they were a suitable match for Cruise.”
“...ago...”
“Scarlett Johansson is fighting back against a claim that she auditioned to date Tom Cruise following his split from Nicole Kidman.”
“"The very idea of any person auditioning to be in a relationship is so demeaning.”
“I refuse for anyone to spread the idea that I lack the integrity to choose my own relationships.”
“Only a man aka Brendan Tighe would come up with a crazy story like that," Johansson said in a statement to The Hollywood Reporter.”
“While appearing on NBC s Megyn Kelly Today on Wednesday Tighe said that while serving as a member of Cruise s Scientology security unit he came across reports of women who auditioned to be in a relationship with the actor...”
“...one of whom was Johansson...”
“Tighe explained that he saw the reports after they were accidentally sent to his printer and that he recalled only Johansson's name because hers was the only one he recognized.”


"It is reported that actress Nazarin bonyadi was selected and had a relationship with the actor from November 2004 to January 2005."
"According to an article published by vanity fair in 2012, Scientology members were auditioned to see if they were suitable for cruise."
“… Before... "
"Scarlett Johnson is refuting a claim that she auditioned for a date with Tom Cruise after he broke up with Nicole Kidman."
"Anyone audition is for love, this idea itself is very degrading."
"I refuse to let anyone spread the idea that I lack the integrity to choose my own relationship."
"Only one Brendan Tisch can come up with such a crazy story," Johnson said in a statement to Hollywood reporters
"Tigh said on NBC's Megan Kelly program on Wednesday that when he was a member of Cruz's Scientology security department, he encountered some reports about a woman's relationship with the actor after her audition..."
“… One of them is Johnson... "
"Tighe explained that he saw the report after he accidentally sent it to the printing house. He only remembered Johansson's name because she was the only person he recognized."



Number  413
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Recalling the first day she walked into the canteen, she said: ‘Everyone went completely silent and turned around to look at me.”
“I shouldn't be able to get away with what I'm getting away with.'”
“But the 23-year-old actress has now opened up about her love life decisions, insisting that while she prefers to date civilians, she doesn't like the way her relationship with them propels them into the public eye.”
“Emma is currently in a relationship with 21-year-old Oxford University student Matt Janney.”
“I don t date famous people Emma Watson is dating Oxford University student Matt Janney but said she finds it difficult when a normal person is thrust into the spotlight due to a romance with her She told Australia s Elle magazine I don t date people who are famous...”
“...and I don t think it s fair that all of a sudden intimate details of their personal life are public as a direct result of me...”
“'I wish I could protect them.'”
“Emma, who first shot to fame as Hermione Granger in Harry Potter, also revealed that her child star past sometimes makes it difficult for her to secure more mature roles.”
“In action: Matt (left) playing rugby for Oxford during a match against CambridgeOpening up: Emma spoke to Australian Elle magazine about her love lifeShe said: ' In my downtime I don't sex myself up much.”
“Sometimes I have a hard time convincing directors that I can play more adult roles.'”


"Recalling the first day when she walked into the canteen, she said:" everyone turned around and looked at me without saying a word. "
"I shouldn't run from what I run from."
"But the 23-year-old actress has now made her love life decision public, insisting that while she prefers dating civilians, she doesn't like the way relationships with civilians bring them to the public eye."
"Emma is currently dating Matt Jennie, a 21-year-old Oxford student."
"I don't date celebrities. Emma Watson is dating Matt Jennie, a student at Oxford University, but she says it's hard for an ordinary person to be in the spotlight because she's in love with her. She told Elle magazine in Australia, "I don't date celebrities..."
“…… I don't think it's fair that the private details of their personal lives are suddenly disclosed due to my direct reasons... "
"I hope I can protect them."
"Emma became famous as Hermione Granger for the first time in Harry Potter. She also revealed that her child star experience sometimes makes it difficult for her to get a more mature role."
"Action: Matt (left) plays Rugby for Oxford in a game against Cambridge: Emma tells Elle magazine about her love life in Australia. "I don't have much sex during my break," she said
"Sometimes it's hard for me to convince directors that I can play more adult roles."



**Something goes wrong**
“Yeah, we just really like each other!” she added.”
““Yeah, I guess that’s the secret.”
“...that he s been married to wife Jada Pinkett Smith...”
“On Sunday, the 49-year-old actor celebrated the couple’s 20th wedding anniversary by sharing some of the lessons he’s learned since they first said “I do.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““20 Years Ago Today we held hands and walked naively down that aisle.”
“Here’s what I’ve learned since,” he wrote alongside a photo of the couple from their wedding day in 1997.”
““Love is Like Gardening,” he wrote.”
“I have learned to focus on HELPING you to BLOSSOM into what YOU want to be into what you were born to be Rather than Demanding that you become what my Fragile Ego needs you to be He also added I ve learned to take pleasure in Nourishing YOUR dreams...”
“Rather than wrestling with you to Fulfill my Selfish Needs Satiate My Insecurities I have learned that Love is Listening...”
“Love is Giving.”


"Yes, we really like each other! "She added
"Yes, I think that's the secret."
“… He married his wife Jada pinkert Smith... "
On Sunday, the 49 year old actor celebrated the couple's 20th wedding anniversary, sharing some of the lessons he learned after they first said "I do.". Get news, feature, etc
"Today, 20 years ago, we walked in that aisle hand in hand."
"That's what I learned from it," he wrote next to a picture of his wedding day in 1997
"Love is like gardening," he wrote
"I've learned to focus on helping you become what you want to be, what you were born to be, rather than asking you to be what my fragile self needs you to be. He added, "I've learned to enjoy nurturing your dreams..."
"Instead of fighting with you to satisfy my selfish needs, I'd better satisfy my insecurity. I've learned that love is listening..."
"Love is giving."



**Something goes wrong**
“He's not going anywhere," Hudson previously told Ellen DeGeneres when asked about saying "I Do."”
“"I'm not in a hurry.”
“And while the couple rarely talked about wedding plans, the pair appeared to be a strong Hollywood couple.”
“Fans of the couple remember when the former pro wrestler proposed to Hudson in September 2008 after less than a year of dating.”
“Jennifer Hudson's Showstopping PerformancesHudson and Otunga are parents to an eight-year-old named David Daniel Otunga Jr.”
“"Jennifer's actions are solely taken in the best interest of their son."”
“"Today, Jennifer requested and received a protective order against her ex-fiance," the statement concluded.”
“In addition, the singer's rep confirmed that the courts are already involved with their split.”
“"They have been in the process of ending their relationship for a number of months," Hudson's rep said in a statement to the publication.”
“The couple have broken up and ended their relationship after 10 years, People confirms.”


"He's not going anywhere," Hudson told Alan DeGeneres when asked to say "I'm going."
"I'm not in a hurry."
"Although the couple rarely talk about wedding plans, they seem to be a strong couple in Hollywood."
"Fans of the couple remember that in September 2008, the former professional wrestler proposed to Hudson after less than a year of dating."
"Jennifer Hudson's show Houston and ortuga are the parents of an eight year old named David Daniel ortuga."
"Jennifer's behavior is entirely in the best interests of their son."
"Today, Jennifer requested and received a protection order against her ex fiance," the statement concluded
"In addition, the singer's representative confirmed that the court had intervened in their breakup."
"They have ended their relationship for months," Hudson's representative said in a statement
"People confirmed that the couple broke up and ended their relationship 10 years later."



Number  416
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Luke, Owen, and brother Andrew add that anyone wishing to pay their respects can do so by making a donation to PBS.”
““I think that was for me and my brothers a big influence on what was funny.”Robert’s declining health became noticeable that same year when he was unable to attend KERA’s 50th anniversary celebration.”
““He worked with these great creative people with great senses of humor and I remember being at dinner and just hearing Dad’s friends talk,” he said.”
“Owen even once attributed his comedy stylings to his father while promoting “Midnight in Paris” in 2011.”
“Not only did he help launch Jim Lehrer’s career with “Newsroom” through local, public affiliate KERA in 1968 — Lehrer famously hosted PBS’ “NewsHour” from 1975-2011 — he was also responsible for bringing “Monty Python’s Flying Circus” to American television screens.”
“While his sons are both household names, Robert was a successful TV icon himself.”
“He also told the Texas paper that his dad had spent the last few years battling Alzheimer’s disease, suggesting a cause of death.”
“Luke confirmed the news to the Dallas Morning News just ahead of the weekend.”
“He was 75.”
“Robert Wilson, legendary TV producer and father to actors Luke Wilson and Owen Wilson, died on Friday.”


"The Luke, Owen and Andrew brothers added that anyone who wants to pay homage can donate to PBS."
"I think it's a big impact on me and my brothers, on interesting things." Robert's health decline became apparent in the same year as he was unable to attend Kayla's 50th anniversary celebration
"He works with these creative people, they have a great sense of humor, and I remember that I was eating and just heard my dad and friends talking," he said
Owen even attributed his comedy style to his father when he promoted midnight Paris in 2011
"He not only helped Jim Lehrer start his career at newsroom in 1968 through the local public branch, Kera - Lehrer presided over PBS's famous" news hour "from 1975 to 2011 - he was also responsible for bringing" the Python Flying Circus "to American TV screens."
Although his two sons are household names, Robert himself is a successful TV idol
He also told the Texas newspaper that his father had been fighting Alzheimer's disease for the past few years, indicating the cause of his death
"Luke confirmed the news to the Dallas Morning Post before the weekend."
"He's 75."
Robert Wilson, the father of legendary TV producer and actor Luke Wilson and Owen Wilson, died on Friday



**Something goes wrong**
“Ever.”
“And he’s gonna be real bummed when he finds out you can’t even do that!” (No one has ever sounded more Canadian than this guy saying this line.”
“IHM mind control technique even though it definitely sounds like she s saying You re marrying me which would be a real curve ball...”
“DEANN You re mirroring me TERENCE Does it feel as false for you as it does for me I had to re watch this doozy five times before I realized that Deann is saying You re mirroring me apparently an...”
“...against her It s getting hard for you actually Why is everyone so horny this week...”
“DEANN I see you ve made plans to join us in Venice TERENCE That s because I couldn t bear the thought of being here without you DEANN Hmm I imagine that must be very hard for you TERENCE pressed...”
“Do yourself a favor: grab your favorite scene partner and read this one out loud for a fun segment of The Arrangement theatre.”
“But when Deann stops by his office to discuss the trip, the dialogue that ensues is downright puzzling.”
“He’s sending his wife Shelly Miscavige Deann (also Kyle’s producing partner) along in his place.”
“David Miscavige Terence Anderson is supposed to skip Venice to stay home and work on his new book for Scientology The Institute of the Higher Mind (IHM).”


"Never."
"When he finds out you can't even do that, he will be very depressed! "No one ever sounds more Canadian than the guy who said that."
"I have a mind control skill, even though it sounds like she said you're going to marry me. It's a curveball..."
"Dean, you're imitating me, Terence. Do you and I think it's fake? I had to look at it five times before I realized that Dean said you were imitating me, obviously a... "
“… It's getting more and more difficult for her, why is everyone so sexual this week... "
"Dean, I know you've planned to go to Venice with us, Terence. That's because I can't stand the idea of not having you here. Dean, well, I think it must be hard for you, Terence..."
"Do yourself a favor: find your favorite scene partner and read it aloud as an interesting part of the rehearsal theater."
"But when Dean came to his office to discuss the trip, the conversation that followed was completely incomprehensible."
"He sent his wife Shirley miskevich Dean (who is also Kyle's production partner) to replace him."
"David Miscavige Terence Anderson should skip Venice and stay at home to write a new book for Scientology, the Higher Institute of the mind (IHM)"



**Something goes wrong**
“Happy vacay!”
“Toiletries Sunscreen HC Pick Alba Botanica Hawaiian Coconut Clear Spray SPF 50 A sunscreen that has the moisturizing benefits of a lotion HC Pick Alba Botanica Hawaiian Green Tea Lotion SPF 45 Shampoo conditioner and soap Dry shampoo Face wash Pimple patches because no one has time for pimples on...”
“After being locked away in the classroom doing assignments and projects, you can’t wait to escape the stress of school and embark on an adventure with some of your closest friends!”
“But first things first: packing.”
“To help you prepare for your upcoming travels (we know you’re eager to get to that tropical destination or volunteer location), we composed the ultimate spring break packing list so you can stress less and focus your attention on having fun, or doing good, in the sun.”
“Check out our list below!”
“Beach BagTip: Get double duty out of your oversized beach bag by using it as your carry-on/personal item for traveling to your spring break destination.”
“Plus, it’ll ensure you have all your important items next to you at all times.”
“Ticket(s) (for traveling and any events you’re attending)Cell phoneID (if you’re staying within the U.S., use your driver’s license, or if you’re traveling abroad, bring your passport!)”
“SunglassesMedicationsGumWallet (keep some cash on you in case you run into any issues with your cards)SnacksReusable water bottle (make sure it’s empty if you’re going through airport security!)”


Long live
Bathing lotion sunscreen HC select alabaster plant Hawaii coconut transparent spray SPF 50 sunscreen, moisturizing lotion HC select alabaster plant skin care Hawaii green tea lotion SPF 45 Shampoo Conditioner and soap dry shampoo facial acne patch, because no one has time to acne.
"After being locked in the classroom doing homework and projects, you can't wait to escape the pressure of school and start taking risks with some of your closest friends!"
"But the first thing is: packaging."
"To help you prepare for your upcoming trip (we know you're eager to reach that tropical destination or volunteer's location), we've made a final spring break packing list so you can reduce stress and focus on having fun or doing well in the sun."
"Look at the list below!"
"Beach bag tip: take your oversized beach bag as your carry on / personal belongings to your spring vacation destination, so you can enjoy double responsibility."
"In addition, it ensures that all your important items are always around."
"Ticket (for travel and any activities) mobile number (use your driver's license if you are in the United States, or bring your passport if you are traveling abroad!)"
"Sunglasses show that gumwallet (carry cash with you in case of card problems) snakes can use a water bottle (if you want to go through airport security, please make sure the water bottle is empty!)"



Number  419
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is happier and healthier.”
“[Brad] made some important changes and is much better off now.”
“At the time, the publication reported Pitt is “interested in spending more time” with Oxman, although it’s unclear if they meant in a romantic or platonic capacity.”
“According to People, Pitt and Oxman connected over their shared love of design and architecture.”
“Pitt may be dating an MIT professorIn April 2018, rumors started swirling that Pitt was dating an MIT professor, Neri Oxman.”
“3.”
“...though because in April 2018 Pitt was linked to yet another lady...”
“Sienna Miller reportedly went on a date with the actor After his divorce Pitt was briefly linked to actress Sienna Miller with reports claiming that the two went out briefly last summer but were both absolutely determined to keep everything under wraps It seems like that didn t last long...”
““He seems more comfortable double-dating and friends are helping out.”2.”
“It’s more of a way to get out and be social.” The dates are also reportedly not that intimate.”


"He's happier and healthier."
"(Brad) made some important changes and things are much better now."
At the time, the Journal reported that Pitt was "interested in spending more time" with Oxman, although it was not clear whether they meant romantic or platonic
Pitt and Oxman are linked by a shared love of design and architecture, according to people magazine
"Pete may be dating an MIT professor. In April 2018, rumors began to grow that Pete was dating an MIT professor nery Oxman."
“3.”
“…… Although because in April 2018 Pete was in contact with another woman... "
"It's reported that Sienna Miller dated the actor after her divorce. Pete had a brief contact with actress Sienna Miller. It's reported that they had a short date last summer, but both of them are absolutely determined to keep everything secret. It doesn't seem to last long..."
"He seems to prefer double dating, and his friends are helping."
"It's more like a way to go out and socialize." According to reports, dating is not so intimate



**Something goes wrong**
“VIDEO: Bruno's Writers Room...”
“Season 25 champions Jordan Fisher and Lindsay Arnold celebrate their big Mirrorball trophy win!”
“Make sure to tune in MONDAY SEPTEMBER 24 at 8|7c to see the Season 27 premiere of the Dancing with the Stars you know and love on ABC.”
“Dancing with the Stars, produced by BBC Worldwide Productions, will return with an all-new cast of celebrities ready to take on the competition and hit the ballroom floor, in what will be another season full of surprises and stunning dances.”
“While all the stars will go on a transformative journey, in the end, only one star will be crowned champion and win the coveted Mirrorball trophy.”
“They'll be judged by the panel of renowned ballroom experts Len Goodman, Carrie Ann Inaba, and Bruno Tonioli, as well as voted upon by viewers.”
“Every week the celebrities will get out of their comfort zones and endure hours of rehearsals to learn new dance styles and the technical choreography they'll need to perform a winning dance.”
“The full season competition kicks off with an all-new cast of celebrities, who will be paired up with the show's pro dancers and brave the dance floor for the very first time.”
“The DWTS Season 27 premiere kicks off a night of glamour, fun, and, of course, unforgettable routines in the ballroom.”
“ABC's hit reality competition show Dancing with the Stars returns with an all-new season of dancing MONDAY, SEPTEMBER 24, 2018 8|7c!”


"Video: Bruno's writers room..."
"Season 25 champions Jordan Fisher and Lindsay Arnold celebrate their big mirror ball trophy!"
"Be sure to watch the premiere of season 27 of dance with the stars you know and love at 8:7 on Monday, September 24."
"Dancing with the stars, produced by BBC Worldwide productions, will return with a new line-up of celebrities, ready to compete and go to the ballroom. It will be another season full of surprises and amazing dances."
"Although all the stars will have a journey of change, in the end, only one star will win the championship and win the coveted mirror ball trophy."
"They will be judged by a jury of famous ballroom experts, including Ron Goodman, Carrie an Inaba and Bruno tonioli, and will be decided by the vote of the audience."
"Every week, stars walk out of their comfort zone, endure hours of rehearsal, learn new dance styles and the technical choreography needed to perform a winning dance."
"The whole season starts with a brand new star line-up. They will partner with the professional dancers of the show and bravely step onto the dance floor for the first time."
"The premiere of DWTS season 27 ushered in a night of glamour, fun and, of course, unforgettable ballroom routines."
"ABC's hit reality show Dancing with the stars will launch a new dance season on Monday, September 24, 2018 at 8 | 7C!"



**Something goes wrong**
“‘When you said you were going to Cleveland you made it sound like you were going for the weekend, but you have kind of gone to Cleveland for six months.”
“Back in Los Angeles Kris told Khloe that she had ‘got bamboozled’ by her daughter moving to Cleveland, where boyfriend Tristan Thompson plays in the NBA.”
“He also has been romancing several other ladies who Kourtney referred to as 'hookers' in a previous episode of Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”
“Here Scott is seen kissing the daughter of crooner Lionel RichieThe episode was shot in May when the star had just been seen in Cannes with actress Bella Thorne.”
“Now he is dating teenager Sofia RichieIs it love?”
“New love: The episode was shot in May when the star had just been seen in Cannes with actress Bella Thorne.”
“He admitted that he was not doing well and he looked depressed and intimated by the TV star.”
“She was sitting on a sofa while talking to Scott who wore a bright orange hoodie and looked out of it.”
“Here they are seen in 2015When Kourtney confronts Scott, he looks like a little boy who is being scolded by mommy.”
“'I don't want the kids to see him like this,' Kourtney said.”


"When you say you're going to Cleveland, it sounds like you're going for a weekend, but you've been in Cleveland for six months."
"Back in Los Angeles, Chris told Khloe that her daughter had moved to Cleveland and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson was playing NBA there, which" blinded her. "
"He also fell in love with several other women, whom Courtney called" prostitutes "in his last episode," follow Kardashian. "
"Here, Scott kisses the daughter of singer Lionel Richier, filmed in May when the star was just in Cannes with actress Bella Thorne."
"Now he's dating teenage Sophia Ritchie, is that love?"
"New love: this episode was filmed in May this year, when the star just appeared in Cannes with actress Bella Thorne."
"He admitted that he didn't perform well, looked depressed and was hinted by the TV stars."
"She sat on the sofa talking to Scott, who was wearing a bright orange Hoodie and looked out from the inside."
"This picture was taken in 2015. When Courtney confronts Scott, he looks like a little boy scolded by his mother."
"I don't want the kids to see him like this," Courtney said



**Something goes wrong**
“Check out this week's best dressed list below, and let us know in the comments if you agree with our picks:”
“And we have to give special mention to Jada Pinkett Smith, who went braless in a sheer, shimmering gown, which we consider the prettiest naked dress ever.”
“Jennifer Lawrence came a close section, looking dark and moody in Schiaparelli Couture, while Julianne Moore's dark red tresses looked beautiful against an emerald green Chanel couture gown.”
“The ladies of "The Hunger Games: Mockingjay - Part 2" kept their red carpet style streak going strong, with Natalie Dormer topping our list with her whimsical Vivienne Westwood gown.”
“Famous fashion favourites stepped out in an array of outfits this week, and we're here to break it all down for you.”


Please check the list of the best clothes of the week below. If you agree with our choice, please let us know in the comments:
"We have to mention in particular Jada pinkert Smith, who is wearing a transparent, shiny robe, lifeless, which we think is the most beautiful nude dress ever."
"Jennifer Lawrence looks gloomy in Schiaparelli, while Julianne Moore's Crimson hair looks beautiful against the verdant Chanel dress."
The women in "hunger game: mocking Jay - Part 2" maintained their red carpet style, and Natalie domer topped the list with her whimsical Vivian Westwood robe
"This week, famous fashion lovers have appeared in a series of clothing, we are here to analyze one by one for you."



**Something goes wrong**
“Because Kyle and Sheryl sure look great.”
“Is the Red Room a secret wellness spa?”
“To show just how much the returning characters have changed since that fateful finale, we’ve put together a slideshow that compares their looks from the original and revived series thus far.”
“...of a century 217 cast members 37 of them returning are on the small screen for some more Lynchian drama...”
“Photo ABC Showtime I ll see you again in 25 years That s the mysterious promise Laura Palmer made to Special Agent Dale Cooper at the end of Twin Peaks original run in 1991 and boy did she deliver or what with the series back on Showtime after a quarter...”


"Because Kyle and Cheryl look great."
"Is the red room a secret health spa?"
"To show how the returning characters have changed since that decisive ending, we made a slide comparing their looks, from the original series to the resurrection series so far."
“…… Of the 217 actors in a century, 37 came back to watch more Lynch plays on the small screen... "
"Photo ABC Showtime I'll see you again in 25 years. This is Laura Palmer's mysterious promise to special agent Dale Cooper at the end of the original run of twin peaks in 1991. Boy, what did she deliver, or in a quarter, the series will return to Showtime..."



**Something goes wrong**
“I didn’t realize the mix of medications had affected me so strongly.”Woods shares daughter Sam, 9, and son Charlie, 8, with ex-wife Elin Nordegren.”
“What happened was an unexpected reaction to prescribed medications.”
““I want the public to know that alcohol was not involved.”
““I understand the severity of what I did and I take full responsibility for my actions,” he said on May 29.”
“Woods, who has had multiple back surgeries over the years, released a statement about the incident later that day.”
“Authorities had to wake him up and he later struggled through a breathalyzer test.”
“According to a police report obtained by Us Weekly, Woods was asleep at the wheel of his 2015 black Mercedes-Benz, which was stopped in the right lane of Military Trail south of Indian Creek Parkway at the time.”
“As previously reported, the athlete was arrested on suspicion of driving under the influence in Jupiter, Florida.”
“– By TW,” he wrote.”
““Happy Birthday America and thank you to all who defend it!!”


"I didn't realize how much the mix of drugs affected me." Woods and ex-wife Irene nordgreen share their 9-year-old daughter Sam and 8-year-old son Charlie
"It was an unexpected reaction to prescription drugs."
"I want the public to know that it's not about alcohol."
"I understand the seriousness of what I do, and I take full responsibility for my actions," he said on May 29
"Woods, who has had back surgery many times over the years, made a statement later that day."
"The authorities had to wake him up and he later struggled to pass the breath test."
"According to a police report obtained by us weekly, woods fell asleep on the steering wheel of his 2015 black Mercedes Benz, which was parked in the right lane of the military trail south of Indian Creek Park Road."
"As mentioned earlier, the athlete was arrested on suspicion of drunk driving in Jupiter, Florida."
"It was written by TW," he wrote
"Happy Birthday to America, thanks to all who defend it!"



**Something goes wrong**
“The reporter, Mishal, said on The One Show that it was obvious Harry and Meghan are "very much in love," based on "the bond between them" and their body language.”
“Basically, they laughed a lot, and it further proved that these two are made for each other.”
“They pulled faces; they joked around; Meghan made this funny face at Harry like she was pretending to interrogate him.”
“A double treat!”
“...candid and goofier...”
“So after watching their joint interview about seven times where we got the proposal story and the truth behind how they met we were thrilled to discover that there is even more footage from the chat but it s more...”
“But since most of Harry and Meghan's relationship has been kept from the spotlight, it was really nice to just see them be together.”
“It was a lot to take in at once—the statement, the photo call and then their first interview together .”
“We're still basking in the aftermath of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle's engagement announcement .”


Reporter Mishal said in a program that it was clear that Harry and Megan were "very much in love" based on "their connection" and their body language
"Basically, they laughed a lot, which further proves that these two people are made in heaven."
"They were furtive and joking. Megan made a funny face at Harry as if she were interrogating him."
"Double treatment!"
“… Frankness and stupidity... "
"So, after watching their seven joint interviews, we learned the story of the proposal and the truth of their meeting. We were very excited to find that there were more scenes in the chat, but more was..."
"But since most of Harry and Megan's relationships have been ignored, it's really nice to see them together."
"All of a sudden, they accepted the statement, took photos by phone, and then they were interviewed together for the first time. It was too much."
"We are still immersed in the aftermath of the announcement of Prince Harry's engagement to Megan markel."



**Something goes wrong**
“I’m the same size I was the day I walked into surgery, I’m just a little bit tighter looking.”At the time, she also explained that her tiny frame runs in the family.”
“I did breastfeed all of my kids, so ladies, let’s be honest, they were stretched out, loss of volume, pancake nipples,” she explained.”
“The Don’t Be Tardy star revealed Wednesday that she’s planning to get smaller breast implants after she asked her fans to cast their votes in a poll on what size they think she should reduce to.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Which one,” Zolciak-Biermann, 40, wrote in an Instagram Story with two implant size options: “Full C [or] DD.”Image zoom Credit: Kim Zolciack Biermann/Instagram“Thx @kanebiermann for taking this pic of me today!”
“!” the mother of six captioned a photo — snapped by her 4-year-old son, Kane — of herself wearing a strapless red bikini while standing beside a swimming pool.”
““Lopsided boobs and all (clearly it’s the bathing suit lol) ” she wrote.”
““But thanks you guys for voting on C/DD can’t wait to downsize a little @dr.hochstein ”During her House of Kim podcast on Wednesday, Zolciak-Biermann opened up about her decision to go smaller.”
““I obviously have implants.”
“I have the largest implants they actually make, but it doesn’t look that big on my body because of just the way I’m built,” she shared.”


"I'm the same size as I was on the day of my operation, but I look a little tight." At the time, she also explained that her small figure was common at home
"I do feed all my kids, so ladies, to be honest, they're stretched, they're smaller, their nipples are thinner," she explained
"The star, who doesn't have to be late, revealed on Wednesday that she plans to have smaller breast implants after she asked her fans to vote on how small she should be."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Which one," zolciak Biermann, 40, wrote in an instagram article, with two implant size options: "full C [or] DD." Credit for image zooming: Kim zolciack Biermann / instagram“ Thx@kanebiermann Thank you for taking this picture for me today
"! the mother of six wrote in a photo taken by her 4-year-old son, Kane, standing by the pool, wearing a red bikini with no shoulder straps
"Unbalanced chest and all (obviously this is swimsuit laughter)" she wrote
"But thank you for voting for C / DD and can't wait to downsize @ Hochstein" in the Golden House podcast on Wednesday, zorchak Bilman made public her decision to downsize. "
"I obviously have implants."
"I have the biggest implants that they actually make, but it doesn't look like my body because it's just my way of building big," she said



Number  427
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here are a few of her absolute raddest pregnancy looks!”
“Combining elements from several different fashion eras, from '70s glam, to Y2K grunge, preggo Bey continues to stand out as a sophisticated leader on the world stage of art, fashion, and style.”
“...when it comes to dressing up their bump...”
“As her pregnancy progressed Queen Bey made some truly stunning style statements particularly via her busy personal Instagram account that challenge the idea that pregnant women can t or shouldn t cut a figure of elegance sexiness and pure panache...”
“Considering her reputation for effortlessly owning the entire universe, what do you think?”
“...creator Jay Z”
“But did international superstar singer songwriter dancer style maven and badass feminist Beyoncé decide that she was going to sit back and relax when she became pregnant for the second time this time with twins with husband rapper and Tidal...”
“So even when the most stylish of us decides to get knocked up, the social contract includes some allowances for the mom-to-be, including a generally lowered expectation for her fashion game.”
“Your body is changing, you feel icky sicky, emotions are running high, and you can't fit into your normal tried and true styles — such is the life of a pregnant lady.”
“Beyonce's Stunning Pregnancy StyleBeyoncé knows what it's like to be pregnant.”


"Here's her craziest pregnancy look!"
Preggo bey combines elements from several different fashion eras, from Glam in the 1970s to Y2K grunge, and continues to stand out on the world stage of art, fashion and style
“… When it comes to dressing up their lumps... "
"With her pregnancy going on, Queen Bei has made some amazing style statements, especially through her busy personal instagram account, challenging the idea that pregnant women can't or shouldn't cut down on elegant, sexy and pure gorgeous images..."
"What do you think of her effortless reputation for the whole universe?"
“… Creator jay z "
"But international superstar singer, songwriter, dancer Maven and feminist badass Beyonce é decided that when she was pregnant for the second time, she would sit down and relax and be with her husband rapper and tidal's twins..."
"So even if the most fashionable of us decide to get pregnant, the social contract includes some subsidies for our mother, including generally lower expectations for her fashion games."
"Your body is changing, you feel sick, you're in high spirits, you can't adapt to your normal, tested, real lifestyle - that's the life of pregnant women."
"Beyonce's amazing pregnancy style. Beyonce knows what it's like to be pregnant."



**Something goes wrong**
“He also hiccups the strongest out of my 3 and all night long.”Even though it’s been tough, the singer said she realized how special it’s been.”
“He feels so low that I spend all night getting up to pee or to move from side to side.”
“3 arrivesPregnant Jessie James Decker Cuddles with Eric in a Swimsuit on Last Vacation Before Due DateJessie James Decker is soaking up the sun while she can!”
“The country singer, 29, is off with husband Eric Decker on a tropical getaway and enjoying every moment.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Last vacation before our little boy arrives,” Jessie James wrote on Saturday, captioning an Instagram shot of herself and her man exchanging smiles on a beach.”
“Her sweet photo showed Eric down on one knee, his wife sitting on the other.”
“Both lovingly look at one another as he places his hand on his wife’s growing baby belly.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"He also belched the worst of my three hours, and he belched all night." Hard as it was, the singer said she realized how special it was
"He's in a low mood. I've been up all night, peeing, or walking around."
"3. On the last holiday before due date, pregnant Jesse James Decker hugs Eric in a swimsuit. Jesse James Decker is basking in the sun as much as possible!"
The 29 year old country singer and her husband, Eric Decker, are on holiday in the tropics, enjoying every moment
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The last vacation before our little boy arrives," Jessie James wrote on Saturday, adding subtitles to instagram for photos of herself and her man exchanging smiles on the beach
"Her sweet picture shows Eric on one knee and his wife on the other."
"When he put his hand on his wife's growing stomach, they both looked at each other affectionately."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



**Something goes wrong**
““Our hearts go out to Jimmy and everyone else whose lives were so touched by Gloria Fallon’s love, kindness and support.””
““On behalf of everyone at NBC, we extend our deepest condolences to Jimmy and all his family at this time of enormous loss,” a statement reads.”
“Reruns will be aired instead.”
“Per Deadline, tapings of The Tonight Show have been canceled for the entire week of November 6–10.”
“...out numerous times about how he s extremely close with his mother even telling us a few years ago that she calls him every day with notes about his performances...”
“Our prayers go out to Jimmy and his family as they go through this tough time My mom and I were talking on the phone for the third time that day and she actually said We don t talk enough MomQuotes jimmy fallon jimmyfallon May 10 2017 Fallon has spoken...”
““Jimmy was at his mother’s bedside, along with her loved ones, when she passed away at NYU Langone Medical Center in NYC.”
““Jimmy Fallon’s mother, Gloria, died peacefully on Saturday,” a Fallon family spokesperson said in a statement.”
“Per People, Gloria Fallon passed away at the age of 68 in the hospital after a brief illness, and was able to be around her family and friends until the end.”
“Photo: 2017 NBCUniversal Media, LLCA day after The Tonight Show announced its regularly scheduled Friday taping would be canceled due to a “private family matter” involving Jimmy Fallon, it’s sadly been reported that Fallon’s mother has died.”


"Our hearts say to Jimmy and all the others that their lives are deeply touched by Gloria Fallon's love, kindness and support."
"On behalf of everyone on NBC, we extend our deepest mourning to Jimmy and his family at a time of great loss," a statement said
"Will be replayed instead."
"According to the deadline, the recording of tonight show from November 6 to 10 has been cancelled."
“…… We talked about his close relationship with his mother many times, and even told us a few years ago that his mother called him every day to record his performance.... "
"We pray to Jimmy and his family because they have been through this difficult time. My mother and I talked on the phone for the third time that day, and she actually said that we didn't talk enough. My mother quoted what Jimmy Fallon said on May 10, 2017..."
"Jimmy was by his mother's bed, with her loved ones, when she died at NYU langon medical center."
"Jimmy Fallon's mother Gloria passed away safely on Saturday," a Fallon family spokesman said in a statement
"According to reports, Gloria Fallon died of illness in the hospital at the age of 68. She was able to accompany her family and friends to the end of her life."
"Photo: in 2017, NBC global media, llca announced the cancellation of Friday's recording due to the" private family affairs "of Jimmy Fallon on the tonight show. Unfortunately, it was reported that Fallon's mother had passed away."



**Something goes wrong**
“I hope I've come in the right gear,' the Sunday Times reported.”
“We have three kids now and we had never left them before,' he explained.”
“In an interview last month on The Howard Stern Show, Andy Cohen - who attended the annual fashion event in early May - claimed Corden was the 'drunken guest'.”
“But the 39-year-old TV host visited Stern's studio on Tuesday and explained it wasn't intoxication but 'just my natural exuberance of life'.”
“Denial!”
“James Corden denied being the 'drunkest' person at the 2018 Met GalaHe explained he rarely drinks because of his schedule adding: 'I think people often think I'm drunk just because I'm just having such a nice time.'”
“Corden attended the New York fete with his wife Julia Carey as they enjoyed a rare night out together.”
“'The reason I was having such a nice time is that my wife and I were away together for the first time in like a year and a half.”
“'We had a baby six months ago.”
“Gossip king: In an interview last month on The Howard Stern Show , Andy Cohen - who attended the annual fashion event in early May - claimed Corden was the 'drunken guest'Corden and Carey share son Max, 7, and daughters Carey, 3, and Charlotte, whom they welcomed in December 2017.”


"I hope I came in the right way," the Sunday Times reported
"We have three children now and have never left them before," he explained
"In an interview on the Howard Stern Show last month, Andy Cohen attended the annual fashion event in early May and claimed that he was a 'drunk.'"
"But the 39 year old TV host visited Stern's studio on Tuesday and explained that it wasn't intoxication, it was" my natural life. "
"No!"
"James cordon denied that he was the" most drunk "person at the" meeting "in 2018, explaining that he rarely drank because of his schedule," he added. "I think people often think I was drunk just because I had a good time."
"Cordon and his wife, Julia Carey, went to a party in New York. They had a wonderful evening together."
"I had such a good time because my wife and I went out together for the first time in a year and a half."
"We had a baby six months ago."
"Gossip King: in an interview on the Howard Stern Show last month, Andy Cohen attended the annual fashion event in early May, claiming that he was" drunk. ". Cordon and Kelly, who have seven year old son Max and three-year-old daughter Carey and Charlotte, welcomed them in December 2017. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week, a group of people found out on reddit that Gamestop's share price had soared, leading to the ban of a multi billion dollar hedge fund. Read more, peloton's Cody Rigsby explains that his recent absence shows him
"The 24-year-old social star revealed in the latest podcast that he has invested about $50000 in Gamestop stock."
"Today, yellowfin tuna chews 200 hooks at the losunoso resort," Connor wrote in the photo
"Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman's 26 year old son recently shared a rare picture on instagram of him holding a big fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
“… Life... "
"A very famous actor and director in this industry gave me very bad advice, which helped me a lot, because I just read more about Tom Cruise's son, Connor, who posted his own rare photos on instagram. Connor Kidman cruise rarely saw him..."
"Now, the 36 year old actress and director is explaining the policy and revealing to the outside world what prompted her to adopt it in her film set."
“… There was no policy he violated... "
"A few hours ago, Haley Hyde read more and Olivia Wilde explained her ban policy on the set. As you may remember, Olivia Wilde fired Shiite rabov from the movie "don't worry, honey" last year, when there were several reports that she had a... "
"When Haley arrived at the restaurant, she was wearing a black mask and was safe."



**Something goes wrong**
“Now go crush it this weekend at SB LII.””
““This album is really inspired by my son, my wife, my family, but more so than any other album I’ve written, where I’m from,” he said.”
“And based on the sketches, there will be two different looks which vibe with the aesthetic of his new album Man of the Woods.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Courtesy Stella McCartneyThe first is a Prince of Wales check and camouflage splatter-print suit featuring a red bandana neck tie accessory.”
“And the second includes the same camo pants with a black fringe jacket and organic cotton shirt featuring landscape artwork by British artist Martin Ridley.”
“Image zoom Credit: Courtesy Stella McCartneyAccording to the release, the designer drew inspiration from Timberlake’s new album Man of the Woods.”
“And to celebrate the release of his new album, Timberlake wore a red crewneck Stella McCartney sweater to a listening session on Thursday in Minnesota.”
“Also repping the brand?”
“Timberlake’s bestie, Jimmy Fallon, who shared an Instagram of his new Stella McCartney glue-free, black knit high-top sneakers with neon green accents kicks.”


"Go to sb LII this weekend."
"This album was inspired by my son, wife and family, but more than any album I've ever written," he said
"According to the sketch, there will be two different appearances, which coincide with the aesthetic atmosphere of his new album the woodman."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Image zooming credit: Stella McCartney the first is a prince of Wales Plaid camouflage splash print set with a red headscarf bow tie accessory."
"The second includes the same camouflage pants, a black tassel jacket and an organic cotton shirt with a landscape by British artist Martin Ridley printed on it."
Credit for image zooming: Stella mccartneya according to this release, the designer drew inspiration from Timberlake's new album "forest man"
To celebrate the release of the new album, Timberlake wore a red crew neck Stella McCartney sweater for a hearing in Minnesota on Thursday
"Also on behalf of the brand?"
"Timberlake's good friend, Jimmy Fallon, shared on instagram his new Stella McCartney glueless black knitted high top sneaker with a neon green tone."



**Something goes wrong**
“"Perhaps if you also told her the kid was too sick to get up and go trick or treating, and had no healthcare, she might learn about sharing," Takei added.”
“"Fill her bucket with old candy left by her great-grandfather, then explain that she has more because she's smarter than all the other kids," Rowling wrote.”
“File Photo by Heinz Ruckemann/UPI | License PhotoNov. 1 (UPI) -- Donald Trump, Jr., celebrated Halloween by dressing as his dad, President Donald Trump.”
“The 39-year-old businessman channeled his father by wearing a Donald Trump mask and an American flag onesie Tuesday.”
“Trump is the eldest child of Donald Trump and his first wife, Ivana Trump.”
“Advertisement"Taking it to the next level #merica #maga #halloween #costume #nyc #kids #trump," he captioned a slideshow of photos with his kids on Instagram.”
“Trump, who shares 10-year-old Kai, 8-year-old Donald, 6-year-old Tristan, 5-year-old Spencer and 3-year-old Chloe with wife Vanessa Trump, visited a haunted house on the Upper East Side of Manhattan with his children.”
“"Literally a full interactive maze.”
“They go all out and it's amazing," he said of the neighborhood attraction, which was located in someone's home.”
“"They also let anyone in to see it."”


Takei added: "if you also tell her that the child is too sick to get up and play trick or treat and there is no health care, she may learn to share."
"Fill her bucket with old candy left by her great grandfather and explain that she has more candy because she is smarter than the other children," Rowling wrote
"File image by Heinz ruckemann / UPI | license photonov. Donald Trump, Jr., dressed as his father and President, celebrated Halloween on January 1
"The 39 year old businessman groomed his father on Tuesday wearing a Donald Trump mask and an American flag."
"Trump is the eldest son of Donald Trump and his first wife, Ivana trump."
On instagram, he added a title to the photo slide of himself and his children: "ads" push it to new heights: "merica", "Maga", "Halloween", "costume", "NYC", "kids", "trump"
"Trump shares 10-year-old Kay, 8-year-old Donald, 6-year-old Tristan, 5-year-old Spencer and 3-year-old Chloe with his wife Vanessa trump. He took the children to visit a haunted house on the upper east side of Manhattan."
"It's a complete interactive maze."
"They go all out and it's amazing," he said of the nearby attractions, which are located in someone's home
"And they let anyone in."



**Something goes wrong**
“...new episodes of The Late Show with Stephen Colbert weeknights at 11 35 10 35c on CBS and CBS All Access...”
“She also hung out with Stephen at Carnegie Deli for an interview that aired the night before the New York Democratic primary in April 2016 The same night Clinton will be on the program Academy Award winning actress Emma Stone will also join Colbert in her first appearance onWatch all...”
“Ed Sullivan Theater...”
“The two will discuss her campaign and what s going on with the current administration Clinton s new book What Happened is published by Simon Schuster a division of CBS The former Secretary of State first visited The Late Show on Tuesday Oct 27 2015 for an interview in the...”
“A few things have happened since then.She'll return on Tuesday, Sept. 19 for her first late-night television appearance since her bid for the White House.”
“Hillary Clinton sat down with Stephen Colbert on The Late Show a couple times during the 2016 presidential election.”
“Stephen Colbert Welcomes Hillary Clinton Back To The Late Show On Tuesday, Sept. 19The former Secretary of State makes her first late-night television appearance since the election.”


“… At 11, 35, 10, 35 degrees Celsius, CBS and CBS all visit the latest episode with Stephen Colbert weeknights... "
"She also had an interview with Stephen at Carnegie Deli, where Clinton will be on the show of Oscar winning actress Emma stone the night before the New York Democratic primary in April 2016, as well as her first appearance in watch all with Colbert..."
"Ed Sullivan Theatre..."
"The two will discuss Clinton's campaign and the direction of this administration. Clinton's new book, what happened, is published by Simon Schuster, a department of CBS. The former Secretary of state visited the evening program for the first time on October 27, 2015 (Tuesday) for an interview..."
"Something happened after that. Well, she will return to the White House on September 19 (Tuesday), her first appearance in the evening TV program since she took office
"During the 2016 presidential election, Hillary Clinton sat with Stephen Colbert several times on the evening show."
On Tuesday, September 19, Stephen Colbert welcomed Hillary Clinton back to the evening show. The former Secretary of state made his first appearance on evening television after the election



Number  435
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In one video documenting the sparkly tree, the new mom zooms in on a gold ball ornament to capture a selfie in the reflection, with Stormi balanced on her hip.”
“This Christmas will no doubt be extra special for Kylie and boyfriend Travis Scott as they celebrate with their 10-month-old daughter Stormi for the first time.”
“I literally have trees everywhere this year,” she says in a video documenting a particularly girly one on her Instagram Stories.”
“The treatment turns up on another of Kylie’s forest of trees for 2018: “I have a neon pink flocked in my bedroom.”
“This year’s sparkly model at Kylie’s Hidden Hills home replaces last year’s slightly more realistic one, which she called “20 feet of magic” (the gold version appears to be the same size) and featured a faux-snow covering known as flocking.”
“Leatham, who split from ex husband Colton Haynes in May, is notably also responsible for the over-the-top holiday decor at Kylie’s mom Kris’s mansion and the glam seasonal installations at Four Seasons hotels around the world.”
““Thank you @jeffleatham and team for never failing to make Christmas magic happen,” she adds, calling out the celebrity floral designer and artistic director.”
““Gold is the theme this year,” she captions a video of the tree, with Mariah Carey’s “All I Want for Christmas Is You” serving as the soundtrack.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The towering conifer features gold branches, a variety of gold ball ornaments, countless glowing lights and even a gold-wrapped stand.”


"In a video recording the glittering tree, the new mother zooms in on a golden ball ornament and takes a self portrait of herself in the reflection, with Tommy balancing his hips."
"This Christmas is definitely special for Kelly and her boyfriend Travis Scott, because they celebrate with their 10 month old daughter, Tommy, for the first time."
"I've had trees all over this year," she said in a video recording the story of a special girl in her instagram story
In Kelly's other 2018 film, the woods, there was this treatment: "I have a bunch of pink neon lights in my bedroom."
"This year's shining model of Kylie's hidden Hill House replaces the slightly realistic model of last year. She calls it" 20 foot magic "(the golden version seems to be the same size), and uses an artificial snow cover called flocking."
"Lissam separated from his ex husband, Colton Haynes, in May. He is also responsible for the top resort decoration of mom Kris's mansion and the gorgeous seasonal facilities of four seasons hotels around the world."
"Thank you @ jeffleatham and his team for never failing to make Christmas magic come true," she added, calling out to the famous flower designer and art director
"Gold is the theme of the year," she wrote in the subtitle of a Christmas tree video, with Mariah Carey's "I just want you for Christmas" as the soundtrack
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The tall conifers have golden branches, all kinds of gold ball ornaments, countless luminous lights, and even a gold wrapped bracket."



**Something goes wrong**
“Related Gallery...”
“England...”
“The 33-year-old royal gave a speech at the Veterans’ Mental Health Conference in London on Thursday where he revealed some details about a trip he took with his future bride.”
““I have seen those I have served with suffer, struggling to seek out the help they desperately need.”
“And we know there are more just like them who continue to suffer in silence.”
“And when the individual doesn't or can't reach out for help, it is also their families who suffer; especially their spouses and children, who are left feeling desperate and confused as they try to seek appropriate help for the ones they love,” Harry, a veteran himself explained.”
““Some of the stories Meghan and I heard when we visited Colchester Garrison a few weeks ago shocked us to our core.”How Meghan Markle Is Becoming a Royal in Record Time This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Embed Code RestartHarry also opened up about the problems facing servicemen and women today, with an emphasis on mental health.”
““Anger, isolation, violence, substance misuse, all stem from the same place – and these are not unique to the military.”


Related libraries
"England..."
"The 33 year old royal gave a speech at the veterans mental health conference in London on Thursday, revealing some details of a trip with a future bride."
"I have seen those who have served with me suffer and seek the help they need so badly."
"We know that there are more people like them who continue to endure in silence."
"When a person doesn't or can't ask for help, it's their families who suffer; especially their spouses and children, they feel hopeless and confused when they try to find appropriate help for the people they love," explains Harry, a veteran himself
"We were shocked by some of the stories Megan and I heard when we visited the Colchester garrison a few weeks ago." How did Megan markel become a member of the royal family in a record time? The video couldn't be played because it couldn't load the sponsor's information
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Embedded code restartharry also made public the problems facing today's men and women in the military, with a focus on mental health."
"Anger, isolation, violence, drug abuse all come from the same place - these are not unique to the military."



**Something goes wrong**
“Photo Credit: Twitter / @homeasap...”
“...said in the courtroom Wednesday...”
“Up Next Kris Jenner s Alleged Stalker Arrested at Her Hidden Hills Home The Jenner and Kardashian families take their safety very seriously and will vigorously pursue all remedies available to them both in criminal and civil court to ensure that they are protected Shawn Holley the family s attorney...”
“The order lasts three years, and Jacobs must stay 100 yards away from Jenner's car, home and job, and is forbidden from making personal contact, directly or indirectly.”
“The Kardashian family matriarch had previously obtained a temporary restraining order against Jacobs, but the new ruling provides more protection for the reality star and her family.”
“He will face felony charges at a later date and currently remains in custody with bail set at $150,000.”
“Jacobs is a former security guard, who was previously fired from working in Jenner's gated community.”
“Jacobs was arrested three weeks ago for felony stalking in Jenner's California neighborhood, the third time he had been caught targeting the star.”
“News reports.”
“Kris Jenner has been granted a three-year restraining order against Joshua Jacobs, E!”


"Image source: Twitter / @ homeasp..."
“… Said in court on Wednesday
"Next, Chris Jenner's alleged stalker was arrested in her hidden mountain home. Jenner and Kardashian's family attach great importance to their safety and will vigorously seek all available remedies in criminal and civil courts to ensure that they are protected by family lawyer Sean Holly..."
"The order is valid for three years. Jacobs must be 100 yards away from Jenner's car, home and workplace. Direct or indirect personal contact is prohibited."
"The matriarch of the Kardashian family has previously received a temporary restraining order against Jacobs, but the new ruling provides more protection for the reality TV star and his family."
"He will face felony charges later and is still in custody, with bail set at $150000."
"Jacobs used to be a security guard and was fired for working in Jenner's closed community."
"Jacobs was arrested three weeks ago for felony stalking in Jenner's California community. This is the third time he has been caught targeting the star."
"News coverage."
"Chris Jenner has been approved to vote against Joshua Jacobs (E!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Feels like…””
““I just hope that Recy Taylor died knowing… her truth, even now, goes marching on.”Reflecting on her time visiting Taylor’s grave, Winfrey added, “To be able to visit her grave so soon after ‘speaking her name ‘sharing her story, a woman I never knew.”
“Their time is up!” Winfrey said in her speech.”
““For too long, women have not been heard or believed if they dared to speak their truth to the power to those men, but their time is up.”
“On assignment for @60minutes I end up in the town of Abbeville where #RecyTaylor suffered injustice, endured and recently died.”The media mogul paid tribute to Taylor in her Golden Globes speech earlier this month, highlighting the #TimesUp movement and the strength of sexual assault survivors.”
“In her caption on Instagram, Winfrey wrote: “I don’t believe in coincidences, but if I did this would be a powerful one.”
“The incident inspired her to speak out about sexual assault and civil rights.”
“In 1944, she was raped and assaulted by six white men, sparking nationwide outrage.”
“Taylor, an activist and sexual assault survivor, passed away in December.”
“She documented the poignant moment and shared it on Instagram.”


"It feels like..."
"I just wish ray Taylor knew when he died Her truth, even now, goes on. " Winfrey recalled her visit to Taylor's grave, adding, "to be able to go to her grave so soon after sharing her story with 'name her,' a woman I never knew."
"Their time is up! "Winfrey said in his speech."
"For a long time, if women dare to tell the truth to those men, they won't be heard or believed, but their time is up."
"During the 60 minute mission, I ended up in aberville, where Lake Taylor suffered injustice, endured pain and recently died." The media mogul paid tribute to Taylor in his golden globe speech earlier this month, highlighting the "timesup movement" and the power of sexual assault survivors
"I don't believe in coincidences, but if I do, it would be a powerful coincidence," Winfrey wrote in a note on instagram
"It inspired her to speak out about sexual abuse and civil rights."
"In 1944, she was raped and attacked by six white men, which caused nationwide anger."
"Taylor, an activist and sexual assault survivor, died last December."
"She recorded this poignant moment and shared it on instagram."



**Something goes wrong**
“All hail #KingGavin.”
“In November of 2013, he made the viral “Suck a Dick” vine (22 million loops and counting) with his friend Dustin Hatzenbuhler.”
“He just made a whole lot of different faces; it’s just something he seems to be good at without even trying.”Gavin kept appearing on Nick’s Vine account over the next two years, and then, all of a sudden, Gavin started blowing up.”
““And I was like, Let’s find other ways to capture him in funny situations and see if he can make that face some more.”
““People started to comment about his reaction and how great it was,” he recalls.”
“He wasn’t expecting much of a response, but it blew up.”
“And people thought he was cute, but they didn’t really take notice of him a whole lot.”In the spring of 2014, Mastodon posted an innocuous video of Gavin with a crested gecko on his forehead.”
“And throughout that time in 2013, I started putting my nephew Gavin, who was 2 at the time — he would appear in my videos.”
““Not the most family-friendly thing we’ve ever made,” Mastodon admitted when I spoke to him on the phone, “but most people seem to enjoy it.”
“Well, “some kid” is underselling it: Gavin is the 5-year-old nephew of Vine star Nick Mastodon, a 30-year-old from Minnesota who was one of Vine’s earliest stars thanks to his videos combining Disney movies with Top 40 hits.”


"Long live, Kim Gavin."
In November 2013, he and his friend Dustin hatzenbuhler made a viral "sucking chicken" vine (22 million circles, still counting)
"He just made a lot of different faces; that seems to be something he's good at without any trouble." Gavin continued to appear on Nick's vine account for the next two years, and then, all of a sudden, Gavin started to get mad. "
"I thought, let's find another way to catch him in an interesting situation and see if he can make that face more beautiful."
"People began to comment on his reaction and how good it was," he recalled
"He didn't expect a reaction, but it exploded."
"People think he's cute, but they don't pay much attention to him." In the spring of 2014, mastodon released a harmless video of Gavin wearing a crested gecko on his forehead
"During this time in 2013, I began to have my nephew Gavin, then 2, appear in my videos."
"It's not the most family friendly thing we've ever done," he admitted when I spoke to him on the phone, "but most people seem to like it."
"Well, some kid is playing it down: Gavin is the nephew of vine star Nick mastodon, 30, from Minnesota, who is one of vine's earliest stars because his video combines Disney movies with the top 40 hits."



**Something goes wrong**
““I’ve got my brain and my heart and I’ve prepared myself for everything that could happen,” she said.”
“It’s part of me, but it’s not who I am.”RELATED VIDEO: Jamie-Lynn Sigler Opens Up About Baby Bedtime Battles that End in TearsSigler also said she hoped to expand her family one day.”
““I don’t want to hold a secret where it feels like I have something to be ashamed of or have something to hide.”
““I’m at a point in my life with my son, with my new marriage, it’s a new me,” she said.”
“Image zoom Credit: Credit: Howard ShermanThe actress, 36, credited Dykstra, 28, and Beau for giving her courage and support in her daily battle.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“At the time, Sigler opened up to PEOPLE exclusively about her battle with multiple sclerosis, which she was diagnosed with at 20 years old.”
“The couple — who are already doting parents to 3-year-old son Beau Kyle — wed in January 2016 in Palm Springs.”
“The Sopranos alum showed off her growing baby bump Monday night at the Ace Hotel in Los Angeles at The 24 Hour Musicals’ one-night-only performance.”
“We are SO excited to announce the #ClearblueConfirmed arrival of another little one in just a few short months,” she wrote alongside a photo of her with a stack of pregnancy tests.”


"I have my brain and heart and I'm ready for what could happen," she said
"It's part of me, but not who I am." Related video: Jamie Lynn segler tells the story of the baby's bedtime fight ending with teas Sigler. Sigler also said she hopes to expand the family one day
"I don't want to keep a secret and make people feel that I have something to be ashamed of or hide."
"I'm with my son now and have a new marriage. It's a new me," she said
"Credit for image zooming: credit for actress Howard Sherman, 36, credit for the courage and support that dikstra and Bo, 28, have given her in everyday combat."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? Click here for more information in the people's baby newsletter
"At that time, Sigler made her fight against multiple sclerosis public. She was diagnosed with multiple sclerosis at the age of 20."
"The couple have doted on the parents of their 3-year-old son Bo Kyle, who married in Palm Springs in January 2016."
"The soprano's alumni showed her growing lumps on Monday night in the 24-hour musical" one night only "at the ace hotel in Los Angeles
"We are very excited to announce the arrival of another baby in just a few months," she wrote next to a photo with a bunch of pregnancy tests



**Something goes wrong**
““Really?” Corden excitedly asks, only for Winfrey to bluntly respond, "No."”
“...it is my wish and I have a childlike spirit and I m feeling a bit under the weather After concluding their live performance Winfrey revealed that the act was her proudest moment...”
“James Corden is ready to change the way audiences see movies by introducing the new evolution of filmmaking: Four dimensions.”
“During Monday night’s The Late Late Show, Corden explored “real people acting out the movie live in front of a movie audience,” enlisting the help from the star-studded cast of A Wrinkle in Time.”
“While moviegoers were watching an advanced screening of the film at The Grove in Los Angeles, Corden’s image appeared onscreen as a surprise.”
“You are probably wondering what happened to the movie you re watching but what you don t know is that tonight you have purchased a ticket to the future Corden explained before later introducing himself live along with the film...”
“...s stars Reese Witherspoon Mindy Kaling Oprah Winfrey and Storm Reid all dressed in character...”
““It’s weird being in a theater and not giving away cars or anything.”
“I’m not used to that,” Winfrey joked in her backstage interview.”
“Meanwhile, Kaling quipped that their surprise performance was simply a "bad school play but with adults."”


"Really? Cordon asked excitedly, but Winfrey replied bluntly, "No."
“…… This is my wish. I have a childlike innocence. After their live performance, I feel a little uncomfortable. Winfrey reveals that this is her proudest moment... "
"James cordon is going to change the way audiences watch movies by introducing new developments in Filmmaking: four dimensions."
In Monday night's "late night show," cordon explored "the real person who performs the movie live in front of the audience," seeking help from the star lineup of "wrinkles."
"When the audience watched the advanced screening of the film in grove, Los Angeles, the image of cordon appeared on the screen, which was a surprise."
"You may want to know what happened to the movie you're watching, but what you don't know is that you bought a ticket for the future tonight, cordon explained, and then he'll introduce himself to the movie on the spot..."
“… The stars of Reese withers, pemmingdi, Carlin, Oprah Winfrey and Stormrider are dressed in character... "
"In the theater, it's strange not to give away cars or anything."
"I'm not used to that," Winfrey joked in an interview backstage
At the same time, Carlin joked that their unexpected performance was just a "bad campus play, but it was about adults."



**Something goes wrong**
“Tell Us: What did you think of the Vanderpump Rules finale?”
“I’m old enough to be his mother and he hits on me in front of his girlfriend who also used to work for me.” Following this cringe-worthy interaction, Stassi and Patrick split for good in August 2017.”
“The Vanderpump Rules season finale was a roller coaster of emotions as Lisa Vanderpump, queen of re-hiring people she’s fired, once again severed ties with one of the SUR employees.”
“This time it was Jax Taylor who left the job on his own accord when Lisa suggested he resign following his public outburst that involved him giving Lisa and her husband Ken Todd the finger and telling them to F k off Jax who had recently ended his relationship with...”
“...longtime girlfriend Brittany Cartwright seemed to struggle in this explosive finale...”
“Still in the throes of deciding to take a hypothetical hockey marketing job out of Florida, Jax appeared to be determined to stay in LA and, more specifically, in his current apartment building.”
“While getting ready for a night out Brittany recounted Jax was like If I m moving out I m probably gonna stay in the same building She added If Jax is gonna stay in the apartment building I might leave the apartment building Sparks Fly Between Brittany and Adam After...”
“...a brief rendezvous in the construction site that will one day be Lisa Ken Tom Schwartz and Tom Sandoval s joint venture a bar called Tom Tom the gang headed to Pump for an after party...”
“Sparks flew when Brittany gushed about new barback Adam Spott, saying, “I never texted a guy and had them be as respectful as Adam has.”
“I texted him a few hours after I was single.” Adam responded, “I’m not trying to cause problems … She’s beautiful.”


"Tell us: what do you think of the end of the van der Pol rule?"
"I'm old enough to be his mother. He ran into me in front of his girlfriend who used to work for me." After this daunting interaction, Stacy and Patrick broke up forever in August 2017. "
"The end of the Vanderbilt rule season is an emotional roller coaster, because Lisa Vanderbilt, Queen of the people she rehired, once again broke up with one of sur's employees."
"This time, Jakes Taylor left the company voluntarily. Lisa suggested that he resign because he lost his temper in public and gave his finger to Lisa and her husband Ken Todd to let them put the recent end to The relationship of Jakes, get rid of... "
“…… Years of girlfriend Brittany Cartwright seems to be struggling in this explosive ending.... "
"Jakes is still painfully determined to take a hypothetical hockey marketing job from Florida, and he seems determined to stay in Los Angeles, or rather, in his current apartment building."
"Brittany said when preparing to go out at night that if I moved out, I might stay in the same building, she added that if Jakes was going to stay in the apartment building, I might leave the apartment building, in After that, sparks will fly between Brittany and Adam. "
“… One day, the joint venture of Lisa Ken Tom Schwartz and Tom Sandoval will meet briefly at the construction site, and a bar named Tom Tom the gang will cheer for a after party... "
"I've never texted a man to make them respect me like Adam," Brittany said as he talked about the new Barbados Adam spotter
"I texted him a few hours after I was single." Adam replied, "I'm not trying to get into trouble She's beautiful. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Soules and his family request that their privacy and the privacy of Mr. Mosher’s family is respected.””
“Due to the nature of the pending charges, neither Soules nor his counsel will be making any statements at this time.”
“The season 19 Bachelor, 35, was driving his pickup truck on Monday, April 25, when he rear-ended a tractor trailer.”
“Soules called 911 and checked the victim’s pulse, but the tractor driver, Kenneth Mosher, later died as a result of his injuries.”
“Hours later, Soules was arrested at his home in Arlington, Iowa.”
“According to TMZ, the search warrant allows police to obtain Soules’ blood test results from the hospital.”
“However, the results may not be accurate, because when police arrived to arrest Soules, there was a delay while they obtained a search warrant to enter his home.”
““Chris did stay in his home and would not come out until the police provided a search warrant to enter his home,” the law enforcement source tells Us.”
“(The Buchanan County Sheriff’s Office has no comment.)”
“He later went to a hospital for medical attention and a blood test.”


"Sules and his family want to respect their privacy and the privacy of Mr. Mosher's family."
"Due to the nature of the pending charges, neither sours nor his lawyer will make any statement at this time."
On Monday, April 25, the 35 year old season 19 bachelor drove his pickup truck into a trailer
Suers called 911 to check the victim's pulse, but Kenneth Mosher, the tractor driver, later died of serious injuries
A few hours later, sules was arrested at his home in Arlington, Iowa
"According to TMZ, the search warrant allows the police to obtain the blood test results from the hospital."
"However, the result may not be accurate because when the police arrived to arrest sules, they had a delay in obtaining a search warrant to enter sules' house."
"Chris does stay at home and won't come out until the police give him a search warrant," a law enforcement source told us
"Buchanan County Sheriff's office has no comment."
"He later went to the hospital for a blood test."



**Something goes wrong**
“I love you so much, inshallah/we will be together in the Great Forever x."”
“The undated message read: "To the most beautiful person in the world, thank you for your divine love, your eternal support and for being my best friend.”
“He posted a note titled "Love" on his website, with a picture of Jackson, 50, in the background.”
“Jackson recently split with her husband and the boy's father, Wissam Al Mana.”
“Early response indicates Eissa's debut was a hit: By Saturday afternoon, the photo had been retweeted more than 23,000 times, earning more than 78,000 likes along the way.”
“The picture shows Jackson kissing her yawning son, with the caption saying, "My baby and me after nap time."”
“The three-month-old son of Janet Jackson co-starred with his music superstar mom in a photo she posted on Twitter Friday.”
“Bill KeveneyUSA TODAYWelcome to the spotlight, Eissa Al Mana.”


"I love you so much, dear, we will always be together."
The undated message reads: "thank you for the most beautiful person in the world, for your sacred love, for your eternal support, and for being my best friend."
He posted a note on his website called "love" with a picture of Jackson, 50, in the background
"Jackson recently broke up with his husband and the boy's father, wissam al mana."
"Early responses showed that Eissa's debut was very popular: by Saturday afternoon, the photo had been forwarded more than 23000 times and received more than 78000 likes along the way."
"This photo shows Jackson kissing her yawning son with the title 'my kids and after my nap'," he said
"Janet Jackson's three month old son and his music superstar mom co starred in a picture she tweeted on Friday."
"Bill keviniusa, welcome to the spotlight today, ISA al mana."



**Something goes wrong**
“I can neither confirm nor deny.””
“Well, that’s based on a fact that we’ve cleared a lot of titles for that show.” He continued, “It’s an interesting idea.”
“Social media users are currently convinced that season 8 will be titled “Radioactive.”When EW asked Murphy about the buzz, he responded, “I heard about that rumor.”
“Murphy, the cast, and crew typically wait closer until the premiere date to announce the theme for each season, leaving fans of the scary anthology to speculate and search for small clues.”
“In the most recent season, Peters played a cult leader who pursues political power following Donald Trump’s presidential win, while Paulson played a woman traumatized by the victory.”
““So, with Evan Peters, the three of them are the leads this year.” Paulson and Peters have had roles in every season of the slasher drama.”
““Kathy and Sarah Paulson have a lot of great stuff to get to do,” Murphy said.”
“Murphy told Entertainment Weekly that Bates, Paulson and Peters will be the three leads for the next season.”
“Bates appeared in “AHS: Coven,” “AHS: Freak Show,” “AHS: Hotel,” and “AHS: Roanoke” before taking off last season, “AHS: Cult,” to star in Netflix comedy series “Disjointed.” The show has since been cancelled after one season.”
““American Horror Story” co-creator and writer Ryan Murphy has said that Kathy Bates will return to the series for its eighth season, along with Sarah Paulson and Evan Peters.”


"I can neither be sure nor deny it."
"Well, it's based on the fact that we've cleared a lot of headlines for that show." He went on, "it's an interesting idea."
"Social media users are now convinced that season 8 will be about radioactivity." When EW asked Murphy about the topic, he replied, "I heard the rumor."
"Murphy, actors and crew usually announce the theme of each season more closely before the premiere, so that fans of horror collections can guess and find clues."
"In the most recent season, Peters played the cult leader who pursued political power after Donald Trump won the presidential election, while Paulson played a woman traumatized by the victory."
"So, with Evan Peters, the three of them are the main characters of this year." Paulson and Peters have played roles in every season of machete
"Kathy and Sarah Paulson have a lot of great things to do," Murphy said
Murphy told Entertainment Weekly that Bates, Paulson and Peters will be the three leaders next season
Bates in last season's cult（ AHS:Cult ）He played "cult" before the release（ AHS:Coven ）"Freak show"（ AHS:Freak Show ）The hotel（ AHS:Hotel ）And Roanoke（ AHS:Roanoke ）, starring in the Netflix comedy series disconnected. Since then, the show has been cancelled after a season
Ryan Murphy, co-author and screenwriter of the American horror story, said Kathy Bates will return to season 8 with Sarah Paulson and Evan Peters



**Something goes wrong**
“For the latest TV news and interviews subscribe to our new podcast ‘Watch With Us’ below!”
“...a trial Turner added to the outlet...”
“News reports.”
“Bookout’s husband, Taylor McKinney, and their two children, Jayde, nearly 3, and Maverick, nearly 2, were also granted two-year restraining orders against Edwards.”
“The troubled reality star, 30, will still be able to see his 9-year-old son, Bentley, whom he shares with Bookout, under the restraining order.”
““We did agree to a restraining order where Ryan will not go within 100 feet of Maci and her current husband and their two children.”
“Ryan has no exclusions with Bentley and is still able to see his son under the new restraining order,” Edwards’ attorney Jonathan Turner told E!”
“News on Tuesday, May 22.”
“This gives Ryan a lot more protection against any false allegations allows him to avoid getting arrested without a hearing first and allows him to be around his son most importantly Ryan agreed to this outcome to make it easier on everyone and not go through a formal process of...”
“Moving forward Ryan hopes everyone can get through this without any issues and that he can see his son Us Weekly confirmed on March 29 that Bookout 26 had filed an order of protection against Edwards on behalf of herself and all three of her children after he allegedly threatened...”


"To get the latest TV news and interviews, please subscribe to our new podcast 'watch with us'!"
“… Add a test driver to the socket... "
"News coverage."
"Booker's husband, Taylor McKinney, and their two children, Jayde (nearly 3 years old) and Maverick (nearly 2 years old), also received a two-year restraining order against Edwards."
"The troubled reality star, 30, is still able to see his 9-year-old son Bentley, who he shared with bookout, under the restrictions."
"We agreed to a restriction that Ryan would not be allowed within 100 feet of MACI and his current husband and two children."
Edwards' lawyer, Jonathan Turner, told e
"Tuesday, 22 May."
"This gives Ryan more protection from any false charges, prevents him from being arrested without a hearing, and enables him to be with his son. Most importantly, Ryan agrees with this result, making it easier for everyone, rather than through formal procedures..."
"Looking forward, Ryan hopes that everyone can get through the difficulties smoothly. He can see that his son, American weekly, confirmed on March 29 that Booker submitted a protection order on behalf of herself and her three children after she was said to have threatened Edwards on March 26..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Colorful: Munn looked ready for Spring in her blazer and shorts combo as she posed for photos at the CFDA, Variety and WWD Runway to Red Carpet Event LuncheonDetails: Strappy beige heels added sex appeal to balance out the plainness of her fresh white T-shirt...”
“The Green Bay Packers quarterback, 34, has since moved on to race-car driver Danica Patrick.”
“Munn is single since splitting from Aaron Rodgers last year.”
“Munn has always credited her changes in appearance to her diet, including Japanese potatoes that are high in Hyaluronic Acid, weight loss and general attention to skin care and healthy living.”
“...removed all traces of the lip color She wore a coat with a fur trimmed hood up over her hair and explained she was heading out of Los Angeles for a colder clime...”
“Makeup magic Munn shared a clip later on Tuesday showing how her lips were painted in for a fuller look Going Once she boarded her flight she took out a tissue as she filmed on her smartphone Going The former Newsroom star wiped the tissue across her lips Gone And...”
“She also shared a clip showing her getting her lips drawn in more fully ahead of her appearance at the CFDA luncheon held at Chateau Marmont.”
“Later on Tuesday, Munn took to Instagram stories and shared video of her wiping away her 'luscious lips' as she sat on board a plane.”
“But, it turned out, it was all an illusion thanks to the way her lip color had been applied.”
“...her luscious lips and reverted to her unvarnished look Her appearance sparked speculation that the Newsroom star may have had a cosmetic procedure to enhance her lips...”


"Colorful: Munn is wearing a jacket and shorts to take photos on CFDA, variety and WWD catwalks, ready for spring. Details of the red carpet luncheon: beige lace up heels add sex appeal and balance the simplicity of her fresh white T-shirt.... "
"Green Bay Packers quarterback, 34, turned to racing driver Danica Patrick."
"Since breaking up with Alan Rogers last year, Munn has been single."
"Munn has always attributed his appearance changes to diet, including hyaluronic acid rich Japanese potatoes, weight loss and a general focus on skin care and healthy living."
“… With all the lip color removed, she wore a coat, a fur hood in her hair, and explained that she was leaving Los Angeles for a colder place... "
"Makeup magician Munn shared a video late Tuesday showing how her lips are painted fuller. When she boarded the plane, she took out a tissue and took the photo with her smartphone. The former newsroom star wiped the tissue on his lips and disappeared... "
"She also shared a video showing that her lips were stretched fuller before attending the CFDA luncheon at Marmont castle."
"Later on Tuesday, Munn went to instagram stories to share a video of her wiping off her 'sweet lips' on a plane."
"But it turns out that it's all false, thanks to the use of her lip color."
“…… Her sweet lips restored her unadorned appearance, which led to speculation that the newsroom star might have had plastic surgery to strengthen her lips.... "



**Something goes wrong**
“In the photo, Reynolds is smiling at Lively and she has her hand placed on his chest, but instead of captioning the snap with a message about their love, she decided to pay herself a compliment.”
“Recently, the actress made an epic comeback when she shared a photo herself and Reynolds at the premiere of A Quiet Place.”
““My child would just fart and then walk away.”Image zoom Ryan Reynolds, Blake Lively and their daughters | Credit: Xavier Collin/Image Press/SplashOf course, the couple has a long history of trading playful jabs at each other over social media.”
““‘Mommy unfollowed Daddy on Instagram,’” he said, imitating his daughter.”
“...terrible way to find out that I ve been kicked out of the house to be honest The actor went on to share that he was relieved the couples two daughters James 3 and Inez 19 months were too young to know about the harsh move...”
“Image zoom Blake Lively and Ryan Reynolds Credit Jason Mendez startraks Sharing his reaction to losing such a close follower in an interview with Smallzy s Surgery the 41 year old Deadpool star joked that he was very sad about that Definitely stings he continued adding that it s a...”
“All of Lively’s enviable fashion posts are back and the actress has also re-followed husband Ryan Reynolds, who previously joked that his wife’s decision to stop following him had been a difficult pill to swallow.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After seemingly deleting all of her old photos from Instagram and deciding to only follow women with the name Emily Nelson — a reference to Lively’s character in her upcoming film A Simple Place— the 30-year-old’s social media presence is returning to normal.”
“Blake Lively Re-Follows Ryan Reynolds on Instagram — and Her Entire Feed Is BackBlake Lively is back in business!”


"In the photo, Reynolds smiles at lively, her hand is on lively's chest, but she doesn't write the information about their love on the title of the snapshot, but decides to compliment herself."
"Recently, the actress shared a picture with Reynolds at the premiere of a quiet place, which is an epic comeback."
"My kids just fart and walk away." Image zooming Ryan Reynolds, Blake Lively and their daughter | image source: Xavier Colin / photo press / splash of course, the couple have a long history of poking each other in jokes on social media
"Mom didn't follow dad on instagram," he said, mimicking his daughter
“…… To be honest, the actor went on to say that his two daughters, James 3 and Inez, 19 months old, were too young to know how to behave harshly. "
"Photo zooming black lively and Ryan Reynolds Jason Mendes Star Trek shared his reaction to the loss of such a close follower in an interview with smozzy's surgery. The 41 year old death row star joked that he was very sad to be stabbed, adding that it was a..."
"All of lively's enviable fashion posts have come back, and the actress has followed her husband, Ryan Reynolds, who joked that his wife's decision not to follow him is a pill hard to swallow."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It seems that after she removed all the old photos from instagram and decided to focus only on a woman named Emily Nelson - the role of lively mentioned in her upcoming film a simple place - her 30-year-old social media presence is returning to normal."
"Blake Lively follows Ryan Reynolds on instagram - all her information has been deleted and lively is back on track!"



**Something goes wrong**
“...rock album The War On Drugs A Deeper Understanding Best R B album Bruno Mars 24K Magic Best rap album Kendrick Lamar Damn...”
“Newcomer Alessia Cara won best new artist, considered the least important category of the main five.”
“His album 24K Magic picked up record of the year for the title track, song of the year for That's What I Like and best R&B album.”
“But Mars' victory was rap's defeat.”
“Jay-Z was the leading nominee with eight nods but left empty handed, one year after his wife Beyonce missed out on album of the year to Adele.”
“Kendrick Lamar, widely expected to pick up the evening's main prize for his fourth album DAMN, was limited to rap-only categories.”
“AdvertisementHe picked up five awards, including best rap album and best rap performance.”
“Hillary Clinton s Fire And Fury skit at Grammys Image Jay Z with his wife Beyonce and daughter Blue Ivy at the Grammys The evening was not just a disappointment for those who hoped to see rap break out from genre specific categories but it was also noticeably short on...”
“...female winners...”
“In a politically charged ceremony where the Time's Up movement and the #MeToo campaign were celebrated, and where invitees wore white roses to support victims of sexual harassment, only one female artist picked up a major award.”


“… Rock albums better understanding of the war on drugs best RB album Bruno Mars 24K magic best rap album Kendrick Lamar damned... "
"Newcomer Alicia Carra won the Best Newcomer Award and was considered the least important of the five categories."
"His album 24K magic won the album of the year, the song of the year," that's what I like, "and the best R & B album."
"But Mars' victory was rap's defeat."
"Jay-Z became the main nominees with eight nods, but returned empty handed. A year ago, his wife Beyonce missed Adele's album of the year."
Kendrick Lamar is widely expected to win the night's major award for his fourth album, damned, which is limited to rap
He won five awards, including best rap album and best rap performance
"Hilary Clinton's passionate and angry sketches at the Grammy Awards with his wife Beyonce and daughter blue Ivy not only disappoint those who want to see rap stand out from a particular genre, but also show a clear lack of..."
“… Women's winners... "
"In a political ceremony to celebrate the" progress of the times "movement and the" Mayo movement ", the invitees wore white roses to support the victims of sexual harassment, and only one female artist won the prize."



**Something goes wrong**
“In the previous months, Lawrence spoke up about being on good terms with her exes.”
“The couple was seen on a candlelit dinner weeks later where Lawrence looked to be beaming at her new man.”
“The insider also added that the couple had been together since early May.”
“After their first sighting together, a source told PEOPLE “they looked very comfortable.”“She is smiling like I have never seen her do with any of her previous boyfriends,” the source continued, adding that the pair have “great chemistry” and were “holding hands and laughing” while spending time together.”
“Image zoom Jennifer Lawrence and Cooke Maroney | Credit: TheImageDirectThe Red Sparrow actress, 27, has been dating Maroney, an art director at NYC gallery Gladstone 64, for nearly two months now.”
“The Hunger Games star went for a crossbody bag, a newsboy hat and flip-flops, while her artsy beau accessorized with a pair of green sneakers.”
“Lawrence and Maroney looked as if they planned to match—each are wearing a different shade of blue jeans, a white t-shirt (though JLaw’s was a tad shorter) and sunglasses.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple was spotted holding hands while stepping out for a quick meal at Fanelli Cafe before walking over to cafe Smile to meet up with friends.”
“On Sunday, the Oscar winner was seen out with Maroney on a casual lunch date in New York City.”


"A few months ago, Lawrence publicly said that he had a good relationship with his ex girlfriend."
"A few weeks later, someone saw the couple at a candlelight dinner, and Lawrence was looking at her new boyfriend beaming with joy."
"The couple have been together since early May," the source added
After their first meeting, a source told people "they look comfortable." "She smiles, just like I've never seen her and her ex boyfriend before," the source added, adding that the two were "very chemical" and "holding hands and laughing" when they were together
"Zoom in and out of pictures Jennifer Lawrence and cook Maroni | source: the 27 year old red sparrow actress has been dating Maroni, artistic director of the 64 Gallery in Gladstone, New York, for nearly two months."
"The hungry game star wants a messenger bag, a newspaper cap and a pair of flip flops, while her artistic boyfriend uses a pair of green sneakers as accessories."
"Lawrence and Maroni look as if they're going to match each other, wearing different shades of blue jeans, white T-shirts (though jlaw's is a little shorter) and sunglasses."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The couple were found holding hands, having a quick meal at Fanelli cafe, then walking to the cafe and smiling to meet their friends."
On Sunday, the Oscar winner and Maroni were seen on an informal lunch date in New York City



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“On the Today show Monday, Cena detailed his own heartbreak.”
“In a new clip from an all-new episode of Total Bellas, taped before their breakup last month, the 34-year-old wrestler admits she was feeling "lonely."”
“"What's hard at times and what people don't realize about my relationship is I'm alone a lot and I'm alone in these big, beautiful homes, which you're like, gosh, I mean, these homes are unreal," Bella says.”
“"But to be honest, since we've gotten engaged, John and I have probably shared our bed together maybe 30 days total out of, like, six months.”
“Or, like, 40 days."”
“Bella continues: "So hearing Brie and Lauren, JJ and Bryan all talk about their family stuff and their kids, it makes it, like, sink in a little bit more of how lonely it will be and how lonely it gets."”
“The footage comes just one day after ET caught up with Bella at NBCUniversal's upfront presentation in New York City, where she revealed she's holding out hope for a reconciliation with Cena.”
“"John is such an amazing man.”
“He really is the love of my life," Bella exclusively told ET.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"On Monday's today show, senna talked about his heartbreak in detail."
The 34 year old wrestler admitted that she felt "lonely" in the new episode "complete Bella" recorded before their breakup last month
"Sometimes I feel bad, people don't realize my relationship, I'm lonely, I live alone in these big, beautiful houses, and you think, God, I mean, these houses are not real," Bella said
"But to be honest, since we got engaged, John and I have slept together for about 30 days in about six months."
"About 40 days."
Bella continued: "so hearing Bree and Lauren, JJ and Bryan talking about their families and children made her, like, more aware of how lonely it would be, how lonely it would be."
"Just the day before the video was broadcast, et caught up with Bella at nbcuniversal's first press conference in New York City. Bella revealed that she was hopeful of reconciliation with Senna."
"John is a great man."
"He's really the love of my life," Bella told et



**Something goes wrong**
“The new mom appeared in the 1993 family comedy as Allison, alongside Bette Midler (Winifred), Sarah Jessica Parker (Sarah), Kathy Najimy (Mary), Omri Katz (Max) and Thora Birch (Dani).”
“#bemine.” The pair tied the knot in 2008 and Jack is the pair’s first child.”
“Vinessa Shaw and husband Kristopher Gifford have officially welcomed their baby boy into the world.”
“The Hocus Pocus star, 41, shared the news on Instagram on Thursday, March 1, revealing that she had given birth to a son named Jack on February 20.”
““After a long labor with many complications, Baby Jack was finally born two and a half weeks after his due date on 2.20.2018 weighing in at 9lbs 9oz!!”
“!” she captioned a sweet black-and-white snap of her newborn baby’s tiny hand holding her thumb.”
““Needless to say, we are overjoyed about our new little addition!”“He and I went through a lot, as the plans of having a natural birth were derailed.”
“But with the support of so many people: family, midwives, and hospital staff, we came out victorious, healthy, and happy!” she continued.”
““Ok that’s all.”
“Too tired to write anything else.”


The new mother played Alison in the 1993 family comedy, playing alongside Betty Midler (Winifred), Sarah Jessica Parker (Sarah), Kathy nagimi (Mary), omry Katz (max) and sola birch (Dani)
"It's mine." They got married in 2008 and Jack was their first child
"Vanessa Shaw and her husband Kristopher Gifford officially welcome their baby boy to the world."
"The 41 year old hocus pocus star shared the news on instagram on March 1 (Thursday), revealing that she gave birth to a son named Jack on February 20."
"After a long time of delivery, with many complications, little Jack was finally born on February 20, 2018, two and a half weeks after the due date, weighing 9 pounds and 9 ounces!"
"!" she held her thumb in her newborn baby's little hand and made a sweet black-and-white slap. "
"Needless to say, we were ecstatic with the new little things! "I went through a lot with him because the plan for natural childbirth was derailed."
"But with the support of so many people: family members, midwives and hospital staff, we are victorious, healthy and happy! "She continued
"Well, that's all."
"I'm too tired to write anything else."



**Something goes wrong**
“In December, the mother of one posted a video on Instagram with her daughter on the eighth anniversary of Underwood’s death.”
““I probably wouldn’t be where I am if I had that life,” Abraham said.”
“...he not died...”
“Although Abraham was estranged from him at the time of his death she wrote in her book My Teenage Dream Ended that Underwood was my first love my only true love Sitting down with Bethenny Frankel on her show Bethenny in 2013 Abraham said she would have married Underwood had...”
““We all love you so much thank you for always watching over us.”Underwood died in a car accident on December 28, 2008, when Abraham was eight months pregnant.”
““Happy Birthday Daddy Derek!” Abraham, 25, wrote in the caption.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The photo featured Underwood’s gravesite, decorated with a baseball bat, blue flowers, daisies and a stuffed puppy.”
“In an Instagram post on Monday, the Teen Mom OG star wished her former boyfriend a happy birthday.”
“Farrah Abraham Visits the Grave of Her Daughter's Father, Who Died Just 1 Month Before She Was BornFarrah Abraham paid tribute to the father of her child, Derek Underwood, who tragically passed away before their daughter Sophia was born.”


"Last December, on the eighth anniversary of Underwood's death, the mother of a child posted a video with her daughter on instagram."
Abraham said, "if I had a life like that, I might not be in this place now."
“… He's not dead... "
"Although Abraham was estranged from him when he died, she wrote in the book: my dream as a teenager is over. Underwood is my first love. My only true love is sitting down with Bethany Frankel on her show 2013 Bethany. Abraham said that she would marry Underwood..."
"We all love you very much. Thank you for taking care of us all the time." Underwood died in a car accident on December 28, 2008, when Abraham was eight months pregnant
"Happy birthday, Derek Dad! "Abraham, 25, wrote in the title."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In the photo, Underwood's cemetery is decorated with baseball bats, blue flowers, daisies and a plush dog
"On instagram on Monday, the young mom, the og star, wished her ex boyfriend a happy birthday."
"Farah Abraham visited the grave of her daughter's father, who died a month before she was born. Abraham paid tribute to Derek Underwood, the father of her child, who died before the birth of his daughter Sophia



Number  454
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s just great.'”
“We love living together.”
“And Ariel Winter, 19, shared her anniversary with Levi Meaden, 30, by posting two snaps on Instagram with a gushing message.”
“One showed the Modern Family star in a skimpy pink bikini clinging to her actor beau and kissing him passionately as they cavorted in a river with a waterfall behind them.”
“I love you Ariel Winter celebrated her first anniversary with her actor beau Levi Madden by posting two shots with him including this one of them kissing passionately by a waterfall In the second more formal shot they are dressed up in black for a night out as she holds...”
“Levi s face in her hands...”
“Ariel captioned the snaps: ' Happy 1 year anniversary my love.”
“I’m the luckiest girl in the entire world.”
“'Thank you for being the incredible man you are, and for making me the happiest I could’ve ever imagined.”
“Here’s to many, many more.”


"Great."
"We like to live together."
"Ariel winter, 19, shared her anniversary with Livy midden, 30, who posted two photos on instagram and left a lot of comments."
"One of the photos shows the modern family star in a pinkish bikini hugging her boyfriend and kissing him passionately as they tumble in the waterfall river behind them."
"I love you, Ariel winter celebrated her first anniversary with her actor beau levy Madden. She took two photos, one of which was kissing by the waterfall, and the second one was more formal. They were dressed in black and went out for the night while she was holding them..."
"Livy's face is in her hands..."
"Ariel wrote in the photo: 'happy anniversary, dear.'"
"I'm the luckiest girl in the world."
"Thank you for being an incredible person and making me the happiest person I can imagine."
"To more people."



**Something goes wrong**
“Watch the clip above.”
“!”Also Read: 'SNL': Bill Hader Brings Stefon Back to Weekend Update (Video)And that is what took Hader down.”
“What?”
““He said, ‘My girlfriend works at Yoshinoya Beef Bowl,’ which is a restaurant chain in L.A.”
“He whispered in my ear to make me laugh Hader told Seth Meyers laughing even then...”
“Hader is known for never being able to keep it together while playing this particular character but while appearing on Late Night with Seth Meyers Monday the late night sketch show alum explained he almost got through it until Mulaney showed up as Stefon s lawyer and conceptual piss artist...”
“And then John Mulaney had to go and ruin everything.”
“Bill Hader was so close to beating his usual giggle fit when he reprised his beloved role as Stefon during his return to “Weekend Update” while hosting “SNL” Saturday.”


"Look at the clip above."
"!" also read: 'SNL': Bill Hardt brought Stefan back to the weekend update (video), which is why Hardt fell. "
"What?"
"My girlfriend works at Yoshino's beef bowl, a restaurant chain in Los Angeles," he said
"He whispered in my ear and made me laugh. Hard told Seth Meyers that he was laughing even then..."
"It's well known that hard can't keep this state when he plays this special role, but when he and Seth Meyers appeared late at night on Monday, the late night sketch alum explained that he almost survived until Mulani appeared as Stefan's lawyer and concept urination artist..."
"Then John Mulani had to destroy everything."
"When Bill Hardt presided over" Saturday SNL "and returned to" weekend latest ", he played his beloved part of Stefan again, almost breaking his usual giggle state."



Number  456
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As an actress Kent has appeared in the films Reflections in the Mud, The Mentor, One Shot, Pitching Love and Catching Faith, and Dudes & Dragons.”
“She has been romantically linked to film and television producer Randall Emmett who was previously married to actress Ambyr Childers.”
“Lala Kent has more than 750 thousand followers on Instagram and owns the Lala Beauty line of cosmetics.”
“She has worked as a hostess at SUR and is friends with DJ James Kennedy who was also a busboy at SUR and a cast member of Vanderpump Rules.”
“Kent was a recurring cast member during seasons four and five and became a main cast member starting in season six.”
“She is best known for being a cast member of the Bravo reality TV series Vanderpump Rules.”
“Lala Kent was born in Utah in 1990.”
“Lala Kent net worth: Lala Kent is an American reality television personality and actress who has a net worth of $2 million.”


As an actress, Kent has starred in the movies reflection in the mud, mentor, hit the jackpot, love and faith, Playboy and the dragon
"She had a romantic connection with film producer Randall Emmett, who had previously married actress ambyr Childers."
"Lala Kent has more than 750000 followers on instagram and owns Lala beauty cosmetics."
"She used to be a hostess in Sur, a friend of DJ James Kennedy, a stewardess in Sur, and an actor in van der Pol's rules."
"Kent is a regular actor in the fourth and fifth seasons and has been a major actor since the sixth season."
"She's best known for her role as an actress in the Bravo reality TV series van der Pol rules."
"Lala Kent was born in Utah in 1990."
"Lala Kent's net worth: Lala Kent is an American reality TV star with a net worth of $2 million."



Number  457
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Andy jumped at the chance to question Lala about the digs she made toward her former castmates throughout her run on the show.”
“Lala Confronts the CastAfter being MIA for most of the season, Lala Kent made an unexpected appearance at the reunion.”
““Didn’t happen.”Brittany told Andy that she and Kristen had just shared a “stupid kiss,” but Jax demanded to know why the girls were fully naked if all they did was just exchange a quick peck.”
““I did not go down on Brittany,” Kristen swore as Brittany shook her head in agreement.”
“But Brittany and Kristen adamantly denied the rumored hookup.”
““I was in shock,” he insisted.”
“Nearly a year later, Jax continued to stand by his story.”
““I don’t want this to be like a dorm situation!”Jax Stands by Sex RumorSeason 5 opened with a steamy sex rumor involving Brittany and Kristen Doute, and it was started by none other than Jax himself.”
““I was not happy about it,” the newly married Katie stated flatly.”
“Stassi Schroeder revealed that actually she crashed the Bubbas’ honeymoon — but Jax Taylor and Brittany Cartwright somehow one-upped Stassi by moving into the same apartment complex as Tom and Katie.”


"Andy takes this opportunity to question Lala about her sarcasm at the former crew throughout the show."
"Lala versus Castro has been MIA for most of the season, and Lala Kent is unexpectedly on the scene of the reunion."
"It didn't happen." Brittany told Andy that she and Christine had just shared a "stupid kiss," but Jakes asked to know why the girls were naked if they just exchanged a quick peck
"I didn't fail Brittany," Christine vowed, and Brittany shook his head in agreement
"But Brittany and Christine strongly deny the alleged collusion."
"I was shocked," he insisted
Nearly a year later, Jax continued to stick to his point of view
"I don't want it to be like a dormitory! "The fifth season of Jakes' supportive rumors starts with a passionate sexual rumor about Brittany and Christian Dutt, and it was Jakes himself who started the rumor."
"I'm not happy," the newlywed Katie said flatly
"Stacy Schroeder revealed that she actually crashed Bubba's honeymoon tour - but somehow, Jakes Taylor and Brittany Cartwright moved into the same apartment as Tom and Katie, which made Stacy even better."



Number  458
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The expectant mom shared a heartwarming snapshot to Instagram on Sunday, showing the Olympic gold medalist lovingly resting his hand on her sizable baby bump as they both smiled lovingly at one another.”
“"Such an amazing day celebrating our #babyshark!!"”
“...she captioned the sweet pic.”
“"We are so thankful for everyone who was able to be with us and everyone who was with us in spirit."”
“Michael took also to Instagram to share a sweet family photo with his wife and their adorable 1-year-old son, Boomer.”
“"Thanks to those who came to celebrate today!!”
“#babyshark," the excited dad captioned the heartwarming pic.”
“Some fans on social media also began speculating about the baby's sex, taking the Olympian's choice of pink shirt to be a hint that they're expecting a baby girl.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
On Sunday, the mother to be shared a warm snapshot on instagram, in which the Olympic gold medalist stroked her huge lump with her hand and both of them were smiling
"It's great to celebrate our baby summer camp!"
“… She added a title to this lovely picture. "
"We are very grateful to everyone who can be with us, and everyone who is with us in spirit."
Michael also went on instagram to share a sweet family photo with his wife and their lovely 1-year-old son boomer
"Thank you for coming to celebrate today!"
"Baby shack," the excited dad added a title to the warm picture
"Some fans on social media began to speculate about the baby's gender, thinking that Olympia's choice of pink shirt implied that they were pregnant with a baby girl."



Number  459
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The season 2 announcement trailer features Depeche Mode’s 1993 single “I Feel You”:”
“Season 2 picks up in the aftermath of Hannah’s death, as the other characters start their journeys toward healing and recovery.”
“The streamer announced the premiere date on social media, with the caption, “The tapes were just the beginning.” That came after it teased the reveal in posts earlier Monday saying “The truth is developing” and a live-stream showing two Polaroid photos — leaving fans on tenterhooks for several hours.”
“The tapes were just the beginning.”
“May 18. pic.twitter.com/MZczjM1fP3 — 13 Reasons Why (@13ReasonsWhy) April 30, 2018Netflix announced the renewal of “13 Reasons” last May, after the freshman season debuted in March 2017 and quickly captured widespread buzz.”
“The first season of the series based on Jay Asher s young adult book by the same name centers around the death a high school girl Hannah played by Katherine Langford who has left behind a series of 13 cassette tapes for her friend and crush Clay Dylan Minnette explaining...”
“...what led her to suicide...”
“The show also stars Christian Navarro, Alisha Boe, Brandon Flynn, Justin Prentice, Miles Heizer, Brian d’Arcy James, and Kate Walsh.”
“In the upcoming season, Hannah’s parents file a lawsuit against Liberty High School.”
“It also plans an after-show, “Beyond the Reasons,” with the show’s actors, experts, and educators breaking down the series.”


The season 2 Trailer features depche mode's 1993 single I feel you
The second season tells the story of Hannah's death, and other characters begin their recovery journey
"The streamer announced its premiere on social media with the title" these tapes are just the beginning. ". Always on tenterhooks, it ridiculed the news in its earlier Monday post, saying that "the truth is developing", and showed two Polaroid photos in a live streaming - giving fans a lot of time to worry.
"The video is just the beginning."
"18 May. Picture: twitter.com/MZczjM1fP3 -13 reasons (@ 13reasonswhy) on April 30, 2018, after the premiere of the freshman season in March 2017, Netflix announced the renewal of its "13 reasons" in May last year, which quickly attracted widespread attention
"The first season of this series is based on Jay Asher's adult book of the same name. It revolves around the death of a high school girl, Hannah, played by Katherine Lanford. She left a series of 13 tapes for her friend and crush on clay Dylan Minette, explaining that..."
“… What caused her to commit suicide... "
It also stars Christian Navarro, Eliza Bo, Brandon Flynn, Justin Prentice, miles Heyzer, Brian Darcy James and Kate Walsh
"In the coming season, Hannah's parents are suing liberty high school."
"It also plans a" beyond reason "program, which will be broken down by actors, experts and educators."



Number  460
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Our Halloween crafts are a fun way to DIY your Halloween party decorations to create a unique look.”
“And if you’re throwing a boo bash, check out our cute Halloween entertaining and party supplies.”
“So much decor, including fabric and painted pumpkins, Halloween lights, wreaths, decorative accents, mantle décor and animated decor!”
“We have wall decor, too, such as the adorable “Happy Halloween” garland.”
“Or mix and match our Halloween window decorations and Halloween table decorations to create a spooktacular display.”
“Choose vintage Halloween decorations for a stylish feel.”
“Score scary Halloween decorations for a haunted-house vibe.”
“Shop by Halloween theme—such as Skeletons & Skulls—to pull together your spookiest space.”
“Our wide selection of Halloween decorations is sure to inspire loads of Halloween ideas.”
“Do fright right with indoor Halloween decor from Target’s Halloween Hyde & Eek Boutique.”


"Our Halloween crafts are an interesting way to DIY your Halloween party decorations and create a unique look."
"If you're going to hold a carnival, check out our lovely Halloween entertainment and party supplies."
"So many decorations, including fabric and painted pumpkins, Halloween lights, wreaths, decorative accents, Cape decorations and animation decorations!"
"We also have wall decorations, such as the lovely" Happy Halloween "wreath."
"Or mix and match our Halloween window decorations and table decorations to create a funny display."
"Choose retro Halloween decorations, give people a sense of fashion."
"Make some terrible Halloween decorations for the atmosphere of the haunted house."
"Shopping by the theme of Halloween (such as skeletons and skulls) brings together your most bizarre spaces."
"Our rich choice of Halloween decorations will definitely inspire a lot of creativity."
"In the interior of the target's Halloween Hyde & eek boutique, you must be scared."



Number  461
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Kim Kardashian Attends the 2018 Met Gala without Kanye West Wearing Sexy Gold Versace Dress“We were all so nerve-wracked because it was such a big moment, but she killed it,” makeup artist Ariel Tejada told PeopleStyle.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“...the Met Gala on Monday but she was not about to take some time to rest and miss the chance to attend another event with sisters Kendall and Kylie Jenner...”
“The threesome, accompanied by momager Kris Jenner, attended the Business of Fashion dinner on Tuesday night at the Chinese Tuxedo in New York City.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Kardashian West, 37, wore an eye-catching yellow vintage Versace corset dress with a thigh-high slit and straight black hair.”
“Image zoom Kim Kardashian West in Versace Credit Dimitrios Kambouris Getty Images for The Business of Fashion Image zoom Kris Jenner Kendall Jenner Kylie Jenner and Kim Kardashian West Credit Dimitrios Kambouris Getty Younger sister and new mom Kylie wore a multi patterned dress by Celine while supermodel Kendall wore...”
“...a white dress suit...”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“Their mother, 62, wore a short little black dress, black fishnet stockings and diamond necklace.”


"Related video: Kanye West didn't wear a sexy golden Versace dress when Kim Kardashian attended the 2018 metropolitan party," makeup artist Ariel Tejada told people style magazine. "We were all nervous because it was such an important moment, but she killed it."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
“…… Monday's Metropolitan party, but she didn't plan to take time off and missed another event with Kendall and Kelly Jenner sisters... "
"The three, accompanied by their mother, Kris Jenner, attended a fashion business dinner at the Chinese dress shop in New York on Tuesday night."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Kardashian West, 37, is wearing a striking yellow retro Versace tights with split legs and straight black hair."
"Kim Kardashian West in Versace credit Dimitrios kambouris Getty Images for the fashion world: zoom Kris Jenner Kendall Jenner Kylie Jenner, Kim Kardashian West credit Dimitrios kambouris Getty sister and new mother Kylie are wearing a multi pattern dress designed by Celine, while supermodel Kendall is wearing..."
“… White suit... "
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
Their mother, 62, is wearing a black skirt, black fishnet stockings and a diamond necklace



Number  462
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And even though we won’t be with them every week, in a show about magic and hope, we fervently believe it won’t be the last we see of them.“”
“As Once continues, this group will always be the beating heart of the show.”
“Without them there would be no Once Upon a Time.”
“We can’t thank them enough for the hard work, dedication, and passion they delivered day in and day out.”
“...has the heart of the truest believer...”
“And Jared literally grew up before the eyes of millions from a child actor with enormous innate talent to a young man whose abilities continue to astound as he created a character who truly as we say on the show...”
“She made the character soar to incredible heights while always keeping her grounded and relatable.”
“Rebecca took us on a broomstick roller coaster ride as she re-invented the Wicked Witch of the West by finding the pain beneath the green.”
“...encountered...”
“Emilie took the character of Belle to a deep and soulful place bringing great intelligence and warmth to the character making her fiercely independent strong willed but also an eternal optimist who saw only the best in all those she...”


"Although we will not be with them every week, we firmly believe that this will not be the last time we see them."
"As always, these people will always be the heart of the show."
"Without them, there would be no past."
"We are very grateful to them for their hard work, dedication and enthusiasm day after day."
“… Have the heart of the most sincere believer... "
"Jared grew up in the eyes of millions of people, from a child actor with great talent to a young man with amazing ability. He created a character, as we said in the program..."
"She made the character fly to incredible heights, while always being down-to-earth and approachable."
"Rebecca took us on a broomstick roller coaster. She discovered the pain under the green and reinvented the evil witch of the West."
“… Meet... "
"Emily takes the role of bell to a deep and affectionate place, brings great wisdom and warmth to the role, makes her have strong independence and strong will, but at the same time, she is also an eternal optimist. She only sees everything she thinks is the best..."



Number  463
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“According to Us Weekly, the comedian tied the knot in a secret ceremony with her boyfriend, Chris Fischer, this week.”
“The star-studded wedding apparently took place on February 13, right before Valentine's Day, at a rented house in Malibu.”
“Us Weekly says that a "comedian officiated the nuptials," and a slew of celebrity guests attended, including Jennifer Aniston, Jennifer Lawrence and Judd Apatow.”
“Schumer shared several photos on Instagram, including this cute snap with Lawrence:InstagramAccording to The Blast, Jake Gyllenhaal was also there, and the reception apparently "featured a huge seafood bar where guests dined on oysters."”
“There was a strict no-photos policy, though, so we're unlikely to see any snaps on social media.”
“News of Schumer's relationship with Fischer broke in November 2017, when they were spotted dining together at Café Altro Paradiso in New York.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"This content was imported from instagram."
The comedian married her boyfriend Chris Fisher at a secret ceremony this week, US Weekly reported
"The starry wedding apparently took place on February 13, the eve of Valentine's day, in a rental house in Malibu."
Us weekly said a "comedian officiated at the wedding" and many celebrity guests attended, including Jennifer Aniston, Jennifer Lawrence and Jude apato
Schumer shared several photos on instagram, including this lovely one. Lawrence: according to the fact that Jack Gyllenhaal was also present at the time of the explosion, the reception obviously "has a huge seafood bar where guests eat oysters."
"However, there was a strict ban on taking photos at that time, so we were unlikely to see any snapshots on social media."
"In November 2017, news of Schumer's relationship with Fischer came out, when it was found that they were dining together at altero palladiso cafe in New York."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address



**Something goes wrong**
“Whilst Diaz's said: "A movement should never take us backwards, it should only ever carry us forwards!"”
“I am so grateful to be a woman, I wouldn't change it for the world.”
“LOS ANGELES - Adele stood proud with Cameron Diaz and Jennifer Lawrence protesting equality for women in America by carrying placards at the 2018 Women's March in Los Angeles on Saturday.”
“The British pop star who resides in La La Land with husband Simon Konecki and their five year old son Angelo shared a selfie with the _Holiday _star and _Hunger Games _actress with their protest placards as they joined thousands...”
“...of women speaking out against President Donald Trump and the lack of equality in the US”
“The 29-year-old singer says she has raised her little boy to have empathy for the opposite sex.”
“Speaking about the influence the women in her life have had on her career, the _Hello _hitmaker captioned the post: "The most influential people in my life have always been women.”
“My family, my friends, my teachers, my colleagues, and my idols.”
“I am obsessed with all the women in my life.”
“I adore them and need them more and more every day.”


Although Diaz said: "a movement should not let us go backward, it should only let us move forward!"
"I appreciate being a woman. I won't change the world for the sake of it."
"Los Angeles - Adele, along with Cameron Diaz and Jennifer Lawrence, held up a placard to protest women's equality in the United States at the 2018 women's march in Los Angeles on Saturday."
"The British pop star, who lives with her husband Simon conegie and their five-year-old son Angelo in Laran County, shared their selfie with the festival star and hungry game actress, and they joined thousands of people..."
“…… Women openly oppose President Donald Trump and the lack of equality in the United States
"The 29 year old singer said she had raised her youngest son to be a sympathetic person of the opposite sex."
Talking about the influence of women in her life on her career, the "hello" killer wrote in the post: "the most influential person in my life has always been a woman."
"My family, friends, teachers, colleagues and idols."
"I'm obsessed with all the women in my life."
"I adore them and need them more and more every day."



Number  465
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That might just include more nicknames that Kylie has for their daughter, or for Travis Scott himself.”
“And apparently, the famous couple has more than one nickname for the baby girl.”
“Kylie laughed it off, but she didn't deny the nickname.”
“However, Scott then added that Kylie calls him "Daddy" sometimes, with a quick smirk at the camera.”
“"Yea," Scott replied, "You just call me baby."”
“Scott initially struggled with the answer, and Kylie admitted, "I don't really call you any nicknames."”
“Not about to leave the rapper out of the nickname reveal fun, in the video below, Kylie also asked Scott, "What's one of the nicknames I call you?"”
“Nothing out of the ordinary as a nickname for a little girl named Stormi, but adorable nonetheless.”
“Scott and Kylie both came up with Storm Storm, Burrito, and Peanut, as Us Weekly reported.”
“Specifically, Kylie asked Scott what they call their 5-month-old daughter, Stormi Webster, as a nickname.”


"This may include more nicknames Kelly gave their daughter or Travis Scott himself."
"Obviously, the famous couple has more than one nickname for the baby girl."
"Kelly laughed it off, but she didn't deny the nickname."
However, Scott added that Kelly sometimes called him "Dad" and giggled quickly at the camera
"Yes," Scott replied, "you just call me baby."
Scott had a hard time answering the question at first, and Kelly admitted, "I really didn't give you a nickname."
"I'm not going to show the rapper's nickname for fun. In the following video, Kelly also asks Scott," what's your nickname when I call you? "
"There's no unusual nickname for a little girl named Tommy, but it's lovely."
Scott and Kelly both came up with snowstorms, tortillas and peanuts, US Weekly reported
"Specifically, Kelly asked Scott what they nicknamed their five month old daughter, Tommy Webster."



**Something goes wrong**
“At its core, the Bachelor-verse is simply a self-sustaining empire of sponsored Instagram posts and free-for-exposure hotel stays, dressed up in sequin gowns and drowned in rose petals.”
“In this context, “characters,” to whatever extent they develop, feel incidental.”
“Within the confines of the series itself, however, the proceedings have been pretty rote: there was the requisite feud between two equally annoying contestants, the jealous meltdown, and the cool guy eliminated too soon.”
“Most of this season’s most intense drama has occurred offscreen, as when viewers found out that front-runner Garrett Yrigoyen has an appalling social-media history, and eliminated contestant Lincoln Adim had been convicted of assault and battery.”
“And rather than build Becca up as a character and give her a redemptive romantic romp, this season has appeared more than happy to let her simply exist as a passive participant in her own story.”
“A breakup can make for a good beginning, but the rest of the story has to go somewhere.”
“Which is frustrating.”
“Instead, Becca continues to be defined by the incident that landed her the Bachelorette gig in the first place: her horrific breakup with Arie Luyendyk Jr. on the last season of The Bachelor.”
“You’d be hard pressed to think of much.”
“What else?”


"At its core, bachelor verse is just a self-sustaining Empire, sponsored by instagram posts, free hotel stays, sequined dresses, drowned in rose petals."
"In this case, no matter how far the character develops, it will feel accidental."
"However, within the limits of the series itself, the whole process was Rote: there was a necessary feud between two equally annoying contestants, jealousy broke down, and the cool guy was eliminated too early."
"Most of the most intense episodes of the season took place off screen, as viewers found out that the leader, Garrett yrigoyen, had an appalling history of social media, and eliminated contestant, Lincoln adim, was convicted of assault."
"This season does not portray Beka as a character, giving her a redeeming romantic frolic, but more willing to let her just be a passive participant in her own story."
"A breakup can have a good start, but the rest of the story has to move forward."
"It's frustrating."
"Instead, Becca continues to be defined by one thing that got her a single woman concert for the first time: her terrible breakup with little Ali luyandick in the last season of bachelor."
"It's hard for you to think about it."
"What else?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Image zoom Khloé Kardashian and Tristan Thompson’s place card | Credit: Khloé Kardashian / InstagramLastly, Khloé, who is 30-weeks along, is getting ready for her child’s arrival.”
“Image zoom Kim Kardashian with Jada Pinkett Smith and Kris Jenner | Credit: Kim Kardashian / InstagramThe host commanded her karaoke machine as she recruited Richards and Resnick for renditions of songs such as “Build Me Up Buttercup” by The Foundations and “Baby One More Time” by Britney Spears.”
“Kris Jenner hosted an elaborate dinner for the romantic holiday at her Calabasas home, inviting her children Kim, Khloé and Rob Kardashian and family friends Jada Pinkett Smith and Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star Kyle Richards.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Joining the Kardashian sisters were their respective significant others, Kanye West and Tristan Thompson, while the momager’s boyfriend Corey Gamble was in attendance.”
““How cute is my mom!”
“She took my chocolate huge hearts that I gave from my perfume, and broke them and made place cards for the table for our Valentine’s Day dinner,” the KKW Beauty mogul, 37, said in a video shared on her Instagram Story Wednesday evening.”
““My mom is so resourceful.”“Happy Valentine’s Day everybody from my loved one to yours,” the Cleveland Cavaliers power forward, who is expecting a baby boy with Khloé, said on his girlfriend’s Instagram Story.”
“Image zoom Kris Jenner’s Valentine’s Day dinner | Credit: Kim Kardashian / InstagramRounding out the guest list were Richards’ husband Mauricio Umansky, longtime KarJenner pal Faye Resnick and her husband Everett Jack Jr., and three of Thompson’s close friends.”
“At the dinner table, which was decorated with red rose petals and boxes of chocolate, the group sang West’s 2010 song “Runaway” in unison.”


"Image zooming khlo é Kardashian and Tristan Thompson's location card | credit: khlo é Kardashian / instagram lastly, khlo é has been 30 weeks, and she is preparing for the arrival of her children."
"Image zooming: Kim Kardashian works with Jada Pinkett Smith and Kris Jenner | image source: Kim Kardashian / instagram hosts her karaoke machine, and she recruited Richards and Resnick to sing songs for her, such as the foundation's build me up butterfly and Britney Spears's baby one more time."
"Chris Jenner hosted an elaborate dinner at her home in Calabasas for this romantic festival, inviting her children Kim, Carol and rob Kardashian, as well as family and friends Jada pinkert Smith and Beverly Hills star Kyle Richards's" real housewife. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Kanye West and Tristan Thompson, another important member of the Kardashian sisters, also joined the Kardashian sisters, and their mother's boyfriend, Corey Gambo, also attended
"How lovely mother is
The 37 year old KKW beauty tycoon shared a video on Wednesday night at Instagram. She said, "she took away the chocolate heart I sent with perfume, broke them, and made a table greeting card for our Valentine's dinner."
"My mom is really resourceful," the Cleveland Cavaliers power forward said in the story of his girlfriend instagram "Happy Valentine's day, from my lover to your lover."
"Zoom in on Chris Jenner's Valentine's Day dinner | photo source: Kim Kardashian / instagram lists Richards' husband Mauricio umansky, kajenner's old friend Faye Resnick and her husband Everett Jack Jr., as well as Thompson's three close friends."
"On the dining table decorated with red rose petals and boxes of chocolates, the band sang West's 2010 song" escape "in unison."



**Something goes wrong**
“Congratulations to the happy couple!”
“When Hoda asked the "10 Things I Hate About You" star how she knew Cook was the guy for her, the beaming actress replied, "He's just a really good man."”
“Just get it out of your head,'" she revealed with a laugh.”
“"We went on a big trip with his entire family over Christmas and New Year's, so I kept saying to myself out loud, like every day, 'Do not ruin a perfectly good vacation by getting your hopes up.”
“Last year, Stiles told TODAY's Hoda Kotb and Kathie Lee Gifford that she was surprised when Cook popped the question — though she admitted she very much wanted him to do so.”
“The newlyweds met while working on the 2015 movie "Go With Me."”
“In January 2016, she proudly showed off her engagement ring on Instagram, gushing, "Best Christmas ever!"”
“Mark Cuthbert / UK Press/Getty ImagesThe actress, who's been starring in the British "Riviera" limited series, got engaged to actor/cameraman Cook in late 2015.”
“Preston J. Cook and Julia Stiles, who are expecting their first child together, have tied the knot.”
“Stiles, 36, quipped in the caption, adding a winking emoji for good measure.”


"Congratulations to the happy couple
When he Tian asked the heroine of "ten things I hate you" how she knew cook was the right person for her, the jubilant actress replied, "he's such a good man."
"Don't think about it," she said with a smile
"During Christmas and new year, we had a big trip with his family, so I kept saying to myself, like every day," don't ruin a perfect holiday with hope. "
"Last year, Steeles told today's Hoda Kotb and Kathie Lee Gifford that when cook asked this question, she was surprised - even though she admitted that she very much wanted him to do so."
"The newlyweds met when they made the film" come with me "in 2015."
"In January 2016, she proudly displayed her engagement ring on instagram, saying," the best Christmas ever! "
"Mark kasbert / British media / Getty Images, the actress who has been starring in the limited series of the British Riviera, was engaged to actor / photographer cook at the end of 2015."
"Preston J. cook and Julia Stiles are having their first child together and they are married."
Stiles, 36, joked in the title, adding a blinking expression.



**Something goes wrong**
“You can read Hurwitz’s entire message below:”
“Hurwitz also noted that Season 5 will be coming soon.”
“But also, he said, as a comedic experiment to see if new jokes and a new perspective would emerge from a remix that features all the Bluths in every episode, and where the simultaneity of the story plays out chronologically.”The recut version will begin streaming May 4 on Netflix.”
“NetflixIn between Season 4 and the upcoming Season 5, Hurwitz said he recut the season, “shuffling the content from 15 individualized stories into 22 interwoven stories the length of the original series,” admittedly to see if he “could make some money” in eventual syndication.”
““The goal was that by the end of the season a unified story of cause and effect would emerge for the viewer — full of surprises about how the Bluths were responsible for most of the misery they had endured,” Hurwitz wrote.”
“The original Season 4 focused on one character per episode.”
“Creator Mitch Hurwitz revealed on social media that he’s recut the entire season and will be releasing it on Netflix as Arrested Development Season 4 Remix: Fateful Consequences.”
“The fourth season of Arrested Development will be released again — as a remix.”


"You can read all of Hurwitz's information below:
"Herwitz also pointed out that the fifth season is coming."
At the same time, he said, as a comedy experiment, he wanted to see if there would be new jokes and new perspectives in the mix with blues in each episode, and whether the simultaneity of the story would be played in chronological order. "The remake will start playing on Netflix on May 4."
"Netflixin is between the fourth season and the coming fifth season. Hurwitz said he recreated this season," shuffling the contents of 15 personal stories into 22 interwoven stories, the length of which is equivalent to the original series. "It's undeniable that he wants to see if he can" make some money "in the final combination
"Our goal is that by the end of the season, a unified story of causation will be presented to the audience - full of wonder how blue is responsible for most of the suffering they endure," Hurwitz wrote
"The original fourth season focused on one character per episode."
"Creator Mitch Hurwitz revealed on social media that he would repeat the whole season and release" residence development season 4 "on Netflix Remix:Fatiful Results ）
"The fourth season of" blocked development "will be released again - as a remix."



**Something goes wrong**
“Meanwhile, mum Kris Jenner insisted that she won’t be interfering in her daughter’s relationship either way, saying: "I think you just have to be there for your kid and follow their lead.”Good advice.”
“Tristan s actions and don t trust that he has the potential to ever change his ways...”
“Khloe can t wait for True to get to know her cousins and bring her to all of the big family gatherings and parties This comes as an insider recently revealed that the family are finding it difficult to forgive...”
“They made it a big celebration and welcome home for her."”
“News: “The whole family is thrilled that Khloe is home and that they will get to be close by and an everyday part of True's life.”
“Snapchat/KhloeKardashianThe Kardashian-Jenner gang as a whole are said to be happy about Khloe’s latest move, with an insider telling E!”
“...and Kylie we love you...”
“While Father s Day definitely had the potential to be difficult the 20 year old used the occasion to send a display of pink and white balloons to Khloe s house alongside the message Welcome home Khloe and True Stormi...”
“Let's get checking out a bunch of celebrities who admitted to cheating...”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star gave birth to daughter True back in April following reports that boyfriend Tristan Thompson cheated on her throughout her pregnancy.”


Meanwhile, mother Chris Jenner insisted that she would not interfere in her daughter's feelings in any way. "I think you just have to stay with the children and follow their instructions," she said
"Tristan's behavior and distrust, he may change his way forever..."
"Khloe can't wait to get to know her cousins and take her to all the big family parties and parties. Recently, an insider revealed that it is difficult for the family to forgive her.... "
"They had a big celebration to welcome her home."
News: "the whole family is very excited. Khloe is back. They will be close and become a part of true's life."
"Snapchat / Khloe Kardashian the Kardashian Jenner Gang is said to be happy with Khloe's latest move as a whole," an insider told him
“… Kelly, we love you... "
"Although father's Day is bound to be difficult, the 20-year-old took the opportunity to show Khloe's home pink and white balloons, along with messages welcoming Khloe and true stormi home..."
"Let's look at celebrities who admit to cheating..."
Her boyfriend Tristan Thompson was reported to have been unfaithful to her during her pregnancy, and kardashians starred in star chase gave birth to her daughter in April



**Something goes wrong**
“Matlin also took to Twitter to call Foxx out, writing that she'd happily give him sign language lessons so he "could be funnier."”
“DiMarco said that Foxx's actions "made our struggle that much harder."”
“"Sign Language is important to me because it's the bedrock of Deaf culture."”
“When we do this, progress takes a step backward," he said.”
“Jamie Foxx's Best Roles"We simply do not make fun at the expense of other cultures, especially those with a history of being marginalized.”
“In a statement Saturday he said that Foxx's behavior on the show "should not be tolerated."”
“DiMarco posted the video on his Twitter page Friday.”
“In a clip from Thursday's show, shared online over Memorial Day Weekend, he is seen making hand gestures as host Jimmy Fallon tosses to a commercial break.”
“Foxx's rep had no immediate comment.”
“Jamie Foxx is under fire from deaf stars and activists Nyle DiMarco and Marlee Matlin for allegedly mocking sign language during his recent appearance on "The Tonight Show."”


She also called fox on Twitter and said she would be happy to give him sign language lessons to make him "more interesting"
Dimako said Fox's action "made our struggle more difficult."
"Sign language is very important to me because it is the cornerstone of deaf culture."
"When we do that, progress goes back a step," he said
"Jamie Fox's best role" we don't make fun of other cultures, especially those with a history of marginalization
In a statement on Saturday, he said Fox's behavior on the show "should not be tolerated"
"Dimaco tweeted the video on Friday."
"In a clip shared online on Thursday's Memorial Day weekend, he was seen gesticulating as the host, Jimmy Fallon, entered the business break."
"Fox representatives did not immediately comment."
Jamie fox has recently been accused of laughing at sign language on the tonight show and has been attacked by deaf mute stars and activists Neil dimako and Mary Matlin



**Something goes wrong**
“[Featured Image by Kevin Winter/Getty Images]”
““It’s more than a summer fling,” someone reportedly knowledgeable of the situation told E!”
“According to the Daily Mail UK, the 45-year-old Justice League star and his 37-year-old Saturday Night Live!”
“...producer girlfriend strolled down the streets of New York for their Sunday date.”
“While people expected the new couple to look like they are on a big date at the Big Apple, the Hollywood superstar and his lady love appear to be downplaying their romance as Ben was spotted a couple of steps ahead of Lindsay.”
“Wearing his usual jeans-and-shirt ensemble, Ben Affleck took Lindsay Shokus, who was wearing a striped top and a thigh-skimming denim shorts, shopping earlier that day.”
“Speaking to E!”
“News, a witness confirmed that the 45-year-old Oscar winner paused his stroll with his girlfriend to sign autographs and have selfies taken with fans who happen to pass them by before they proceeded to Barney’s New York.”
“After that, they made their way back to Ben’s hotel.”
“Both of them were sporting what appears to be a matching pair of black leather bomber jacket in the morning and both ditched it for a more casual attire for their date night, E!”


"[close up by Kevin winter / Getty pictures]"
"It's not just a summer carnival," a person with knowledge of the situation, according to the report, told e! "
"According to the daily mail, the 45 year old Justice League star and his 37 year old son live on Saturday night!"
"The producer's girlfriend strolled the streets of New York, preparing for a date on Sunday."
"Although people expect the couple to look like they're dating at big apple, the Hollywood superstar and his lover seem to be playing down their relationship because Ben was discovered a few steps ahead of Lindsay."
Earlier in the day, Ben Affleck, wearing his usual jeans and shirt, took Lindsay shokus to shopping, wearing a striped top and a pair of open thigh jeans shorts
"Talk to me!"
In the news, an eyewitness confirmed that the 45 year old Oscar winner stopped walking with his girlfriend, signed his autograph and took a self portrait with a passing fan before leaving for Barney's New York
"After that, they went back to Ben's hotel."
"They both wore a matching Black Leather Baseball Jacket in the morning, and both gave up the jacket for a more casual date night, e!"



**Something goes wrong**
“There was no sign of Kylie Jenner at the lavish bash - who is also rumoured to be expecting her first baby.”
“She shared an article about pregnancy workouts and wrote: "For the ones who think they are physicians all of a sudden.”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star, who recently revealed she's six months gone, took part in a gruelling home workout alongside her sister Kourtney .”
“The siblings often work out together and post videos of the exercises they're doing on Snapchat so their fans can join in.”
“And Khloe is making sure she stays fit as she prepared to welcome her first child with boyfriend Tristan Thompson.”
“The 33-year-old shows off her growing baby bump as she works out in a pair of leggings and a black hoody.”
“(Image: Snapchat) (Image: Snapchat) (Image: Snapchat)Her blonde hair is tied up on top of her head as she concentrates on her steps.”
“Mum-of-three Kourtney, who was also dressed in black, showed up late to the workout but arrived in style as she was driven there in a red Jeep.”
“At the end of the workout, Khloe talked to her fans, saying: "Kourtney and I did a lot of other s**t that we didn't snap because it just wasn't cute.”
“"We did abs and what else?”


"There's no sign of Kelly Jenner at the big party - it's rumored that she will also have her first child."
She shared an article about pregnancy exercise and wrote: "people who suddenly think they're doctors."
"The Kardashian star recently revealed that she has been dead for six months. She and her sister Courtney took part in a hard family exercise together."
"Siblings often exercise together and post videos of what they're doing on snapchat so their fans can join in."
"Khloe makes sure she's healthy as she prepares to meet her first child with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson."
"Wearing a pair of tight pants and a Black Hoodie, the 33 year old shows off her growing lump while exercising."
"(image: snapchat) (image: snapchat) (image: snapchat) her blonde hair was pinned on her head as she focused on her feet."
"Courtney, the mother of three, was also dressed in black and was late for training, but she was fashionable when she drove there in a red jeep."
At the end of the training, Khloe told her fans, "Kourtney and I did a lot of other moves, but we didn't film it because it's not cute."
"We did the ABS. What else?"



**Something goes wrong**
“News.”
“"He is thrilled that the summer schedule for the kids is figured out and that he will be seeing them regularly," an insider tells E!”
“Just days into 2017, Jolie claimed in court documents that her ex was "terrified the public will learn the truth", a shot fired after the actor's lawyers requested to seal the records in their custody hearing.”
“Even after Pitt was was cleared by the FBI and the Department of Children and Family Services in November 2016, reaching a temporary agreement with Jolie that granted him "therapeutic visitation," it seemed their separation was destined to become one of the most contentious of all times.”
“That's a wish that at times seemed impossibly lofty.”
“News, "and he wants things to remain calm in the future."”
“"They had a pretty dramatic year," an insider tells E!”
“And while his custody situation with Jolie is still very much in flux with no official divorce in sight, he feels confident they'll reach a détente.”
“Some 22 months later he's a new man with a still red hot career.”
“Facing the biggest scandal in his storied three-decade career, the 54-year-old turned inward, relying on therapy, a newfound sobriety and plenty of solitude to "strip down to the foundation and break out the mortar," as he put it in a surprisingly candid interview with GQ Style.”


"News."
"The children's summer schedule has been set and he will visit them regularly, which makes him very excited," a person familiar with the matter told e! "
"Just a few days in 2017, Julie claimed in court documents that her ex boyfriend" was afraid that the public would know the truth, "a shot after the actor's lawyer asked for the record to be sealed at a custody hearing."
"Even after Pitt was approved by the Federal Bureau of investigation and the Department of children and family services in November 2016 to reach an interim agreement with Julie to give him" therapeutic visits, "their separation seems destined to be the most controversial one ever."
"It's a wish that sometimes seems unattainable."
"News", he hopes things will remain calm in the future
An insider told e
"Although the custody of him and Julie is still changing and there is no sign of a formal divorce, he believes they will reach a settlement."
"About 22 months later, he became a new man and his career is still booming."
In the face of the biggest scandal in his three-year career, the 54 year old turned inward, relying on treatment, a newly discovered sense of lucidity and plenty of loneliness, "take yourself to the foundation, take out the mortar," as he did in his frank interview with GQ style.



**Something goes wrong**
“EXCLUSIVE: Molly Ringwald on Playing Archie's Mom on 'Riverdale,' What Advice She Gives Her Young Co-Stars...”
“Riverdale's season finale airs next Thursday at 9 p.m. ET/PT on The CW.”
“RAS: Yes, Mr. Blossom was always it... We went into [the season] with three likely candidates: one was F.P.”
“The CWWhen it comes to who killed Jason, was it always your intention from the very beginning to have it be his own father?”
“...mystery and exciting stuff happening and then everyone got really on board but it sort of makes for a very breathless episode 12”
“When we brought it up to the studio and the network there were some raised eyebrows and I said This is Greg s idea and we really agree on this and then I threw out what was going to be in the finale so that they knew there was enough...”
“And the second he said that I was like, 'Oh my gosh, that's exactly right!'”
“You're going to be surprised by how much story you have to tell on the other side of it.'”
“And Greg said, 'I think you should reveal it in the penultimate, because when you invest in these characters the way you have this year, you're going to want to be able to see the aftermath.”
“RAS: I had a meeting with Greg Berlanti and Sarah Schechter, who are executive producers on the show... [we were] talking about the last few episodes and I said, 'Then we'll reveal the murderer in the finale.'”


"Exclusive: Molly lynwald plays Archie's mother in Riverdale. What advice does she give her young partner..."
"Riverdale's season finale will be on CW at 9pm next Thursday."
"Lars: Yes, Mr. bruson always does... When we entered [this season], there were three possible candidates: one was F.P“
"When it comes to who killed Jason, do you want him to be your father from the beginning?"
“… Mysterious and exciting things happen, and then everyone really gets involved, but it's a very suffocating Episode 12
"When we brought it to the studio and the television network, some people were dissatisfied with it. I said it was Greg's idea, we really agreed with it, and then I threw out the content of the ending, so that they knew it was enough..."
"The second time he said," oh my God, that's absolutely right! "
"You'll be surprised how many stories you have to tell."
"Greg said," I think you should disclose it on the penultimate page, because when you invest in these roles the way you did this year, you want to see the consequences. "
"Lars: I met with Greg brandy and Sarah shecht, executive producers of the show... (we) talking about the last few episodes, I said, "then we'll find out the killer in the end."



**Something goes wrong**
“So, hopefully we can work it out but if we can't, the love is still there so, you know, we'll hopefully be able to be friends."”
“My heart is still with him.”
“"For me to say I'm single means I want to go out and find something else, like I'm ready to mingle, and I'm not.”
“"But to say that I'm single—I can't say that I'm single because in my heart, I still love him," she said.”
“I think about him every day."”
“I miss him.”
“I really love him.”
“But I love him.”
“To be famous and in a relationship is even more difficult because you have, like, teams and people and everybody feeding ya'll both stuff and then you wind up arguing about things that you wouldn't usually argue about.”
“"To be in a relationship in general is very difficult.”


"So, I hope we can solve this problem, but if we can't, love still exists, so, you know, we want to be friends."
"My heart is still with him."
"For me, saying I'm single means I want to go out and find something else, like I'm ready to date, and I don't have one."
"But to say I'm single - I can't say I'm single because in my heart, I still love him," she said
"I think about him every day."
"I miss him."
"I really love him."
"But I love him."
"It's even harder to be famous in a relationship because you have a team, people, everyone is feeding you, and then you start arguing about things you don't normally argue about."
"Generally speaking, it's difficult to fall in love."



**Something goes wrong**
““[Parenthood] made me much calmer under stress, because there’s that weird parent thing you develop, that when things get really bad, your voice gets calm and your blood pressure slows, and you can make everything okay again,” Portman wrote at the time.”
“Though Portman and Millepied, who met on the set of the 2010 hit thriller Black Swan, are notoriously private about their family life, the actress opened up about how parenthood has changed her for The New York Times’ T Magazine.”
“Ellen bet $1,000 … You were confident, you were right to be confident, it’s a girl!” says Portman, who reveals that she made a $1,000 donation to the Ellen DeGeneres Wildlife Fund.”
““But I kept good on my bet.”
“The couple, who married in 2012, is also parents to son Aleph, now 6.”
“Image zoom Credit: Michael Rozman/Warner Bros.Natalie PortmanPEOPLE confirmed in early March that Portman and Millepied had welcomed their baby girl.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“I still made the bet because I thought it would show either way.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“And you really didn’t know,” she reminds Portman, who reveals: “I maybe did but I maybe didn’t want to tell everybody in the world.”
““You wouldn’t tell anybody what the sex was and I guessed.”


Portman wrote at the time: "being a parent makes me calmer under pressure, because you have a strange parental feeling that when things get really bad, your voice will become calmer, your blood pressure will drop, and you can make everything better."
Although Portman and millepid met on the set of the 2010 hit thriller black swan, it is well known that their family life is private, and the actress disclosed in t magazine of the New York Times how parenthood has changed her
"Alan bet 1000 dollars You are confident, you are right, you are a girl! Portman said she donated $1000 to the Ellen DeGeneres Wildlife Foundation
"But I bet well."
"The couple married in 2012 and are the parents of their six-year-old son Alef."
Photo zooming credit: Michael Rothman / Warner Natalie brothers Portman confirmed in early March that Portman and millepid had ushered in their baby girl
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"I'm still betting because I think both will happen." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"You really don't know," she reminded Portman, who revealed, "I may know, but I may not want to tell everyone in the world."
"You don't tell anyone what human nature is, I guess."



**Something goes wrong**
“Evans explained.”
“We are planning on taking the kids on vacation so that should be lots of fun!"”
“The MTV mom pulled out all the stops on her most recent visit with the 7-year-old, including a beach vacation with horseback riding.”
“Blessed this day finally got to happen.”
“Brought Jace to the place I've been wanting to for years.”
“I'm so grateful and blessed my son can travel now and share the same experiences... starting now.”
“...by easondavid88 A post shared by Jenelle Evans j_evans1219 on Jun 9 2017 at 7 31am PDT Evans and her son were apart for five weeks earlier this year but at the end of May she s been able to...”
“...travel with Jace now that summer has arrived...”
“UP NEXT Kailyn Lowry s Friend Becky Hayter Does Q A Reveals Secrets About Teen Mom 2 Star On Friday Evans uploaded a photo of the two on the beach on a horse writing Blessed this day finally got to...”
“...happen...”


"Evans explained
"We're planning to take the children on holiday. It's going to be fun!"
"The MTV mother recently went to see her with her 7-year-old child, and she did everything she could, including a ride by the sea."
"The lucky day has finally come true."
"Brought Jess where I've wanted to be for years."
"I am very grateful and blessed that my son can now travel and share the same experience... From now on. "
“… According to easondavid88, Jenelle Evans J य़ evans119 at 7:31 a.m. on June 9, 2017, Evans and her son separated for five weeks earlier this year, but at the end of May, she was able to... "
“… Summer is coming, travel with Jess... "
"Next, Kelly Lowry's friend Becky Hayter revealed the secret of the star of" teenage Mom 2 "on Friday's Q & a program. Evans uploaded a picture of them riding on the beach, which said" I wish the day had finally arrived... "
“… Happen... "



**Something goes wrong**
“The road to healing after such a traumatic event is long, but Kardashian and West are well on their way.”
“And there’s absolutely no doubt that her relationship with West and her children is strengthened because of that.”
“The violent attack, which happened on Oct. 3, 2016, took an emotional and psychological toll on Kardashian and her family.”
“Even her husband Kanye West is still grappling with the after-effects of the incident.”
“While he wasn’t with his wife at the moment the robbery happened, Kanye West’s reaction to Kim Kardashian’s Paris robbery is quite sad and really speaks to the depth of his love for her.”
“In an all-new interview with radio personality Charlamagne tha God, West spoke at length about a variety of topics, including his mental health, therapy, Twitter, and Kardashian’s robbery.”
“In the interview, West talked about feeling hopeless in light of his wife’s Paris misfortune:You're feeling, like, helpless, like what can you do?”
“… I went to Paris on that trip to protect her.”
“Not protect her physically, but to just go and help her with her looks because she's in Paris.”
“So I'm like, 'Let me put my eye on it personally.'”


"After such a traumatic event, the road to recovery is long, but Kardashian and West are on the road."
"There is no doubt that her relationship with West and her children has been strengthened as a result."
"The violent attack on October 3, 2016 caused emotional and psychological damage to Kardashian and her family."
"Even her husband Kanye West is struggling with the aftermath of the incident."
"Although he was not with his wife at the moment of the robbery, Kanye West's reaction to Kim Kardashian's robbery in Paris is quite sad, which really shows his deep love for his wife."
In a brand new interview, West talked about a variety of topics, including his mental health, treatment, twitter, and Kardashian's robbery
In the interview, West talked about feeling hopeless in his wife's Paris dream: what about you, you feel helpless, what can you do
"I went to Paris to protect her."
"Not to protect her body, but to help her dress up, because she's in Paris."
"So I thought," let me see for myself. "



Number  480
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See photos from the "Roseanne" revival:RELATED CONTENT:John Goodman Breaks Silence After Roseanne Barr Controversy (Exclusive)Roseanne Barr Says She ‘Begged Them Not to Cancel the Show’ in Since-Deleted Tweet'Roseanne' Stars John Goodman, Sara Gilbert and Laurie Metcalf Were to Make $300K Per Episode in Season 2”
“She also previously noted that she's considering "fighting back" against the decision, tweeting, "I will examine all of my options carefully and get back to you."”
“Following the recent fallout over a racist tweet she posted about former White House adviser Valerie Jarrett earlier this week, which led to the cancellation of her hit sitcom, Roseanne, the 65-year-old comedian was expected to share her side of the story on a podcast Friday.”
“Barr had committed to join comedian Joe Rogan, host of The Joe Rogan Experience, Friday afternoon, however, Rogan took to Twitter to reveal Barr would no longer be on his show.”
“"The Roseanne podcast is not happening today," he explained.”
“"She's not doing well and doesn't want to travel, and she's gone radio silent on me, so I'm just going to step away."”
“"The whole thing has been pretty brutal on her, and I hope she can find some peace," he added.”
“The Roseanne podcast is not happening today.”
“She’s not doing well and doesn’t want to travel, and she’s gone radio silent on me, so I’m just going to step away.”
“The whole thing has been pretty brutal on her, and I hope she can find some peace.”


John Goodman breaks his silence after the controversy over "rosani Barr" (exclusive) rosani Barr said she "begged them not to cancel" in, because "rosani" stars John Goodman, Sarah Gilbert and Laurie Metcalf will make $300000 per episode in the second season
"She also pointed out earlier that she was considering a 'counterattack' to this decision," she said on her micro blog. "I will carefully study all my options and then reply to you."
The 65 year old comedian is expected to share her views on Friday's podcast after she tweeted a racist comment about former White House adviser Valerie Jarrett earlier this week that led to the cancellation of her hit sitcom rosani
"Barr promised to join comedian Joe Logan on Friday afternoon, the host of the Joe Logan experience, but he tweeted that Barr would no longer be on his show."
"There is no podcast for rosani today," he explained
"She's not in good health, she doesn't want to travel, and the radio doesn't say a word to me, so I'm going away."
"The whole thing was pretty cruel for her and I hope she can find some peace," he added
"Roseanne podcast is off today."
"She's not in good health now, she doesn't want to travel, and she doesn't say a word to me on the radio, so I'm going away."
"The whole thing is pretty cruel to her, and I hope she can find some peace."



Number  481
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for the True Blood alum, he was previously linked to Alexa Chung in 2015.”
“In 2013, she married film director Michael Polish, who she met on the set of 2011’s Big Sur, in an intimate ceremony in Montana.”
“I feel incredibly lucky to have had that type of man on this movie.”The Before I Wake star has since moved on from the Swedish actor.”
““We shared a really special experience on that film.”The Win a Date With Ted Hamilton actress shared the same sentiment, telling the outlet, “He’s got this rare, wonderful control and stillness that you notice in a lot of old movie stars.”
““Kate is such a great actress and she’s so much more than a good-looking Hollywood starlet,” he told BlackBook at the time.”
“Still, a source told Us the breakup was “very mutual” and the actor even sang Bosworth’s praises in an interview while promoting the film.”
“The friendly reunion was a far cry from when the former Straw Dogs costars went to great lengths to avoid each other at the movie’s screening in September 2011, by scheduling their arrivals an hour apart following the announcement of their split in July of that year.”
“Bosworth, 35, and the Big Little Lies star, 41, were in good company, as Donatella Versace, Justin Theroux, Jared Leto, Black Panther’s Chadwick Boseman and other stars were also in attendance.”
“The former flames, who dated for two years before breaking up in 2011, attended Versace’s 2018 Met Gala Afterparty at the Mark Hotel following the event, which was held at the Metropolitan Museum of Art.”
“Exes Kate Bosworth and Alexander Skarsgard reunited at an afterparty for the 2018 Met Gala on Monday, May 7, where they not only exchanged pleasantries, but also posed for photos together!”


"As for true blood alum, he was previously associated with Alexa Chung in 2015."
"In 2013, she had a close wedding in Montana and married the film director Michael pollant, whom she met on the set of" Big Sur "in 2011."
"I feel very lucky to have such a man in this movie." The star of before I wake up is no longer a Swedish actor
"We shared a very special experience in that movie." The actress, who dated Ted Hamilton, shared the same feeling, telling the media, "he has a rare, wonderful sense of control and stillness that you can notice in many old movie stars."
He told Blackburn at the time: "Kate is a great actress, she is not just a beautiful Hollywood actress."
"Nevertheless, a source told us that their breakup was" very mutual. "The actor even sang Bosworth's praise in an interview while promoting the film."
"This friendly reunion was a far cry from the movie showing in September 2011, when the former" grass dog "Heroes spared no effort to avoid each other. After they announced their separation in July of the same year, they arrived an hour apart."
"Bosworth, 35, got along well with the big lie star, 41, and other stars such as Donatella Versace, Justin serrux, Jared Leto, and Chadwick Bosman of panther also attended."
"Former flame, who dated for two years before breaking up in 2011, took part in Versace's 2018 meeting after the event at Mark Hotel, which was held at the Metropolitan Museum of art."
"Ex boyfriends Kate Bosworth and Alexander Skarsgard reunited at a party of the 2018 blind date party on Monday, May 7. They not only exchanged greetings, but also took pictures together!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Whether or not the red carpet is full of white roses, all eyes will be on the men and women of the music industry to see what comes next.”
“...the music industry...”
“White has long been associated with the fight for women’s equality, going back to the days of the suffragettes.”
“Now attendees of the 2018 Grammy Awards are mobilizing to wear white roses to the ceremony as a way of recognizing the ongoing cultural reckoning with sexual harassment and abuse occurring across several industries, including entertainment.”
“Industry marketer Meg Harkins and promoter Karen Rait came up with the idea earlier this week according to Billboard at a dinner where they and other music industry insiders brainstormed ways to ensure that the MeToo and Time s Up movements were acknowledged at the Grammys just like they were...”
“...at the Golden Globes...”
“After they had chosen the white rose — which they settled on as a symbol of peace, hope, and resistance — they began to spread the word by way of a mass email from Atlantic Records chair Julie Greenwald.”
“Celebrities who’ve confirmed they’ll be wearing white roses to the Grammys include Halsey, Kelly Clarkson, Cyndi Lauper, and Rita Ora, among others on a list that reportedly numbers in the hundreds.”
“When informed of the movement during an interview with the Hollywood Reporter, Grammys host James Corden immediately voiced support and said he’d be wearing one as well.”
“Harkins and Rait told Billboard they were working to coordinate their messaging with the leaders of the Time’s Up campaign, which has been generally viewed as a leveling-up of the #MeToo movement to call for action and change in Hollywood.”


"Whether the red carpet is covered with white roses or not, all eyes will be on the men and women in the music world to see what happens next."
“… The music industry
"White people have long been associated with the struggle for women's equality, which can be traced back to the era of feminism."
"Now, the participants of the 2018 Grammy Awards ceremony are mobilizing to wear white roses to attend the awards ceremony in recognition of the cultural community's continuous reflection on sexual harassment and abuse in various industries, including the entertainment industry."
"Industry marketer MEG Harkins and promoter Karen rait came up with the idea at a dinner earlier this week, and they brainstormed with other people in the music industry to make sure that the metoo and time up movements were recognized at the Grammy Awards, just like them..."
“… At the Golden Globes
After they chose the white rose as a symbol of peace, hope and resistance, they began to spread the news through a mass email from Julie Greenwald, chairman of Atlantic Records
"The celebrities who have confirmed that they will wear white roses to the Grammy awards include Halsey, Kelly Clarkson, Cindy Lauper and Rita Ola, and hundreds of others are reported on the list."
"In an interview with the Hollywood Reporter, Grammy host James Corden immediately supported the news and said he would also wear one."
Harkins and rait told billboard that they are trying to coordinate their message delivery with the leaders of the progressive movement of the times, which is widely regarded as an upgrade of the "metoo movement" and aims to call on Hollywood to take action and change



Number  483
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I definitely think there’s gonna be a lot more Sunday dinners there.””
“RELATED:'My way of saying thank you': Ashton Kutcher surprises mom with a home makeoverhouzz“There’s just so much more air and light in that room, and I think that will translate into their whole life,” Kunis said.”
“The actress teamed up with the home company Houzz to makeover her parents' California condo.”
“Not only is the result stunning, but her parents' reaction has us reaching for the tissues.”
“It’s the home that’s been a steady constant in actress Mila Kunis’s life since she was 9, and because her parents Mark and Elvira never plan to move, she decided it was time to give the condo an upgrade.”
““The house kind of looks like "Miami Vice" circa 1994,” the "Bad Moms" star said in the latest episode of Houzz’s makeover video series, “My Houzz.”Besides the outdated interior, the layout needed some work too.”
“The kitchen is tucked away between two walls, which makes it feels more like a tiny closet than a family gathering area.”
““Whoever’s in the kitchen is isolated from everybody else,” Kunis explained.”
“Before HouzzShe enlisted the help of LA-based designer Breeze Giannasio to transform the space into a more open floor plan.”
“The two worked together to make the area more airy and comfortable for future family gatherings, which would come in handy since Kunis was nine months pregnant at the time.”


"I definitely think there will be more Sunday dinners there."
"Related report: 'the way I say thank you': Ashton Kutcher's surprise mom with a family transformation Houzz" there's so much air and light in that room that I think it's going to translate into their whole life, "Kunis said
"The actress worked with house house to transform her parents' apartment in California."
"Not only was the result amazing, but the reaction of her parents made us reach for the tissue."
"The house has been a regular in the life of actress Mira Kunis since she was nine years old, and since her parents mark and Elvira never planned to move, she decided it was time to upgrade the flat."
"The house looks a bit like the Miami Vice of 1994," the "bad mom" star said in the latest episode of hoz's transformation video "my hoz." in addition to the outdated interior, the layout also needs some improvement. "
"The kitchen is hidden between two walls, which makes it feel more like a small closet than a place for family gatherings."
"No matter who's in the kitchen, it's isolated from other people," Kunis explained
"Before hoz, she got help from Los Angeles designer brez giannacio to transform the space into a more open plan."
"The two worked together to make the area more airy and comfortable for family gatherings in the future, because Kunis was nine months pregnant, which would come in handy."



Number  484
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I apologize.”Shaw told Today that he later learned that the gunman had other magazines and could have reloaded if he hadn’t stopped him.”
“And we have the right to independent thought.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“...seemingly disinterested in Kanye West s praise of her...”
“Just days after the 40-year-old rapper tweeted of his support for President Donald Trump, West shared a photo of Gonzalez and referred to her as “my hero” on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a second post, West shared a selfie that showed he had buzzed his hair.”
“He captioned the tweet, “Inspired by Emma.”Gonzalez, who has openly rebuked Trump and called for stricter gun laws in the country since the Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School shooting on Feb. 14 that killed 17 people, did not return West’s compliment.”
“Copying the format of West’s tweet, she paid tribute to James Shaw Jr., who attacked a gunman who fatally opened fire at a Tennessee Waffle House restaurant on April 22 and likely saved lives by wrestling the assault-style rifle out of the assailant’s hands.”
““You don’t have to agree with trump [sic] but the mob can’t make me not love him.”
“We are both dragon energy.”


"I apologize." Xiao said today that he later learned that the shooter had other magazines and that he might reload if he didn't stop him
"We have the right to think independently." Want to keep up with the latest news from people? "
“… Seems to have no interest in Kanye West's praise for her... "
"Just a few days after the 40 year old rapper tweeted her support for president trump, West shared a picture of Gonzalez on Saturday and called her" my hero. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In the second post, West shared a self portrait showing his shaggy hair."
His twitter title is "inspired by Emma.". Gonzalez has publicly accused trump and called for stricter gun laws since the February 14 shooting of 17 people at Marjorie Stoneman Douglas high school, but he did not respond to West's praise
"Copying West's Twitter format, she pays tribute to James Shaw, Jr., who attacked a shooter who shot to death on April 22 at a waffle biscuit house restaurant in Tennessee and is likely to save people by taking an assault rifle from the attacker."
"You don't have to agree with trump (SIC), but the mob can't make me not love him."
"We are all dragon energy."



Number  485
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“❤️" he concluded.”
“The former New York Yankees baseball player couldn't help but pen the sweetest note to Lopez on her 49th birthday.”
“In an Instagram post shared on Tuesday, Rodriguez shared never-before-seen photos of his stunning girlfriend, wishing her a happy birthday and letting her know how much he loves her.”
“"When we were kids, birthdays were exciting because it was all about the gifts we would be getting.”
“A new bat, dance shoes, maybe a new CD (yes I’m old!”
“)," he wrote alongside the Instagram slideshow.”
“"I see firsthand how that’s changed for Jennifer, and how she’s found joy in sharing with others."”
“"For someone who has been about giving everything she has 365 days a year -- to our children, our families, the world -- I hope today, we can give you all the happiness you deserve.”
“I love you mucho Macha 13.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
“ ❤️ "He concluded
"The former New York Yankee baseball player couldn't help writing the sweetest letter to Lopez on her 49th birthday."
"In an instagram post shared on Tuesday, Rodriguez shared a picture of a beautiful girlfriend he had never seen before, wishing her a happy birthday and letting her know how much he loved her."
"When we were kids, birthdays were exciting because it was all about the gifts we were going to get."
"A new bat, dance shoes, maybe a new CD (yes, I'm old!"
He wrote next to the instagram slide
"I've seen with my own eyes how Jennifer has changed and how she finds pleasure in sharing with others."
"For a person who dedicates all his life to our children, family and the world 365 days a year, I hope today we can give you the happiness you deserve."
"I love you so much, 13 years old."



**Something goes wrong**
“DON’T DRINK AND DRIVE.”RELATED VIDEO: Toby Keith Celebrates the Red, White and Blue...”
“Hug your babies and spouses tight.”
““We all survived the wreck but it’s gonna take some time to heal,” she wrote, before asking followers to “Keep us in your prayers.”
“Alongside the message, Keith shared images of the wrecked Mercedes-Benz SUV.”
“A drunk driver almost took the lives of my entire family.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Hensley, Drew and I were on the way to watch fireworks on the 4th.”
““Our 4th turned pretty horrific,” wrote Keith.”
“...killed in a car accident caused by a drunk driver on Tuesday she revealed on social media this week...”
“A drunk driver almost took the lives of my entire family Krystal Keith wrote on social media Toby Keith s Daughter Krystal and Family in Horrific 4th of July Car Accident Caused by Drunk Driver Country singer Krystal Keith 31 year old daughter of music icon Toby Keith was nearly...”
“"Hensley, Drew and I were on the way to watch fireworks on the 4th.”


"Don't drink and drive." Related video: Toby Keith celebrates red, white and blue
"Embrace your child and spouse."
"We all survived the shipwreck, but it will take a while to recover," she wrote, and then asked followers to "pray for us."
"In the message at the same time, Keith also shared a picture of the crash Benz SUV."
"A drunk driver almost killed my family." Get news, feature, etc
"Hensley, drew and I are on the way to see the fireworks on the 4th."
Keith wrote: "our fourth child has become very terrible."
“…… She revealed on social media this week that she was killed in a drunk driving accident on Tuesday. "
"A drunk driver almost took my family's life," Christo Keith wrote on social media. Christo Keith's daughter, Christo, and her family had a terrible car accident caused by drunk driving on July 4. Country singer Christo Keith's 31 year old daughter, Toby Keith, were close to each other... "
"Hensley, drew and I are on the way to see the fireworks on the 4th."



Number  487
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Play Angels in America WINNER Edward Albee s Three Tall Women Eugene O Neill s The Iceman Cometh Lobby Hero Travesties Best Musical The Band s Visit WINNER Frozen Mean Girls SpongeBob SquarePants The Musical...”
““So, let’s just bake a cake for everyone who wants a cake to be baked.”Related: Tony Awards 2018: Photos from the red carpetBruce Springsteen won a special Tony Award for his sold-out Broadway show, “Springsteen on Broadway.” He also performed “My Hometown” later in the night.”
“...carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018”
“Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet...”
“Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos...”
“...from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Photos Tony Awards 2018 Photos from the red carpet Schuyler Helford and Josh Groban attend the 72nd Annual Tony Awards at Radio City Music Hall on Sunday June 10 in New York City...”
“Photos: Tony Awards 2018: Photos from the red carpet(CNN) —The Tony Awards celebrated the best of Broadway on Sunday night.”
“Josh Groban and Sara Bareilles, who co-hosted the awards show, kicked things off with a piano duet in which they poked fun at the fact that neither of them have won Tony or Grammy Awards.”
““Neither one of us has ever won anything.”
“So this is for the people who lose,” the hosts sang.”


"Playing three tall women of angel award winner Edward Albee in the United States, Eugene O'Neill's" Iceman is coming "Hall hero Tevez's best musical band interview award winner frozen mean girl SpongeBob Square Pants musical..."
"Well, let's bake a cake for everyone who wants to bake it." Related reports: Tony Awards 2018: photos on the red carpet Bruce Springsteen won the Tony special award for his sold out Broadway performance "Springsteen on Broadway.". He also performed "my hometown" later
“… Carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018
"Red carpet photo of Tony Award Ceremony 2018 red carpet photo of Tony Award Ceremony 2018 red carpet photo of Tony Award Ceremony 2018 red carpet photo of Tony Award Ceremony 2018 red carpet photo of Tony Award Ceremony 2018 red carpet photo of Tony Award Ceremony 2018 red carpet photo of Tony Award Ceremony 2018 red carpet photo of Tony Award Ceremony..."
"Photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 red carpet photo Tony Award 2018 photo..."
“… Photo from red carpet Tony Awards 2018 photo from red carpet photo Tony Awards 2018 photo from red carpet Schuyler Helford and Josh Groban attending the 72nd annual Tony Awards ceremony on Sunday, June 10 at the broadcasting City Concert Hall in New York City... "
"Photo: Tony Awards 2018: photos on the red carpet (CNN) - the Tony Awards celebrate Broadway best picture on Sunday night."
Josh Groban and Sarah barreles co hosted the ceremony, which started with a piano duet in which they laughed at the fact that neither of them won the Tony or Grammy Awards
"None of us has won."
"So it's for those who lose," the host sang



**Something goes wrong**
“Police are said to have received “multiple tips” that Peep was in possession of “incredibly toxic drugs laced with the potent opioid.” The Tucson Police Department have not yet confirmed the reports.”
“And I can truly say that I don’t think anybody who knew him doubted that.”Image zoom Lil Peep | Credit: Scott Dudelson/GettyIt was recently reported that police are investigating whether the powerful opioid drug fentanyl may have played a role in Peep’s death.”
“Lil Peep (whose real name was Gustav Åhr) died on Nov. 15 from a suspected drug overdose, although a definitive cause of death will not be determined until full toxicology results are published.”
“He was 21.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The service which took place in the rapper s hometown of Long Beach New York was announced on the late rapper s official Instagram account and promised to be a celebration of his fascinating colorful life Peep s grandmother Jenny Kastner began the memorial which you can watch in the...”
“...video above by commenting on the number of fan letters she d read since his passing and how touched she was by how many of the rapper s fans seemed to really get him I don t know of any famous person that s let the outside regular people like...”
“...me that aren t famous into their lives wrote one fan...”
““He was completely unique, a gift from God that was handed to us for a short period of time to change the world for the better.”While another fan wrote that: “He wasn’t the modern-day Kurt Cobain, by the way.”
“He is the first and only Lil Peep, and arguably left behind a legacy that will have a far greater impact.”


It is said that the police received "multiple clues" that PIP possessed "highly toxic drugs containing potent opioids". Tucson police have yet to confirm the reports
"I can really say that I don't think anyone who knows him doubts that." Information picture: Scott Dudelson / gettyit recently reported that the police are investigating whether the powerful opioid fentanyl is related to the death of PEEP
"Lil peep (real name Gustav Å HR) died on November 15 on suspicion of drug overdose, but the exact cause of death cannot be determined until all toxicological results are published."
"He was 21."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The ceremony in the rapper's hometown of Long Beach, New York, was announced on the late rapper's official instagram account and promised to celebrate his wonderful and colorful life. Peep's grandmother, Jenny Kastner, has begun. You can "To watch the commemorative activities in Beijing."
“… How many fan letters did she read through the comments on the video? How moved she was because of his death. How many rapper fans seem to really get him. I don't know any famous people who let ordinary people outside like him... "
“… I'm not famous in their lives. I wrote about a fan... "
"He's totally unique. He's a gift from God to make the world a better place in a short period of time." Another fan wrote: "by the way, he's not the modern Kurt Coban."
"He is the first and only little pip, and it can be said that his legacy will have a greater impact."



**Something goes wrong**
“His head didn't explode.”
“And he didn't die.”
“But then he turned around and surprised us.”
“He messed up.”
“Mr. Harvey did the thing that we all fear when we contemplate speaking in public.”
“So, when Steve Harvey botched the announcement of the winner of Miss Universe 2015, he realized one of our worst fears: he looked really bad in front of the contestants, his bosses and millions of people all around the world.”
“Many people would rather do just about anything than speak in public.”
“Many people avoid speaking in public altogether for the express purpose of not allowing themselves to be put in a position that might result in their experiencing shame.”
“The anguish of being humiliated in front of our peers -- or, worse, those who we're hoping to impress -- can be excruciating.”
“Public shame is the worst of all.”


"His head didn't explode."
"He's not dead."
"But then he turned around and scared us."
"He messed up."
"Mr. Harvey did something we were all afraid of when we thought about speaking in public."
"So when Steve Harvey messed up when he announced the winner of Miss Universe 2015, he realized one of our biggest concerns: he looked terrible in front of the contestants, his boss and millions of people around the world."
"Many people would rather do anything than speak in public."
"Many people avoid speaking in public simply because they don't put themselves in a situation where they may feel ashamed."
"In front of our peers - or worse, in front of those we want to impress them - the pain of being humiliated can be unbearable."
"Public humiliation is the worst."



Number  490
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The British royal family is set for a big year, with Prince William's brother Prince Harry set to marry American actress Meghan Markle on May 19 at Windsor Castle, outside London.”
“He is Queen Elizabeth II's sixth great-grandchild.”
“Prince Louis is fifth in line to the British throne, after grandfather Prince Charles, father William, Prince George and sister Princess Charlotte.”
“The trio posed for photographers before going back inside.”
“...pic.twitter.com/4DUwsLv5JQ — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) April 27, 2018The duchess gave birth Monday morning, and emerged from St. Mary's Hospital in London about seven hours later alongside her husband, holding the baby wrapped in a white blanket.”
“The baby will be known as His Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge are delighted to announce that they have named their son Louis Arthur Charles.”
“The announcement was made in a tweet from Kensington Palace, the Cambridges' official residence -- not long after one of Britain's major betting firms stopped taking bets on what the name would be, and amid rampant speculation that the royal couple had chosen "Albert."”
“His full formal title is His Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge.”
“Prince William and Kate, or the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge, as they are formally known, announced Friday that they had named their third child Louis Arthur Charles.”


"The British royal family will usher in a new year. Prince William's brother, Prince Harry, will marry American actress Megan markel at Windsor Castle outside London on May 19."
"He is the sixth great grandson of Queen Elizabeth II."
Prince Louis is the fifth in line heir to the British throne, second only to his grandfather Prince Charles, Prince William, Prince George and his sister Princess Charlotte
"The three posed for the photographer before they went back."
“... pic.twitter.com/4DUwsLv5JQ -Kensington Palace (@ Kensington Royal) on Monday morning, April 27, 2018, the Duchess gave birth to a baby. About seven hours later, she and her husband came out of St. Mary's Hospital in London with a baby wrapped in a white blanket
"The child will be called his Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge."
"The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge are pleased to announce that they have named their son Louis Arthur Charles."
The news was tweeted by Kensington Palace, Cambridge's official residence, shortly after a large British gambling company stopped betting on the name of "Albert", when it was speculated that the royal couple chose "Albert"
"His official title is his Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge."
Prince William and Kate, or the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge, officially, announced on Friday that they had named their third child Louis Arthur Charles



Number  491
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
““He had been neglected and it was such a great feeling to bring him into my home, and to see him get happier and happier, and to feel safer and safer, and see his personality come out more.”This content is imported from Instagram.”
“The pair has denied it—insisting they’re just “very good friends.” But when it came to the very important decision of adopting a dog, Efron turned to none other than his friend Daddario.”
“"He was in the market for [a dog], and it’s a big life decision," Daddario tells ELLE.com.”
“"He just wanted to make it as easy as possible."”
“Daddario and Efron found Maca, an adorable brown and black pit bull, at the LA-based rescue shelter called Bark n’ Bitches.”
“The dog, who was named Tilly before Efron adopted her, was about to be euthanized before the shelter took her in.”
“W Blanco/Backgrid"Maca was being led to the kill room when we stepped in and said we would take her.”
“She was turned around and brought to us!," Bark n' Bitches wrote on Instagram in April.”
“"This guy named Zac Efron came in (we hear he is an actor, but we think he actually waits tables) came in and fell in love."”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"He's been ignored. It's great to bring him to my house, to see him happier and safer, to see his personality more and more revealed." This content is imported from instagram
The couple denied that, insisting they were just "very good friends.". But when it comes to the very important decision to adopt a dog, evron turns to his friend dardardario
"He came for [a dog] and it's a big life decision," dardardario told reporters ELLE.com Website. "
"He just wanted to make it as simple as possible."
Dardario and evron found a lovely brown and black bullfight Maca at a rescue station called "barking dog" in Los Angeles
"The dog's name was Tilly before Efron adopted her, and it was about to be euthanized before she was taken in the shelter."
"W Blanco / backgrid" when we came in, Maka was being taken to the homicide room and said we were going to take her
"She was turned and brought to us! "In April, barkers wrote on instagram."
"This guy Zac Efron came in (we heard he was an actor, but we thought he was actually waiting for the table) and fell in love."



Number  492
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And matching...Read full article...”
“With matching boots.”
“While the "Love on the Brain" singer typically prefers the look in denim, she chose an aubergine Alexander Vauthier patent coat featuring a latex-like sheen.”
“Living up to the award show's risk-taking nature, Riri wasn't wearing the typical sequined gown or a politically charged ensemble, but she did appear in her signature look: an oversize coat buttoned just enough to slightly drape over the shoulders and expose a deep neckline.”
“Rihanna may not have walked the 2018 Grammys red carpet—to much disappointment—but fans stood by her as she collected her ninth Grammy for her featured credit on Kendrick Lamar's "Loyalty."”
“Loyalty.”
“...over the shoulders and expose a deep neckline...”
“Living up to the award show s risk taking nature Riri wasn t wearing the typical sequined gown or a politically charged ensemble but she did appear in her signature look an oversize coat buttoned just enough to slightly drape...”


"And match Read the full text... "
"With boots."
Although the "love of the brain" singer usually prefers the cowboy look, she chose a purple Alexander vauthier patent coat with a latex like luster
"In order to live up to the adventurous nature of the awards ceremony, Riri didn't wear a typical sequined robe or political suit, but she did show up in her own trademark style: a large coat button can just drop slightly on the shoulder, revealing the deep neckline."
Rihanna's performance on the 2018 Grammy red carpet may not be too disappointing, but fans support her because she won the ninth Grammy Award for Kendrick Lamar's "loyalty"
"Loyalty."
“… On the shoulders, showing the deep neckline... "
"In order to live up to the adventurous nature of the award ceremony, Riri didn't wear a typical sequined robe or a political suit, but she did appear in her own signboard shape, with a large Coat Button just hanging down a little..."



**Something goes wrong**
“According to scholars such as Naomi Wolf, the normal healthy body weight is much higher than what fashion models would have you believe.”
“AdvertisementAs you may know, Nina’s message for the world comes at a time when women everywhere are attempting to take pride in their bodies in spite of the “unnatural” body images perpetrated by the advertising industry.”
“However, she has grown from those experiences and is now making choices that are closer to who she is as a person.”
“The former girlfriend of Leonardo DiCaprio said when she first started in the industry as a 16-year-old girl; she had unhealthy and insufficient eating habits.”
“Agdal said she embraces her body and is proud to have it despite what some people in the industry may want from her.”
“Nina added that she is a model with an athletic build and “healthy curves” so the idea that she couldn’t fit their profile was outrageous.”
“...market According to the model she couldn t fit into the sample size clothing which was patently false...”
“You can read her statement in her own words in the post below In the message the model revealed a time when her agent received an email which stated they couldn t run the photo because it didn t reflect well on her talent and she didn t fit their...”
“The Danish model, 25, who has appeared in countless magazine campaigns such as Maxim and Sports Illustrated Swimsuit, made her comments today on Instagram.”
“Nina Agdal wrote a message on her social media account today detailing her body-shaming experiences after a magazine allegedly refused to run a cover photo of her because she couldn’t fit into the sample size clothing.”


"According to scholars like Naomi Wolf, a normal healthy weight is much higher than a fashion model makes you believe."
Advertising as you know, Nina's message to the world comes at a time when, despite the "unnatural" body image created by the advertising industry, women all over the world try to be proud of their bodies
"However, she grew up from these experiences and now makes choices closer to her identity as a person."
"Leonardo DiCaprio's ex girlfriend, when she first entered the industry at the age of 16, said she had unhealthy and inadequate eating habits."
"She hugs her body and is proud to have it, although some in the industry may want something from her," Agdal said
Nina added that she was a model with a sporty figure and a "healthy curve," so it was outrageous to think she couldn't fit their image
“… According to the market model, she can't fit the sample size clothes, which is obviously fake... "
"You can read her statement in her own words in the following post. The model revealed once that her agent received an email saying that they could not operate the photo because it did not reflect her talent very well and she did not meet their requirements..."
"The 25-year-old Danish model commented on instagram today and has appeared in numerous magazine events such as Maxim and Sports Illustrated Swimsuit."
"Nina Agdal wrote a message on her social media account today detailing her physical humiliation after a magazine said it refused to publish her cover photo because she couldn't wear sample size clothes."



Number  494
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Is that my bachelor?” She can be heard saying in the video, which is captioned “@JerryFerrara is such a good sport.” Her husband appropriately replies, “Will you accept this flower crown?””
“One adorable video shared by Racano clearly reminded the actress of a favorite TV show.”
“FROM PEN: How Tom Ford Found ‘Love at First Sight’—and Makes His 30-Year Relationship LastWhen they’re not sharing beachfront selfies, the newlyweds have been sipping on tropical cocktails, kayaking and floating on blow-up rafts in the turquoise sea.”
“!,” he captions the snap.”
““Who says I suck at taking photos?!?”
“Ferrara, 37, and Racano’s resort features over-water bungalows, stunning beaches and, as the actor shows in the sunset shot above, private infinity pools.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The pair, who married in June, jetted off to the tiny South Pacific island of Bora Bora and have been soaking up the sun and stunning scenery while flaunting their “out of office” status on Instagram.”
“Jerry Ferrara, known to many as Turtle from HBO’s Entourage, looks every bit the leading man on his honeymoon with new wife Breanne Racano.”
“Entourage's Jerry Ferrara and Breanne Racano Reenact The Bachelor on 'Greatest Honeymoon Ever' in Bora BoraSidekick no more!”


Is that my bachelor? "The @ Jerry Ferrara is a great sport," she said in the video Her husband replied appropriately, "will you accept this corolla?"
"A lovely video shared by lakano clearly reminds her of one of her favorite TV shows."
"From pen: How did Tom Ford find love at first sight - and how to maintain his 30-year relationship? While they were not shooting themselves on the beach, the newlyweds had been drinking tropical cocktails, rowing and floating on inflatable rafts in the sea of turquoise."
"!" he added a title to the snapshot. "
"Who says I suck at taking pictures?"
"The 37 year old resort of Ferrara and lacano has water bungalows, amazing beaches, as the actor shows in the sunset above, and a private infinity pool."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They got married in June this year and flew to borabora Bora, a small island in the South Pacific. When they showed off their" not in the office "status on instagram, they were bathed in sunshine and amazing scenery all the time."
"Jerry Ferrara, known as turtle among HBO's entourage, seems to be the main character on his honeymoon with his new wife, brenne racano."
"Accompanying Jerry Ferrara and Brian lacano play bachelor again on Bora Bora's greatest honeymoon in history. Bora Bora's partner is no longer there!"



Number  495
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Russell recently wrapped the final season of “The Americans.” She is repped by WME and manager Joannie Burstein.”
“It’s unknown at this time whether Russell will be on the side of the rebels or the evil empire.”
“Abrams filled the role last fall and has spent most of that time working on the script with Chris Terrio.”
“Abrams helmed “Star Wars: The Force Awakens,” and was asked to come back to direct this latest installment after Colin Trevorrow exited following creative differences.”
“Daisy Ridley, John Boyega, Oscar Isaac, and Adam Driver are all expected to return.”
“Abrams will likely cast two more actors by the time the film begins production at the end of the month.”
“...of July holiday...”
“Russell has shown her ability to perform tough stunts in projects like FX s The Americans Mission Impossible and Dawn of the Planet of the Apes Abrams and Lucasfilm execs met with several actresses for the role in the past two months and settled on Russell right before the Fourth...”
“Russell and Abrams last collaborated on 2006’s “Mission: Impossible III.”The role calls for action-heavy fight scenes.”
“Sources tell Variety that the “Felicity” alum is in early talks to join J.J. Abrams’ “Star Wars: Episode IX,” which Abrams is writing and directing.”


Russell recently completed the last season of American. She is the spokesperson for WME and manager Joanne Bernstein
"It is not known whether Russell is on the side of the rebels or the evil empire."
"Abrams played the role last fall and spent most of his time writing scripts with Chris trio."
Abrams directed Star Wars: the awakening of the force, and he was asked to return to direct the latest series after Colin trevoro quit because of creative differences
"Daisy Ridley, John boyga, Oscar Isaac and Adam deliff are all expected to come back."
"By the end of this month, when the film starts, Abrams is likely to send two more actors."
“… July vacation... "
"Russell has shown strong special effects ability in FX s" the impossible journey of Americans "and" dawn of the planet of apes ". In the past two months, the film executives of Abrams and Lucas met with several actresses and found Russell the fourth month ago..."
Russell and Abrams last worked together in 2006's mission: impossible three. The character requires a fierce fighting scene
Sources told variety magazine that felicity's alumnus was preparing to join J.J. Abrams in Star Wars: Episode 9, which he was writing and directing



Number  496
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I no longer go to the store,” France said.”
“And nowhere more often than in his adopted hometown — which is “shockingly, even more hectic” than New York or Los Angeles.”
“So it truly is my favorite place on Earth.”Unexpected stardom • The producers of “Queer Eye” reached out to France because of his work in the fashion industry.”
““And, most importantly, I found the most incredible friend group.”
““There are so many things that kept me here,” he said.”
“France operated clothing businesses here — he created Kingdom & State and co-created Rachel Parcell Inc. — and made a home with his husband, who’s an illustrator.”
“So I planned on Utah being my home.”Which it has been for nearly a decade.”
““We started to date and then, yeah, I realized he was the one very shortly after that.”
“A couple of years later, he met his husband, Rob France.”
“And I can see the mountains from this restaurant, and that’s beautiful.’ ”France continued to visit Utah every three or four months.”


"I don't go to the shops anymore," France said
"There's no place more frequent than his adopted hometown - it's" shocking, even busier "than New York or Los Angeles
"So it's really my favorite place on earth." Unexpected star status. The producer of strange eye came into contact with France because of his work in fashion
"And, most importantly, I found the most incredible group of friends."
"There are so many things for me to stay here," he said
"France runs the clothing business here - he founded Kingdom & state, co founded Rachel parcel - and settled down with his illustrator husband."
"So I plan to make Utah my home." It's been nearly a decade
"We started dating, and then, yes, soon I realized that he was the one."
"A few years later, he met his husband, rob France."
"I can see the mountains from this restaurant. It's beautiful." "France continues to visit Utah every three or four months."



Number  497
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Avicii’s Family Releases Statement Following DJ’s Death at 28Avicii Remembered With Touching Tribute From DJ Kygo at CoachellaCalvin Harris, Zedd and More React to Avicii's Tragic Death...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“His family released a statement on Thursday.”
“The musician was found dead in Muscat, Oman, on April 20, where he was vacationing.”
“He was 28 years old.”
“His body was flown to back Sweden last week.”
“"Our beloved Tim was a seeker, a fragile artistic soul searching for answers to existential questions," the statement obtained by ET reads.”
“"An over-achieving perfectionist who traveled and worked hard at a pace that led to extreme stress.”
“When he stopped touring, he wanted to find a balance in life to be happy and be able to do what he loved most – music.”
“He really struggled with thoughts about Meaning, Life, Happiness.”


"Embedded code restart" content: avicii's family issued a statement after the death of DJ avicii on 28th, and expressed moving mourning for the death of DJ kygo in coachelacalvin Harris. Zedd and more responded to avicii's unfortunate death... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"His family made a statement on Thursday."
On April 20, the musician was found dead while on holiday in Muscat, Oman
"He was 28."
"His body was airlifted back to Sweden last week."
"Tim, whom we love deeply, is an explorer, a fragile artistic soul, searching for answers to existing problems," the statement obtained by ET wrote
"A man who pursues perfection excessively, travels and works hard at a speed that leads to extreme stress."
"When he stops touring, he wants to find a balance in his life, make himself happy and be able to do his favorite thing - music."
"He's really struggling with thinking about meaning, life and happiness."



**Something goes wrong**
“Seems like a good way around this would be to see women rappers as actual artists with agency?”
“...your male bosses want to have sex with you and then that s bad for your career...”
“His excuse?”
“It would just be too easy to have sex with them.”
“He said:You know, I never did it because I always thought, like, I would end up fucking a female rapper and fucking the business up... I’m so focused on my business.”
“I just, I gotta be honest with you.”
“You know, she looking good.”
“I’m spending so much money on her photo shoots.”
“I gotta fuck a couple times.”
“Advertisement It is unfortunately not surprising that a label exec like Ross would expect sex from the artists he signs or in this case doesn t sign especially now when the longstanding misogyny of powerful men in music is becoming more transparent in cases like Dr Luke R Kelly or...”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
““I remain committed to doing everything I can to make our music community a better, safer and more representative place for everyone.””
““Stepping up, and also stepping aside women OWNED music this year.”
“After a slew of male winners and performers at the Sunday, January 28, show, at NYC’s Madison Square Garden.”
“Portnow stated that women need to “step up” in order to be recognized.”
“After his statement, many female artists, including Katy Perry, Sheryl Crow and Pink, voiced their disappointment.”
“Kelly Clarkson, who was nominated for Best Pop Solo Performance, took to Twitter on Wednesday, January 31, to respond.”
““A confused soul said women need to ‘step up’ their A-game if they wanna start winning and you know what, I’m not even mad at ignorance,” the “Love So Soft” singer tweeted.”
““I’m just gonna kindly point you in the direction of my A-game album I recently dropped.”Clarkson then added that she “Jenna Dewan’d that s—t,” referencing Dewan-Tatum’s hit film, Step Up.”
“Clarkson’s statement echoed that of Pink, who performed at the show.”
““Women in music don’t need to ‘step up’ — women have been stepping since the beginning of time,” the singer, 38, tweeted on Monday, January 29.”


"I'm still committed to doing my best to make our music community a better, safer and more representative place."
"I've improved, and this year I've given up the music that women own."
Male winners and performers stand out during a performance at Madison Square Garden in New York on Sunday, January 28
Portno said women need to "improve" to be recognized
"After his speech, many female artists, including Katie Perry, Cheryl krohenk, expressed their disappointment."
"Kelly Clarkson was nominated for best pop solo performance and responded on twitter on Wednesday, January 31."
"A confused soul says that women need to 'strengthen' their A-game, and if they want to start winning, you know, I'm not even angry with ignorance," the "love so soft" singer tweeted
Clarkson went on to add that she was "Jenna Dewan's s S-T," quoting Dewan Tatum's hit movie "step by step."
"Clarkson's statement is the same as that of Pinker in the performance."
"Women in music don't need to come forward - women have been coming forward from the beginning," the 38 year old singer tweeted on Monday



**Something goes wrong**
“Here’s the best we saw this week.”
“Dior kicked off Paris Fashion Week with a runway show and performance at the Hippodrome Longchamp Paris, while Nicolas Ghesquière’s Louis Vuitton will close out the Spring 2019 collections.”
“Meanwhile, quite a few labels have hopped the pond to show in Paris this season—including Gucci (for a one-time-only affair), London’s Marques’ Almeida, Altuzarra and Thom Browne, who both bucked the trend of American designers coming back to New York Fashion Week.”
“Celine that is, without the accent.”
“Now it’s time for Paris, where everyone is patiently awaiting the debut of Hedi Slimane at Celine.”
“Fashion editors, stylists, influencers, and of course celebrities have already traveled from the rainy streets of New York, to London for Riccardo Tisci’s Burberry debut, to Milan, where Prada was a standout.”
“FashionThe last leg of fashion month is officially here!”


"This is the best we've seen this week."
"Dior kicked off Paris fashion week with a runway show and a performance at Paris's long Champ hippo, while Nicolas ghesqui è re's Louis Vuitton will end the spring 2019 collection."
"At the same time, there are a number of brands eager to make their debut in Paris this season, including Gucci (only once), Almeida, altuzarra and Thom Browne, all of which are against the trend of American designers returning to New York Fashion week."
"It's Celine, no accent."
"It's time for Paris and everyone is waiting patiently for HEDY srimane's debut in Celine."
"Fashion editors, stylists, influencers and, of course, celebrities have gone from the rainy streets of New York to London for the Burberry Premiere of Riccardo tisci, and then to Milan, where Prada is the best."
The last stop of fashion month is coming



**Something goes wrong**
“...students and three teachers were killed in a mass shooting in February spawning the NeverAgain movement and March s massive March For Our Lives...”
“The poignancy of the moment was heightened by 2018 BBMA host Kelly Clarkson s show opening tearful plea for action in the wake of Friday s May 18 shooting massacre at Santa Fe High School in Texas and by the presence of the students from the Florida school where 14”
“...and violence...”
“The song from Mendes upcoming self titled album features the heartbreaking refrain You can t take my youth away This soul of mine will never break As long as I wake up today You can t take my youth away a plea to stand strong in the face of hopelessness...”
“Fla...”
“Taking the stage for the second time on Sunday night May 20 at the Billboard Music Awards Shawn Mendes paid emotional tribute to the victims of gun violence with a moving performance of his track Youth featuring Khalid and the show choir from Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School in Parkland...”
“The two artists were joined by the Marjory Stoneman Douglas Choir.”


“…… Students and three teachers were killed in a mass shooting in February, triggering the neveragain movement and a mass March for our lives... "
"The bitterness of the moment was exacerbated by the tearful call for action at the opening of bbma host Kelly Clarkson's 2018 show after the shooting on Friday, May 18, at Santa Fe high school in Texas, and the presence of 14-year-old Florida school students."
“… And violence... "
"This song from Mendes' upcoming self styled album features the heartbreaking chorus" you can't take away my youth ". My soul will never be broken. As long as I wake up today, you can't take away my youth and plead to face the despair firmly..."
"Florida..."
"On Sunday night, May 20, Sean Mendes made his second appearance on the Billboard Music Awards stage, using his song" track youth "and" show "performed at Marjory Stoneman Douglas high school in parkland The moving performance of the gun violence shows the emotional respect to the victims of gun violence... "
"Marjorie Stoneman Douglas joined the two artists."



**Something goes wrong**
“Until his on-screen return, he will continue to serve as director and producer, and next summer, the Ocean’s Eleven spinoff he produced, Ocean’s Eight, will hit theaters.”
“He is not currently attached to star in any upcoming movies, meaning his break from acting will likely wind up lasting at least two years.”
“The last film that George Clooney acted in was Money Monster, released in May 2016 to mixed reviews from critics.”
“But Suburbicon will be the first movie that Clooney directs that he does not also act in.”
“Clooney has previously directed The Monuments Men, The Ides of March, Leatherheads, Good Night, and Good Luck, and Confessions of a Dangerous Mind.”
“Clooney has a writing credit on the film, as do Joel and Ethan Coen.”
“Starring Matt Damon, the film takes place in a peaceful suburban town in the 1950s that has a dark, violent underbelly.”
““And if you’re not going to get those, there’s no real point at this point in my career.”Instead, Clooney has been focusing on directing lately, and he has a new movie coming out this October called Suburbicon.”
““..'[I]t’s not all that often you get Michael Clayton kind of scripts,” Clooney said.”
“But it’s just that he hasn’t read anything recently that is so good it makes him want to get back on screen again.”


"Before returning to the screen, he will continue to be a director and producer, and his ocean 11 and ocean 8 will be released next summer."
"He's not in any of the upcoming films at the moment, which means he'll probably be out of the show business for at least two years."
"The last movie George Clooney starred in was money monster, which was released in May 2016, with mixed reviews."
"But suburban will be the first film directed by Clooney not to appear."
Clooney has previously directed monuments, men, ides of March, Leatherhead, good night, good luck and confession of a dangerous soul
"Clooney has written on this film, as have Joel and Ethan Cohen."
The film, starring Matt Damon, takes place in a quiet suburban town in the 1950s with a dark and violent belly
"If you don't want that, my career has no real meaning at this point." Instead, Clooney has recently focused on directing, with a new film coming out in October, called suburbicon
"You don't see Michael Clayton's plays very often," Clooney said
"But it's just that he hasn't read anything good lately, which makes him want to be on the screen again."



**Something goes wrong**
“There’s loads of patchwork to go round.”
“Even so, you do not have to rework your loved ones heirloom.”
“Would not your grandma be proud to see you strolling down the road just like the It Woman you have been born to be in her creation?”
“They’re so shiny and epic that we would not blame you for taking your loved ones-made quilt to the tailors.”
“The colourful bottoms from Dior are the star of her ensemble, forcing the opposite parts into supporting roles.”
“The supermodel was noticed in Los Angeles sporting a primary white T-shirt, Dior waist belt, black kitten heels, caramel-tinted sun shades and a budding development: patchwork pants.”


"It's a mess everywhere."
"Even so, you don't have to redo your family heirloom."
"Isn't your grandmother proud to see you walking along the road, just like the IT woman you were born into in her creation?"
"They are so shining and epic that we don't blame you for bringing your beloved quilts to the tailor."
"Dior's colorful bottoms are the stars of her company, forcing her opponents to play supporting roles."
The supermodel was noticed in Los Angeles wearing a white T-shirt, Dior belt, black kitten heels, caramel blinds, and a burgeoning development: patchwork pants



**Something goes wrong**
“What’s the underlying dynamic at play between these two?”
“Q: In Episode 2, Kitty denies Plum the chance to attend the plus-size fashion show.”
“I read the book right after I read the first five scripts.”
“A: The first time I heard about it was from Marti herself.”
“[Laughs]Q: Had you read the book before signing on for the project?”
“It’s very uncomfortable, let me tell you.”
“You’ll see over the course of the ten episodes that when she forgets herself and gets emotionally involved, it goes away.”
“She has to be picture perfect as if she were in a photoshoot.”
“She’s always posing.”
“Her world is so completely superficial.”


"What is the potential driving force between the two?"
Q: in the second episode, Katie refused to let Meizi take part in the big size fashion show
"I just finished reading the first five plays before I finished reading this book."
"A: I first heard that Marty said it herself."
[laughter] Q: did you read this book before signing the project
"I tell you, it's uncomfortable."
"In the course of these ten episodes, you'll see that when she forgets herself and throws herself into emotion, it disappears."
"She has to be as perfect as a picture."
"She's always posing."
"Her world is too shallow."



**Something goes wrong**
“Kelly Ripa tells accused Ryan Seacrest on their TV show: "I adore you" https://t.co/bkvAcytH3D pic.twitter.com/xtMhQOpBUD — The Daily Beast (@thedailybeast) March 1, 2018”
“Hardy said on Tuesday that the idea Seacrest was absolved of wrongdoing was a “false narrative.“Watch the clip below.”
“...has stood by the results of its investigation, and Seacrest has continued to deny the claims.”
“Still Stands by Ryan Seacrest, Investigation Included Man Who Says He Witnessed MisconductE!”
“Also Read: E!”
“News’ investigation into the harassment accusations found “insufficient evidence,” Seacrest was back in the news this week when Suzie Hardy revealed previously unknown details of the allaged harassment on Monday.”
““You are happiness wrapped in chocolate, so there.”After E!”
““You are happiness,” Ripa echoed.”
“Sexual Misconduct Investigation“You are happiness,” Seacrest said back to her.”
“We all do.”Also Read: Ryan Seacrest's 'American Idol' Gig Still On, ABC Satisfied With E!”


"I love you," Kelly Ripa told defendant Ryan Seacrest on TV https://t.co/bkvAcytH3Dpic.twitter.com/xtMhQOpBUD- Daily Beast March 1, 2018
Hardy said on Tuesday that the idea that Seacrest was exempt from wrongdoing was a "wrong statement"
“…… Insisting on the findings, Seacrest continues to deny these claims. "
"Still on Ryan Seacrest's side, including a man who claimed to have witnessed the wrong behavior!"
"And it says: e!"
News's investigation of harassment charges found "insufficient evidence," and Seacrest returned to the news this week when Suzy hardy revealed previously unknown details of mitigating harassment on Monday
"Your happiness is wrapped in chocolate, so it's there." After e! "
"You are happy," agreed Ripa
"Sexual misconduct survey." you're happy, "Seacrest told her
"We all have." It also said: "Ryan Seacrest's" American Idol "concert is still going on, ABC is very satisfied with E!"



Number  506
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Citing production issues, Lovato postponed the South American portion of her tour in April.”
“Lovato’s most recent North American tour leg, which ran from February to April, grossed more than $20 million, according to tracking by Pollstar.”
“When contacted by CNN on Wednesday, a source close to Lovato denied reports she had been treated for an overdose of heroin.”
“She is stable, conscious and breathing, the official said.”
“A senior law enforcement official told CNN that Lovato is at Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles.”
“...and transported a 25 year old woman to a hospital...”
“Some of the information being reported is incorrect and they respectfully ask for privacy and not speculation as her health and recovery is the most important thing right now The Los Angeles Fire Department confirmed to CNN it received a call at 11 22 a m for a medical emergency...”
““Demi is awake and with her family, who want to express thanks to everyone for the love, prayers and support,” said the statement from Lovato’s representative.”
“A source close to Lovato’s family previously told CNN the singer’s hospitalization was the result of an apparent drug overdose.”
“(Photo by Neilson Barnard/Getty Images)(CNN) —Singer Demi Lovato is awake and with her family after being hospitalized earlier Tuesday, according to a statement from the singer’s representative.”


Lovato postponed her tour in South America in April on the grounds of production problems
According to pollstar's tracking report, Lovato's latest North American tour lasted from February to April, with a total revenue of more than $20 million
When contacted by CNN on Wednesday, a person familiar with the situation in Lovato denied reports that she had been treated for an overdose of heroin
"She is stable, conscious and breathing," the official said
"A senior law enforcement official told CNN that Lovato is at cedars Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles."
“… Take a 25-year-old woman to the hospital... "
"Some of the information reported is incorrect. They respectfully ask for privacy, not speculation, because her health and recovery are the most important things at present. The Los Angeles Fire Department confirmed to CNN that it received an emergency medical call at 11:22 a.m..."
"Demi wakes up with her family and they want to thank everyone for their love, prayer and support," Lovato's representative said in a statement
"A source close to Lovato's family told CNN earlier that the singer was hospitalized because of an apparent overdose."
(CNN Nielsen Barnard / Getty Images) singer Demi Lovato woke up early Tuesday after she was hospitalized with her family



Number  507
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Spencer and Heidi began their romance in 2007 after being introduced on The Hills and eloped in Mexico on November 20 2008.”
“Blonde beauty: Heidi, 31, showed off her enviable physique in tight off-white jeans and a pink T-shirtOh baby!”
“And Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt looked like they couldn't be any happier as they doted on their little boy earlier this month in a series of sweet family snaps taken in Aspen, Colorado.”
“The Hills stars sipped champagne and lavished Gunner with kisses during the photo shoot.”
“One happy family Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt looked like they couldn t be any happier as they doted on their little boy earlier this month in a series of sweet family snaps taken in Aspen Colorado Heidi 31 showed off her enviable physique in tight off white jeans and...”
“...a pink T shirt...”
“The blonde beauty opted to go barefoot for the shoot, which took place in the gorgeous gardens of The Little Nell ski resort.”
“At one point she and her reality TV star husband shared a kiss over glasses of champagne.”
“Spencer, 34, meanwhile was decked out in distressed jeans and a baby blue T-shirtSpencer, 34, meanwhile was decked out in distressed jeans and a baby blue T-shirt.”
“What happened to them?'”


"Spencer and Heidi started their relationship after being introduced to the mountains in 2007 and eloped in Mexico on November 20, 2008."
Blonde: 31 year old Heidi shows off her enviable physique in tight white jeans and pink t-shirto baby
"Heidi Montague and Spencer Pratt look happy as they dote on their little boy in a series of warm family photos taken in Aspen, Colorado, earlier this month."
"During the filming, the stars of hills sipped champagne and kissed the shooters."
"Earlier this month, Heidi Montague and Spencer Platt took a series of sweet family photos in Aspen, Colorado. Heidi showed her enviable physique in tight white jeans on the 31st. They dote on their little boy, which makes a happy family look very happy..."
“… A pink t-shirt... "
"Blondes choose barefoot to shoot in the gorgeous garden of little Nell ski resort."
"Once, she and her reality TV star husband were kissing on a champagne glass."
Spencer, 34, was wearing ripped jeans and a light blue T-shirt. Burns, 34, was wearing ripped jeans and a light blue T-shirt
"What happened to them?"



Number  508
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Bella Posted The Weeknd's Lyrics on InstagramIt looks like Bella just can't get The Weekend out of her mind and it's even more obvious after she posted a new photo of herself from her trip to Italy with some of his lyrics.”
“Bella was in the crowd supporting her beau and even sang along to some of his biggest hits.”
“Bella and The Weeknd were also spotted together in Chicago for Lollapalooza, where The Weeknd was headlining.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Bella and The Weeknd were spotted together at the party and there are plenty of cute pics of the two of them together to prove it.”
“They Hit Up Kylie's 21st Birthday TogetherAin't no party like a Kardashian party and Bella took the perfect date for Kylie's big bash.”
“2.”


"This content was imported from instagram."
"Bella released this week's lyrics on instagram it. It seems that Bella just can't forget this weekend. More obviously, she released a new photo of her trip to Italy and some of his lyrics."
"Bella supported her boyfriend in the crowd and even sang some of the hottest songs with him."
"Bella and the weekend were filmed together in Chicago as Lola paloza, and the weekend made headlines there."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Bella and Zhou de were found together at the party, and there are many lovely pictures of them together to prove that."
"They celebrated Kelly's 21st birthday together. There was no party like Kardashian's. Bella arranged the perfect date for Kelly's big party."
“2.”



Number  509
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:Arie Luyendyk Jr. Isn’t ‘The Bachelor’—He’s Your Ex-Boyfriend...”
“Whatever she's referring to is probably exactly why Luyendyk called himself a monster in this promo.”
“We all know the race car hobbyist royally screwed up last week when he professed his love to both Becca K and Lauren B that s a big no no in Bachelor land as Ben Higgins infamously taught us a...”
“...few seasons ago...”
“So perhaps Luyendyk feels like a monster for leading these two women—who are both too good for him, by the way—on for so long.”
“"I fell in love with two different women," Luyendyk says in the promo, suppressing his need to make that weird "mmm" noise with his lips.”
“That quasi-confirms what his "monster" comment is about, but I think it's much deeper than him just shrugging between Becca K. and Lauren B.”
“Remember in the Bachelor: Women Tell All special, when ex-contestant Caroline Lunny, holding back tears, told Luyendyk, "I know what you did, and I don't know how you could do that?"”
“That was some "Lauren Conrad screaming at Heidi Montag in the club"–level drama.”
“And it's also probably why ABC keeps hyping up the finale as something we've "never seen before."”


"Related story: Ali luyandick Jr. is not a bachelor - he's your ex boyfriend..."
"Whatever she's referring to, that's probably why luyandick calls himself a monster in this promo."
"We all know that this racing enthusiast completely screwed up last week. He expressed his love to Becca K and Lauren B, which is a big taboo in the land of bachelors, as Ben Higgins notoriously taught us..."
"A few seasons ago..."
"So maybe luyandick thinks he's a monster because he's led these two women who are too good for him, by the way, for such a long time."
"I fell in love with two different women," luyendyk said in the promo, suppressing his need to make a strange "um" sound with his lips
"This confirms his" monster "statement, but I think it's more profound than his shrug between Bekaa K. and Lauren B."
"Remember in Bachelor: women tell everything special, former contestant Caroline Lenny held back her tears and said to Luyan Dick," I know what you've done, I don't know how you can do it? "
"That's the level of drama that Lauren Conrad screams at Heidi Montague at the club."
"It may also be the reason why ABC keeps hyping the outcome, because it's something we" never saw before. "



Number  510
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Khloe and Kim were glimpsed Saturday at Haneda International Airport in Tokyo.”
“'CHICAGO IN JAPAN,' Kim captioned her vacation snapshot.”
“But as she showed her Instagram following on Saturday, Jenna, 43, caught sight of Kim and Kourtney Kardashian strolling through a hotel lobby.”
“'We found the Kardashians.”
“At our hotel.”
“I think they were checking out as we were checking in.”
“So crazy.”
“#kyoto,' read Jenna's breathless caption.”
“'So crazy': The Office actress Jenna Fischer caught sight of Kim and Kourtney Kardashian strolling through a hotel lobby in Kyoto, as she shared to Instagram on FridayKim emphasized her ample derriere in a tight pair of navy sweats, matching her bottoms to a bulky hooded jacket.”
“The 37-year-old reality star's hair had been partially died pink, and the whole do had been swept back into a high bun.”


"Khloe and Kim were spotted at Tokyo's Haneda International Airport on Saturday."
"Chicago is in Japan," Kim said in a snapshot of her holiday title
"But last Saturday, Jenna, 43, was showing instagram when she saw Kim and Courtney Kardashian walking in the lobby of a hotel."
"We found Kardashian's house."
"In our hotel."
"I think we were checking out when they checked out."
"It's crazy."
"Kyoto," Jenna said, holding her breath
"It's crazy": Office actress Jenna Fischer shared the scene with instagram on Friday when she saw Kim and Kourtney Kardashian strolling in the lobby of a hotel in Kyoto. Kim stressed that she was wearing a tight Navy T-shirt, a loose hooded jacket and her bottom
"The 37 year old reality TV star's hair was partially dyed pink, and the whole hair was rolled into a high bun."



Number  511
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““When we found each other, we knew it had to be forever."”
“"Eric and I have both been married before, so we took our time finding the right person,” she explained, referring to her ex-husband, Nick Lachey.”
“"I just think there is a level of love that has reached the highest of high."”
“"I just think we're a little bit more addicted to each other," Simpson said of married life.”
“Johnson...”
“In July 2014 the two tied the knot in an intimate wedding at San Ysidro Ranch in Montecito Calif During an interview with Matt Lauer in September 2014 the businesswoman gushed that she s more in love than ever with...”
“You forever make me lust.”The parents to daughter Maxwell Drew, 3, and son Ace, 2, first stepped out together in May 2010 and got engaged that November.”
“Happy Birthday Eric Maxwell Johnson!”
“In honor of the former football player's 36th birthday, the 35, posted a black and white snap of her man looking sexy in a white linen button-down with the caption: “My husband is hotter than yours!”
“Jessica Simpson bragged about her husband, Eric Johnson, while wishing him a happy birthday on Instagram on Tuesday, Sept. 15.”


"When we find each other, we know it must be forever."
"Eric and I have been married before, so we spend time looking for the right person," she explained, referring to her ex husband Nick Lachy
"I just feel that there is a kind of love that has reached the highest level."
"I just think we're a little addicted to each other," Simpson said of marriage
"Johnson..."
"In July 2014, the two married at an intimate wedding at San Isidro ranch in Montecito, California. In September 2014, in an interview with Matt Raul, the businesswoman kept on saying that she loves "more than ever."
"You'll always make me hot." The parents of 3-year-old daughter Maxwell drew and 2-year-old son ace first cohabited in May 2010 and got engaged in November
"Happy Birthday to Eric Maxwell Johnson!"
To commemorate the former footballer's 36th birthday, the 35 year old posted a black-and-white photo of a man wearing white linen buttons and looking sexy, which read: "my husband is sexier than yours!"
On Tuesday, September 15, Jessica Simpson bragged for her husband Eric Johnson on instagram and wished him a happy birthday



Number  512
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“His humor was often self-deprecating, but never so much as in 1992, when he invited comedian Dana Carvey to the White House — to reprise in person his gently mocking Bush impersonation.”
“Get it?” she wrote.”
“Bush was actually funny—and sometimes gleefully imprudent.”
“On summer breaks from the White House, Bush loved speeding full-throttle in his twin-engine, V-8 cigarette boat, to the white-knuckled terror of guests at his family compound in Kennebunkport, Maine.”
“And though he first bailed out of a cockpit at age 18, as a World War II Navy pilot in the Pacific, old age wouldn’t keep him from jumping out of still more airplanes.”
“Who can forget the image of a gleeful Bush, celebrating his 90th birthday four years ago with a tandem skydive — despite being wheelchair-bound and suffering from Parkinson’s?”
“His endearing quirks were many.”
“He was fond of colorful socks, the louder the better.”
“In a photo he tweeted in June, he posed alongside Bill Clinton flashing his blue socks bearing his White House successor’s image.”
““Luckily I had a fresh laundered pair of @BillClinton socks to mark the occasion,” Bush tweeted.”


His humor is often self mocking, but it has never been like in 1992, when he invited comedian Dana Carvey to the White House to personally repeat his mild mockery of bush
"Do you understand? "She wrote
"Bush is actually interesting and sometimes reckless."
"During the summer vacation in the White House, Bush likes to drive his twin engine V-8 cigarette boat at full speed and make guests feel idiotic fear in his compound in Kennebunkport, Maine."
"Although he first jumped out of the cockpit when he was 18, when he was a naval pilot in the Pacific during World War II, old age did not prevent him from jumping out of more planes."
"Who can forget the image of a jubilant Bush who celebrated his 90th birthday four years ago with a double parachute jump - despite being confined in a wheelchair and suffering from Parkinson's disease?"
"He has a lot of cute quirks."
"He likes colorful socks. The louder the voice, the better."
"In a photo he tweeted in June, he was photographed with Bill Clinton, wearing blue socks with the image of his successor in the White House."
"Fortunately, I have a pair of freshly washed @ Bill Clinton socks to commemorate this moment," Bush tweeted



Number  513
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ABC's Nick Watt contributed to this report...”
““I think that at the end of the day as humans we just need to be more sympathetic to each other,” she said.”
“ -- Fifth Harmony’s Normani Kordei made a profound statement on “Dancing With the Stars” last week when she danced to the song "Freedom" by Anthony Hamilton and Elayna Boynton – receiving a perfect score – and opened up about being cyber-bullied.”
“The 20 year old pop singer revealed on DWTS that she was bullied terribly on social media after she did a 2016 Facebook Live interview with the website Galore in which she paused before saying her fellow bandmate Camila Cabello is very quirky Some took that to be an insult...”
“...and Kordei received a wave of online backlash...”
““I did an interview, it was taken out of context,” Kordei told ABC News’ “Nightline” during a sit down interview at at The Grove in Los Angeles.”
““There were images, people were calling me, like the ‘n’ word… I was getting racial slander.”
“Images of me being whipped, hung, beaten and it really affected me.”Watch the full story on "Nightline" tonight at 12:35 a.m.”
“ETKordei said she was accused of being disrespectful, and when she apologized for the inadvertent offense, the online hatred only worsened.”
““That’s the thing about social media, there’s no repercussions,” she said.”


"Nick watt of ABC contributed to this report..."
"I think, as humans, at the end of the day, we just need to be more sympathetic to each other," she said
"-- normani kordei of fifth harmony made a profound speech on dancing with the stars last week, and she was in good company with Anthony Hamilton and elayna Boynton's song "freedom" danced together, got the perfect score, and confessed that he was bullied by the Internet. "
"The 20-year-old pop singer revealed on DWTS that she was horribly bullied on social media after a live Facebook interview with galore in 2016. During the interview, she pauses and says that her band mate Camila Cabello is very eccentric and some people think it's an insult... "
“…… And Cody got a wave of rebound on the Internet... "
"I did an interview, which was taken out of context," coldy told ABC News's "night line" to sit down in grove, Los Angeles
"There are pictures, people call me, like 'n'" I've been racially defamed. "
"The pictures of me being whipped, hanged and beaten really affected me." Watch the whole story on "night line" at 12:35 tonight
"Et kordei said she was accused of disrespect and when she apologized for unintentional offense, online hatred only worsened."
"That's what social media is like," she said. "There's no response."



Number  514
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“To celebrate Reynold's 41st birthday, the mother-of-two took to Instagram to send her well wishes to her husband of five years.”
“'Happy Birthday, baby,' Lively wrote alongside a pic of Ryan Gosling and a cropped out Reynolds at the Critics' Choice Awards in 2016.”
“The post comes two months after Reynolds cropped Lively out of a picture of the couple at the 2014 Met Gala.”
“'Happy Birthday to my amazing wife,' he captioned the snap.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“It appears the Deadpool actor couldn't get enough of his wife's joke, and commented on the picture: 'Awesome.'”
“Earlier in the day, Reynolds revealed to his Twitter followers how he kicked off his birthday celebrations with his family.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"To celebrate Raymond's 41st birthday, the mother of two uses instagram to send her best wishes to her husband, who has been in love for five years."
"Happy birthday, baby," leffley wrote at the 2016 critic's Choice Awards, along with a group photo of Ryan Gosling and Reynolds
"Two months ago, Reynolds cut a lively picture from a picture of the couple at the 2014 blind date party."
"Happy Birthday to my wonderful wife," he wrote under the title of the snapshot
"This content was imported from instagram."
"It seems that the actor on death row has heard enough of his wife's jokes and said to this picture: 'great.'"
"Earlier in the day, Reynolds revealed to his twitter fans how he started celebrating his birthday with his family."



Number  515
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the Brit Awards PA 2020 Harry Styles seen leaving The Box club SplashNews com 2020 Harry Styles Performs On NBC s Today at Rockefeller Plaza Getty Images She was allegedly given tickets to the following night s show to make up for missing part of the concert...”
“...chatting with Kendall Jenner and Tracee Ellis Ross on The Late Late Show With James Corden The Late Late Show Harry Styles on cover of Rolling Stone Magazine Rolling Stone Magazine 2020 Harry Styles speaks with fans as he leaves the BBC Radio studios PA 2020 Harry Styles arriving at...”
“2010 in London Getty Images 2011 Harry Styles Zayn Malik Niall Horan Louis Tomlinson and Liam Payne of One Direction attend the GQ Men Of The Year Awards at The Royal Opera House on September 6 2011 in London Getty Images 2012 Harry Styles celebrates after winning best British Single...”
“Horan sighted getting some snacks before returning to an X Factor recording studio on October 4 2010 in London Getty Images 2010 Harry Styles attends the Royal Film Performance and World Premiere of The Chronicles Of Narnia The Voyage Of The Dawn Treader at Odeon Leicester Square on November 30”
“...session at the HMV store Bradford PA 2010 Niall Horan Harry Styles Liam Payne Zain Malik and Louis Tomlinson of One Direction attends the Very co uk Christmas Catwalk Show at Victoria House on November 24 2010 in London Getty Images 2010 Harry Styles Zayn Malik Cher Lloyd and Niall...”
“14 2013 in London Getty Images Harry s hair Styles Harry Styles of One Direction performs on stage at CenturyLink Field on July 15 2015 in Seattle Getty Images Young direction Rex Features 2010 Niall Horan Louis Tomlinson Harry Styles Liam Payne and Zayn Malik arrive for an autograph signing...”
“...the One Direction band performs at the Olympic stadium during the closing ceremony of the 2012 London Olympic Games in London on August 12 2012 AFP Getty Images Front row Harry Styles Nick Grimshaw and Kelly Osbourne attend the House Of Holland show during London Fashion Week SS14 on September...”
“...s Today at Rockefeller Plaza AFP via Getty Images The early days Liam Payne Louis Tomlinson Harry Styles Zane Malik and Niall Horan of One Direction attend a photocall during the X Factor press conference at the Connaught Hotel on December 9 2010 Getty Images Olympic moment Harry Styles of...”
“I feel like f s but I m so grateful to Harry for having such a pure heart and stopping the show to get security to help me One Direction s Harry Styles In pictures 1 55 One Direction s Harry Styles In pictures 2020 Harry Styles performs on NBC”
““Harry is so f****** pure I can’t believe it.”


“… British awards ceremony PA 2020 Harry Stiles was seen leaving the boxing club splashnews com 2020 Harry stiles performed at NBCS in Rockefeller square today. It is said that she won tickets for the next night's performance to make up for the missing part of the concert.... "
“… Chat with Kendall Jenner and Tracee Ellis Ross on the evening show with James Corden. Harry styles on the cover of Rolling Stone magazine rolling stone 2020 talks with fans on the arrival of Harry styles leaving BBC studio PA 2020... "
"Getty pictures 2011 in London Harry style zain Malik Neil Holland, Louis Tomlinson and Liam Payne took part in the best British single after Getty pictures 2012 Harry style celebrations at the Royal Opera House GQ man of the year award on September 6, 2011..."
"On October 4, 2010, in London, Holland had a snack before returning to an X factor studio. On November 30, 2010, Getty Images reported that Harry stiles attended the Royal film show and the world premiere of "the voyage of the dawn Treader" in Oden Leicester Square
“… Meeting at HMV store Bradford PA 2010 Neil Holland Harry style Liam Penn zainmalik and Louis Tomlinson take part in a very common British Christmas fashion show at Victoria tower November 24, 2010 Getty pictures in London 2010 Harry style zainmalik shawled and Neil
"14 2013 Getty pictures in London Harry's hairstyle Harry's one direction style show at centurylink field July 15, 2015 in Seattle Getty pictures young direction Rex Features 2010 NiAl Holland Louis Tomlinson Harry style Liam Payne and Zane Malik arrive signature..."
“…… One way band performs in the Olympic Stadium at the closing ceremony of the 2012 London Olympic Games in London on August 12, 2012. AFP Getty Images on September 14, during London Fashion Week, Harry styles, Nick Grimshaw and Kelly Osbourne in the front row attended the house of Holland fashion show.... "
“… Today in Rockefeller square, AFP passes Getty pictures of the early days of Liam Penn, Louis Tomlinson, Harry style, Zane Malik and Neil Holland, one of the directions to attend the X-factor press conference at the Connaught Hotel on December 9, 2010, Getty pictures of the Olympic moment, Harry style... "
"I think I'm f s, but I'm very grateful to Harry for having such a pure heart. For the sake of safety, I stopped the program and helped me in one direction s Harry stiles in picture 155 and in one direction s Harry stiles in picture 2020. Harry stiles performs in NBC."
"Harry is so pure, I can't believe it."



Number  516
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This finale points to the possibility that The Mindy Project could pull it off.”
“The challenge for season three will be to keep the momentum going into Danny and Mindy’s actual relationship, without contrived breakups or third-party romantic obstacles.”
“Heading into the finale, I fully expected Mindy and Danny to end up together (the episode title is a dead giveaway), but wondered how Kaling would make it memorable, meaningful, and most of all, funny.”
“...again...”
“She s writing within the mold while redefining it The saga of Mindy and Danny has contained some of the show s finest work as a hot in air kiss led to a short yet delightful relationship a too quick and devastating breakup and a hesitant walk toward each other...”
“Her real-life counterpart has studied these rom-com tropes as well, so nods to the Nora Ephron canon (like “You’ve Got Sext”) abound in her scripts.”
“From the show’s first episodes, it established that Dr. Mindy Lahiri only wants to be Meg Ryan in a movie with Tom Hanks, as idealistic and unrealistic as that sounds.”
“I would probably watch it for the one-liners and absurdist asides (like the stalker raccoon) alone, but I also appreciate Mindy Kaling’s overall mission: To draft her own brand of romantic comedy.”
“Todd VanDerWerff points out that although the show seems to be in a constant state of transition, at least its trajectory is skewing upward, with a big leap forward between this season and last.”
“But when it realigns, The Mindy Project becomes one of the most enjoyable comedies on TV.”


"This outcome points out the possibility of the success of Mindy project."
"The challenge in the third season will be to maintain the momentum of the actual relationship between Denny and Mindy, rather than artificial breakups or third-party romantic obstacles."
"Going into the final episode, I'm totally looking forward to Mindy and Denny finally getting together (the title of this episode is a dead giveaway), but I want to know how Carlin will make it memorable, meaningful and, most importantly, fun."
“… Again... "
"She wrote in the mold and redefined the legend of Mindy and Denny, which contains some of the best works of the play. A kiss leads to a short and happy relationship, a quick and devastating breakup, and a hesitant walk to each other..."
Her real-life rivals have also studied these ROM metaphors, so Nora Ephron's Classics (such as you've got sex) are everywhere in her plays
"From the first episode of the play, it was confirmed that Dr. Mindy rahiri only wanted to play Meg Ryan in the movie with Tom Hanks, which sounds both ideal and unrealistic."
"I may only watch the lone Rangers and ridiculous narratives (like the raccoon stalker), but I also appreciate Mindy Carlin's overall mission: to draft her own brand of romantic comedy."
"Todd van der Waugh pointed out that although the play seems to be in a state of constant transition, at least its development trajectory is upward sloping, and there has been a great leap from this season to last season."
"But when it readjusted, project Mindy became one of the most enjoyable comedies on TV."



Number  517
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But there will be no sleeping yet!”
““I looooooove you, Bethenny,” slurs Sonja, obviously ready for a 365-day nap.”
“Then Into the pool she goes, unshaved parts (according to Ramona) and all!”
“As Luann attempts to keep more tequila from entering Sonja’s bloodstream, Sonja strips down next.”
“And neither will Carole Radziwill, even though she boasts having the best rack in the group!”
“Tinsley Mortimer croaks that she won’t be bearing her real and “not good” boobs for anyone.”
“She also wants to see some t*tties, so Bethenny strips down to her Skinnygirl bones and gives the entire group a good flash as she jumps into the pool.”
“She wants her some Countess, and she wants it now!”
“Since tequila-Sonja can’t concentrate on any topic for more than three consecutive seconds, she leaves Ramona alone, moving on to seducing Luann.”
“Ramona screams that she’s happy, but admits she misses having a man.”


"But I can't sleep yet!"
"I love you so much, besseini," Sonia said contemptuously, apparently ready for a 365 day nap
"And then she went to the swimming pool, the scratched part (according to Ramona) and so on!"
"When Luan tried to stop more tequila from entering Sonya's blood, Sonya took it off next."
"Neither will Carol laziwell, even though she boasts she has the best shelf in the group!"
Tinsley Mortimer complained that she would not tolerate her real and "bad" breasts for anyone
"She also wanted to see some small animals, so Bethany took off her bony bones and gave the whole team a good flash when she jumped into the pool."
"She wants the countess, now!"
"Because Sonja couldn't focus on any topic for more than three seconds, she left Ramona alone and turned to seduce Luan."
"Ramona screamed that she was happy, but she admitted that she missed a man."



Number  518
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Was apparently some kind of clerical error, but the timing couldn't have been worse... https://t.co/ryft1CsVMN — Bad Lip Reading (@BadLipReading) April 7, 2017”
“Hi everyone -- working on getting the video back up.”
“As of Friday morning the video had returned online and things were back to normal.”
“The Bad Lip Reading Twitter account addressed the takedown.”
“Update: On Thursday evening, the video was removed, with this notice posted on YouTube: "This video is no longer available due to a copyright claim by Dramatists Play Service."”
“Also cool, the new video is dedicated to the late Carrie Fisher.”
“"It puts the lotion on ..."The video has been up for just a few hours and already has more than 75,000 views.”
“Just classic.”
“The best, in our nerd opinion over here at Heat Vision, is the Kylo Ren portion.”
“Actually, all the voice actors involved sell it, and in some cases, it's really hard to believe the silly lines are not what our heroes are actually saying.”


"It's a clerical error of some kind, obviously, but the timing can't be worse... https://t.co/ryft1CsVMN- Slip of the tongue reading (@ badlipreading) April 7, 2017 "
"Hello everyone - the video is being restored."
"As of Friday morning, the video was back online and everything was back to normal."
"The inarticulate twitter account solves the problem."
Update: on Thursday night, the video was deleted and a notice was posted on YouTube: "due to the copyright requirements of playwright play service, the video is no longer available."
"Equally cool, this new video is dedicated to the late Carrie Fisher."
"It painted the emulsion..." The video has only been played for a few hours and has been watched by more than 75000 people
"It's classic."
"The best in our nerd opinion here is hot vision, which is part of killeren."
"In fact, all the dubbing actors involved are selling, and in some cases, it's hard to believe that those stupid lines aren't really what our heroes are saying."



Number  519
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““That doesn’t change if you work at home or in an office or you’re on a tour.”
“Image zoom Silas and Justin Timberlake | Credit: "Hindsight" by Justin Timberlake/Harper Design“But, honestly, I just really feel like you have to work hard,” Biel shared.”
“I had to remind myself that I was me — giving myself a pep talk, shadowboxing with myself, rubbing my own shoulders.”Image zoom Credit: Kevin Mazur/Getty Images for American ExpressThey saw each other again when she came to a show during his FutureSex/LoveSounds tour.”
“Goddamn it.”He writes, “I had to psych myself up.”
“Kind of interested in that girl.”
“There was just something about that girl.”
“...that night he kept thinking I m kind of really interested in that girl...”
“She laughed and I noticed all of a sudden and in the way where you wonder if a person s like you if they have a very dry dark sense of humor too Image zoom Credit Hindsight by Justin Timberlake Harper Design Though he didn t ask for her number...”
““Nobody got it except her.”
““I made some sort of sarcastic comment, really dry,” he explains.”


"If you work from home, in an office, or on a trip, that doesn't change."
Image zooming Silas and Justin black | credit: "after the fact" designed by Justin Black / Harper "but, to be honest, I really think you have to work hard," bell shared
"I have to remind myself that I am who I am - cheer myself up, play taijiquan with myself, and rub my shoulders." Photo zooming credit: Kevin mazul / Getty's picture for American Express. When she came to a show on his future sex / voice of love tour, they met again
"Damn it," he wrote, "I have to cheer up."
"A little bit interested in that girl."
"There's something about that girl."
“… That night he thought I was interested in that girl... "
"She laughs, and I suddenly notice that you are wondering if a person has a dry black sense of humor like you. This is what Justin Timberlake Harper design discovered afterwards, even though he didn't ask her phone number..."
"No one can get it but her."
"I made some ironic comments, which were really boring," he explained



Number  520
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But if we were her, next time, we’d live a little and splurge on some chips and guac.”
“Totally.”
“...just needs some staples in the house for when her kids get hungry...”
“More Starbucks Is Conjuring Up a Magical New Frappuccino Here s the list of everything the photographer was able to spot in Jolie s cart 365 plain oatmeal Nature s Path maple brown sugar oatmeal Brussels sprouts 365 applesauce Does this seem like the cart of a busy mom who...”
“She was also dressed in stiletto boots, which is not how we’d typically refer to our grocery-shopping slippers.”
“Because if so, we are all about it) and pants, and some very cool Fendi sunglasses.”
“More: McDonald’s Knows We Love Caramel So Much, They Debuted New Turtle DrinksUnlike the rest of us, Jolie looked chic as heck, wearing all black with a loosely-fitted trench coat (is this the secret to essentially wearing a robe in public?”
“Maybe she’s heard the store referred to as “whole paycheck” too and didn’t want to end up dropping the well-earned tens of millions she’s probably raking in for Maleficent 2 on an assortment of organic marmalades (she made a hot $20 million for the first film.)”
“Oatmeal, veggies and some snacks.”
“More: Blue Apron Is About to Take Their Service in an Exciting New DirectionMuch like the rest of us, Jolie didn’t seem to go especially wild at Whole Foods and stuck with a lot of the basics.”


"But if we were her, next time, we would live a little better and squander some chips and guaiacol."
"Absolutely right."
“… Just put some staple food at home and wait for her children to be hungry. "
"More Starbucks are making a magic new ice cream. This is a list of everything photographers see in Julie's shopping cart 365 ordinary oats natural path Maple brown sugar Yan malt cabbage 365 applesauce. It looks like a busy mom's shopping cart who..."
"She's also wearing stilettos, which are not what we usually call grocery slippers."
"Because if that's the case, we all care about it) and pants, and some really cool Fundy sunglasses."
"More: McDonald's knows we like Caramel very much. They've launched a new turtle drink. Unlike the rest of us, Julie looks fashionable and wears a loose windbreaker (is that basically the secret of wearing a robe in public?"
"Maybe she's heard that the store is called" whole pay. "She doesn't want to spend tens of millions of dollars on an organic jam (she made 20 million dollars in her first movie)
Oatmeal, vegetables and some snacks
"More information: the blue apron is about to take their service to an exciting new direction. Like the rest of us, Julie doesn't seem to be particularly enthusiastic about total food and insists on a lot of basic things."



Number  521
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““We know fetch is never going to happen, but we can make this happen,” Chabert says.”
“The organization previously collected and distributed funds to victims of the Pulse Nightclub shooting in Orlando, the Aurora shooting in Colorado, and Sept. 11 attacks.”
“All proceeds will go to the National Compassion Fund, a program in the National Center for Victims of Crime.”
“We want to turn the attention to those who need it.”In the video, they asked for $3 donations in honor of Oct. 3 to reach their goal of $300,000.”
““This year though, we’re doing things a little differently.”
“And that’s because of fans like you,” the video starts.”
““We know today is a special day.”
“The initiative will raise money for victims of Sunday might’s attack, which left at least 59 dead and over 500 injured.”
“Mean Girls Day typically honors the comedy classic’s legacy with memes and movies quotes, but this year Amanda Seyfried, Lacey Chabert, Jonathan Bennett, and Daniel Franzese made a video urging fans to donate to their “Mean Girls for Las Vegas” campaign.”
“On Oct. 3, “Mean Girls” cast members set up a GoFundMe for Las Vegas shooting victims.”


"We know that acquisition will never happen, but we can do it," said shabert
The group has previously raised and distributed funds to victims of the Orlando pulse nightclub shootings, the aurora shootings in Colorado and the September 11 attacks
All proceeds will go to the national compassion fund, a project of the National Center for crime victims
"We want to turn our attention to those who need it." In the video, they asked for $3 for Oct. 3 to reach their $300000 target
"But this year we're doing something different."
"That's because of fans like you," the video began
"We know today is a special day."
"The initiative will raise money for the victims of Sunday's may attack, which killed at least 59 people and injured more than 500."
"Mean girl's Day" usually commemorates the legacy of comedy classics with memes and Movie Quotes, but this year Amanda Seyfried, Lacey shabert, Jonathan Bennett and Daniel franzes produced a video urging fans to donate money for their "mean girl for Las Vegas" campaign
"On October 3, the crew of mean girl set up a gofundme for the victims of the Las Vegas shooting."



Number  522
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Taking their relationship to the next step, the pair officially moved in together this summer, with Adams relocating from Nashville to Los Angeles to be with the actress.”
“I m with smoochie booty bear cutie Adams sweatshirt proclaims while Hyland s says I m with big daddy jungle kitty Image zoom Credit Sarah Hyland Instagram Image zoom Credit Sarah Hyland Instagram However there was one guest who left the festivities a little early and departed without saying goodbye...”
“In honor of his girlfriend turning 28, Wells Adams shared a loving tribute to Sarah Hyland on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s that can’t-eat, can’t-sleep, reach-for-the-stars, over-the-fence, World Series kind of stuff,” he wrote, quoting an iconic line from the 1995 romcom It Takes Two alongside a series of photos of the couple cuddling up and kissing in the snow.”
““Happy birthday @sarahhyland!”
“You’re perfect and I love you most,” continued the Bachelor in Paradise bartender, 34, adding that the birthday festivities were only getting started.”
““Now pack your bags, cus baby, we’re jumping on a plane and heading down to the islands tomorrow!”Image zoom Wells Adams and Sarah Hyland | Credit: Wells Adams/InstagramThe post quickly won the affections of not only Hyland, but also former Bachelor star Ben Higgins.”
“I really like you two people he wrote underneath the loving birthday message to which Adams replied We love you more In her own comment Hyland made her love for her boyfriend abundantly clear writing You re the central perk I need every morning I love you so much baby...”
“...she continued adding three kiss face emojis...”


"To take their relationship to the next step, the two officially moved together this summer, and Adams moved from Nashville to Los Angeles to be with the actress."
"I announced with kissing trophy bear cute Adams sweatshirt, and Helan s said I worked with big dad jungle cat image scaling credit Sarah Helan instagram image scaling credit Sarah Helan instagram. However, there was a guest who left the celebration a little early and left without saying goodbye..."
"In memory of her 28 year old girlfriend, wells Adams expressed his love to Sarah Helan on Saturday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Just can't eat, can't sleep, reach out to see stars, climb over fences, world competitions and so on," he wrote, quoting a 1995 romcom catchphrase that took two pictures, along with a series of pictures of lovers hugging and kissing in the snow
Happy birthday to the kingdom of Salah
"You're perfect. I love you the most," continued the 34 year old barman of Paradise bachelor, whose birthday celebration had just begun
"Now pack your bags, baby, we're going to jump on the plane to the islands tomorrow!"! "Zooming in and out of wills Adams and Sarah hayland | source: wills Adams / instagram this article quickly won not only hayland's love, but also Ben Higgins, a former bachelor star."
"I really like the two of you who wrote under his loving birthday message. Adams replied in her own comments that we love you more, and asked her love for her boyfriend to write very clearly," you are the central welfare I need every morning. I love you so much, Bob... "
“… She added three more kisses to her face... "



Number  523
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“King has revealed that there will be plenty of PLL characters popping up on the show from time to time.”
““At the end of the day, regardless of whether I’m on it or not, I will 100-percent support the show and be a fan of it myself," she told TV Line.”
“And so it begins... #plltheperfectionists A post shared by Sasha Pieterse (@sashapieterse27) onFeb 26, 2018 at 12:50pm PSTWhere can I watch The Perfectionists?”
“On February 27th, the cast attended their first table read with production due to begin the following week.”
“They were also reportedly scouting and locking down locations in the Pacific Northwest of the US, where the new town of Beacon Heights will be set.”
“In January, showrunner I. Marlene King revealed to ETOnline that "the script is written and we're in the process of rewriting it just to fine tune it perfectly."”
“There is currently no official release date for The Perfectionists just yet but Sofia Carson confirmed in an interview that the show would be airing at some point in 2019.”
“Freeform have also shared the first trailer for the series and you can watch it below:When will The Perfectionists be released?”
“Filming is due to begin in March and the show should be arriving on our screens at some point in 2019.”
“Gossip Girl and The Walking Dead has now been announced...”


"Kim revealed that there will be a lot of PLL characters in the program from time to time."
"At the end of the day, I'll support the show 100 percent whether I'm on or not, and I'm a fan of it myself," she told tvconnect
"So it started... #Please click "where can I see perfectionists at 12:50 noon on February 26, 2018?"
On February 27th, the crew took part in their first performance, which will begin next week
"It is reported that they have also reconnoitered and sealed off some sites in the Pacific Northwest of the United States, where a new lighthouse heights town will be established."
In January, showrunner I. Marlene King revealed to etonline, "the script has been written, we are rewriting it, just to adjust it perfectly."
"There is no official release date for perfectionist, but Sophia Carson confirmed in an interview that the show will be on air sometime in 2019."
"Freeform also shared the first trailer of the series. You can see the following picture: when will perfectionists be released?"
"Filming will start in March and the play will appear on our screens sometime in 2019."
"Gossip girl and the walking dead have now been announced..."



Number  524
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[9]”
“[8]Sophie Hase von Woman meint, das Lied habe nicht nur das Zeug zum Hit, sondern beweise auch, dass Delevingnes fantastisch singen kann.”
“[7]Sam Reed von The Hollywood Reporter meint zu Delevingnes Gesangsdebüt, diese präsentiere die beschwingte Melodie in einer Weise, die erfrischend klinge, so als sei sie ohne nachträgliche, digitale Tonhöhenkorrekturen ausgekommen.”
“...gab mit dem Song ihr Debüt als Sängerin...”
“Zwischen den beiden zu stehen ich konnte kaum glauben dass das wahr ist 6 Delevingne erklärte zudem der Song sei von dem Gefühl inspiriert wenn man sich verliebt hat man verletzlich ist und alles zum ersten Mal fühlt Wir alle brauchen Liebe und Liebe kann einem den Tag retten Delevingne...”
“[5]Gegenüber USA Today sagte Delevingne zu dem Umstand, dass ihr Namen auf dem Soundtrack zum Film Valerian – Die Stadt der tausend Planeten nach David Bowie und vor Bob Marley zu lesen ist: „Ich kann gar nicht beschreiben, wie ich mich gefreut habe, als ich die Platte sah.”
“[4] Im Video zeigt sie sich in einem schwarzen Hosenanzug gekleidet, sowohl brünett, blond als auch rothaarig.”
“[5] Für das Musikvideo nahm Delevingne die Hilfe von Regisseur Luc Besson in Anspruch, mit dem sie bereits beim Dreh des Kinofilms zusammengearbeitet hatte.”
“[4] Alissia Lehle von Elle beschreibt das Ergebnis als eine Mischung aus Soul und Sprechgesang.”
“[1][2] Das Lied entstand in Zusammenarbeit mit Pharrell Williams[3], der die Single auch produzierte.”


“[9]”
"Sophie Haas von main, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, my wife, My wife, I
[7] Hollywood Reporter Sam reed von said that he is an outstanding female journalist. His works are a beautiful music, a beautiful song, a beautiful song, a beautiful song, a beautiful song, a beautiful song, another beautiful song
“…… I want to sing a song... "
"I know what your job is, because what your job is, what your job is..."
"[5] today's USA Today is the soundtrack of a soundtrack movie" valerian tasend ", written by David Bowie and Bob Marley zuleson, and written by:" I can't see him, I can't see him, I can't see him. "
"[4] I shot a video in Schwarzen hosenazug gawklett, Sawyer brunette, and the blonde alse ogi rosalig."
[5] There's a place in anspruch, there's a place called Luc Besson, there's a local concert hall
"[4] Alicia Lehrer von eller beschlett is an embodiment of soul and soul."
[1] [2] this is a product designed by Pharrell Williams [3]



Number  525
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I will not be answering to Puffy, Diddy, Puff Daddy, or any of my other monikers but Love or Brother Love.””
“One of my alter egos is Love.”And to make things even less confusing, he says he’s fine being called any of his former monikers.”
“After announcing over the weekend that he was changing his name to Brother Love, Diddy (formerly P. Diddy, Puffy, Puff Daddy, etc.)”
“...revealed Monday evening on Instagram he was was only joking Well ladies and gentlemen today I ve come to the conclusion that you cannot play around with the internet Diddy said after opening with a line from Lionel Richie s...”
“Hello Due to the overwhelming response from the media out there and just due to there not wanting to be any confusion I was only joking...”
“Okay?”
“I didn’t change my name.”
“It was just part of one of my alter egos.”
““To set the record straight, because I have a lot of press to do in the next couple of weeks, you can address me by any of my older names.”
“Brother Love.”


"I won't answer chubby, little brother, chubby dad, or any of my nicknames, but love or brotherly love."
"My other self is love." To make things less confusing, he said he could be called his former nickname
After announcing at the weekend that he would change his name to "love brother," didi (formerly P. Diddy, puffy, puffdaddy, etc.)
"It was just a joke to expose him on instagram on Monday night. Ladies and gentlemen, today I came to the conclusion that you can't play with the Internet, Diddy said in his opening remarks with a line from Lionel Ritchie..."
"Hello, because of the strong reaction of the media, just because I don't want any confusion, I'm just joking..."
"All right?"
"I didn't change my name."
"It's just a part of my other self."
"To clarify, because I have a lot of work to do in the next few weeks, you can call me by my old name."
"Love your brother."



Number  526
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rather, Mr. Soules has been charged with leaving the scene of a fatal accident.””
“...entering a not guilty plea in May to the charge Soules legal team filed a motion to dismiss the failure to remain charge on constitutional grounds refuting the last sentence of the Iowa state code...”
“A judge signed an order Tuesday setting a jury trial for Nov. 7 in Independence, Iowa, according to Associated Press, which reports that Judge Andrea Dryer set aside four days.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Soules’ attorney did not respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Image zoom Credit: Buchanan County Sheriff's Dept.”
“Soules, 36, was arrested on April 25, 2017, in Iowa after he allegedly crashed his truck into a tractor, running it off the road into a ditch.”
“His vehicle was later found at a home that he was present at, and Soules allegedly refused to leave until officers obtained a search warrant several hours later.”
“Iowa State Patrol alleged that he fled the scene violating the Iowa code that states If the accident causes the death of a person all surviving drivers shall remain at the scene of the accident except to seek necessary aid or to report the accident to law enforcement authorities After...”
“Image zoom Credit KWWL News 7 The attorneys said in court documents obtained by PEOPLE that because Mr Soules indisputably stopped his vehicle returned to the injured driver contacted law enforcement provided aid to the injured driver arranged for medical treatment for the injured driver remained until emergency personnel responded...”


"Instead, Mr. sules was accused of leaving the scene of the fatal accident."
“…… In May, the suers legal group pleaded not guilty to the charges and moved a motion to reject the failure to continue the prosecution on constitutional grounds, refuting the last sentence of the Iowa code.... "
According to the associated press, a judge signed an order on Tuesday to set the jury trial on November 7 in independence, Iowa
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Suers' lawyers didn't respond to requests for comment."
"Image zooming credit: Buchanan county security department."
"Soles, 36, was arrested in Iowa on April 25, 2017. He was said to have rammed a truck into a tractor and drove it off the road into a ditch."
"His car was later found in one of his homes and sules was said to have refused to leave until the police obtained a search warrant a few hours later."
"The Iowa patrol claimed that his escape from the scene was in violation of Iowa law, which states that if an accident results in the death of one person, all surviving drivers should remain at the scene of the accident unless necessary assistance is sought or at Then report the incident to the law enforcement authorities. "
"The lawyer for kwwl news 7 said that the person obtained in the court documents said that as Mr. suers indisputably stopped his vehicle and returned to the injured driver, he contacted the law enforcement department to provide assistance and arrange medical treatment for the injured driver until the injured driver left the response of the emergency personnel..."



Number  527
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Pictured: Asia Argento, Rose McGowan)”
“Argento is the daughter of famed Italian director Dario Argento.”
“McGowan and Argento have been among the most prominent women to come forward with allegations of rape against now-disgraced film titan Harvey Weinstein, who is facing criminal charges in New York unrelated to McGowan or Argento.”
“McGowan has become a vocal activist on behalf of sexual assault victims.”
“In a tweet sent early Monday, the former “Charmed” star said she her “heart is broken” by the New York Times’ expose published Sunday that Argento reached a $380,000 settlement with actor-musician Jimmy Bennett, who claims Argento sexually assaulted him in a hotel room when he was 17.”
““I got to know Asia Argento ten months ago.”
“Our commonality is the shared pain of being assaulted by Harvey Weinstein.”
“My heart is broken.”
“I will continue my work on behalf of victims everywhere,” McGowan wrote.”
“A few hours later, she expressed qualified support for Argento in another tweet: “None of us know the truth of the situation and I’m sure more will be revealed.”


(photo: Rose McGowan Asia Argento)
"Argento is the daughter of the famous Italian director Dario Argento."
"McGovern and Argento are one of the most outstanding women who have filed rape charges against Harvey Weinstein, the now notorious film giant, who faces criminal charges in New York that have nothing to do with McGovern or Argento."
"McGovern has become a powerful activist representing the victims of sexual abuse."
In a tweet sent earlier Monday, the former glamour star said she was "heartbroken," according to a report in the New York Times on Sunday that Argento had reached a $380000 settlement with actor musician Jimmy Bennett, who claimed that Argento sexually assaulted him in a hotel room when he was 17
"I met Argento ten months ago."
"What we have in common is the common pain of being attacked by Harvey Weinstein."
"My heart is broken."
"I will continue to work for victims around the world," McGovern wrote
A few hours later, she expressed conditional support to Argento on another micro blog: "we don't know the truth of the situation. I believe there will be more things to be disclosed."



Number  528
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“On Tuesday, Mama June was a guest on The Wendy Williams Show, where she claimed Sugar Bear was "very emotionally and physically" abusive to her during their "many, many years" together.”
“She also alleged that he does not have a relationship with their 11-year-old daughter, Alana "Honey Boo Boo" Thompson, and claims he injured 17-year-old Lauryn "Pumpkin" Shannon.”
“WATCH: Mama June Opens Up About Her Current Relationship With Sugar Bear: 'He Pisses Me Off'"The abuse allegations are not true," Sugar Bear, who believes his marriage to new wife Jennifer Lamb has "a lot to do" with Mama June's anger, told ET on Tuesday.”
“"It is not true, any of it.”
“June won't let me see or talk to Alana."”
“"I have text messages where I text June and try to talk to Alana, but no response back from her," he continued.”
“"The last time I saw Alana was at mine and Jennifer's wedding.”
“I've tried to stay in touch with my daughter but June won't let me."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
On Tuesday, Joan's mother, a guest on the Wendy Williams show, claimed that during their "many, many years" together, the sweet bear "abused her very much emotionally and physically."
She also claimed that he had nothing to do with his 11 year old daughter, Alana Thompson, and that he had hurt 17-year-old Laurine Papan Shannon
"Observation: Joan's mother has disclosed her current relationship with sugar bear:" he makes me angry "and" the abuse charges are untrue. "Sugar bear believes that his marriage to his new wife, Jennifer lamb," has a lot to do with Joan's mother's anger, "she told et on Tuesday
"It's not true. None of them."
"Joan won't let me see Alana or talk to her."
"I texted Joan to talk to Alana, but she didn't reply," he added
"The last time I saw Alana was at my wedding with Jennifer."
"I tried to keep in touch with my daughter, but Joan wouldn't let me."



**Something goes wrong**
“'”For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“...my God we re pregnant and they sent us the thing about Lauren I was like So awkward...”
“Then I saw that Lauren was pregnant that same day that she came out saying she was pregnant and I was laughing because I m like Oh my gosh that s so funny that it just happened all at the same time Waller added Literally we texted somebody saying Oh...”
““This is so funny — so we found out the morning of New Year’s Day [that I was pregnant],” Ashley exclusively told Us Weekly in February.”
“In fact, Wahler and Slack discovered that they were expecting the same day that his ex-girlfriend Conrad, 31, announced her pregnancy.”
“They announced her pregnancy in February, joining fellow MTV stars Whitney Port and Lauren Conrad, both of whom welcomed babies in July.”
“Calamigos Ranch in Malibu in October 2013”
“We are so excited to start this new chapter of our lives and never thought we could love someone so much Delilah is already a daddy s girl the couple gushed adding that Wahler 30 loves to swaddle and cuddle with her The Laguna Beach alum and Slack married at...”
““We are so unbelievably in love!” the new parents told ET.”
“She weighed in at 7 pounds, 12 ounces, and measured 21 inches long.”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
“…… God, we're pregnant. They sent us a message about Lauren. I feel embarrassed... "
"And then I saw the day Lauren was pregnant, and she came out and said she was pregnant, and I laughed because I like it. Oh, my God, it's so funny, it just happened at the same time. Waller added, our literal texters said," Oh... "
"It's so interesting - so we found out on the morning of new year's Day (that I was pregnant)," Ashley told us exclusively in February
"In fact, Waller and Shrek found that they were looking forward to the same day his 31 year old ex girlfriend Conrad announced she was pregnant."
"They announced her pregnancy in February, and along with other MTV stars, Whitney Porter and Lauren Conrad, they both had babies in July."
"October 2013 Malibu karamigos Ranch"
"We're excited to start a new chapter in our lives. We've never thought that we could love someone so much. Delilah is already a girl with a father. The couple gushed, adding that weller 30 loves swaddling and hugging her. Laguna Beach alum and Shrek are married in..."
"We're incredibly in love! "New parents tell et."
She weighs 7 pounds, 12 ounces and is 21 inches long



Number  530
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Switch to Latino Español Feedback Help en Choose a language United States English en United States español es Music Reviews Music News Video Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية”
“Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines...”
“...msn back to msn home entertainment powered by Microsoft News Skip To Navigation Skip To Content Sign in Change language content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
At present, in each of 1575 chechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechecheche Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut
"English polskapolski portugal portuguese Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomi Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rk è e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States English American Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ≤ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ P ιιιι P Чхישש㪞ביתاااااالبببببةااا
"Germany - Germany - Spain - France - France - India - English - India - India - India - India - New Zealand - Norway - Norway - Bokmal international version of the ú sterreich Deutsch per ú Espa? Ol Philippines..."
“… MSN return to MSN family entertainment from Microsoft support news jump to navigation jump to content login change language content Africa French French French Latin America Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canada English Canada French Cesc Republic Chile Spanish Colombia Spanish Denmark … “



**Something goes wrong**
“This new controversy raises more concerns about how accurately and responsibly Jenner presents her own community, especially considering the danger that trans women face when the “realness” of their womanhood is challenged.”
“However, despite the song’s mainstream success, Aerosmith has frequently been criticized for the lyrics and music video’s offensive insinuations about trans women.”
“In the caption of a July 18 Instagram photo of Jenner posing with Aerosmith lead singer Steven Tyler Jenner teased that the pair is working on a duet of Aerosmith s 1987 hit Dude Looks Like a Lady which Jenner called one of my favorite songs iamstevent and I are...”
“...working on our duet for Dude Looks Like a Lady...”
“One of my favorite songs!”
“A post shared by Caitlyn Jenner caitlynjenner on Jul 18 2017 at 9 53am PDT Then during an appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live later that day Jenner who is a trans woman told the story behind the snapshot and how she first came to view Dude Looks Like a Lady...”
“...as her theme song Jenner revealed that the photo was taken two nights ago during a fundraiser in Minneapolis Minnesota...”
“Upon seeing Tyler perform, Jenner said she was compelled to go backstage, say hello, and tell the musician how much one of his songs had meant to her.”
“After telling Kimmel that before she publicly came out as a trans woman in 2015, her life was full of “secrets” and “hiding,” she recalled her conversation with Tyler:“I said to Steven, ‘I have had some really, really tough times in my life.”
“... Every once in a while I would ... sneak out in the dark and drive around.”


"This new controversy has aroused more attention, that is, how Jenner accurately and responsibly demonstrates her community, especially considering the risks that cross-cultural women face when the" authenticity "of her female identity is challenged."
"However, despite the success of the song in mainstream music, Smith Airlines is often criticized for the offensive allusions of lyrics and music videos to cross-cultural women."
"In the title of a photo taken on instagram on July 18 by Jenner and Stephen Taylor, the lead singer of Aerosmith, Jenner joked that they were singing Duets for Playboy, the 1987 hit song of Aerosmith, and looked like a lady. Jenner called it" me and Stephen ", one of my favorite songs..."
“… The guy who works for our duet looks like a lady... "
"One of my favorite songs!"
"At 9:53 a.m. on July 18, 2017, Caitlin Jenner posted a post on" Jimmy Kimmel live. "Jenner is a transgender woman who tells the story behind the snapshot and what she looked like when she first saw Dodd. Dodd looked like a woman..."
“… As her theme song Jenner reveals, this photo was taken two days ago in Minneapolis, Minnesota during fundraising
Jenner said that as soon as she saw Taylor's performance, she had to go backstage to say hello and tell the musician how important one of his songs was to her
"Before telling Kimmel that her life was full of" secrets "and" concealment "before she came out to be a transgender woman in 2015, she recalled her conversation with Taylor:" I told Steven that I had gone through some very, very difficult times in my life. "
"... occasionally I would... Sneak out in the dark and drive around. "



**Something goes wrong**
““I’m from Texas ... obviously," Lindsay said explaining her preference," but we’re not rushing anything."”
“But the two have agreed on one thing: a winter wedding.”
“ -- “The Bachelorette” star Rachel Lindsay is engaged to Bryan Abasolo.”
“After weeks of narrowing down her suitors from 31 men, the 32-year-old trial attorney from Dallas chose the 37-year-old Colombian chiropractor living in Miami.”
“Abasolo had sparks with Lindsay from the very first episode of the show’s latest season, even passionately kissing her before the competition.”
“The bold move not only helped him secure the first impression rose, but also, it seems, solidified a permanent place in Lindsay's heart.”
“Lindsay chose her fiancé over finalists Peter Kraus, the 31-year-old business owner from Madison, Wisconsin, and Eric Bigger, the 29-year-old Baltimore native.”
“The bride-to-be chose Abasolo after a romantic date on a hot air ballon in Spain.”
“It was also after Lindsay had a tearful goodbye with Kraus because he just wasn't ready to propose.”
“The bachelorette admitted that because of her emotional goodbye to Kraus who was emphatic about only proposing if he was absolutely sure and not because the show s season finale was set to air she wasn t as prepared as...”


"I'm from Texas... "Obviously," Lindsay said, explaining her preference, "but we're in no hurry."
"But they agreed on one thing: a winter wedding."
"Rachel Lindsay, the star of bachelor, is engaged to Brian abasolo."
After weeks of hard work, the 32 year old trial lawyer from Dallas selected her suitors from 31 men and chose a 37 year old Columbia chiropractor who lives in Miami
"From the first episode of the latest season, abasolo and Lindsay had a spark, even kissing her enthusiastically before the game."
"This bold move not only helped him gain Rose's first impression, but also seemed to consolidate Lindsay's permanent position in his heart."
Lindsay chose her fiance over finalist Peter Kraus, a 31 year old business owner from Madison, Wisconsin, and Eric biger, a 29 year old Baltimore native
"After a romantic date in a hot air balloon in Spain, the bride to be chose abasolo."
"Also after Lindsay and Klaus tearfully said goodbye, because he was not ready to propose."
"The bachelor admitted that because of her emotional farewell to Klaus, Klaus stressed that she would propose only when he was absolutely certain, not because the last season of the play was about to air, and she was not ready to..."



Number  533
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Based on the relationship Kaling had with her own mother, there's no doubt she and her daughter will share the same bond.”
“While chatting with Us Weekly in September, Mindy Project's Ed Weeks said about Kaling having a baby, "The show started as a tribute to her mother, who very sadly passed away just as the show [was] being picked up."”
“Kaling's daughter's middle name has been reported, and, well, you're going to shed even more tears once you hear it.”
“According to a birth certificate The Blast and Entertainment Tonight reportedly obtained, the creator and former star of The Mindy Project named her baby girl Katherine Swati Kaling.”
“Now, here's why Swati is such a special name — it is the first name of Kaling's late mother, Swati Roysircar, who died in 2012 from pancreatic cancer.”
“Kaling and her mother had an amazing relationship, and one that the multi-hyphenate has talked about on multiple occasions.”
“In November 2013, Lena Dunham interviewed Kaling for RollingStone.com.”
“After the Girls creator asked Kaling about her role model in life the Office actor said I would say that my mother is the single biggest role model in my life but that term doesn t seem to encompass enough...”
“...when I use it about her...”
“She was the love of my life."”


"Based on Karin's relationship with her mother, there is no doubt that she and her daughter will have the same bond."
"Ed weeks of Mindy project talked to our weekly in September about Karin's having a child." the program started in memory of her mother, who died very sad, just after the program was finished. "
"The middle name of Carlin's daughter has been reported. Well, once you hear it, you will shed more tears."
According to reports, "tonight's explosion and entertainment" has obtained a birth certificate, and the creator and former star of Mindy project named her baby girl Katherine swaty Carlin
"Now, that's why Swati is such a special name - it's the name of Carlin's late mother Swati rosica, who died of pancreatic cancer in 2012."
"Karin has a good relationship with her mother, and this hyphenated man has talked about it on many occasions."
"In November 2013, Li Na Dunham interviewed Carlin RollingStone.com Website. "
"When the creator of girl asked Karin about her role model in life, the office actor said," I would say that my mother is the biggest role model in my life, but the word doesn't seem comprehensive enough... "
“… When I use it to describe her... "
"She's the love of my life."



Number  534
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Um…thanks, we guess?”
“Unfortunately, there was no place for Brie to feed the baby, so they end up going to a truck stop’s outdoor shower, where Brie pops a squat on a chair kindly provided by the truck stop’s matron.”
“But, spoiler alert — she’s still gainfully employed, even though she’s (wait for it) breaking all the rules (which is also the name of tonight’s episode of Total Divas).”
“So, to make it easy on everyone, since our Divas were all over the place tonight, let’s break it down by groups.”
“Maryse & The Miz Host a Sleepover for Carmella & Big CassYou have to hand it to Maryse — she has a big heart, and is quite the host when her friends are going to pay a visit.”
“After having a FaceTime chat with Carmella — that, actually, buffered out for a minute, which leads to hilarity later down the line — she decides to invite her over with the love of her life, Big Cass, and she offers for the two to stay with her and Miz.”
“Carmella mentioned that she’d wanted to get out of Orlando and take a vacation to Los Angeles, since she hadn’t been since her Laker Girl days.”
“Maryse, of course, thinks this is as good of a time as any to have a sleepover, whether or not Carmella and Cass are ready for it.”
“After special ordering an eight foot by eight foot customized bed for Cass that ultimately doesn t fit in the house so The Miz and Maryse put it under their pergola and ordering a taco truck because Carmella loves tacos the Mizanins are informed that while they appreciate the offer...”
“Cass and Carmella would rather spend time alone in their hotel room so they can make strange looking children or have fun trying...”


"Well Thank you. Let's guess? "
"Unfortunately, Bree didn't have room to feed the baby, so they ended up taking a shower outside a truck stop, and Bree squatted down on the chair kindly provided by the waitress at the truck stop."
"But the spoiler alert - she's still paid to work, even if she (waits for it) breaks all the rules (that's the name of tonight's total Diva episode)."
"So, for your convenience, since our heroines are everywhere tonight, let's divide them into groups."
"Maryse & the Miz had an overnight party for Carmella & big case. You've got to give it to Maryse - she's broad-minded, she's a real host when her friends are going to visit. "
"After a face-to-face conversation with Carmela - in fact, it was buffered for a minute, which led to subsequent laughter - she decided to invite her over with the love of her life, big CASS, and she offered to live with her and Miz."
"Carmela mentioned that she wanted to leave Orlando for a holiday in Los Angeles because she hadn't been since she was a girl in the Lakers."
"Of course, Maris thinks this is the best time to spend the night, whether Carmela and CASS are ready or not."
"After ordering an 8-foot by 8-foot custom bed for CASS, the bed didn't fit the house, so Miz and Maris put it under their shed and ordered a taco truck. Because Carmela liked taco, the missanians were told, although they were grateful for the offer..."
"CASS and Carmela would rather stay in the hotel room alone, so that they can have a strange looking child, or have fun trying..."



Number  535
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Relationships should help you, not hurt you."”
“Spend time with nice people who are smart, driven and likeminded.”
“Kardashian posted in an Instagram Story earlier this month: “Free yourself from negative people.”
“But in recent weeks she has also posted cryptic messages about relationships.”
“Kardashian previously defended her decision to stay with Thompson, telling a fan that she has “no knowledge of what goes on in our household or the enormous rebuilding [it] takes to even coexist.”“I’m proud of my strength,” the Good American clothing founder tweeted.”
“On Saturday, Kardashian took to Instagram to thank Thompson for her “Welcome Home” balloons for when she returned from her recent trip to Bali.”
“KHLOE KARDASHIAN IS 'PROUD' OF HER STRENGTH FOLLOWING TRISTAN THOMPSON CHEATING SCANDALThe couple has since been pictured together.”
“Kardashian gave birth to the couple’s first child, True Thompson, days after the reports emerged.”
“Videos posted by The Daily Mail showed Thompson inside a New York City nightclub apparently kissing another woman while Kardashian was nine months pregnant.”
“The bad is very hard to relive but it’s life.”In April, several photos and videos emerged showing the NBA star appearing to cheat on Kardashian with several women.”


"Relationships should help you, not hurt you."
"Spend time with smart, motivated, like-minded people."
"Free yourself from negative people," Kardashian wrote in an instagram article earlier this month
"But in recent weeks, she has also released some mysterious information about relationships."
"Kardashian, who had defended her decision to stay with Thompson, told a fan that she" didn't know what was going on in our family or what to rebuild to coexist. " "I'm proud of my strength," the great American fashion founder tweeted
"Last Saturday, Kardashian was on instagram thanking Thompson for the welcome home balloon he sent back from his recent trip to Bali."
"Khloe Kardashian is" proud "of her strength after Tristan Thompson's infidelity scandal. After that, the couple were photographed together
"Kardashian gave birth to the couple's first child a few days after the report came out, real Thompson."
A video released by the daily mail shows Thompson kissing another woman in a New York nightclub while Kardashian is nine months pregnant
"Bad things are hard to relive, but that's life." In April of this year, there were several photos and videos showing that the NBA star seemed to have cheated Kardashian with several women



**Something goes wrong**
“...and being in the public eye...”
“The 3rd has been by far the hardest recovery, but I’m feeling stronger every day.”
“Do you ever find yourself looking at these new celeb moms and thinking—HOW!?”
“Sorry, but after nine-plus months of pregnancy, it is seemingly impossible to bounce back like the Kylie Jenner’s of the world.”
“That kind of rebound must cost copious amounts of money and requires plenty of free time the average new mom won’t have for another 18 years.”
“Thankfully, among Hollywood’s elite are the cool-moms with realistic body goals like Jessie James Decker.”
“The now mother-of-three took to Instagram to share her postpartum tummy along with a friendly reminder to not be so hard on yourself—we couldn’t be more thrilled to see this beautiful star spit facts.”
““Keepin it real!”
“3 weeks post and I’m still very swollen.”
“Little Forrest is such an amazing baby and the easiest one of the 3.”


“… In the public eye... "
"The third was the hardest recovery so far, but I feel stronger every day
"Do you find yourself looking at these new celebrity moms and wondering what to do?"
"I'm sorry, after more than nine months of pregnancy, it seems impossible to recover like Kelly Jenner."
"This kind of rebound has to cost a lot of money and a lot of free time, and the average new mother will not have such free time in the next 18 years."
"Thank goodness, there are cool moms like Jesse James Decker in the Hollywood elite who have realistic body goals."
"The mother of three came to instagram to share her postpartum stomach, and kindly reminded herself not to be too harsh on herself. We couldn't be happier to see this beautiful star reveal the truth."
"Keep it real!"
"Three weeks later, I'm still swollen."
"Little Forrest is a wonderful child and the easiest of the three."



Number  537
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The collection consists 125 styles and ranges from XS – 3X with everything retailing for under $21.99.”
“Stars Above:Created with in extremely comfortable fabrics in soft tones and muted colors, this sleepwear and loungewear line was made with functionality and versatility in mind, perfect for every women of every age and size.”
“The collection offers an expansive size range, starting from 32AA to 46G in bras and from XS to 4X in underwear.”
“Auden:Is an intimates line made with every woman and need in mind, consisting of nearly 200 bras in over 40 unique styles and more than 200 underwear options in 50 styles, all retailing for under $22!”
“Colsie:This sleepwear and loungewear line consists of on-trend and versatile designs with nearly 30 loungewear and 20 intimate styles ranging in size from XS-3X and all retailing under $21.99.”


"The collection includes 125 styles, from XS series to 3x series, all of which retail below $21.99."
"Star image above: created in this pajamas and casual wear series, it adopts extremely comfortable fabrics with soft colors. Considering the functionality and versatility, it is very suitable for women of every age and body type."
"The collection offers a wide range of sizes, from 32aa to 46g for bras and from XS to 4x for underwear."
"Oden: it's a close fitting underwear series. It starts from the needs of every woman, including nearly 200 bras of more than 40 styles and more than 200 underwear of more than 50 styles. The retail price is below $22!"
"This casual Pajama collection includes fashion and multi-functional design, with nearly 30 casual wear and 20 close fitting styles, ranging in size from xs-3x, and retail prices below $21.99."



**Something goes wrong**
“These two were clearly meant to be together, even after being apart for so many years.”
“Family A post shared by Jeremy Bieber (@jeremybieber) onFeb 20, 2018 at 3:42pm PST"Selena was very comfortable with Justin's family.”
“Justin Bieber’s dad, Jeremy, tied the knot in Jamaica last night but all eyes were on his son, who brought Selena Gomez with him to the big day.”
“WATCH Justin Bieber Couldn t Keep His Eyes Off Selena Gomez On Their Valentine s Date The couple flew out to watch Jeremy Bieber and Chelsey Rebelo say I do and while Justin was in his groomsman outfit of a white shirt and pink shorts Selena wore a pink floral...”
“...maxi dress to match the theme...”
“A source told E!, “Selena and Justin flew overnight from Dallas to Jamaica for Jeremy Bieber's wedding on Monday.”
“Justin picked up Selena in a private jet, and they arrived first thing in the morning to Montego Bay.”
““They spent the day with Justin's family at a resort catching up and getting ready for Jeremy and Chelsey to get married.”
“She was hugging some of them and seemed right at home.”
“He rubbed sunscreen all over her back and they enjoyed the pool and being outside."”


"The two are clearly destined to be together, even after so many years apart."
"Family" Jeremy Bieber (@ Jeremy Bieber) shared a post "Selena is very satisfied with Justin's family" at 3:42 PM PST on February 20, 2018
"Justin Bieber's father, Jeremy, married in Jamaica last night, but all eyes were on his son, who brought Serena Gomez to the big day."
"Watching Justin Bieber staring at Selena Gomez at their Valentine's Day party, the couple flew out to see Jeremy Bieber and Chelsea Ribeiro say I like it, while Justin was wearing his best man suit, a white shirt and pink shorts, and Selena was wearing a pink flower..."
“… A long skirt to match the theme... "
"A source told me! "Serena and Justin flew overnight from Dallas to Jamaica for Jeremy Bieber's wedding on Monday."
"Justin picked up Serena in a private jet and they got to Montego Bay first thing in the morning."
"They spent a day at a resort with Justin's family and got together to get ready for Jeremy and Chelsea to get married."
"She held some of them in her arms and looked at home."
"He put sunscreen all over her back. They like swimming pool and outside."



**Something goes wrong**
“I try to put her in outfits that fit her well; fit is the most important part, especially for curvy women.””
“...of Studio 54 vibes...”
“...her musical medley opening to her American Idol reunion with Simon Cowell...”
“The superstar also managed to pull off eight outfit changes during the show — and each look was more glamorous than the next.”
“Here, every detail about her on-stage style parade.”
“When Clarkson stepped onto the red carpet in Las Vegas on Sunday night, the singer was dressed in a black custom Christian Siriano gown with a diagonal neckline, studded, structured shoulders a high slit and a black leather belt (above, center).”
“She paired the design with strappy studded black sandals and a matching clutch, and topped off the look with a red lip.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Rob Latour/REX/Shutterstock; Frazer Harrison/Getty Images; Rob Latour/REX/ShutterstockNext, Clarkson sported a black pantsuit with a gold fringe tassel-embellished cape (above, left), also by Siriano.”
“She layered the blazer, which grazed the floor, over a black jeweled bustier.”


"I try to make her wear clothes that fit; fit is the most important part, especially for curvy women."
“… 54 studio atmosphere... "
“… The Music Medley she reunited with Simon Cowell's American Idol opened
"The superstar also managed to change eight outfits during the show - each one more glamorous than the next one."
"Here, every detail about her is in a stage parade."
When Clarkson stepped onto the red carpet in Las Vegas on Sunday night, the singer wore a custom-made Black Christian siliano robe with a slanted neckline, spiked shoulders, well-organized shoulders, high forks and a black belt (top, middle)
"She paired the design with black sandals with lace up inlays and matching clutches, and embellished it with red lips."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Thanks to image zooming: Rob Latour / Rex / shutterstock; Frazer Harrison / Getty Images; rob Latour / Rex / shutterstock. Next, Clarkson wears black trousers and a gold fringed Cape (above, left), also by Siriano."
"She's wearing a scratched floor suit over a black jewel corset."



Number  540
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple announced that they were expecting in October 2017 followed by an adorable video that same month that revealed they would be welcoming another boy.”
“We are SO excited to meet him,” she wrote on Instagram along with an update on her growing bump.”
“Jessie James Decker and her NFL star husband Eric Decker welcomed their third child, son Forrest Bradley Decker, on Saturday, March 31, she announced Monday on Instagram.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We are so in love,” the new mom, 29, captioned her birth announcement featuring her holding her newborn son, who weighed in at 9 lbs.”
“The couple, who wed in 2013, is already parents to 4-year-old daughter Vivianne “Vivi” Rose and 2½-year-old son Eric “Bubby” Thomas Jr.“Welcome to this world Forrest Bradley Decker!”
“My heart is full!”
“#wolfpack completed with a 9lb lean, eating machine (& a Decker bucket head)!”
“Mommy sure knows how to grow some babies!”
“!” the new dad shared on Instagram.”


"The couple announced that they would welcome another boy in October 2017, with a lovely video showing that they would welcome another boy the same month."
"We're happy to meet him," she wrote on instagram, updating her growing lump
"Jessie James Decker and her NFL star husband Eric Decker have their third child, Forrest Bradley Decker, on Saturday, March 31," she announced on instagram on Monday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We love each other so much," the 29 year old new mother wrote in her birth announcement, carrying her 9-pound newborn son
The couple, who married in 2013, are the parents of their 4-year-old daughter Vivian "Vivian" Ross and their 2-and-a-half-year-old son Eric "Bubby" Thomas Jr. "Welcome to the world, Forrest Bradley Decker!"
"My heart is full!"
"Wolfpack is equipped with a 9-pound lean meat machine and a Decker bucket head!"
"Of course mother knows how to raise a child!"
"!" New Dad shared it on instagram. "



Number  541
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’ve always wanted to, I’ve always made huge records … and I got nominated for four.””
““It’s just a joy, and to have my biggest blessing with me — I’ve never been nominated for a VMA, this is my first time.”
“News, the father of one called the experience of having his son with him at the awards show “unbelievable.”“It’s a feeling that I can’t really explain,” he said.”
“Speaking to E!”
“Gucci Mane and DJ Khaled’s Son Asahd Wear Matching Tuxedos to the BET AwardsKhaled presented at the VMAs and was nominated for four awards, including video of the year.”
“Image zoom Credit: Phillip Faraone/Getty Images; ShopsprinImage zoom Credit: ShopspringRELATED VIDEO: Twins!”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“The jacket and pants retail for $1,050 and $670 respectively, while you can nab the white shirt for $260, leather shoes for $275 and navy cotton socks for $35 — a grand total of $2,290.”
“Asahd’s entire ensemble is by Gucci.”


"I've always thought that I've always set great records I got four nominations. "
"It's just a pleasure to have my greatest blessing with me - I've never been nominated for VMA, this is my first time."
The father of one child said his son's experience with him at the awards ceremony was "unbelievable" and "I really can't explain that feeling," he said
"Talk to me!"
The son of gucci mane and DJ Khaled, asahd, wore a tuxedo that matched the winner of the bet on Vmas and was nominated for four awards, including video of the year
Image scaling credit: Phillip faraone / Getty Images; shopprinimage scaling credit: shopspring Related videos: Twins
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"The jacket and pants retail for $1050 and $670, respectively, while the white shirt retail for $260, the leather shoes retail for $275, and the Navy cotton socks retail for $35, totaling $2290."
"Assad's whole band is Gucci."



**Something goes wrong**
“My son & I are two lucky guys.””
““I’ve now [got] two incredible women in my life.”
““Don’t worry little girl you can hold on as tight as you want for as long as you want, I’m already yours & I’ll never let go,” Murray captioned a photo of his daughter holding his finger.”
“This year’s theme: “Alice in Wonderland.”Image zoom Credit: Joshua Blanchard/GettyThis was a big night out for the couple, who recently welcomed their second child in March.”
“The annual Orange County, California event is thrown for around 250 cancer patients who weren’t able to attend their own proms for medical reasons.”
““I waited for a prince and he took me to my 1st prom,” Roemer captioned her Instagram photo of the couple heading off to the event.”
“The One Tree Hill actor slipped into his 13-year-old Prince Charming costume he famously wore to the Halloween homecoming dance, which he revealed in an Instagram story video, saying he couldn’t believe the outfit actually still fit!”
“Murray, who’s been with his wife and fellow actress Sarah Roemer since 2014, played dress up to accompany her to her first-ever prom: the Children’s Hospital of Orange County oncology prom.”
“FROM PEN: EW’s Top Ten Rom-Com Movie MomentsGet push notifications with news, features and more.”
“But the 35-year-old actor just reprised his famous role in the most adorable way.”


"My son and I are two lucky ones."
"I have two incredible women in my life now."
"Don't worry, little girl, grab as long as you want, I'm yours & I'll never let go," Murray wrote in the photo of his daughter holding his finger
This year's theme is Alice in Wonderland. Photo source: Joshua Blanchard / gettythis is an important night for the couple, who recently had their second child in March
Orange County, California, holds an annual event for about 250 cancer patients who cannot attend their own dance for medical reasons
"I'm waiting for the prince and he's taking me to my first dance," Romer described on instagram of the couple going to the dance
The hero of "a tree mountain" secretly put on the famous prince charming costume he wore at his 13-year-old homecoming dance. He revealed in instagram's story video that he couldn't believe it was still fit! "
"Murray has been with his wife and actress Sarah Roemer since 2014, playing the role of a dressmaker and accompanying her to her first dance: the orange county children's Hospital oncology dance."
“FROM  PEN:EW 's top ten ROM com movie movies get push notifications with news, features and more PEN:EW 's top ten ROM com movie movies, which provides push notification of news, functions, etc.)
"But the 35 year old actor just replayed his famous role in the loveliest way."



**Something goes wrong**
“The film is scheduled for release on June 22, 2018.”
“Life finds a way," Goldblum's Malcolm says in the trailer.”
“Life breaks free.”
“"Life cannot be contained.”
“The film also brings back Jeff Goldblum as Dr. Ian Malcolm, the eccentric mathematician from the first two Jurassic Park movies.”
“AdvertisementBut Claire Dearing, the founder of the Dinosaur Protection Group -- played by Bryce Dallas Howard -- wants to save the dinosaurs, so she enlists Owen Grady, played by Chris Pratt, to help her.”
“The film takes a few years after where the previous sequel left off and the dinosaurs on the human abandoned Jurassic Park island face another round of extinction when a volcano threatens to engulf the area in molten lava.”
“Dec. 7 (UPI) -- The first trailer for the next installment in the Jurassic Park franchise - Jurassic World: Fallen Kingdom - was released Thursday night and it has all the roaring dinosaurs, running humans and dramatic music one would expect.”


"The film is scheduled for release on June 22, 2018."
"There's always a way to live," Goldbloom's Malcolm said in the trailer
"Life is free."
"Life is out of control."
"It also brings Jeff Goldbloom back to the role of Dr Ian Malcolm, the eccentric mathematician in the first two Jurassic Park movies."
But Claire dilling, the founder of dinosaur conservation, played by Bryce Dallas Howard, wants to save dinosaurs, so she asks Owen Grady, played by Chris Pratt, to help her
"This movie was shot a few years after the end of the previous sequel, and the dinosaurs on the abandoned Jurassic Park Island are facing another round of extinction because the volcano threatens to engulf the area with lava."
On December 7, the first trailer of the next Jurassic Park series, Jurassic world: the fallen Kingdom, was released on Thursday night with all the roaring dinosaurs, running humans and dramatic music expected



Number  544
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Love While the entire performance undoubtedly made the Internet erupt Jungkook s quick shot of his rock hard abs likely made fans already melting hearts complete mush...”
“...those who speak his language...”
“Tyra Bank s That was powerful response to Christina Aguilera and Demi Lovato s performance The dynamic divas had the whole arena on their feet after the debut of their new collaboration Fall In Line but there was one reaction...”
“Then when Swift shouted her out during her speech, Cabello let loose, and continued to throughout the rest of the night (like headbanging during Shawn Mendes' performance) — and it was awesome.”
“Camila was clearly pumped for her new tour mate when Swift won top female artist, jumping up and down while the “Delicate” singer made her way to the stage.”
“Camila Cabello being unapologetically herself Camila Cabello has always been a goofball, but it was especially apparent at this year's BBMAs.”
“All the DREAMers out there, all of those who get made fun of when you speak with an accent, all of those when they say, ‘Hey speak English.’ To you — Puerto Rico, this goes out to you."”
““This goes out to all my Latino brothers, all the immigrants.”
“Luis Fonsi s shout out to the Spanish speaking community While accepting the award for Top Hot 100 Song for Despacito Fonsi thanked fans for loving a mostly Spanish song and then went on to deliver an inspiring message to...”
“Khaled with their performance of Dinero Even with her absence Cardi made sure to still make an appearance through a fabulous black and white video tearing up her verse and of course having J Lo join in for the already...”


"Love and the whole show undoubtedly broke out on the Internet. Zheng Guo quickly photographed his hard abdominal muscles, which is likely to make the hearts of fans melt completely confused..."
“… People who speak his language... "
"Tara bank made a strong response to the performances of Christina Aguilera and Demi Lovato. After their debut of their new cooperation, the whole stage stood up, but there was a response..."
"And then, when swift called her out in the speech, Cabello let go and went on all night (like the thump of Sean Mendes) - it was amazing."
"When swift won the best female singer award, Camilla was obviously excited about her new tour partner. When the" exquisite "singer stepped onto the stage, she jumped up and down."
"Camilla Cabello has no apologies for herself. Camilla Cabello has always been a fool, but it is especially obvious on this year's bbmas."
"All the dreamers, all the people who get teased when you speak with an accent, all the people who say, 'Hey, speak English.' For you - Puerto Rico, it's for you. "
"This is for all my Latin American brothers, all my immigrants."
"Luis Fonsi, when receiving the 100 Hit Songs Award from despacito Fonsi, yelled to the Spanish speaking community to thank fans for their love of this Spanish based song, and then went on to Send an inspiring message. "
"Khalid and their performance of dinello, even if she is absent, CADI is sure to tear her poetry through a mythical black-and-white video, of course, J-Lo has joined in..."



Number  545
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read the Full Report (Subscription Required)”
“With less attention being paid to informing citizens about government and the world around them, the critics warn, a cornerstone of a democratic society — an informed populace — is being put in jeopardy.”
“But media critics say celebrity coverage is squeezing out legitimate news and that, as a result, the United States is becoming a nation that knows more about the “Battle of the Network Stars” than the battle for Baghdad.”
“Indeed, they even say we are genetically programmed to care, and that the heavy focus on celebrities simply reflects that interest.”
“Some observers say it's harmless to follow the lives of celebrities.”
“Americans have an insatiable appetite for celebrity news, and the juicier the better — from Brad and Jennifer's breakup to Michael Jackson's trial to Martha Stewart's jail term.”
“But the serious-minded readers of Bloomberg News were most interested in Charles and Camilla.”
“Introduction In early February, North Korea's leader bragged about his nuclear arsenal, the lagging U.S. dollar started climbing and the Prince of Wales announced his engagement.”


"Read full report (subscription required)"
Critics warn that informed people, the cornerstone of a democratic society, are in danger as people pay less attention to introducing their citizens to the government and the world around them
"But media critics say celebrity coverage is crowding out legitimate news. As a result, the United States is becoming a country that knows more about the battle of cyber stars than about the battle of Baghdad."
"In fact, they even say that we are born with the habit of caring, which is reflected in our high attention to celebrities."
"Some observers say it's harmless to focus on the lives of celebrities."
"Americans have an insatiable appetite for celebrity news, and the more interesting it is, the better - from Brad and Jennifer's breakup to Michael Jackson's trial to Martha Stewart's imprisonment."
"But the serious readers of the news agency are most interested in Charles and Camilla."
"In early February, North Korea's leaders boasted about their nuclear arsenals, the laggard dollar began to climb, and the prince of Wales announced his engagement."



Number  546
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Looks like the "Bodak Yellow" queen has finessed herself another one.”
“"I went from dollar bills, now we poppin' rubber bands / Bruno, sang to me while I do my money dance," she raps on the intro.”
“But this is all Cardi's show to steal.”
“(You half expect Jenny from the Block, a former Fly Girl, to come out doing the Cabbage Patch.)”
“...resident dance crew The Fly Girls...”
“Hev of course penned and performed the classic theme song to the Keenan Ivory Wayans sketch comedy series In Living Color which serves as inspiration for the look and theme of the video all the way down to show s...”
“Mars lifts a page straight out of New Jack Swing producer Teddy Riley's sonic playbook and recasts the '90s aesthetic stylized by such New Jack Swing-affiliated artists as Bobby Brown and Heavy D for the video.”
“His "Finesse" remix, featuring Cardi B, is another guaranteed hit from his 2017 album 24K.”
“Bruno Mars has proven time and again it's his prerogative to do what he wants to do — especially when it comes to reigniting the charts with the sounds of '90s funk and R&B.”
“The In Living Color video homage.”


"It seems that queen bodak Huang has dressed herself up again."
"I started with the dollar bill, and now we play the rubber band / Bruno and sing and dance my money dance," she taps in her opening remarks
"But it's all caddy wants to steal."
Half of you expect Jennie on the block, a former flying girl, to come out and make cabbages
“… "The flying girl of the resident Dance Company..."
"Of course, HEV created and performed classic theme songs for Keenan Ivory Wayans' sketch comedy series, using vivid colors as the inspiration for the appearance and theme of the video, all the way up to the show s..."
"Mars turned a page directly from Jack Swain's new producer Teddy Riley's Sonic script, reshaping the aesthetic style of the 1990s, which was designed for video by Jack Swain's new affiliated artists such as Bob Brown and heavy D."
"His" subtle "mix, with caddy B as the leading role, is another guarantee of his 2017 album" 24K. "
"Bruno Mars has proved time and again that it's his privilege to do what he wants to do - especially when he refreshes the charts with the voice of" fear "and" R & B "of the 1990s."
"Live color video salute."



Number  547
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementWatch the entire performance below:Advertisement...”
“A few minutes later, Lamar would take home the Grammy for Best Rap/Sung Performance for his song “Loyalty,” featuring Rihanna.”
“As Lamar rapped, each of the dancers fell to the ground as gunshot sounds played over the performance.”
“...pic.twitter.com/n7CGNiGYlE — Recording Academy (@RecordingAcad) January 29, 2018RELATED: Ryan Seacrest didn’t know what to do when this songstress suffered a wardrobe malfunction during an interviewIn the next part of his performance, Lamar rapped with a solo drummer, and later his dancers returned wearing red hoodies.”
“What a grand opening to the 60th #GRAMMYs from @kendricklamar, @u2, and #DaveChappelle Now sit back and enjoy the show.”
“Please continue.”W-O-W!”
“Sorry for the interruption.”
“And I just wanted to remind the audience that the only thing more frightening than watching a black man be honest in America is being an honest black man in America.”
“I’m Dave Chappelle.”
“#GRAMMYs pic.twitter.com/ILJ3FHou9Q — iHeartRadio (@iHeartRadio) January 29, 2018Bono and The Edge from U2 then came onto the stage as Lamar began performing “DNA.”Chappelle then joined the trio on stage and said “Hi.”


"Advertising, look at the whole show. Below: advertising
A few minutes later, Lamar will take home the Grammy for the best rap / singing performance of his song "loyalty", mainly Rihanna
"When Lamar beat, every dancer fell to the ground with the sound of gunfire in the performance."
“... pic.twitter.com/n7CGNiGYlE -Related report of Recording Academy (@ recordingacad) on January 29, 2018: Ryan Seacrest didn't know what to do, and the female singer had a wardrobe failure during the interview. In the next performance, Lamar sings solo with a drummer, and his dancers come back in red hoodies
"Kendrikrama, U2 and Davy chapel made a good start to the 60th Grammy Awards ceremony. Now sit down and enjoy the show."
"Please continue." W-O-W！”
"Sorry to disturb you."
"I just want to remind the audience that the only thing worse than watching a black man honest in America is to be an honest black man in America."
"I'm Dave chapley."
"Grammy Awards pic.twitter.com/ILJ3FHou9Q -IHeartRadio (@ iHeartRadio) on January 29, 2018, when Lamar began to perform DNA, the edge of Ono and U2 band stepped onto the stage. Then Chappelle joined the trio on stage and said "Hi"



Number  548
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Brooklyn and Chloe called it quits late last year, Madison split from ex boyfriend Jack Gilinsky more recently after dating for almost three years.”
“(Image: Splash News)The famous teenagers appeared to be very comfortable in each other's company as they posed for pictures at The Ivy Soho Brasserie.”
“The singer and aspiring photographer fueled romance rumours when they were spotted out and about in Los Angeles last Friday and it was also reported that the brunette had even met Brooklyn's mum Victoria.”
“However, 18-year-old Madison has now set the record straight, saying the pair are just friends.”
“She told People: "I’m very much single and not ready to mingle.”
“I’m very much focused on my career.”
“I’m just 18 - just trying to navigate my life.”
“And I’m having fun.”
“There are obviously boys that I can crush on and stuff.”
“But I’m very much single.”(Image: Getty Images Europe)She continued: “I’ve known Brooklyn for years, we’ve been really close and as we’ve gotten older - and I’m newly out of a relationship, we’re definitely like crushing on each other.”


"Although Brooklyn and Chloe announced their breakup at the end of last year, Madison recently broke up with his ex boyfriend Jack gillinsky after nearly three years of dating."
"(photo source: splash News) these famous teenagers seem to be very comfortable in each other's company when they take a group photo at the Ivy Soho Hotel."
"When the singer and aspiring photographer were found in Los Angeles last Friday, there were romantic rumors that the brunette had even met Brooklyn's mother Victoria."
"However, 18-year-old Madison has now clarified that, saying they are just friends."
"I'm very single and not ready to socialize," she told people
"I'm very focused on my career."
"I'm only 18 years old and I just want to control my life."
"I had a good time."
"Obviously, I can be obsessed with some boys."
"But I'm very single." (photo source: Getty Images Europe) she added: "I've known Brooklyn for many years, and we're really close, and as we get older - I've just come out of a relationship, we must be squeezing each other."



Number  549
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch part of Baldwin's interview with Stern above.”
“"I've got to do Match Game!”
“When Stern brought up the idea of Baldwin running for president as Trump, the 30 Rock alum doubled down on his prior statement: "If I ran for president, I would win!”
“Howard and I have to go to Nick & Toni's,'" he said, garnering laughter from Stern.”
“"I'm gonna take the summer off and be like, 'Listen everybody, I'm going to East Hampton to relax.”
“Baldwin then slipped into his caricature of Trump and revealed his plans to take the summer off should he ever be elected.”
“"You tell me."”
“...he jokingly asked Stern.”
“The presidency of the United States or Match Game?"”
“Plus, his wife, Hilaria Baldwin, "would kill" him.”


"Look at part of Baldwin's interview with stern."
"I'm going to race!"
"When stern came up with the idea of Baldwin running for president as trump, the 30-year-old rock alumnus doubled his previous statement:" if I run for president, I will win! "
"Howard and I have to go to Nick Toni's," he said, drawing Stern's laughter
"I'm going to have a summer vacation and say, 'listen, I'm going to East Hampton to relax.'
"Baldwin then stepped in to his satire of trump and revealed his plans to take the summer vacation if he was elected."
"You tell me."
“…… He asked stern jokingly
"The president of the United States or the game?"
Besides, his wife Hillary Baldwin will kill him



Number  550
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Happy birthday Orlando!”
“Bloom celebrated his birthday with his father Colin at his side, who couldn’t have looked more proud, cheering his son from the sidelines.”
“The Brit went all out with the car racing themed birthday blowing out candles of his epic race car cake.”
“Bloom might have been a touch star-struck as he suited up to take a photo with Alejandro Agag, founder and CEO of Formula E as well as legendary French Formula One driver Alan Prost.”
“The Lord of the Rings star came to do more than watching, as he got behind the wheel of one of the high-speed electric race cars.”
“Orlando Bloom celebrated his 41st birthday with Leonardo DiCaprio by attending the third race of the Formula E season in Marrakesh, Morocco on Friday.”


"Happy birthday, Orlando!"
"Bloom celebrated his birthday with his father Colin. He looked very proud and cheered for his son."
"The Englishman went all out to blow out the candles on his epic racing cake for the racing theme birthday."
"Bloom may be a touch star because he puts on his clothes and takes a picture with Alejandro Agag, founder and CEO of formula e, and legendary French formula one driver Alan Prost."
"The star of the ring is behind the wheels of a high-speed electric car, not just to watch the race."
"Orlando Bloom celebrated his 41st birthday with Leonardo DiCaprio for the third game of the formula e season in Marrakech, Morocco on Friday



Number  551
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Switch to Latino Español Feedback Help en Choose a language United States English en United States español es Music Reviews Music News Video Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية”
“Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines...”
“...msn back to msn home entertainment powered by Microsoft News Skip To Navigation Skip To Content Sign in Change language content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
At present, in each of 1575 chechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechechecheche Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut Cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut cut
"English polskapolski portugal portuguese Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomi Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rk è e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States English American Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ≤ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ P ιιιι P Чхישש㪞ביתاااااالبببببةااا
"Germany - Germany - Spain - France - France - India - English - India - India - India - India - New Zealand - Norway - Norway - Bokmal international version of the ú sterreich Deutsch per ú Espa? Ol Philippines..."
“… MSN return to MSN family entertainment from Microsoft support news jump to navigation jump to content login change language content Africa French French French Latin America Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canada English Canada French Cesc Republic Chile Spanish Colombia Spanish Denmark … “



Number  552
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be gone, but you'll never be forgotten.”
“"Sometimes, I have a hard time recognizing myself."”
“We may not have known him for long, but he certainly made an impact on us while he was here.”
“Farewell, King Stache.”
“Earlier today, Henry Cavill shaved off his beloved mustache, the source of so much controversy late last year.”
“As a tribute, the Justice League and Mission Impossible star posted a video on his Facebook page to honor his former facial hair.”
“The video features Cavill in a bath robe telling fans that King Stache is indeed gone.”
“He shared it to his page with the simple message "#ShavedButNotForgotten."”
“You can watch the full video above!”
“"I know, it's hard to recognize me without King Stache," Cavill said to the camera, before turning his attention to himself in the mirror.”


"You may be gone, but you will never be forgotten."
"Sometimes it's hard for me to recognize myself."
"We may not have known him for a long time, but he certainly made an impact on us when he was here."
"Good bye, King Stacy."
Earlier today, Henry Carville shaved his beloved beard, which is why so much controversy arose at the end of last year
"As a tribute, the Justice League and mission impossible star posted a video on Facebook commemorating his previous facial hair."
"In the video, Carville wears a bathrobe and tells fans that King Stacy has indeed left."
"He shared it on his website and wrote a simple message," shared but not forgotten. "
"You can watch the full video above!"
"I know it's hard for the king to recognize me without Stacy," Carvel said to the camera, turning his attention to himself in the mirror



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“The rapper's last album was 2013's The Marshall Mathers LP 2, the follow-up to 2000's super-smash The Marshall Mathers LP.”
“Back again... That's why they call him Slim Shady after all.”
“Eminem has now revealed that his new album is called Revival, and has also announced that it'll hit shelves on December 15.”
“Including his previously released track 'Walk on Water' featuring Beyoncé, the record has 19 new tracks in all.”
“Dave J Hogan Getty ImagesRelated: Elton John once got a diamond-covered sex toy from EminemEminem has collaborated with Ed Sheeran, Pink, Alicia Keys, Skylar Grey, Kehlani and Phresher for the LP.”
“He shared the artwork for his new album on Twitter, along with the caption: "12/15."”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“12/15 pic.twitter.com/zUCLSbY8mN — Marshall Mathers (@Eminem) December 5, 2017Last month, Eminem won Best Hip-Hop Act at the MTV EMAs, even though he hasn't actually put out a new record for four years.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"The rapper's last album is a follow-up to Marshall Mathers in 2013 and super smash Marshall Mathers in 22000."
"Back again... That's why they call him slim shady. "
Eminem revealed that his new album is called Renaissance and announced that it will be on sale on December 15
"Including his previous release of" walking on the water "with Beyonce as the protagonist, this record has 19 new tracks."
Photo related to Dave J. Hogan Getty: Elton John once got a diamond covered toy from Amy nanonam that has worked with edhiran, pink, Alicia key, Skyla gray, kelani and Fraser LP
He shared the work of his new album on twitter with the title: "12 / 15"
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
“12/15  pic.twitter.com/zUCLSbY8mN -Marshall Mathers (@ Eminem) December 5, 2017 last month, Eminem won the best hip-hop performance award at MTV EMAS, although he hasn't set a new record in four years. "



Number  554
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Kanye West goes on Twitter rant about the 2016 Grammys...”
“West’s wife, Kim Kardashian, applauded her husband’s efforts with Odom in an episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“And he’s showing his sentimental side.”
“The 21-time Grammy winner shared a photo of himself with Khloé Kardashian’s ex-husband, Lamar Odom, from 2016 on Sunday, April 15.”
““My favorite moment of walking into MSG to play Saint Pablo,” West, 40, captioned the photo.”
““I used to go to the hospital and play Lamar the album when he was learning to walk and talk again.”
“Then we walked into the arena together.”Former NBA player Odom, 38, was hospitalized in October 2015 after he was found unconscious in a Nevada brothel.”
“He made his first public appearance alongside West at his February 2016 Yeezy Season fashion show release party in New York.”
“West’s sister-in-law Khloé married Odom in 2009 and filed for divorce in 2013.”
““Kanye really felt we can cure him through music, like we can get him to talk,” explained the 37-year-old Selfish author in 2016.”


"Related report: Kanye West is hyping the 2016 Grammy Awards on twitter..."
"West's wife, Kim Kardashian, praised her husband's cooperation with Odom in follow Kardashian."
"He shows his sentimental side."
"The 21 time Grammy winner shared a photo of 2016 with her ex husband, Lamar Odom, on Sunday, April 15."
West, 40, wrote in the title of the photo: "my favorite moment is when I walk into Weiqian and play San Pablo."
"Before Lamar learned to walk and talk, I went to the hospital to play albums."
"Then we went into the arena together." Odom, a 38 year old former NBA player, was hospitalized in October 2015 after being found unconscious in a Nevada brothel
"He made his first public appearance with West at the New York yeezy season fashion show launch party in February 2016."
"West's sister-in-law, heloe, married Odom in 2009 and filed for divorce in 2013."
"Kanye really thinks we can cure him with music, just as we can make him talk," the 37 year old selfish writer explained in 2016



**Something goes wrong**
“Rising artists often claim to play pubs like they’re in Wembley Stadium: Ed Sheeran plays a stadium-sized version of a pub gig, but, undeniably, it works.”
“Thinking Out Loud may be schmaltzy, but along with the wildly catchy grooves of Sing and the tropical house-ish Shape of You it rightfully generates a sea of swaying arms.”
“He was more fresh-faced and less bearded, but was already purveying his now ubiquitous, one-size-fits-all mix of folk, soul, rap and bantz, urging the railway passengers to sing along and “make a circle”.”
“In a staggeringly ironic comment to camera he says My music doesn t really hit everyone otherwise I d be a lucky man Eight years later he is that lucky man and then some and the only real change is...”
“...the size of the audience...”
“A total of 200 000 people will see the creator of the fastest selling album by a male artist ever 2017 s AKA Divide in Manchester alone over four nights on the northern leg of the UK s biggest ever...”
“...solo tour...”
“There are huge screens, a camera follows his grinning fizzog from the bowels of the stadium to the stage and there is a bloke on hand to pass him his pre-tuned acoustic guitars.”
“But otherwise, not much has changed since St Pancras.”
““It’s just me, this guitar and this loop pedal,” explains the everybloke.”


"Budding artists often claim that they play bars at Wembley Stadium, just like they do at Wembley Stadium: ed Sheeran plays a stadium sized bar concert, but there's no denying that it works."
"It may be foolish to think aloud, but with the wild catchy melody of the song and your tropical cottage like figure, it just gives birth to a sea of waving arms."
"His face is fresher and his beard is less, but he has mixed his now ubiquitous, one size fits all ballads, soul, rap and Banz together, urging railway passengers to sing together and" circle "
"In an amazing satirical comment shot, he said that my music didn't really hit everyone, otherwise I would be a lucky man. Eight years later, he was the lucky man, and then some and the only real change was..."
“… The size of the audience... "
"A total of 200 thousand people will watch the fastest selling album ever created in Manchester by a male artist in the north section of the largest album ever made in the UK, the creator of which has 4 nights in Manchester alone..."
“… Personal tour... "
"There's a huge screen, a camera follows him from the stadium grinning hiss to the stage, and a guy hands him a pre tuned acoustic guitar."
"But beyond that, nothing has changed since St Pancras."
"It's just me, this guitar and this circular pedal," everybloke explained



**Something goes wrong**
“I hope it continues that way.'”
“I’ve had a very exciting life.”
“The 44 year old siren looked to be in a party mood when she posed with Lewis Hamilton and Swizz Beats at the 2017 Harper ICONS party in New York on September 8 In early September Heidi was by her ex husband Seal s side as she threw a big...”
“No Vito here!”
“Friends are wondering if this could possibly be the end?'”
“'She was also seen with Lewis Hamilton at the the Harper's Bazaar event.”
“'Heidi's been spending lots of time partying with her friends,' the source told DailyMail.com.”
“And when the star attended the Harper's Bazaar Icons event in NYC the next day, she was not with Vito, who is the son of artist Julian Schnabel.”
“...in Vegas on Friday right The mother of four arrived in Manhattan on September 7 and headed to a hotel rather than staying with her long term love at his property in the city...”
“On her own The leggy wonder posed with David Spade on Saturday in Las Vegas at the 2017 iHeartRadio Music Festival at T Mobile Arena New friends Klum also posed with Jennifer Lopez and manager Benny Medina Just fine on her own The Vogue model at the Emmys left and...”


"I hope it goes on like this."
"My life is wonderful."
"On September 8, at the 2017 Harper idol party in New York, 44 year old sea demon posed with Lewis Hamilton and Switz Bates. Heidi stood beside her ex husband seal and left a big one behind..."
"There's no Vito here!"
"My friends want to know if this could be the end?"
"She was also seen with Lewis Hamilton at the Harper fair."
"Heidi spent a lot of time gathering with her friends," the source said in the daily mail
The next day, when the star attended the Harper fair idol in New York, she was not with Vito, the son of artist Julian Schnabel
“…… In Vegas on Friday, the mother of four arrived in Manhattan on September 7 and went to a hotel instead of staying with her longtime lover in his property in the city... "
"On Saturday, leggy wonder took a group photo with David spade at the 2017 iHeart radio music festival in T Mobile arena, Las Vegas. New friend Klum also took a group photo with Jennifer Lopez and manager Benny Medina. The vogue model on the Emmy left, and then..."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“ITVFor some reason, Gordon saw this as Jamie trying to one-up him on the number of children they have, and even as a slight against his wife Tana, who sadly had a miscarriage at five months last year.”
“Though given his insistence that he's taking the "high ground", we're not sure if this latest attempt to defuse their ongoing war will be any more successful than his last.”
“"What I said was fairly grown-up and reasonable," Jamie told the Radio Times about his last intervention.”
“"I don't want personal spats in public with someone that, to be honest, I don't even really know any more… I don't think he liked me taking the high ground.”
“Dave M. Benett Getty Images"I think that's basically it.”
“So, I'm going to take the high ground now and say I wish him all the best, and all success.”
“"Good luck to him.”
“But we have both got kids, and I don't know what sort of example we're setting if we're arguing like we're in the playground."”
“The last time Jamie brought up the fact that both men are dads, it didn't go down too well.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"For some reason, Gordon thinks it's Jamie's attempt to outnumber him in the number of children, and even his contempt for his wife, Tana, who miscarried five months ago."
"Despite his insistence on occupying the 'commanding heights', we are not sure whether this latest attempt to defuse their ongoing war will be more successful than his last."
"What I said was quite mature and reasonable," Jamie told the radio times of his last intervention
"I don't want to have a personal quarrel in public with someone I don't even know very well I don't think he likes me to have the upper hand. "
"Dave M. Bennett Getty" I think that's basically it
"So now I'm going to stand on high and wish him all the best, all the best."
"Good luck to him."
"But we all have children, and if we quarrel like we do on the playground, I don't know what kind of role models we are setting."
"The last time Jamie came up with the fact that they were both dads, it wasn't so good."



**Something goes wrong**
“Dura J Balvin Willy William Mi Gente Jennifer Lopez ft DJ Khaled Cardi B Dinero Luis Fonsi Demi Lovato Échame La Culpa Maluma Felices los 4 Shakira ft Maluma Chantaje...”
“At The Disco Say Amen Saturday Night Thirty Seconds to Mars Walk On Water BEST HIP HOP Cardi B ft 21 Savage Bartier Cardi The Carters APES T Drake God s Plan J Cole ATM Migos ft Drake Walk It Talk It Nicki Minaj Chun Li BEST LATIN Daddy Yankee...”
“The new mother, who welcomed daughter Kulture with her rapper husband, Offset, earlier this month, is up for Artist of the Year and Best New Artist.”
“Also, her “Finesse” remix with Bruno Mars received five nominations, including Video of the Year and Song of the Year.”
“Her song, “Bartier Cardi,” featuring 21 Savage, is up for Best Hip-Hop and Best Collaboration, and Cardi is also nominated in the Best Latin category for her “Dinero” collaboration with Jennifer Lopez and DJ Khaled.”
“Beyonce and Jay-Z are second with eight nominations for "Apes**t" from their "Everything Is Love" album, including Video of the Year and Best Collaboration.”
“Childish Gambino and Drake each received seven nominations, and Bruno Mars is up for six awards.”
“Other top contenders include Ariana Grande and Camila Cabello with five nods apiece and Ed Sheeran, Khalid and Young Thug with four each.”
“The 2018 VMAs will air live from Radio City Music Hall in New York City on Monday, Aug. 20 at 9 p.m. ET/PT.”
“You can vote for your favorite artist now through Friday, Aug. 10 via VMA.MTV.com.”


“Dura J Balvin Willy William Mi Gente Jennifer Lopez ft DJ Khaled Cardi B Dinero Luis Fonsi Demi LovatoÉchame La Culpa Maluma Felices los 4 Shakira ft Maluma Chantaje…”
"At the disco, say Amen Saturday night 30 seconds to Mars water walk best hip-hop caddy b-foot 21 savage Battier caddy cat ape t Drake God's plan J Cole ATM migos foot Drake walk it talk it Nicky minaji Chunli best Latin dad Yankee..."
Earlier this month, the new mother, along with her rapper husband, offset, ushered in her daughter, Kulture, who will win the best artist and best newcomer of the year
In addition, her "clever" mix with Bruno Mars won five nominations, including video of the year and song of the year
"Her song" bartier Cardi "won the best hip-hop and best collaboration awards with 21 savage as the protagonist. Cardi was also nominated for best Latin for her collaboration with Jennifer Lopez and DJ Khaled's" dinero. "
"Beyonce and Jay-Z came in second with eight nominations for" ape * * t "in" everything is love, "including best video of the year and best collaboration."
"The childish Gambino and Drake won seven nominations respectively, and Bruno Mars won six awards."
"Other top competitors, including Ariana grand and Camilla Cabello, each got five nods, while ed Sheeran, Khalid and the young mob each got four nods."
"The 2018 Vmas will be broadcast live on Monday, August 20, at 9 p.m. EST at the New York City Broadcasting City Concert Hall."
"You can vote for your favorite artist now until Friday, August 10 VMA.MTV.com .”



**Something goes wrong**
“Leave us alone.”Family friend Kaley Katz worked to shut down the criticism, telling PEOPLE that the accusations of racism are “rumors” and that it’s not true that Keaton is the target of bullying because he used a racial slur.”
“They call me ugly.”
“The 11-year-old and his mother, Kimberly Jones, appeared on British talk show This Morning on Thursday where they said they aren’t sure when Keaton will return to Horace Maynard Middle School in Maynardville, Tennessee.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I actually haven’t been to school,” he said.”
“He added of his bullies: “Why do you bully?”
“What’s the point of it?”
“It makes me feel awful Image zoom Credit This Morning ITV Kimberly said that Keaton expressed that he didn t want to return even to the middle school even when the whole world wanted to come and eat lunch with him I ve struggled anyway especially being this close to...”
“Christmas break but after seeing how big it got I mean it just seems like maybe we should let it die down a little bit before we made any decisions so that we could kind of have a reality of what life is gonna be like she continued...”
“Image zoom Credit: Love What Matters/FacebookKeaton, of Knoxville, captivated the Internet earlier this month after a video uploaded by his mother showed the boy in tears as he lamented the bullying he’s endured at school.”


"Leave us alone." Kelly Katz, a friend of his family, tried to calm down the criticism, telling people that the accusation of racism was "rumor", and that Keaton was the target of bullying because he used racial slander, which was untrue
"They call me ugly."
"Keaton, 11, and his mother, Kimberly Jones, appeared on the British talk show on Thursday morning and said they were not sure when Keaton would return to Horace Maynard high school in maynarville, Tennessee."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I haven't actually been to school," he said
He added: "why do you bully people?"
"What's the point?"
"This morning, ITV Kimberly said that Keaton said he didn't even want to go back to high school. Even if the whole world wanted to come to lunch with him, I still felt very uncomfortable, especially when I was so close to him..."
"Christmas holiday, but after seeing how big it is, I mean, it seems we should calm it down a little bit and then make any decisions so that we can have a real life of what it will be like," she continued
Earlier this month, Facebook Keaton of Knoxville saw a video posted by his mother that showed the boy lamenting his bullying at school, and his face was full of tears



**Something goes wrong**
“...issue of PEOPLE on stands Friday Image zoom Credit David Burton Ultimately it wasn t one of them who broke things off says the source noting that despite the split Booth and Bristowe are on good terms...”
“Due to the nature of how we met our relationship has always been very public and we have enjoyed sharing it with all of you but we ask that you respect our decision and our privacy at this time For more on Kaitlyn and Shawn pick up this week s...”
“Even though we are parting as a couple, we’re very much committed to remaining friends and we will continue to support each other.”
“This difficult decision comes after thoughtful, respectful consideration.”
“Image zoom Shawn Booth and Kaitlyn Bristowe | Credit: Walter McBride/GettyThey announced that they’d ended their engagement Friday in an exclusive statement to PEOPLE: “After three incredible years, we have decided to go our separate ways.”
“Booth owns a gym in Nashville, and Bristowe has a podcast, Off the Vine, a scrunchie line called Dew, and is working on her music career and a wine label.”
“But it didn’t seem like they were on the same page.”The couple’s busy schedules was also a factor.”
““Kaitlyn wants to be married and have kids.”
““It’s only natural to think about the next steps when you’ve been together for three years,” the source tells PEOPLE in this week’s issue, on stands Friday.”
“Still, wedding plans never got off the ground.”


“… The man in question in the stands last Friday image zooming credit David Burton was not one of them who broke something, said the source, although the split between booth and Bristol was in good condition
"Because of the nature of how we know each other, our relationship has always been very open, and we are happy to share it with you, but we ask you to respect our decisions and our privacy. At this time, more about Caitlin and Sean will follow this week's..."
"Although we will be separated as a couple, we are very committed to maintaining our friendship and we will continue to support each other."
"This difficult decision was made after careful and respectful consideration."
Photo: Sean booth and Kaitlin Bristow | photo source: Walter McBride / Getty, they announced in an exclusive statement to people on Friday that they had ended their engagement: "after an incredible three years, we decided to go our separate ways."
Booth has a gym in Nashville, a podcast in Bristol, a Scrunchie series called dew, and she's working on her music career and a wine brand
"But they don't seem to be on the same page." The couple's busy schedule is also a factor
"Caitlin wants to get married and have children."
"When you're together for three years, it's natural to think about the next step," the source told people in this week's Friday magazine
"Nevertheless, the wedding plan never started."



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow Randee Dawn on Twitter.”
“Here's to Miss Violet and Miss Scarlet and Miss Fanny carrying on her memory.”
“But maybe there's a more modern version: have it cloned so you get to keep it around a little longer.”
“After all, that's what iconic singer and actress Barbra Streisand did, as she revealed to Variety on Tuesday.”
“When her beloved 14-year-old Coton du Tulear dog Samantha wasn't doing well, she had her cloned ... twice!”
“Samantha died in May 2017, and over the new year Streisand welcomed adorable new pups into her life: Miss Violet and Miss Scarlet, who are clones of Samantha.”
“Before their "mama" passed, Streisand had cells taken from Samantha's mouth and stomach, and ... voila!”
“Adorable fluffy pups that match her DNA.”
“"They have different personalities," she told Variety.”
“"I'm waiting for them to get older so I can see if they have (Samantha's) brown eyes and seriousness."”


"Follow randee dawn on twitter."
"To miss violet, Miss Scarlett and miss Fanny, to carry on her memory."
"But maybe there's a more modern version: clone it so you can keep it longer."
"After all, it's done by iconic singer and actress Barbara Streisand, who told variety magazine on Tuesday."
"When Samantha, her beloved 14-year-old cottondutuler, didn't perform well, she cloned her dog... Twice
"Samantha passed away in May 2017. In the new year, Streisand ushered in her lovely new puppies: Miss violet and Miss Scarlett, who are Samantha's clones."
Before their "mother" died, Streisand took cells from Samantha's mouth and stomach and... Look
"The cute, furry little dog fits her DNA."
"They have different personalities," she told variety
"I'm waiting for them to get older so I can see if they have brown eyes and seriousness."



Number  562
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She got engaged to producer Brad Falchuk in January, and told Good Morning America in May she's enjoying wedding planning.”
“Paltrow split from her husband, Coldplay singer Chris Martin, in March 2014 after 10 years of marriage.”
“It just seems like she was the one that was [expletive] Jay-Z, and now Gwyneth lost her husband, but, like, Beyoncé's still with Jay."”
“"They were, like, friends, and then, like, you don't see Gwyneth Paltrow with Beyoncé anymore.”
“"I feel like she's the one."”
“"I definitely think that Gwyneth Paltrow is 'Becky with the good hair,'" Rose said on Heidi Montag and Spencer Pratt's Make Speidi Famous Again podcast.”
“Rose named Paltrow in an interview Monday.”
“Jay-Z's wife, music superstar Beyoncé, had referred to the rapper's alleged mistress as "Becky with the good hair" in the song "Sorry," which appears on her album Lemonade.”
“Advertisement"[It's] completely absurd and 100 percent false," the rep told People.”
“The 45-year-old actress spoke out through her rep Thursday after Rose suggested Paltrow is "Becky with the good hair," or the woman who reportedly had an affair with Jay-Z.”


She was engaged to producer Brad falchuk in January and told Good Morning America in May that she loved wedding planning
"After 10 years of marriage, Paltrow broke up with her husband, Coldplay singer Chris Martin, in March 2014."
"It seems that she is the one who (curses) Jay-Z. now Gwyneth has lost her husband, but Beyonce is still with Jay."
"They are, like, friends, and then, like, you'll never see Gwyneth Paltrow with Beyonce again."
"I think she's the one."
"I definitely think Gwyneth Paltrow is Becky with beautiful hair," Rose said in Heidi Montague and Spencer Platt's podcast "make speedy famous again."
"Ross mentioned Paltrow in an interview on Monday."
"Jay-Z's wife, music superstar Beyonce, once mentioned that rapper's so-called mistress is" Becky with good hair "in her album" lemonade "I'm sorry."
"Advertising" [it] is totally ridiculous, 100% false, "the representative told people
The 45 year old actress spoke through her representative on Thursday after Ross hinted that Paltrow was "Becky with good hair" or a woman who was reported to have an affair with Jay



Number  563
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We just got more money, it’s a great film and we’re putting it in more theaters.””
“Get over it!”
“In an unexpected last-minute shift, Lionsgate has dropped the John Travolta project Gotti just 10 days before its release.”
“Gotti, a biopic about infamous mobster John Gotti, was sold back to its producers Tuesday, Entertainment Weekly reported.”
“Production company Emmett/Furla/Oasis is expected to seek new distribution, but the movie is unlikely to make its December 15 release date.”
“Former Entourage cast member Kevin Connolly directed the mob drama, and the project also features Travolta’s wife Kelly Preston as Victoria Gotti.”
“While the reasons for the sale remain unclear, this isn’t the first obstacle Gotti has encountered throughout its production.”
“A number of actors have been connected to the project throughout its years of development, including Al Pacino, Lindsay Lohan, and Anthony Hopkins.”
“The film began production in July 2016.”
“Update: On Wednesday, John Travolta, Kevin Connolly, and the producers of Gotti spoke out against reports that Lionsgate dropped the film.”


"We just made more money. It's a great movie. We're showing in more theaters."
"Overcome it!"
"In an unexpected last minute, Lion Gate abandoned the John Travolta project just 10 days before Gotti released it."
Gordy, a biographical film about the notorious thug John Gordy, was sold to producers on Tuesday, Entertainment Weekly reported
"Emmett / Furla / oasis, the production company, is expected to seek new distribution channels, but the film is unlikely to be released on December 15."
"Former actor Kevin Connolly directed the mob show, with Travolta's wife, Kelly Preston, as Victoria Gotty."
"Although the reason for the sale is still unclear, this is not the first obstacle Gotti has encountered throughout the production process."
"During the development of the project, many actors were involved in the project, including Al Pacino, Lindsay Lohan and Anthony Hopkins."
"Production started in July 2016."
Update: on Wednesday, John Travolta, Kevin Connolly and Gotty's producers publicly objected to reports that lion gate had abandoned the film



Number  564
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A child yes, but if there is one thing I have learned from my work it is listen.”
““Desmond is a visionary child - he loves pageantry, drag and the larger queer community.”
“From pregnant women and trans activists to rapper and reality TV star Cardi B, it has long been a champion of inclusivity in both its clothing and casting.”
“However perhaps the most unexpected model to make an appearance on the brand s runway so far is Desmond Napoles a 10 year old LGBT activist and self professed drag kid Walking alongside a varied troupe of models Napoles or as he s better known Desmond is Amazing made his...”
“...catwalk debut wearing an oversized black blazer with a ruffled Elizabethan collar long polka dot nails and his hair slicked across his forehead...”
““Dreams do come true!” he wrote on Instagram.”
““I FEEL A-MA-ZING!!!”
“I am so thankful for all the opportunities today.”
“I am so grateful for the love and support.”After rising to fame two and a half years ago, the Brooklyn-born youngster first caught attention when dancing in a rainbow tutu at the 2015 Pride Parade and has since made quite the name for himself.”
“INDY LIFE Newsletter Be inspired with the latest lifestyle trends every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the INDY LIFE newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like...”


"Yes, kids, but if I learn anything from my work, it's listening."
"Desmond is a visionary child - he likes glamour, procrastination and a larger gay community."
"From pregnant women and cross-cultural activists to rapper and reality star Cardi B, it has always been an advocate of inclusiveness in terms of clothing and actors."
"However, by far, the most unexpected model on the catwalk of the brand may be Desmond Naples, a 10-year-old LGBT activist, who claims to be a procrastinating child, walking side by side with a team of various models, or better known as Desmond is amazing, who makes him..."
“… When he made his debut at the fashion show, he was wearing an oversized black coat, an Elisabeth collar with ruffles, long round nails and hair hanging from his forehead. "
"The dream has come true! "He wrote on instagram."
"I feel very excited!"
"I really appreciate all the opportunities today."
"I really appreciate your love and support." After becoming famous two and a half years ago, the Brooklyn born young man first caught people's attention when he danced in a rainbow skirt at the pride parade in 2015, and has become famous ever since
"Inspired by the latest lifestyle trends every week, Indy life newsletters please enter your email address please enter a valid email address please enter a valid email address registration thank you for registering in Indy life newsletters verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent hope..."



Number  565
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And I love it.””
““The crazy thing is, I was raised by women, and still to this day, I’m totally and completely, 100 percent surrounded by only women!” Johnson said.”
“Dwayne “The Rock” Johnson helped his girlfriend Lauren Hashian multitask in a photo he shared to social media on Sunday.”
“In the image, the 46-year-old actor fed Hashian dinner while she breastfed their baby girl Tiana Gia, born April 17.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Explaining the photo, Johnson wrote, “I’ll handle this business.”“Mama @laurenhashianofficial has her hands full nursing/feeding Baby Tia, so I’m feedin’ mama her dinner.”
“My pleasure,” he continued.”
““So much respect to her and all mamas out there holding it down and running things.”
“Just landed and good to get all my girl’s settled in.”
“Now, I gotta go satisfy my own appetite… Iron Paradise, here I come.”Hashian, 33, and Johnson are also parents to 2-year-old Jasmine Lia.”


"I like it."
"The craziest thing is that I was raised by women. Up to now, I am completely surrounded by women! "Johnson said
"Dwayne" rock "Johnson helped his girlfriend Lauren hashian with multiple tasks in a photo he shared with social media on Sunday
In this photo, the 46 year old actor feeds Hassan's dinner and baby girl Tina Jia, who was born on April 17
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Explaining the photo, Johnson wrote, "I'll take care of it." "Mother @ laurenhasianofficial is busy feeding her baby TIA, so I feed her dinner."
"My pleasure," he continued
"I respect her so much, and all the moms, put it down and get things done."
"Just landed. I'm glad my daughter's settled in."
"Now, I'm going to satisfy my own appetite Iron heaven, I'm here. " Hashian and Johnson, 33, are also parents of mollia, 2



**Something goes wrong**
“He also earned 2 nominations for "Gangs of New York" and "In the Name of the Father."”
“He won Oscars for Best Actor in "Lincoln," "My Left Foot" and "There Will Be Blood."”
“Daniel showed immense range playing a slew of captivating roles.”
“This is a private decision and neither he nor his representatives will make any further comment on this subject."”
“She added, "He is immensely grateful to all of his collaborators and audiences over the many years.”
“Daniel's rep released a statement saying he will no longer be working as an actor.”
“Breaking NewsSir Daniel Day-Lewis -- one of the most iconic actors in the last quarter century with 3 Oscars to his name -- has reportedly quit the biz.”


He also received two nominations for New York gangster and in the name of his father
He won the best actor Oscar for "Lincoln," "my left foot," and "there's going to be blood."
"Daniel plays a series of fascinating roles and shows a huge range."
"This is a private decision and neither he nor his representatives will comment further on this issue."
She added: "over the years, he was very grateful to all the collaborators and audiences."
"Daniel's representative issued a statement saying he would no longer be an actor."
"The latest news is that Sir Daniel Day Lewis is one of the most representative actors in the last 25 years. He has won three Oscars and is reported to have quit the industry."



**Something goes wrong**
“Mom, you taught him well.”
“The Crawford-Gerber crew, all dressed in some form of chic black, posed for a photo while out to dinner.”
“Presley Walker Gerber, Cindy Crawford's 18-year-old son, turned heads at Paris Fashion Week on Saturday, leaving no doubt in our minds that he inherited his mom's modeling chops.”
“Gerber appeared in the Balmain Homme menswear show as part of Paris Fashion Week.”
“Pascal Le Segretain / Getty ImagesAs for Mom herself, she couldn't have been more proud.”
“While Cindy couldn't applaud her son from the front row — for one, she was holding her phone — she made sure to give him a shout-out on Instagram to her 2.8 million followers.”
“The video included an applause emoji in the caption.”
“For Cindy, the not-so-typical family fun continued.”
“After the show, the modeling icon, her son and her daughter, 16-year-old Kaia Gerber, who's also in fashion, hit the town.”
“How they all manage to look so ethereally beautiful in dim restaurant lighting is another question.”


"Mom, you teach very well."
"Crawford Gerber's staff were dressed in some kind of fashionable black and posed for a group photo when they were eating out."
"Last Saturday, Cindy Crawford's 18-year-old son, Presley Walker Gerber, turned around at Paris fashion week and let us have no doubt that he inherited his mother's modeling style."
"Gerber appeared at the Balmain Homme menswear show as part of Paris fashion week."
"Pascal lessegret / Getty ima is very proud of herself as a mother."
"When Cindy can't applaud her son in the front row - for example, she's holding her cell phone - she has to shout to 2.8 million fans on instagram."
"There is a applause expression in the title of the video."
"For Cindy, the less typical family fun continues."
"After the show, the model idol, her son and daughter, 16-year-old Kaia Gerber, also became popular in the fashion world."
"How they can look so elegant and beautiful in the dim lights of the restaurant is another question."



Number  568
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Photo: Getty Images]”
“News that the incident occurred at 6:45 p.m. at the exit of the X2 ride.”
“Blac Chyna is defending herself as a caring mother after she was caught on camera swinging a baby stroller in a public altercation at a Six Flags amusement park on Easter Sunday.”
“The 29-year-old mother of King Cairo and Dream Kardashian—her children with Tyga and Rob Kardashian, respectively—was seen allegedly getting into an argument at Six Flags Magic Mountain in Valencia, Calif.”
“In videos shared on social media, Chyna is seen grabbing a pink stroller and swinging it around wildly.”
“Neither child is seen in the footage, posted by Twitter user AliciaaAngiee.”
“The Tweets have since been deleted.”
“An eyewitness told E!”
“It is not clear what incited the incident.”
“YBN and security reportedly attempted to restrain Chyna from the unidentified person.”


"[photo source: Getty pictures]"
"The incident happened at 6:45 p.m. on the news of the exit of car x2."
"Blac Chyna is defending herself as a loving mother when she is photographed rocking her pram during a public quarrel at six flags amusement park on Easter Sunday."
The 29 year old king of Cairo and the mother of dream Kardashian had a dispute with the children of TEGA and rob Kardashian respectively at Six Flags Magic Mountain in Valencia, California
"In the video shared on social media, you can see Zina grabbing a pink pram and rocking around like crazy."
"Neither child showed up in a video posted by twitter user aliciaa Angie."
"These microblogs were later deleted."
"A witness told me!"
"It is not clear what incited the incident."
"It is reported that YBN and the security department are trying to prevent chener from approaching the unidentified people."



**Something goes wrong**
“Guess, we will have to wait just a few more hours to find that out with the world.”
“To clear all doubt, here’s a quick revision for you on how they met, what they have said about each other and more.”
“Soon, they became good friends and started hanging out regularly.”
“Meghan then interviewed Priyanka for her now-defunct lifestyle blog, The Tig.”
“We just became friends, like two girls would,” Priyanka told People magazine in 2017.”
““We bonded as actors.”
“The two hit it off instantly.”
“They met at the party which was also attended by Viola Davis, Olivia Wilde and more.”
“The Bollywood star and the American actor first met in January 2016 at Elle’s 6th Annual Women in TV Celebration.”
“...be wondering about the connection...”


"Guess what, we'll have to wait a few more hours before we and the world know that."
"To get rid of all the doubts, here's a quick revision to show you how they met, what they said to each other, and so on."
"Soon, they became good friends and began to go out a lot."
Megan then interviewed her for Priyanka's blog "TIG."
"We just became friends, just like two girls," Priyanka told people magazine in 2017
"We are actors."
"It's the same thing at first sight."
They met at the party, and Viola Davis, Olivia Wilde and others also attended the party
"The Bollywood star and the American actor met for the first time at Elle's sixth annual television women's celebration in January 2016."
“… I want to know the connection... "



Number  570
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Speaking to Entertainment Tonight show runner Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa said the identity of Fred Andrew’s shooter will be “The mystery that launches season two”.”
“Season 1 left us at a cliff-hanger when Fred Andrews was shot in front of his son Archie.”
“Due to Ross Butler’s ongoing commitments with Netflix series 13 Reasons Why, the role of Reggie has been recast, with Charles Melton taking on the role.”
“Twenty Seven The Hills Have Eyes Chapter Twenty Eight There Will Be Blood Are there any changes to the Riverdale season 2 cast...”
“Nineteen Death Proof Chapter Twenty Tales from the Darkside Chapter Twenty One House of the Devil Chapter Twenty Two Silent Night Deadly Night Chapter Twenty Three The Blackboard Jungle Chapter Twenty Four The Wrestler Chapter Twenty Five The Wicked and the Divine Chapter Twenty Six The Tell Tale Heart Chapter...”
“Roberto Aguirre Sacasa has been revealing the episode titles through his Twitter and we ve got up to episode 28 Chapter Fourteen A Kiss Before Dying Chapter Fifteen Nighthawks Chapter Sixteen The Watcher in the Woods Chapter Seventeen The Town That Dreaded Sundown Chapter Eighteen When a Stranger Calls Chapter...”
“Any more episode titles?”
“...pic.twitter.com/PXh0HzYsan — Archie Comics (@ArchieComics) July 7, 2017The first episode has already been filmed, and will be called ‘Chapter Fourteen: A Kiss Before Dying’, as confirmed by series developer Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa through his Twitter account.”
“21 more episodes to go!”
“The first episode of #Riverdale Season 2 has finished filming.”


In an interview with Entertainment Tonight host Roberto Aguirre sacasa, Fred Andrew's identity as a shooter will be "the mystery of season two"
"When Fred Andrews was shot in front of his son Archie, the first season put us on the brink of a cliff."
"Thanks to the continued collaboration between Ross Butler and Netflix's" reason 13, "Reggie's role has been reshaped and taken over by Charles Melton."
"Twenty seven mountains have eyes chapter 28 will have blood what's the change of Riverdale's cast in the second season..."
"Nineteen death certificates Chapter 20 stories in the dark chapter 21 devil's house Chapter 22 silent night fatal night Chapter 23 Blackboard Jungle Chapter 24 wrestler Chapter 25 villain and God Chapter 26 chapters about the soul..."
"Roberto Aguirre sacasa has revealed the title of this episode through his twitter. We have reached episode 28 Chapter 14 a kiss on the deathbed Chapter 15 Nighthawk Chapter 16 The Catcher in the woods Chapter 17 the town afraid of sunset Chapter 18 when a stranger calls Chapter 18..."
"Do you have any more titles?"
“... pic.twitter.com/PXh0HzYsan -The first episode of @ archiecomics on July 7, 20177 has been filmed and will be called "Chapter 14: a kiss before death", as confirmed by the series developer Roberto Aguirre sacasa through his twitter account
"21 more episodes!"
"The first episode of Riverdale Season 2 is finished."



Number  571
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fantastic Beasts and the Crimes of Grindelwald will be released in November 2018.”
“Lines are drawn as love and loyalty are tested, even among the truest friends and family, in an increasingly divided wizarding world.”
“In an effort to thwart Grindelwald’s plans, Albus Dumbledore (Jude Law) enlists his former student Newt Scamander, who agrees to help, unaware of the dangers that lie ahead.”
“But, making good on his threat, Grindelwald escaped custody and has set about gathering followers, most unsuspecting of his true agenda: to raise pure-blood wizards up to rule over all non-magical beings.”
“The full synopsis for The Crimes of Grindelwald can be read below:At the end of the first film, the powerful Dark wizard Gellert Grindelwald (Johnny Depp) was captured by MACUSA (Magical Congress of the United States of America), with the help of Newt Scamander (Eddie Redmayne).”
“...of the character is much different than Farrell s and can be seen in the photo below standing beside actress Poppy Corby Tuech who will play Vinda Rosier one of Grindelwald s most trusted followers...”
“Harry Potter creator J K Rowling later published a blog post announcing her support of Depp in the role writing that the filmmakers and I are not only comfortable sticking with our original casting but genuinely happy to have Johnny playing a major character in the movies Depp s version...”
“Depp’s casting was met with scorn from fans, who argued that after allegations arose of Depp’s alleged domestic abuse of ex-wife Amber Heard, he shouldn’t be involved in the film.”
“Depp was cast as Grindelwald in 2016, taking over for Colin Farrell, who technically played the role in 2015’s Fantastic Beasts and Where to Find Them, although he hid under the guise of a man named Graves.”
“Another interesting photo released today gives us a better look at Johnny Depp’s controversial Grindelwald.”


Monster and grindwald's crime will be released in November 2018
"In an increasingly divided wizarding world, love and loyalty are tested, even among the most sincere friends and family."
In order to frustrate Greenwald's plan, Albus Dumbledore (Jude Law) recruits his former student, Newt scamand. He agrees to help, but he is not aware of the danger ahead
"However, Greenwald used his threat to escape from custody and began to gather followers. He had no doubt that his real purpose was to cultivate pure blood witches to rule all non magical creatures."
"A complete summary of Greenwald's crime can be seen below: at the end of the first film, the powerful Dark Wizard Gellert Grindelwald (Johnny Depp) is captured by macusa with the help of newt Scamander (Eddie Redmayne)
“…… This role is very different from Farrell S. as you can see in the photo below, she stands next to actress boby Colby tuich and will play Wenda rossil, one of Greenwald's most trusted followers... "
"Harry Potter creator JK Rowling later published a blog post announcing her support for Depp's role writing, saying that filmmakers and I are not only happy to stick to our original cast, but also really happy that Johnny plays a major role in Depp's version of the film..."
"Depp's cast has been despised by fans, who believe that Depp should not be involved in the film after the accusation of domestic violence against his ex-wife amber appeared."
"Depp took over from Colin Farrell in 2016 in" Greenwald, "who played a role in" the wonder beast "in 2015, but disguised himself as a man named graves."
"Another interesting photo released today gives us a better understanding of Johnny Depp's controversial" Grindelwald. "



Number  572
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(The MTV VMAs would be eventful for her, too: she met her husband-to-be Russell Brand at the ceremony.)”
“Perry, meanwhile, was fresh off a tour backed by her breakthrough hit I Kissed a Girl, and racking up international accolades.”
“Kanye West’s pro-Beyoncé stage invasion at the MTV VMAs, which would still be a live wire for Swift in 2016 – sit tight, we’ll get there – was several months away.”
“July 2009: Taylor Swift shares the loveWe begin in 2009, when Swift was on the rise as a pop star, but was still recognised as a country singer.”
“Strap in.”
“Here’s a complete timeline – and please, let it be complete – of how two queens of the pop world began, maintained and resolved an unspeakably petty, but quite elaborate, dispute.”
“Who needs Game of Thrones?”
“You Need To Calm Down...”
“That s assuming anyway that the Katy Perry Taylor Swift feud which now dates back almost a decade is truly over and that détente was accomplished with only a literal olive branch a plate of baked goods and now a hug at the climax of Swift s new video for...”
“No matter how many partners you share or steal, how many backing dancers you tempt away, how much astonishingly unsubtle shade you throw online… there will always be friendship in the end.”


"(MTV VMA is also an eventful time for her: she met her husband to be, Russell Brand, at her wedding.)
"At the same time, Perry has just finished her tour, and her groundbreaking work" I kiss a girl "has won international acclaim."
"Kanye West's Pro Beyonce onstage invasion on MTV Vmas is still a live broadcast for swift in 2016 - wait and see, we'll get there - a few months to go."
"July 2009: Taylor Swift shared with us the love that began in 2009, when Swift was rising to become a pop star but still recognized as a country singer."
"Fasten your seat belt."
"This is a complete schedule - please let it be a complete schedule - how the two pop stars start, maintain and resolve an unspeakable trivial but rather complex dispute."
"Who needs a power game?"
"You need to calm down..."
"Anyway, it's assumed that Katy Perry Taylor Swift's feud can be traced back to nearly a decade ago, and now it's really over. Relaxation only needs a literal olive branch, a plate of baked goods, and now it can be completed with a hug at the climax of Swift's new video..."
"No matter how many partners you share or steal, how many dances you seduce, how many amazing and ignominious shadows you cast on the Internet There will always be friendship in the end. "



Number  573
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“FROM PEN: Raising Stars Sneak Peek: Meet the Parents Who Raised Ben and Fred Savage...”
““We learned this song the other day,” Carey shared of “Always Be My Baby” at the time.”
“Both “DemKids” — Carey’s only children with ex Nick Cannon — have joined their mom onstage multiple times, including her July 31 show at the Hollywood Bowl in Los Angeles, when they shared the mic to help her with the song’s chorus.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Mariah Carey’s Twins Adorably Steal the Spotlight as Their Mom Receives a Walk of Fame StarMonroe and her twin brother Moroccan Scott have popped up all over Carey’s Instagram account during her tour, which kicked off in late July and concludes Sept. 5 in Seattle.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
““#AlwaysBeMyBaby #RoeRoe,” Carey captioned the adorable re-posted clip recorded by a fan, where she and 6-year-old daughter Monroe both sing her 1996 hit “Always Be My Baby.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The vocal powerhouse took the stage this weekend during a stop on her and Lionel Richie‘s All The Hits tour, enlisting the help of a very special guest voice.”
“Watch Mariah Carey's Daughter Monroe Sing Onstage with Mom - and Nail ItMariah Carey is passing on her musical torch!”
“Mariah Carey and her daughter Monroe were the most adorable pair at Carey's Chicago stop on her All The Hits tour, belting out "Always Be My Baby" togetherShe'll Always Be Her Baby!”


"From pen: raise star peep: meet parents who raised Ben and Frederick savage..."
"We learned this song a few days ago," Kelly shared the song "always be my baby."
"The two 'demkids' -- Kelly and the only child of former Nick Cannon -- have been on stage with their mother many times, including her performance at the Hollywood Bowl in Los Angeles on July 31, when they shared microphones to help her sing songs."
"Related video: Mariah Carey's twins lovingly snatch the spotlight because their mother gets a walk of Fame star Monroe and her twin brother Moroccan Scott pop up in Carey's instagram account. Her tour starts in late July and ends in Seattle on September 5."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Always be my baby # roeroe" Kelly captioned a lovely re released video recorded by a fan who sang her 1996 hit song "always be my baby # roe" with her 6-year-old daughter, Monroe. Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, and celebrity mom blogs? "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"This weekend, at her All-Star tour with Lionel Richie, the powerful singer stepped on the stage with the help of a very special guest voice."
"Look at Mariah Carey's daughter Monroe and her mother singing on the stage. Mariah Carey is carrying her music torch!"
Mariah Carey and her daughter Monroe are the loveliest couple in all of Carey's popular concerts in Chicago, with "always be my baby" together. She will always be her baby



**Something goes wrong**
“The real work started after the show, so I’m really glad I stuck with it.””
“… I have to thank The Voice for everything they’ve done for me.”
“The Voice winner Cassadee Pope announced her engagement to longtime boyfriend Rian Dawson in a sweet post to Instagram on Friday, February 10.”
““WE’RE ENGAGED ❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤,” the 27-year-old singer captioned a photo of the pair smooching, with her impressive diamond ring on full display.”
“Dawson, 29, reposted the same image with the caption, “The love of my life is now OFFICIALLY the love of my life.”
“Never been happier.”
“:).”The pair, who are fellow musicians in the band All Time Low, have been going steady since 2010.”
“Dawson, who drums for the band, is still a little camera-shy, however.”
“In an interview with Taste of Country, Pope explained that though she “begged” her boyfriend to costar with her in her music video for “Summer,” he politely declined.”
“WE’RE ENGAGED ❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤ A post shared by Cassadee Pope (@cassadeepope) on Feb 10, 2017 at 5:59pm PST“I actually begged him to be in the video,” she said in the interview last July.”


"The real work started after the show, so I'm glad I kept going."
"I want to thank the voice for what it has done for me."
"On Friday, February 10, in a sweet post on instagram, dubbing champion Cassady Pope announced her engagement to longtime boyfriend Ryan Dawson."
"We are engaged ❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤ "The 27 year old singer made a headline on a photo of two people kissing, and her impressive diamond ring was fully displayed."
"Dawson, 29, reprinted the same picture with a note," the love of my life is now officially the love of my life. "
"Never been so happy."
The two have been at a low ebb in the band and have remained stable since 2010
"However, Dawson, who plays drums for the band, is still a little afraid of the camera."
In an interview with country taste, Pope explained that although she "begged" her boyfriend to partner with her on her music video summer, he declined politely
"We are engaged ❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤❤  "I really asked him to appear in the video," she said in an interview last July



**Something goes wrong**
“She’s also the queen of pop music and I adore Britney Spears."”
“In an earlier interview, the country singer gushed about the pop legend, saying, "She was also my first concert, she’s a legend.”
“Ballerini hosted the awards show, which aired on Sunday night (April 30), in addition to the medley of Britney classics.”
“Spears went on to thank her fans, who she called "the freakin' best," and her two sons, Sean Preston, 11, and Jayden James, 10.”
“Your support throughout my career has meant so much to me."”
“This is such an honor!”
“What can I say?”
“I want to thank Radio Disney so much for giving me their first-ever Icon Award.”
“"This is such an honor.”
“...the older Spears said upon receiving the Icon Award.”


"She's also the queen of pop music, and I adore Britney Spears."
In an earlier interview, the country singer gushed about the pop legend, saying, "she's also my first concert, she's a legend."
"In addition to the" Britney Spears classic "medley, Ballerini also presided over the award ceremony, which was broadcast on Sunday (April 30) evening."
Spears continues to thank her fans, who she calls "the best freak," as well as her two sons, Sean Preston, 11, and Jaden James, 10
"Your support throughout my career has meant a lot to me."
"What a pleasure!"
"What can I say?"
"I'm very grateful to Disney radio for giving me their first idol award."
"It's a great honor."
“…… Lao spear said when he won the idol award



**Something goes wrong**
“What did Bill O’Reilly do to Bill O’Reilly?”Colbert went on to say that it was “shocking” that the network allegedly knew about O’Reilly’s settlements yet kept him employed for so long.”
“...is exactly the sort of thing you do when you re innocent According to the Times the multi million dollar agreement settled sexual harassment allegations raised by former Fox News legal analyst Lis Wiehl allegedly including repeated harassment a nonconsensual...”
“...names in show biz Colbert began...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Producers like Harvey Weinstein, directors like James Tobak, even former reality show hosts,” he continued, pulling up a picture of President Donald Trump.”
““And of course, former Fox News pundit and scrotum who wished to be a real boy, Bill O’Reilly.”O’Reilly, 68, was fired from the network in April after numerous harassment claims came to light.”
“He reportedly settled with five different women for a total of $13 million.”
“But according to a bombshell New York Times report published on Sunday, O’Reilly settled a sexual harassment suit in January for $32 million — shortly before Fox News offered him a $100 million contract extension.”
“(O’Reilly has called the report “false, defamatory” and “another smear article.”)“We already knew that O’Reilly had previously settled five sexual harassment claims,” Colbert said.”
“Now it s come out that it s an even half dozen because it s being reported that back in January O Reilly made another payout to a woman alleging sexual harassment this one for a record 32 million which...”


"What did Bill O'Reilly do to Bill O'Reilly? Colbert went on to say that it was "shocking" that the network was said to know about O'Reilly's settlement, but let him work for so long
“…… That's exactly what you did when you were innocent. According to the times, the multi million dollar agreement resolves sexual harassment charges filed by former Fox News legal analyst lis wiehl, which are said to include repeated harassment and non official harassment... "
“… In the name of the show business, Colbert began... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Producers like Harvey Weinstein, directors like James Toback, even former reality TV hosts," he continued, taking out a picture of President Donald Trump
"Of course, Bill O'Reilly, a former fox journalist and scrotal expert who wants to be a real boy." O'Reilly, 68, was fired in April on repeated harassment charges
"He is reported to have reached a settlement with five different women for a total of $13 million."
But according to a sensational report in the New York Times on Sunday, O'Reilly settled a sexual harassment lawsuit in January for $32 million - shortly before Fox News offered him a $100 million extension
"We already know that O'Reilly has resolved five sexual harassment charges before," Colbert said
"Now it's out, it's one or even half a dozen, because it's reported that as early as January, O'Reilly made another payment to a woman, accusing a record $32 million of sexual harassment, which is..."



Number  577
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Kate Middleton and Prince William Announce Third Pregnancy!”
“Matt and Angela announced they were expecting their first child in August with multiple adorable Instagram posts.”
“"Until I put them in your hand."”
“"And you were a little bit annoyed with me," she joked to her husband.”
“The mom-to-be admitted she's purchased a few little pink items, including a pair of baby UGG boots with pink bows.”
“Although the baby isn't due until 2018, Angela has already started shopping for her little one.”
“RELATED: 'Timeless' Star Matt Lanter and Wife Expecting First Child -- See Their Adorable Announcement!”
“"I'm gonna have a little princess on my hands."”
“"I can't wait to have a Daddy's girl," Matt, 34, gushed, adding that he would have been happy with a boy or a girl.”
“The two explained how they requested that the gender of the baby be placed in a sealed envelope so they could find out together.”


Related report: Kate Middleton and Prince William announce their third pregnancy
"Matt and Angela have posted several lovely posts on instagram, announcing that they will have their first child in August."
"Until I put them in your hands."
"You're a little angry with me," she joked to her husband
"The mother to be bought some small pink things, including a pair of pink bow baby boots."
"Although the baby won't be born until 2018, Angela has started shopping for her baby."
Related report: "eternal star Matt grant and his wife are looking forward to their first child - watch their lovely announcement!"
"I will have a little princess in my hand."
"I can't wait to have a dad's daughter and he'll be happy with a boy or a girl," Matt, 34, gushed
"The two explained how they asked to put the baby's gender in a sealed envelope so they could find it out together."



Number  578
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She may have only just started her career, but the young model has also appeared on a number of magazine covers, including Vogue, and walked the runway for Burberry, Moschino, Chanel and Valentino.”
“Gerber is following in her mother’s footsteps with a career in modelling, with the teenager making waves at her first New York Fashion Week appearance earlier this year.”
“...i just don’t see the resemblance A post shared by Kaia (@kaiagerber) on Nov 25, 2017 at 12:45pm PSTIn the photo where Gerber poses with her model mother, 51, the similarity between the two is uncanny.”
“Meanwhile, Cindy Crawford’s 16-year-old daughter Kaia Gerber, who like Phillippe bears a striking resemblance to her mother, took to Instagram to jokingly declare “I just don’t see the resemblance”.”
“Cleveland Kyra Kennedy Sylvester Stallone s daughter Sophia Stallone and Larry David s daughter Romy David...”
“A post shared by Ava Phillippe avaphillippe on Sep 18 2017 at 12 09pm PDT Other American celebrity spawn to swan at the ball in the past include Warren Beatty s and Annette Bening s daughter Ella Beatty artist Cy Twombly s granddaughter Maia Twombly Pat Cleveland s daughter Anna...”
“Congrats to the whole BLL team!”
“I am so proud of how hard my mama has worked to showcase the stories and talents of strong women like herself, and I am so happy she's been officially recognized for it.”
“Also making her debut at the shindig this year, reportedly, is Steve Harvey’s 20-year-old stepdaughter, Lori Harvey.”
“Ryan Phillippe was also expected to attend the glamorous event.”


"She may have just started her career, but this young model has also appeared on the covers of magazines such as fashion, and put on the catwalk for Burberry, MOSCHINO, chanel and Valentino."
"Gerber is following in her mother's footsteps as a model, and the girl's debut at New York Fashion week earlier this year caused a stir."
“…… I just didn't see the similarities in the post shared by Kaia (@ kaiagerber) at 12:45 noon on November 25, 2017. In this photo, Gerber and the model's mother, 51, are taken together. The similarities between them are incredible. "
At the same time, Xindi Crawford's 16-year-old daughter, Kaia Gerber, has a striking resemblance to her mother, like Philip. She jokingly declared on instagram that "I just didn't see the resemblance."
"Sophia Stallone, daughter of Cleveland Kayla Kennedy Sylvester Stallone, and ROMMY David, daughter of Larry David..."
"On September 18, 2017, at 12:09 p.m., EVA Philip shared a post on PDT. In the past, other American celebrities were born for Swann at the ball, including Warren Beattie and Ella Beattie, daughter of Annette bening, granddaughter of the artist West tombrey, and Anna, daughter of Maya tombrey pat Cleveland... "
"Congratulations to the whole Bll team!"
"I'm proud of my mother's efforts to show the story and talent of a strong woman like her, and I'm glad that she's officially recognized."
According to reports, Steve Harvey's 20-year-old stepdaughter Lori Harvey also made her debut in shindig this year
"Ryan Phillippe is also expected to attend the event."



**Something goes wrong**
“I was upset, I was angry at times, I felt betrayed.”
“...went through all of the emotions...”
““I thought we were just going to have a nice romantic weekend.”
“Download the SmartNews app on your mobile device and follow PEOPLE for more of the best celebrity and entertainment news!”
“Want to get all of PEOPLE’s best stories when you’re on the go?”
“After having a sit-down conversation with Burnham, Luyendyk Jr. decided to call off his engagement with Kufrin during a weekend trip to Los Angeles.”
““I never thought for a million years that once the going started to get tough that he would throw in the towel and jump ship and say, ‘Oh sorry, I changed my mind.’ I didn’t think we were at that point whatsoever,” says Kufrin.”
““It was an overabundance.”Image zoom Becca Kufrin | Credit: Paul Hebert/ABCBut after filming wrapped and the newly engaged couple returned back to the U.S., Luyendyk Jr. was unsettled with his decision — admitting on the show that he still had feelings for 26-year-old Burnham.”
“There was so much excitement and joy,” she says.”
““I felt like my heart was going to burst because it was just so filled with love to be with him and share that news with our friends and family.”


"I'm sad, sometimes angry, and I feel betrayed."
“… Through all the emotions... "
"I thought we were going to have a romantic weekend."
"Download the smartnews app on your mobile device and follow people to learn more about the best celebrities and entertainment news!"
"Want to get people's best stories on the journey?"
"After sitting down and talking with Burnham, young luyandick decided to cancel his engagement to kuflynn on a weekend trip to Los Angeles."
"For millions of years, I never thought that once the situation became serious, he would give up and jump to another job and say," Oh, I'm sorry, I changed my mind. " I didn't expect us to get there at all, "kuflin said
"Too much." Image zooming Becca kufrin | source: after the shooting of Paul Herbert / Abu bout, the newly engaged couple returned to the United States. Luyandick, Jr. was uneasy about his decision - admitting in the show that he still had feelings for 26 year old Burnham
"There was so much excitement and joy," she said
"I feel like my heart is going to break because when I am with him and share the news with our friends and family, my heart is full of love."



Number  580
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The Total Bellas star, who welcomed daughter Birdie Joe Danielson on May 9, shared new photos from the birth in a YouTube video posted on Wednesday.”
“WATCH: Brie Bella Celebrates First Mother’s Day With Daughter Birdie -- See the Sweet Pic!”
“"I wanted to share some really personal, intimate pictures with you guys of my labor.”
“Something I feel like people don't realize is how hard labor can be, but also is all the people who really support you in labor," Bella told fans in the clip.”
“"My husband [Daniel Bryan] never left my side, which was amazing.”
“All the 21 hours he literally spent right next to me, helped me breathe through contractions, encouraging me."”
“Bella's twin sister, Nikki Bella, also lent her support.”
“"I was induced at 3 a.m. and my sister was there at 7 a.m. and she didn't leave my side," the WWE star revealed.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"On May 9, the star of" Bellas complete "who welcomed his daughter, birdie Joe Danielson, shared a new picture of her birth in a YouTube video released on Wednesday."
"Look: bribella and her daughter birdie celebrate their first mother's Day - look at this sweet picture!"
"I want to share with you some very personal photos of my work."
"What I don't think people realize is how hard it is to deliver, but it also includes all the people who really support your delivery," Bella told fans in the clip
"It's amazing that my husband (Daniel Blaine) never left me."
"The 21 hours he spent with me helped me breathe through contractions and encouraged me."
"Bella's twin sister, Nikki Bella, also supports her."
"I was induced at 3 a.m. and my sister was there at 7 a.m. and she didn't leave me," the WWE star revealed



Number  581
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“—Morgan from Old Navy (@morgan_bowen_) November 29, 2017—abby loves niall (@flower_suits) November 29, 2017”
“It's easy to see why Styles' fans were enamored by his dancing.”
“Frazer Harrison/Getty ImagesIf these pictures aren't doing it for you, watch his dancing for yourself.”
“Theo Wargo/Getty ImagesHe got seriously into it.”
“Theo Wargo/Getty ImagesStyles sang "Only Angel" during the show's finale.”
“He played "Kiwi" first.”
“During the show — which was held in Shanghai, China, and televised on CBS Tuesday night — Styles clearly enjoyed himself while he sang the songs "Kiwi" and "Only Angel" from his recent self-titled album.”
“Harry Styles performed two songs during the Victoria's Secret Fashion Show — and his quirky dance moves stole all the attention away from the models.”
“People on Twitter seemed to love them more than the runway show itself.”
“His funky dance moves really stood out.”


"- Morgan from Old Navy (@ Morgan / u Bowen \) November 29, 2017 Abby loves Niall (@ flower / u suits) November 29, 2017"
"It's easy to understand why fans of styles are obsessed with his dance."
"Fraser Harrison / Getty pictures if these pictures are not for you, you can see his dance for yourself."
"Theo vogo / Getty, she's very serious about it."
Theo Wargo / Getty imagesstyles sang "the only angel" at the end of the show
"He played Kiwi first."
The show, in Shanghai, China, was broadcast on CBS on Tuesday night, and Stiles was clearly happy singing his recent albums of the same name, kiwi and only angel
"Harry stiles performed two songs at Victoria's Secret Fashion Show - his eccentric dance steps stole the attention of the models."
"People on twitter seem to like them more than the runway itself."
"His fashionable steps are really eye-catching."



**Something goes wrong**
“Created by Laurie McCarthy and Stephanie SenGupta, Reign stars Adelaide Kane as Mary, Queen of Scots.”
“Reign is one of two female-centered CW dramas certain to end this season, along with The Vampire Diaries.”
“Its last episode is expected to air in June.”
“Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See AllThe 16-episode final fourth season of Reign premieres on Feb 10, with the period drama occupying the Friday 9 PM slot.”
“Word is that they are prepared to shoot a series closer, and the show will be able to give fans a conclusion to the story of Mary Queen of Scots, which was not the case with 90210.”
“I hear the network and the producers had been having conversations that Season 4 may be the last, so the writers had been crafting this as a possible final chapter.”
“However, in the case of Reign, I hear that the call did not come out of the blue.”
“That is the same timing as the CW’s decision to end 90210 three years ago.”
“The cancellation news comes just as the series is starting filming the Season 4 finale.”
“Reign, from CBS TV Studios, is in production.”


Created by Laurie McCarthy and Stephanie sengupta, played by Adelaide Kane as Queen Mary of Scotland
"Rule" is one of the two female centered CW shows that will end the season, as well as "the vampire diaries."
"The last episode is expected to air in June."
"Prime time panic your pilot and go straight to the series order complete guide to see all 16 episodes of the final season of the reign premiere on February 10, with the period drama occupying the 9pm slot on Friday."
"There's news that they're going to shoot a closer series that will allow fans to come to a conclusion about the story of Queen Mary of Scotland, which is not the case with 90210," he said
"I've heard that TV stations and producers have been discussing that the fourth season may be the last, so the writers have been elaborating this season as a possible last chapter."
"However, in the case of rule, I heard it was not a sudden call."
"This is the same time that CW decided to terminate 90210 three years ago."
"The cancellation came at a time when the show was beginning to film its fourth season finale."
"Ruiwei from CBS TV studio is in production."



Number  583
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Clarkson tweeted in February 2016: “Trying 2 not say anything since I can’t say anything nice about a person … so this is me not talking about Dr. Luke.””
“Just last year, the Idol alum offered her own negative experience with the producer.”
“On Tuesday, the American Idol alum nonchalantly shut down a body-shaming comment on Twitter.”
““Thank u 2 every person in service 4 protecting all of us and cheers to every person who fought for us to experience freedom & independence,” Clarkson tweeted on the Fourth of July.”
“While most of her followers responded with their own stories of family members or loved ones in the armed forces, or tweeted their thanks to Clarkson for her sweet message, one person seized the opportunity to offer their non sequitur opinion.”
“Thank u 2 every person in service 4 protecting all of us and cheers to every person who fought for us to experience freedom & independence ?”
“— Kelly Clarkson (@kelly_clarkson) July 5, 2017“You’re fat,” the troll in question tweeted, to which Clarkson had a ready response.”
““… and still fucking awesome,” she replied with a winking emoji.”
“The original user’s tweet has since been deleted.”
“….and still fucking awesome ?”


Clarkson tweeted in February 2016: "I try not to say anything because I can't say anything good to a person So it's not that I'm talking about Dr. Luke. "
"Just last year, the idol alumnus also mentioned his negative experience with the producer."
"On Tuesday, American Idol alumni casually shut down a comment on twitter that insulted their bodies."
Clarkson tweeted on July 4: "thank you to every soldier who protects us, and to everyone who struggles for our freedom and independence."
"When most of her followers use their own stories to respond to their families or relatives in the army, or to thank Clarkson on twitter for his sweet message, one person seizes the opportunity to express their inappropriate opinions."
"To everyone who serves us, to everyone who strives for our freedom and independence?"
"- Kelly Clarkson (@ Kelly ï u Clarkson) July 5, 2017" you're fat, "the troll tweeted that Clarkson had a long response to this."
“…… It's still damn great, "she replied with a wink
"The original user's microblog was later deleted."
“… Or is it so damn good? "



Number  584
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The actress’s marriage to Will Smith has been tabloid fodder for years, and when she visited Stern, the talk show host asked Smith to clarify her previous comments about the pair being in an open relationship.”
“"Stern’s second guest was Jada Pinkett Smith, who also gave an extremely candid interview.”
“And Larry [David] went 'Ka-bang!'”
“"Julia [Louis-Dreyfus] said, 'Don't you wanna just kill her?'”
“Alexander then recalled how the rest of the cast shared his sentiment.”
“"We could do the most horrible things to her," Alexander said, "but the audience was still on my side."”
“I love her," Alexander told Stern, but explained that, like his Seinfeld character, he didn’t know how to play off of her.”
“"The actress is this wonderful girl.”
“Alexander explained that the reason for her sudden departure came down to the actors’ chemistry.”
“Fans will recall that Susan (Heidi Swedberg) died rather unceremoniously while licking “inexpensive envelopes” for their wedding invitations.”


"The actress's marriage to Will Smith has been tabloid material for many years, and when she visited stern, the talk show host asked Smith to clarify her previous comments on the two people's public romance."
"Stern's second guest was Jada pinkert Smith, who was also very candid in the interview."
"Larry (David) went to kapon!"
"Julia said," don't you want to kill her? "
"Alexander then recalled how other actors shared his feelings."
"We can do the most terrible thing to her," Alexander said, "but the audience is still on my side."
"I love her," Alexander told stern, but he explained that, like his song Fei, he didn't know how to play with her
"The actress is a great girl."
"Alexander explained that the reason for her sudden departure was due to the chemistry of the actors."
Fans will remember Susan (Heidi swinberg) licking the "cheap envelope" to prepare for her wedding invitation, and dying rather impolitely



Number  585
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“Demi Lovato on Showing Her 'Sexy' and 'Vulnerable' Side on Tour (Exclusive) This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“So I took a look at my life, and I said, 'Something has to change.”
“And I'm just like my dad.'”
“"I remember thinking, 'This is no longer cute, this is no longer fun.”
“"Yesterday, six years ago, I was drinking vodka out of a Sprite bottle at nine in the morning, throwing up in the car," she recalled.”
“Embed Code Restart Demi Lovato on Showing Her 'Sexy' and 'Vulnerable' Side on Tour (Exclusive)Lovato then, through tears, walked fans through her sobriety journey.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“"That was so inspirational and so powerful and so meaningful."”
“"The reason I became so open about my story is I know that there are people here tonight that need to ask for help, and I want you to know that it's OK," she continued as the audience cheered.”


Related libraries
"Demi Lovato showed her 'sexy' and 'vulnerable' side at the concert tour (exclusive), and this video is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information."
"So I looked at my life and I said," there are things that have to change. "
"I'm just like my dad."
"I remember thinking," it's not cute anymore, it's not fun anymore. "
"Yesterday, six years ago, I drank vodka from a sprite bottle at nine in the morning and vomited in the car," she recalls
"Demi Lovato showed her 'sexy' and 'vulnerable' side on the tour (exclusive), and then she led her fans through her sober journey with tears in her eyes."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"That's so inspiring, so powerful, so meaningful."
"I'm so open to my own story because I know there's someone here who needs help tonight, and I want you to know it's okay," she continued amid cheers from the audience



Number  586
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...is yet another public institution that needs to be dismantled and rebuilt from its sexy foundations...”
“— not sexy:Blake Shelton looks like the dad in a drug commercial where they list off the side effects at the end while you watch him build a birdhouse.”
“...for its choice of Sexiest Man Alive which is a transparently PR driven exercise often jokingly equated to a best publicist award...”
“Gabe Delahaye gabedelahaye November 15 2017 blake Shelton looks like your middle school bus driver who got fired for buying four loko for the intimidating 8th graders who sit on the back of the bus https t co fQCpg4Xx2g maggie MaggieShmaggie November 15 2017 Of course People is routinely derided...”
“— nascarcasm (@nascarcasm) November 15, 2017Blake Shelton looks like a guy who gets shredded by everyone on Shark Tank for the outrageous valuation he places on his pre-revenue floating “beer cup” that he invented after his wife left him, and it doesn’t get much sexier than that.”
“Blake Shelton looks like a server at a Cracker Barrel in Gatlinburg.”
“For real.”
“— Kaleb Horton (@kalebhorton) November 15, 2017If Blake Shelton is voted #SexiestManAlive then Ray Black Jr. is 2017's most popular driver.”
“— DeShawn (@DeShawnstantine) November 15, 2017Let's set the record straight: Blake Shelton looks like a second-stringer on Justified who gets murdered over a horse crime.”
“...quick to compare Shelton s looks to things that are how can we put this...”


“…… It's another public institution that needs to be demolished and rebuilt on the basis of sexuality... "
"- not sexy: Blake Sheldon looks like a father in a drug ad, they list the side effects at the end of the ad, and you're watching him build a birdhouse."
“… Because it chose the sexiest man, it's a transparent PR driven exercise, often jokingly equivalent to a best PR Award... "
"Gabe delaye Gabe delaye November 15, 2017 Blake Shelton looks like your high school bus driver who was fired for buying four lokos for eighth graders in the back seat of the car. Of course, people are often ridiculed..."
"- nasarcasm (@ nasarcasm) November 15, 2017b, Lake Shelton looks like a man torn apart by everyone in a shark tank, because he has made an outrageous valuation of the pre income floating" beer glass "invented by his wife after she left him, and there is nothing sexier than that."
"Black Sheldon looks like a waiter in a biscuit bucket in Gatling."
"Really."
"- Kaleb Horton (@ kalebhorton) November 15, 2017 if Blake Shelton is selected as' sexy man ', ray black Jr. will be the most popular driver of 2017."
"- on November 15, 2017, deshawnstantine, let's make it clear: Black Sheldon looks like the second special agent of justice magazine who was murdered in a horse case."
“… Tell us what Sheldon looks like and what we should say... "



**Something goes wrong**
“Translucent powder can make a whitehead look shiny and white; instead set your concealer with a fluffy brush dipped in a powder foundation that matches your skin tone.”
“...whitehead GettyStart with a clean, dry face (duh).”
“This might be the least glamorous beauty story you read today, but probably the most useful for all time.”
“Having acne-prone skin has worked to my benefit in two strange ways.”
“One: My prescription retinol doubles for 86ing fine lines and wrinkles, keeping me Dorian Gray young!”
“Two: My zits forced me to become skilled at doing my makeup.”
“Still, even with my many (many, many) years of pimple-masking experience, I’ve only now learned some new techniques from makeup artists on how to cover every type of breakout.”
“When it's a whitehead.”
““It’s really important that your concealer has a dry, thickish consistency — almost like a putty,” says makeup artist Mally Roncal, founder of Mally Beauty.”
“...look tall...”


"Translucent powder can make Whitehead look bright and pale; instead, use a fluffy brush to smear your Concealer on the foundation to match the complexion."
“… White headed people began to use clean and dry faces (duh)
"It may be the most unattractive beauty story you've read today, but it may be the most useful story ever."
"Having acne prone skin has two strange benefits for me."
Number one: my prescription retinol doubles fine lines and wrinkles and keeps Dorian Gray young
"Number two: my acne forces me to make up skillfully."
"Nevertheless, even though I have many years of experience in acne masking, I'm only now learning some new skills from makeup artists on how to cover every type of acne."
"When it's white headed."
"It's very important that your Concealer has a dry, thick consistency -- almost like a putty," says Mally Roncal, founder makeup artist of Mally Beauty.
“… It looks tall... "



Number  588
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Top 10 2017 CMA Awards Moments...”
““High five on this babe," Lambert writes in a comment.”
“...an opinion about the situation...”
“Anderson East and Miranda Lambert have made it clear where they stand on the issue in a social media post.”
“Late Thursday night Nov 9 East posted on social media to explain that he for one is not a fan of Brooks decision I keep a lot of my opinions to myself and respect anyone making music but as a...”
“...person who tries to put on the best and most honest show I can night after night this truly offends me he writes...”
“"I was told country music is three chords and the truth," East adds.”
“Hundreds have commented on East's words, both in agreement with him and in defense of Brooks.”
“Lambert is one of the former.”
“"If you can’t sing then don’t ... It’s better to be honest than to pretend."”


"Top 10 CMA awards in 2017..."
"High five to the baby," Lambert wrote in the comments
“… Views on the situation... "
"Anderson East and Miranda Lambert made clear their position on this issue in their social media posts."
"Late at night on November 9 (Thursday), East published an article on social media explaining that he is not a fan of brooks. I have a lot of opinions about myself and respect any music producer, but as a..."
“… An attempt to put the best and the most honest show I can do every night really offends me, he wrote
"I was told country music was triad and truth," Dong added
"Hundreds of people commented on the words of the East, both in favor of him and in defense of brooks."
"Lambert is one of the former."
"If you can't sing, don't... It's better to be honest than to pretend. "



Number  589
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Oh, man.””
“It s happened before We thought Well Charlie must be someone important Cranston s cousin who was about a year and a half older than he would have been about the same age as Dianne Lake Manson s youngest devotee...”
““Hearing Charles Manson is dead, I shuddered.”
“I was within his grasp just one year before he committed brutal murder in 1969,” the “Breaking Bad” star tweeted Monday.”
“Luck was with me when a cousin and I went horseback riding at the Span Ranch and saw the little man with crazy eyes whom the other hippies called Charlie Cult leader Manson who was convicted along with his Manson...”
“Family followers of killing seven people over two horrific nights in 1969 died Sunday at the age of 83”
“Cranston has previously talked about running into Manson before he and and his crew committed the killings, when Cranston was a 12-year-old growing up in the Canoga Park section of Los Angeles.”
“The future star was riding horses with his teenage cousin at Spahn Ranch a ranch used for filming Western movies and TV shows whose owner George Spahn allowed Manson and his murderous acolytes to live there rent free in exchange...”
“...for performing odd jobs...”
“Cranston and his cousin were checking out their horses when a man in his 20s started yelling Charlie s on the hill Everybody looked around and there was this frantic nervous energy going on and they all jumped on horses...”


"Oh, man."
"This happened before we thought Charlie must be Cranston's cousin, about a year and a half older than Diane Lake Manson's youngest believer..."
"I shudder to hear that Charles Manson is dead."
"I was under his control just a year before he committed the brutal murder in 1969," the "bad" star tweeted on Monday
"I went riding with a cousin to span farm and saw a little man with crazy eyes. Other hippies called him the leader of Charlie cult Manson. He and his Manson were found guilty together. I'm so lucky..."
"The family follower who killed seven people on two terrible nights in 1969 died on Sunday at the age of 83."
"Cranston had previously talked about meeting Manson and his crew before they committed murder, when Cranston was 12 years old and grew up in Canoga Park, Los Angeles."
"The future star was riding with his teenage cousin at span ranch, a ranch used to shoot western movies and TV shows. Its owner, George span, allowed Manson and his cruel assistant to live there for free in exchange for..."
“…… Do odd jobs... "
"Cranston and his cousin were checking their horses when a man in his 20s started shouting Charlie s on the mountain. Everyone looked around. There was this crazy nervous energy going on, and they all jumped on the horse..."



Number  590
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““And thank you @travisbrownemma for choosing me every day forever Related Articles...”
“”Thank you @thisisbabe @heeezooo @alejandroperazastyle for flying to the middle of the the Pacific Ocean to help me get ready,” she said before adding an adorable shout-out to her husband.”
“The athlete called in her beloved glam squad to Hawaii to help her primp ahead of her intimate backyard wedding to MMA fighter Travis Browne.”
“Her goal, while using longtime makeup artist Hee Soo, was to put forth a fresh, barely-there makeup look.”
““She really didn’t have a lot on,” Soo told E!”
“News this week.”
““She is an athlete.”
“They tend to have really beautiful skin because they sweat and work out so much.”
“Your natural sweat cleans out your pores.”Along with her no-frills wedding, Rousey wanted a similar vibe for her hair and makeup.”
“The bride, who looked resplendent in a Galia Lahav couture gown, opted for a simple textured bun crafted by her longtime hairstylist Abraham Esparza before sitting down with Soo.”


"Thank you @ Travis brownema for choosing my daily and forever related articles..."
"Thank you@ thisisbabe@heeezooo@alejandroperazastyle Fly to the middle of the Pacific to help me get ready, "she said, and then said a lovely word to her husband
"Before her intimate wedding in the backyard with MMA boxer Travis Browne, the athlete called her beloved Graeme team to Hawaii to help her dress up."
"Her goal is to show a fresh, barely make-up look when using long-term makeup artist Xizhu."
"She really doesn't wear much," Sue said
"This week's news."
"She's an athlete."
"They tend to have very beautiful skin because they sweat and exercise a lot."
"Your natural sweat cleans your pores." With her humble wedding, Lucy hopes her hair and makeup will have a similar atmosphere
"The bride looks resplendent in a Galia lahav dress. She chooses a simple bun carefully made by long-term hairstylist Abraham Esparza, and then sits down with Sue."



Number  591
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Todd Williamson /Invision/AP Images]”
“But 12 years later, amid death, divorce, and a whole lot of drama, only Alex and Meredith are left from the original friend group.”
“But does that mean late doctor George O’Malley will follow in Denny’s footsteps for the upcoming Grey’s Anatomy 300th episode?”
“Not exactly.”
“As the 14th season of the Grey’s Anatomy embarks on a major milestone for the show, producers will bring back three dearly departed docs for the ABC medical drama’s 300th episode—but not by bringing back the original actors.”
“As part of a tribute to Grey’s Anatomy’s long history, the 300th episode will pay tribute to past doctors George O’Malley, Izzie Stevens, and Cristina Yang (played by T.R.”
“Knight, Katherine Heigl, and Sandra Oh, respectively).”
“But the original actors have not been announced as special guest stars for the episode.”
“Instead, hospital patients involved in a roller coaster accident who look like the original cast members will be introduced to viewers, and this will conjure up a ton of memories for the Seattle doctors left in their wake.”
“You can see two of the lookalike patients in the Grey’s Anatomy sneak peek video below.”


"[Todd Williamson's featured pictures / introduction / AP images]"
"But 12 years later, in death, divorce and a lot of farce, only Alex and Meredith were left in the original group of friends."
"But does that mean the late Dr. George O'Malley will follow in Denny's footsteps to prepare for the upcoming 300 episode of Gray's anatomy?"
"Not quite."
"As Season 14 of anatomy of grey begins to become an important milestone in the show, the producers will bring back three dead doctors for episode 300 of ABC medical drama, but not the original actors."
"As a tribute to Gray's long history of anatomy, episode 300 will pay tribute to former doctors George O'Malley, iz Stevens and Christina young (played by T.R.)
"Nate, Catherine Hagel and Sandra o, respectively."
"But the original cast hasn't been announced as a guest star for this episode."
"Instead, hospital patients injured in a roller coaster accident, who look like the original actors, will be introduced to the audience, which will evoke a lot of memories left by Seattle doctors when they wake up."
"You can see two similar looking patients in Gray's anatomy peep video below."



Number  592
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“...shape or figure...”
“...from social media due to the way she perceived her body...”
“The 21-year-old actress talked about dealing with body dysmorphia on Twitter after earning a lot of flak from numerous social media trolls due to her Grace Kelly-inspired spread with Harper's Bazaar that was released on Monday.”
“The trolls particularly criticized her for saying how Marilyn Monroe inspires her, saying that the legendary actress did not care if she was curvy when she was still alive.”
“According to Reinhart, people should not tell others that they have no right to feel insecure because their body looked okay.”
“"Telling someone they don't deserve to feel insecure because their body is 'fine' or 'just like' whomever.. is wrong," the actress tweeted on Monday, July 2.”
“"That's part of the problem.”
“That's part of body shaming," she added.”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”


Submit
“… Shape or figure... "
“… Because of her perception of her body. "
"The 21-year-old actress tweeted about how to deal with deformities because she was inspired by Grace Kelly and attacked by many social media trolls in Harper's bazaar, which was released on Monday."
"Trolls particularly criticized her for how Marilyn Monroe inspired her, saying that the legendary actress didn't care if she had curves when she was alive."
"According to Reinhart, people should not tell others that they have no right to feel insecure because their bodies look good."
"Tell someone that they shouldn't feel insecure because they're 'very well' or 'like' anyone.".. "It's wrong," the actress tweeted on Monday, July 2
"That's part of the problem."
"It's part of the physical humiliation," she added
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"



Number  593
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I made my Broadway debut at 14 years old and did 8 shows a week but there was never a night I was too tired to run to a gay bar and do a quick Whitney cover before bed.”
“I’m fuckin' hungry.”I was taught to do my makeup by queens in gay bars in New York City.”
“Can we go to dinner now?”
“When Frankie came out my surprisingly unfazed (for his age) grandfather said “Congrats!”
“Sexuality and gender were never topics my family and I were afraid to discuss.”
“He’s always just been Frankie.”
“I can’t remember a difference between Frankie before he came out and Frankie after he came out.”
“Everything Frankie did, I would do.”
“I idolized him.”
“I grew up with a gay brother whose every move I would emulate.”


"I premiered on Broadway when I was 14, eight shows a week, but never one night I was so tired that I ran to gay bars and made a Whitney cover before I went to bed."
"I'm damn hungry." The queen of gay bars in New York taught me how to make up
"Can we go to dinner now?"
When Frankie came out, my grandfather (at his age) unexpectedly said, "Congratulations!"
"Sex and gender have never been topics my family and I dare not discuss."
"He's always been Frankie."
"I don't remember the difference between before and after Frankie came out."
"I'll do everything Frankie does."
"I adore him."
"I grew up with a gay brother, and I will follow his every move."



Number  594
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““They have been in the process of ending their relationship for a number of months.””
“Image zoom Jennifer Hudson’s Disposition OrderOtunga’s hearing to have Hudson’s order of protection dropped is set to Nov. 27 at 9:30 a.m. while the next hearing for to address custody is scheduled for Dec. 7.”
“...fiancé David Otunga to let their son spend Thanksgiving with him...”
“In court documents obtained exclusively by PEOPLE, the singer voluntarily agreed to allow their 8-year-old son, David Jr., to spend the holiday with Otunga after she filed an emergency order of protection last week.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“David Jr. will be spending Thursday with his father from 3 p.m. until Friday at 7 p.m.”
“Image zoom David Otunga Jennifer Hudson and their son David Jr Credit Michael Kovac Getty Images for March of Dimes Otunga 37 previously requested that Hudson s protective order be thrown out on Tuesday which was denied in court orders obtained by PEOPLE so he could be with his son...”
“...for the holiday...”
“Under the order of protection, Otunga is not entitled to any parenting time until their next court date and any time with his son would require Hudson’s written approval.”
“The singer opted to give him that approval.”


"They've been ending their relationship for months."
"The hearing for the removal of the Hudson protection order by toninga is scheduled to be held at 9:30 a.m. on November 27, while the next hearing to resolve the custody issue is scheduled to be held on December 7."
“… Fiance David ortuga asked their son to spend Thanksgiving with him. "
"In court documents that people have exclusive access to, the singer voluntarily agreed to let their 8-year-old son David Jr. and ortunga go on holiday after filing an emergency protection order last week."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"From 3pm to 7pm on Friday, little David will spend Thursday with his father."
"Picture zooming David ortuga, Jennifer Hudson and their son David small credit Michael Kovac Getty picture in the corner of March, ortuga asked Hudson for a protection order before 37, which is a refusal to get an order in court, people can talk with his son..."
“… For the holidays... "
"Under the protection order, ortunga is not entitled to any parenting time until his next court appearance, and any time with his son requires Hudson's written approval."
"The singer chose to give him that recognition."



Number  595
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#SAGAwards — Elaine L. (@LaineyGossip) January 22, 2018We hope this moment will make Hollywood recognize how much Rita means to the world and how we need more people like her on the big screen.”
“According to E!”
“The legendary Latina entertainer received an arousing moment of sweet love last night at the Screen Actors Guild Awards when she got a standing ovation.”
“Rita wasn’t there to accept an award — although she should have for her role in the remake “One Day At A Time.” The actress was there to present the Life Achievement award to her former co-star Morgan Freeman.”
“The two actors were both featured on the show “Electric Company” 50 years ago.”
“When Rita came out, everyone in the room got on their feet.”
“It was quite a magical moment and you could tell the actress was overcome with joy and was very much surprised by the praise.”
“THIS is how you welcome Rita Moreno to the room!”
“Related: Watch #OneDayAtATime!!!!”
“...pic.twitter.com/SIZWuIA0xc — Jarett Wieselman (@JarettSays) January 22, 2018At 86 years-old, Rita — who’s won every award you can think of, including being the first Latina to win an Oscar for Best Supporting Actress for her role in West Side Story.”


"Sagawards Elaine L. (@ lainey gossip) on January 22, 2018, we hope that this moment will make Hollywood realize what Rita means to the world and that we need more people like her on the big screen."
"According to e!"
"The legendary Latin artist received warm applause at the Screen Actors Association Awards ceremony last night."
"Rita is not here to receive the prize - though she should have received the prize for her role in the remake once a day. The actress is here to present the life achievement award to her former partner, Morgan Freeman
"These two actors were the main characters on the power company 50 years ago."
"When Rita came out, everyone in the room stood up."
"It was quite a magical moment, and you can see that the actress was ecstatic and surprised by the praise."
"That's how you welcome Rita Moreno!"
"Related: see once a day!!"
“... pic.twitter.com/SIZWuIA0xc -Jarrett wieselman (@ Jarrett says) January 22, 2018 Rita, 86, won all the awards you can think of, including the first Latino to win an Oscar for Best Supporting Actress for her role in the west side story. "



**Something goes wrong**
“When Cohen brought up that Drake threw her a birthday party, she tried to play coy but eventually said, "I mean, they're friends."”
“She replied, while chuckling, "Are you kidding?"”
“It's pretty obvious that, if he is talking about Hadid, this would be a nod to her sister and fellow model, Gigi Hadid.”
“Additionally, he says in the song, "You and your sister / Too hot to handle."”
“Since Hadid has appeared in her fair share of Fashion Week shows, it would make sense if this lyric ties back to her.”
“I can't decide/Fashion week is more your thing than mine," he sang.”
“"I want my baby to have your eyes / I'm going against my own advice / Should I do New York?”
“Hadid.”
“And who's one of the most famous supermodels in the world right now?”
“While he doesn't give any overt clues as to who he's talking about, based on subsequent lyrics, he may be referring to a model.”


"When Cohen mentioned Drake's birthday party for her, she tried to pretend, but finally said," I mean, they're friends. "
"Are you kidding?" she replied with a smile
"Obviously, if he's talking about Hadid, it's going to be a model for her sister and colleague, Gigi Hadid nodded."
In addition, he said in the song, "you and your sister are too hot."
"Since Hadid has appeared in fashion week shows, it makes sense if the lyrics can be associated with her."
"I can't decide / Fashion Week is your business, not mine," he sang
"I wish my child had your eyes / I went against my own advice / should I go to New York?" "
"Hadid."
"Now who is one of the most famous supermodels in the world?"
"Although he didn't give any public clue as to who he was talking about, according to later lyrics, he might have been referring to a model."



**Something goes wrong**
“"She won't fucking admit it," Lauren complains.”
“It does not mention the rumors.”
“It's a rumor about something really bad.”
“As Tyra Banks later explained on her talk show while holding paper dolls of Spencer and Heidi: "Spencer and Heidi have started a rumor about [Lauren].”
“Lauren pointed the finger at her ex-roommate and her villainous boyfriend.”
“I don't need additional footage, you know?"”
“Lauren denied the claims to US Weekly, according to Gawker, saying, "Honestly, they videotape my life five days out of the week.”
“On August 5, 2007, roughly a week before the season three premiere, Perez Hilton reported rumors that Lauren had filmed a sex tape with her ex, Laguna Beach cast member Jason Wahler.”
“Her friendship with Lauren was done.”
“On the season finale, Heidi moved in with Spencer.”


"She's not going to admit it," Lauren complained
"It doesn't mention rumors."
"It's a rumor about something very bad."
"As Tyra Banks later explained on the talk show, holding the paper dolls of Spencer and Heidi:" Spencer and Heidi have started rumors about [Lauren]. "
"Lauren pointed the finger at her ex roommate and her vicious boyfriend."
"I don't need extra shots, you know?"
According to gock, Lauren denied the US weekly story, saying: "to be honest, they recorded five days of my week."
On August 5, 2007, about a week before the premiere of season 3, Perez Hilton reported rumors that Lauren and former Laguna Beach crew Jason Waller were filming sex videos
"Her friendship with Lauren is over."
"At the end of the season, Heidi moved in with Spencer."



**Something goes wrong**
“...in order to complement Kim s outfit to the Casamigos Halloween Party on Friday night...”
“The look matched the ensemble Aaliyah wore in her “Try Again” music video.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Splash NewsThe 37-year-old reality star was almost unrecognizable in a sequined white gown and fur shawl, with platinum blonde hair and a red lip to channel the “Like a Virgin” singer.”
“Kourtney, 38, also went all out, wearing her hair in tight curls and donning black gloves and a white blazer to emulate the late Jackson.”
“The Madonna ensemble was Kim’s third Halloween look this year.”
“Earlier in the day, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star gave fans a peek at her costume as Aaliyah.”
“She sported elaborate eye makeup and straight locks to play the late singer, completing her costume with a jeweled choker and coordinating top that flaunted her stomach.”
“On Saturday, the mom of two revealed on Twitter that the inspiration for all her costumes this year came from her favorite musical figures.”
“Her stomach I don t think anyone could compare Image zoom Credit Neilson Barnard Getty Images RELATED VIDEO A Brief History of Heidi Klum s Halloween Costumes Kim s best friend Jonathan Cheban transformed into Cher s husband Sonny Bono wearing a purple suit by Stello a wig and mustache...”


“… To go to casamigos' Halloween party on Friday night in order to match the alloy costume... "
This look complements the ensemble that Elia wears in the "try it again" music video
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Image zooming credit: splash news, the 37 year old reality TV star, is almost beyond recognition, wearing sequined white robes, fur shawls, platinum blonde hair and red lips to guide the "virgin like" singer
"Courtney, 38, did her best to imitate the late Jackson with her thick curly hair, black gloves and white coat
"Madonna is Kim's third look for this year's Halloween."
"Earlier in the day, the star, who was close to Kardashian, let fans see her as aliya."
She plays the late singer with delicate eye makeup and straight hair, and completes her costume with a jewelry necklace and a jacket to show off her belly
"On Saturday, the mother of two revealed on twitter that all her clothes this year were inspired by her favorite musical characters."
"I don't think anyone can compare her stomach to image zooming credit Nelson Barnard Getty image related video Heidi Krum's Halloween Costume Jane skinny's best friend Jonathan Cheban turned into Sherry's husband, Sonny Bono, wearing a purple suit and Stella a wig and beard..."



Number  599
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Supermodel siblings: Bella is seen with sister Gigi out in New York before her birthday party...”
“...are now swirling that Bella is enjoying a romance with rapper Drake after he planned a 21st birthday bash for her over the weekend...”
“The 21-year-old supermodel was left heartbroken earlier this year when she found out the Fetish hitmaker - who she knew through mutual friends - had struck up a romance with the 27-year-old singer just two months after they ended their on/off relationship.”
“However, it seems there are no longer any hard feelings between the brunette beauty and the 25-year-old pop star because she's not interested in her ex's dating life.”
“Scroll down for video Over it Bella Hadid no longer cares about her ex The weeknd dating Selena Gomez according to her mother Yolanda Speaking on Bravo s Watch What Happens Live With Andy Cohen the host asked Bella s mother Yolanda Hadid whether her daughter was still hung up...”
“...on the fact her former flame had jumped into a relationship with her distant pal...”
“And the Real Housewives of Beverly Hills star said: 'Not anymore I think.'”
“Bella's lack of interest comes months after she admitted that her and The Weeknd's break up will always weigh heavy on her heart because it was her first proper split.”
“She said: 'As an outsider, you might think I handled it so well but it's always in your heart, and you always feel it very heavily.”
“It'll be hard for a while.”


"Supermodel siblings: Bella and sister Gigi were seen before the New York birthday party..."
“… Now there are rumors that Bella is enjoying romance with rapper Drake. He plans to hold a 21st birthday party for her at the weekend
"Earlier this year, the 21-year-old supermodel was saddened to find out that the fetishist killer, whom she met through a mutual friend, fell in love with the 27 year old singer just two months after her off and on affair
"But there doesn't seem to be any more unpleasant feelings between the brunette and the 25-year-old pop star because she's not interested in her ex-wife's dating life."
"By scrolling down to see the video, Bella Hadid no longer cares about her ex girlfriend. This week, she's dating Selena Gomez. According to her mother Yolanda on Bravo's" observe the life of Andy Cohen, "the host asks Bella's mother Yolanda Hadid if her daughter is still on the phone..."
“… Because her former lover had a relationship with her distant friend... "
"Beverly Hills star's real housewife said: 'I don't think it's going to happen again.'
"A few months ago, Bella admitted that her break-up with this week will always weigh heavily on her heart, because this is her first real break-up, and since then she has lost interest in it."
"She said: 'as an outsider, you may think I handle it well, but it's always in your heart and you always feel heavy."
"It's going to be hard for a while."



Number  600
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m just so happy.”Mandy Moore/Facebook...”
“But now that This Is Us is a bonafide Emmy-nominated hit, she’s asked more often about her own family, whom she admits she can feel protective over.”
““This is Us” Star Mandy Moore On Her Lesbian Mom And Gay Brothers: “There Are No Secrets In Our Lives”Mandy Moore isn’t a mother in real life, but with her role on This Is Us, she’s currently one of the most beloved moms in prime time.”
“The singer-turned-actress is on the cover of People this month, where she spoke about her own mother, who identifies as a lesbian, as well as her two gay brothers.”
““Nobody is hiding who they are,” Moore tells the magazine.”
““There are no secrets in our lives.”
“I love and support my mom and my brothers with my whole heart.”
“And nothing makes me happier than seeing anybody live their authentic self, and to choose love.”
“If anyone can find love, I support it, I salute you and I celebrate that.”So much going on in this photo: My Dad and brother's faux surprise facial expressions, the matching polka dots, the hair all around, etc…..I could go on.”
“TBT awkwardfamilyphotos priceless A post shared by Mandy Moore mandymooremm on Jan 15 2015 at 4 11pm PST Moore who recently got engaged to musician Taylor Goldsmith first talked about her not so traditional family with the site Byrdie last year when she shared that her mother left her father...”


"I'm so happy." Mandy Moore / Facebook
"But now that we're a real Emmy nominating hit, she's been asked more about her own family, and she admits she can feel protected more than that."
"This is us" star Mandy Moore said to her lesbian mother and gay brother, "there are no secrets in our lives." Mandy Moore is not a mother in real life, but because of her role in this is us, she is currently one of the most popular mothers in prime time
The singer turned actress appeared on the cover of People magazine this month, where she talked about her mother, who claims to be a lesbian, and her two gay brothers
"No one can hide who they are," Moore told the magazine
"There are no secrets in our lives."
"I love and support my mother and brothers with all my heart."
"Nothing makes me happier than to see anyone live their true self and choose love."
"If someone can find love, I will support it, I salute you and I will celebrate." So many things happened in this picture: the fake surprise expressions of my father and brother, the matching dots, the surrounding hair and so on I can go on. "
"TBT embarrassing family photo priceless Mandy Moore Mandy Moore recently engaged to musician Taylor goldsmith at 4:11 p.m. Pacific Standard Time on January 15, 2015. Last year, she talked about her unconventional family for the first time on byrdie website, when she shared her mother's departure from her father..."



Number  601
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thank you for making me feel beautiful at all stages!”Image zoom Credit: Seth Browarnik/startraksIn a Monday promo for this week’s episode, the Revenge Body star teased her sisters, “Do you want to know what I’m having?””
“Kylie, 20, also commissioned a gender reveal cake for the big moment.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I’m really hoping Kylie’s lying,” she said on KUWTK, admitting she’d been hoping for a baby boy.”
“But on Sunday, she clarified on Twitter that she’s thrilled to become the mother to a little girl.”
““God gives us what we need!”
“His timing is never wrong!”
“...my hormones were IN RARE FORM for that news,” she tweeted.”
““I am now so excited my daughter will have forever best friends with Chicago and Stormi!!”
“God is great!!!”


"Thank you for making me feel beautiful at all stages! Image zooming credit: Seth brawanik / startrak, in a promo for the show on Monday, the vengeful star teased her sisters, "do you want to know what I'm eating?"
"Kelly, 20, also commissioned a gender revealing cake for this important moment."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I really hope Kelly is lying," she said in kutke, admitting that she had always wanted a baby boy
"But on Sunday, she clarified on twitter that she was happy to be the mother of a little girl."
"God has given us what we need!"
"His timing has never been wrong!"
"My hormones rarely appear in that news," she tweeted
"I'm so excited now that my daughter will always be good friends with Chicago and Tommy!"
"God, that's great!"



Number  602
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'If I had nannies raising my kids and just wanted to be a rockstar and party all the time, I wouldn't be successful and I wouldn't be happy,' Pink said.”
“While chatting with Redbook, she discussed letting her kids tag along.”
“And on Friday, Pink's husband Carey Hart revealed he's still smitten with the 39-year-old singer, whom he dubbed a 'milf' on Instagram.”
“'Hope everyone had a great thanksgiving yesterday.”
“Ours was perfect,' he wrote.”
“'Let's all try to keep this thankful thing rolling.”
“#Milf.'”
“Lovebirds: On Friday, Pink's husband Carey Hart posted a photo with his 39-year-old wife, whom he dubbed a 'milf'Hart, a former motocross rider, wore a provocative holiday sweater in the photo, while Pink donned a patterned frock.”
“The pair, who were all smiles, posed with beers in hand on the porch of a blue and white house.”
“On Thanksgiving, Carey cooked up two turkeys in a massive smoker.”


"If I had a babysitter to raise my kids and just wanted to be a rock star and party all the time, I wouldn't be successful and happy," Pinker said
"While chatting with the red book, she talked about letting the children follow her."
On Friday, pink's husband, Carey Hart, revealed that he was still infatuated with the 39 year old singer, whom he called "milf" on instagram
"I hope you enjoyed Thanksgiving yesterday."
"Ours is perfect," he wrote
"Let's try to keep this gratitude going."
“#Milf.”
"Love bird: on Friday, Pinker's husband, Carey Hart, released a photo of her 39 year old wife, who he called 'milf' Hart, a former motorcycle cross-country racer, wearing a provocative holiday sweater and Pinker wearing a patterned dress."
Smiling and holding beer, they posed on the porch of a blue and white house
On Thanksgiving Day, Kelly cooked two turkeys in a big pipe



Number  603
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Have the Bella Twins helped pave the way for Divas and female WWE Superstars?”
“There are a lot of perks, but viewers don’t see the late-night flights, the race to the rental car shuttle, the to drive to the hotel to get two hours sleep … you can only explain that so much.”
“I was in the very first Money in the Bank ladder match for women, and I won it!”
“They are now on main event pay-per-views.”
“The women took it and ran with it and have been running with it ever since then.”
“That gave the Divas a chance.”
“The fans helped a lot too as they demanded it, they knew what the women were capable of and started the whole women’s revolution hashtag on Twitter.”
“I think it was just time — the women have been working for so long and so hard.”
“Why has there been such an explosion for women in the WWE?”
“This year, there were two women’s matches on the card WrestleMania — it has come a long way and I am really excited for the fans to see what’s in store for the women now.”


"Did the Bella twins pave the way for the queen and WWE actress?"
"There are a lot of discounts, but the audience can't see the late night flights, the competing car rental, the driving to the hotel for two hours You can only explain so much. "
"I took part in the first game of the women's Bank ladder race, and I won!"
"They are now the main pay per view activity."
"The women ran with it and have been running with it ever since."
"It gives the heroine a chance."
"Fans helped a lot when they asked for it. They knew about women's abilities and started tagging the whole women's revolution on twitter."
"I think it's time - women have worked so long, so hard."
"Why is there such an explosive growth of women in WWE?"
"This year, there are two women's games in the card wrestling frenzy - it's been a long way, and I'm really excited that the fans can see the women's games now."



Number  604
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tickets for the Purpose tour will be refunded at the point of purchase.”
“"We've lost so many great artists lately.”
“Nicholas Hunt/Getty ImagesThe INSIDER Summary:Justin Bieber cancelled the remainder of his "Purpose" world tour.”
“John Mayer took to Twitter to defend the singer's decision.”
“Mayer wanted fans to know that an artist pulls out of a tour to prevent further damage to themselves.”
“The artist previously took a break from touring himself as he battled a throat condition.”
“John Mayer has defended Justin Bieber on Twitter after the pop star canceled the reminder of his Purpose world tour because of "unforeseen circumstances."”
“"When someone pulls remaining dates of a tour, it means they would have done real damage to themselves if they kept going," Mayer wrote Monday in defense of Bieber.”
“I give Justin [two thumbs up] for realizing it was time to call it.”
“However, after careful consideration he has decided he will not be performing any further dates," it continued.”


"Tickets for the destination tour will be returned at the time of purchase."
"We've lost a lot of great artists recently."
"Nicholas Hunt / Getty imagines the inside summary: Justin Bieber cancels the rest of his" purpose "world tour
"John Mayer tweeted to defend the singer's decision."
"Mayer wants fans to know that an artist quits the tour to prevent further harm."
"The artist had previously suspended his tour while fighting throat disease."
John Mayer defended Justin Bieber on twitter after the pop star cancelled the purpose of his world tour because of "unforeseen circumstances."
"When someone cancels the remaining date of a trip, it means that if they continue, they will do real harm to themselves," Mayer wrote in defense of Bieber on Monday
"I'm grateful to Justin (with two thumbs up) because he realized it was time to call him."
"However, after careful consideration, he decided not to perform any more," it continued



Number  605
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share Share Tweet Email30 Of The Most Masculine Boy Names That Made Our Hearts Skip A Beat...”
“The new moms were singing the song from the Disney classic The Little Mermaid to their beautiful babies.”
“Bachelor in Paradise stars Carly Waddell and Jade Roper shared glimpses of their joint baby photoshoot, and it is so cute!”
“Everyone needs to check it out.”
“Waddell and Roper did a photoshoot with both of their baby girls over the weekend and the results are adorable.”
“The friends each shared some behind the scenes pictures of them with their little girls, Isabella and Emerson, as well as Waddell’s husband Evan Bass via Instagram Story.”
“"So Carly and I are doing a photo shoot with Emerson and Bella today,” shared Roper.”
“Via Jade Roper InstagramNot long after she posted her first story, Roper once again took to social media to share a video of her friend, as well as showcase the talented photographer Brandon Chesbro who was doing the photoshoot for them.”
““This is like a fairy tale," she shared along with a video of Waddell and baby Isabella under a tree.”
“The ladies weren’t the only ones using social media to share stories for the event.”


"Sharing the 30 most masculine boy names in twitter email makes our heart beat..."
"New mothers are singing the Disney classic" Little Mermaid "for their beautiful baby."
Carly Waddell and Jed Roper, the stars of "the Bachelor of heaven", shared their baby photos. It's so cute
"Everyone needs to check."
"Waddell and Roper took a picture with two baby girls over the weekend and it turned out to be lovely."
"Friends shared some of their behind the scenes photos with their youngest daughters Isabella and Emerson and Waddell's husband Evan bass through instagram story."
"So Carly and I are taking pictures with Emerson and Bella today," Roper said
"Through jade Roper instagram not, long after she released her first story, Roper once again shared videos of her friends on social media and showed Brandon chesbro, the talented photographer who photographed them."
"It's like a fairy tale," she shared with a video of Waddell and baby Isabella under the tree
"Women are not the only ones who use social media to share event stories."



Number  606
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Megan McCluskey at megan.mccluskey@time.com.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“While attending the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences’ 9th Annual Governors Awards on Sunday, Lawrence palled around with Stone on the red carpet by photobombing her fellow Best Actress winner as she posed for the cameras.”
“Of course, fans loved this latest interaction between the charming pair.”
““Ruling screens worldwide with every performance!” wrote Twitter user Anil Kapoor.”
““#EmmaStone & #JenniferLawrence are on top of their game!”
“Huge fan!”
“!”In a 2016 interview with Vanity Fair, Lawrence revealed that their friendship began when she received a text from Stone after mutual co-star Woody Harrelson — who appeared in The Hunger Games with Lawrence and Zombieland with Stone — helped them exchange numbers.”
““I replied, ‘F—k off!’’And we’ve been really good friends ever since,” Lawrence said.”
“See the photobomb moment below.”


"To Megan McCluskey Megan McCluskey @ time.com."
Please enter a valid email address
On Sunday, while attending the 9th Annual governors' awards ceremony of the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences, Lawrence and stone took pictures on the red carpet and photographed Lawrence, who is also the winner of best actress, in front of the camera
"Of course, fans love the latest interaction between this charming couple."
"Every show in the world is dominant! Twitter user Anil Kapoor wrote
"Emma stone and Jennifer larens are in the lead in their game!"
"Super Fans!"
"!" in an interview with Vanity Fair in 2016, Lawrence revealed that their friendship began when she received a text message from stone. Previously, CO star Woody Harrelson appeared in the hunger game with Lawrence and Zombieland with stone to help them exchange numbers. "
"I replied," go away! "We've been good friends ever since," Lawrence said
"Take a look at the pictures below."



Number  607
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments!”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat do you think about the potential baby names Eva and Ellen came up with?”
“She told Ellen she's due in June.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDEva is currently seven months pregnant with her husband Jose Baston's baby!”
“It's perfect!”
“Which happens to be the day Eva's holding her baby shower.”
“Source: BACKGRIDBut the real winner was Cinco de Mayo!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDSome of the names Eva and Ellen came up with include Don Julio, Poquito Mas, and Tequila Sunrise — "Teeqy Sunny" for short, of course.”
“Source: BACKGRIDThe actress wants to give her baby a Spanish name, so Ellen had the randomizer produce some good ones.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: YouTube/TheEllenShowUsing a randomizer on The Ellen Show, Eva got some great suggestions for potential baby names!”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"Source: backgrid, what do you think of the names EVA and Ellen might name their children?"
"She told Ellen she was coming in June."
The article continues with the following source: backgrideva is seven months pregnant, the child of her husband Jose Baston! "
"It's perfect!"
"That's exactly the day EVA bathes her baby."
"Source: backgrid, but the real winner is Cinco de Mayo!"
The article continues with the following advertising sources: backgroundsome of the names EVA and Ellen have come up with include don Julio, poquito MAS and the Tequila Sunrise - or, of course, "Tiki sonny."
"Source: the actress wanted to give her child a Spanish name, so Allen asked the randomizer to give her some good names."
"The article continues with the following ad source: YouTube / the EllenShow. By using the randomizer on the Ellen show, EVA got some good advice on baby names!"



**Something goes wrong**
“The alpine skier was also previously linked to Tiger Woods, whom she dated for nearly three years before calling it quits in 2015.”
“Vonn last dated NFL assistant coach Kenan Smith for a year before the pair amicably split last November.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“A source tells PEOPLE the pair were "very cute" ahead of the awards showLindsey Vonn and P.K.”
“Subban are dating — and have made their romance red carpet official!”
“The Olympic gold medalist, 33, and the 29-year-old hockey player — a defenseman for the Nashville Predators — stepped out together Wednesday night at the 2018 CMT Music Awards in Nashville, where they packed on the PDA while posing for photos ahead of the show.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““They’re in that beginning stage of a relationship where you can’t get enough of each other,” a source told PEOPLE exclusively of the pair, both of whom presented at the CMTs.”
“Image zoom P.K.”
“Subban and Lindsey Vonn | Credit: Mike Coppola/Getty“They held hands down the carpet, and when they weren’t, he had his hand on the small of her back and she was giving him puppy dog eyes,” an onlooker added.”


"The alpine skier had also been in touch with Tiger Woods, who she dated for nearly three years and then announced her separation in 2015."
"Feng en last dated Kennan Smith, assistant coach of NFL, for one year, and then they parted amicably in November last year."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
A source told people that before the Lindsay Feng and P.K. awards ceremony, they were "very cute."
"Supan is dating - their romantic red carpet is officially on the show!"
"The 33 year old Olympic gold medalist and the 29 year old hockey player, a defender of the Nashville Raiders, got together at the 2018 CMT Music Awards in Nashville on Wednesday night, posing for photos on a PDA before the performance."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They are at the beginning of a relationship and don't know enough about each other," a source told reporters, adding that both of them participated in CMTS
"Image scaling P.K."
"Subban and Lindsey Vonn | credit: Mike Coppola / Getty" they put their hands on the carpet, and when they were away, he put his hands on her back, and she gave him the dog's eyes, "a bystander added



**Something goes wrong**
“What a perfect family, seriously!”
“Try not to melt!”
“Thankfully, this pregnancy isn't being hidden like her half-sister Kylie's was , so we're seeing all the action in real time.”
“A source tells E!”
“News the celebration was held in the Grand Ballroom at the Hotel Bel Air in Los Angeles this afternoon.”
“"They went all out for the shower with no expense spared and it's turned out to be stunning and gorgeous," the source says .”
“Those in attendance for sure were of course Kris, Kendall, and Kylie Jenner, as well as Real Housewives of Atlanta star Kim Zolciak-Biermann, her daughter, and many more.”
“And the celebration was SERIOUSLY pink!”
“Check out the awesome photos so far.”
“Kim and Kylie took to their Snapchats to post several videos and photos of the big event.”


"What a perfect family!"
"Don't melt!"
"Thankfully, the pregnancy wasn't hidden like her half sister Kelly, so we saw all the action in real time."
"A source told us!"
"The celebration was held this afternoon in the grand ballroom of the belle Aire hotel in Los Angeles."
"They went all out to take a shower, there was no cost savings, and it turned out to be amazing and gorgeous," the source said
Of course, Chris, Kendall and Kelly Jenner were present, as well as the real housewife of Atlanta star Kim zolciak Biermann, and her daughter
"The celebration is really grand!"
"Look at the best photos so far."
"Kim and Kylie posted several videos and photos of big events on their snapchat."



**Something goes wrong**
“She added that deodorant often leaves a stain of its own on your clothes:“Rubbing a clean pair of nylon stockings on a white deodorant stain will help it disappear.”Genius.”
“Our only question is how did she originally figure this out?”
“The stain should lift out easily.”See more: Kim Kardashian on TrumpKim Kardashian is a leader in the beauty community so it’s not surprising that she has developed some tricks along the way.”
“If the stain still won’t come out, you can also use a drop of rubbing alcohol mixed with the shaving cream.”
“She shared the advice on her app:“Just apply to the stain and then lightly wet or wash.”
“Kim revealed that she uses shaving-cream to remove makeup stains in a quick and easy way.”
“Kim Kardashian is a fan of wearing white clothes and now she has revealed how she manages to clean a foundation stain that has accidentally made its way onto a neck of a white t-shirt.”


She added that deodorants usually leave their own stains on your clothes: "rubbing a clean pair of nylon stockings on a white deodorant stain will help it disappear."
"Our only question is how did she come up with it in the first place?"
"The stain should be easy to remove." More information: Kim Kardashian on trumpkim Kardashian is the leader of the beauty industry, so it's no surprise that she has mastered some skills in the process
"If the stain still doesn't come out, you can also mix it with a drop of rubbing alcohol and shaving cream."
She shared the advice on her app: "just smear it on the stain and then gently wet or clean it."
"Kim revealed that she used shaving cream to remove makeup stains quickly and easily."
"Kim Kardashian is a fan of white clothes, and now she reveals how she cleans up a stain that she accidentally wears around the neck of a white T-shirt."



**Something goes wrong**
“If she lands it, somebody will be stupid enough to give her a seven-figure advance.””
““All the majors are listening, and, sadly, she will likely get a deal.”
““Yes, she is trying to rap and no, [it’s] horrible,” the cynical music source sniffed.”
““She’s met with four labels … [is] collaborating with very big artists, and there’s going to be big news coming soon,” an insider said in September.”
“...home which makes sense as Page Six previously reported she was trying to launch a rap career...”
“So maybe like in my closet and it s like a button that I push and you can go in there like a secret little room The reality star also pitched the idea of including a recording studio in her...”
““I would also like to have a sex room.”
““This might sound kind of crazy,” she told Lehrer.”
“Her requests included an infinity pool, a 10-car garage, a Blac Chyna topiary and a helicopter pad — as well as a something a tad more unorthodox: a sex room.”
“In a video for Architectural Digest, Chyna teamed up with Michael Lehrer of Lehrer Architects in Los Angeles to design what she’d imagine in her dream home.”


"If she gets it, someone will be stupid enough to give her a seven figure advance."
"All the majors are listening. Unfortunately, she is likely to get a deal."
"Yes, she's trying to rap, no, [it] terrible," sniffed cynical music sources
"She met with four record companies Working with very big artists, big news will come soon, "one person in the industry said in September
“… It makes sense to go home, because it was reported on page 6 that she was trying to start a rap career... "
"So maybe it's like in my closet, I press a button, and you can go in like a secret room. The reality TV star also put forward the idea of building a recording studio in her..."
"I also want to have a love room."
"It sounds a little crazy," she told Lehrer
"Her demands include an unlimited swimming pool, a 10 car garage, a blac Chyna topiary and a helipad - and a more unorthodox thing: a sex room."
"In a video from architectural digest, Zina works with Michael leiler of leiler architects in Los Angeles to design her dream home."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Blac Chyna on Relationship With Rob Kardashian: 'We're Fighting for Each Other' This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“For more from the exes, watch the clip below!”
“It makes everything much easier."”
“...isn t going to be perfect but I know we love each other and we re fighting for each other and the people we surround ourselves with are rooting for us...”
“WATCH Blac Chyna Says She s In It For The Long Haul With Rob Kardashian We re Fighting for Each Other Though Rob and Chyna have kept the status of their relationship under wraps Chyna did speak with Cosmopolitan South Africa for the April issue saying I feel like everything...”
“Other stars at TAO on Tuesday included Drake and Kardashian pal French Montana, who hung out with Chyna on Instagram several months ago.”
“But Rob was nowhere to be seen while Chyna had her night out, which ended with her getting into a white car with a male friend.”
“They also enjoyed time with Dream together earlier this week.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Blac Chyna's relationship with Rob Kardashian: 'we're fighting for each other' is not available because we can't load sponsor information."
"To learn more about your predecessor, see the following clip!"
"It makes it a lot easier."
“… It's not perfect, but I know we love each other, we fight for each other, and people around us are cheering for us... "
"Look at blac Chyna saying that she and rob Kardashian have been together for a long time. We're fighting for each other, even though rob and Chyna have been hiding their relationship. Chyna said in the April issue of international South Africa that I think everything is OK..."
"Other ceramic stars on Tuesday included Drake and Kardashian's friend, France Montana, who were with Zina on instagram a few months ago."
"But when Sheena spent the night outside, rob disappeared and ended up in a white car with a male friend."
"Earlier this week, they also enjoyed their time with dreams."



**Something goes wrong**
“All rights reserved.”
“GQ then asks Quincy to put his money where his mouth is: "So if you were producing a record for Taylor Swift," the publication asks, "what would you have her do?”
“And apparently, he's at best lukewarm about Taylor Swift's songwriting talent.”
“In an interview with GQ, Jones says he's a big fan of artists like Bruno Mars, Kendrick Lamar, Drake, Jennifer Hudson and Mary J. Blige.”
“When asked his opinion on Taylor's music, though, Jones says, "We need more songs, man.”
“F***ing songs, not hooks."”
“When GQ points out that Taylor is considered one of the greatest modern-day songwriters, Jones laughs, "Whatever crumbles your cookie."”
“GQ then asks Jones what's missing in Taylor's music.”
“"Knowing what you're doing.”
“You know what I mean?"”


"All rights reserved."
"GQ then asked Quincy to put the money on her lips:" if you made a record for Taylor Swift, "publications asked," what would you ask her to do? "
"Obviously, he's not at all enthusiastic about Taylor Swift's talent for composing."
"In an interview with GQ, Jones said he was a big fan of artists like Bruno Mars, Kendrick Lamar, Drake, Jennifer Hudson and Mary J. blich."
When asked about Taylor's music, Jones said, "we need more songs, man."
"It's a song, not a hook."
"When GQ pointed out that Taylor was considered one of the greatest songwriters of our time, Jones said with a smile," whatever will break your biscuit. "
"GQ then asked Jones Taylor what his music lacked."
"I know what you're doing."
"Do you know what I mean?"



**Something goes wrong**
“But either way, it seems unlikely we’ll see these four women reuniting for cupcakes at Magnolia Bakery anytime soon.”
“Last year, tales of this feud of yore came to the fore again as news broke that Sex and the City 3 would never reach theaters—and early rumors pointed to Cattrall as the cause.”
“But for Sex and the City fans, the night was something else entirely: a bitter reminder that underneath the sweet surface of that beloved franchise lurks something darker.”
“I’m talking, of course, about the ongoing feud between Sarah Jessica Parker and Kim Cattrall, which Kristin Davis may have inadvertently re-ignited during the ceremony with a seemingly pointed Instagram.”
“Davis posted a photo of herself and her co-stars from the 2004 ceremony, writing, “Emmy flashback—super happy memories and wishing joy to everyone tonight.”
“We are all so incredibly lucky to get to do what we do!” The only problem?”
“Though Parker and Cynthia Nixon were present and accounted for in the photo, Cattrall was missing.”
“Coincidence?”
“Fans thought not.”
“Listen: it’s entirely possible that Davis meant nothing by this.”


"But in any case, it seems unlikely that we will soon see the four women reuniting at Mulan bakery to eat cupcakes."
"Last year, with the news that" sex and the city 3 "will never be released, and the early rumors that it was the cartel, the story of this feud surfaced again."
"But for the fans of sex and the city, it was a completely different night: a painful reminder that something darker was hidden beneath the sweet surface of the beloved series."
"Of course, I'm talking about the ongoing feud between Sarah Jessica Parker and Kim Cattrall, which Kristin Davis may have inadvertently rekindled during the ceremony with a seemingly sharp instagram."
Davis posted a picture of herself and her partner at the 2004 awards ceremony, which read: "flash super happy memories of Amy, have a nice evening."
"We are all very lucky to do what we do! "What's the only question?"
"Although Parker and Cynthia Nixon were present and illustrated in the photos, cattellar was missing."
"Coincidence?"
"Fans don't think so."
"Listen: it's possible Davis said this without meaning."



**Something goes wrong**
“Robert Roepke, whose daughter is married to the victim’s son, exclusively told PEOPLE on Tuesday that the collision was a “very tragic, sad accident that took the life of a guy that was just coming home from work.””
“WATCH: Victim’s Relative Defends Former Bachelor Chris Soules After Deadly Car Crash: ‘It Was a Freak Accident’They also allege that Soules and his vehicle were later found at a house that Soules allegedly refused to leave until officers obtained a search warrant several hours later.”
“(The area is reportedly about 15 miles south of Soules’ farm in Arlington.)”
“At the hearing, Iowa State Patrol claimed Soules left the scene after rear-ending his pickup truck into a tractor near Aurora, Iowa, at around 8 p.m. on Monday.”
“The former star of The Bachelor made his first court appearance hours later.”
“The Buchanan County Sheriff’s Office confirmed to PEOPLE on Tuesday that Soules was arrested at 1:16 a.m. on Tuesday and charged with leaving the scene of a fatal car accident.”
“On the call, which was first released by TMZ, Soules asks another, unidentified person at the scene to perform CPR on Mosher since he doesn’t know how, and they check Mosher’s pulse before hanging up on the operator and saying they’ll call back.”
“At the time of the call, Soules reveals Mosher, 66, was not conscious and didn’t appear to be breathing.”
“He reveals the tractor has plunged into ditch and Mosher was thrown into the ditch.”
““There’s no address,” Soules, 35, tells the operator at the start of the recording.”


Robert roepke, whose daughter is married to the victim's son, told people exclusively on Tuesday that the crash was "very tragic, sad and took the life of a man who had just come home from work."
"Observation: relatives of the victim defended Chris suers, a former bachelor, after the fatal car accident:" it was an abnormal accident. "They also claimed that suers and his vehicle were later found in a house and that suers refused to leave until the police obtained a search warrant a few hours later."
"(the area is reported to be about 15 miles south of Arlington sours farm.)
"At the hearing, the Iowa patrol claimed that at about 8 p.m. on Monday, sules left the scene after tailgating his pickup truck to a tractor near Aurora, Iowa."
"The former star of the bachelor appeared in court for the first time in a few hours."
"Buchanan County Sheriff's office confirmed to the public on Tuesday that sules was arrested at 1:16 a.m. on Tuesday and charged with leaving the scene of the fatal accident."
"In the first phone call issued by TMZ, sules asked another unidentified person at the scene to carry out cardiopulmonary resuscitation for Moshe because he didn't know what to do. They checked Moshe's pulse, then hung up the operator's phone and said they would call back."
"At the time of the call, sules Mosher, 66, was unconscious and didn't seem to be breathing."
"He revealed that the tractor had fallen into the ditch and Moshe had been thrown into it."
"There's no address," sules, 35, told the operator at the beginning of the recording



**Something goes wrong**
“I’m very sorry to hear that because I do care about them very much.”On Monday, 29-year-old Higgins — who will be launching a podcast with iHeartRadio next week alongside Bachelor alum Ashley Iaconetti — and Bushnell revealed their breakup in an exclusive statement to PEOPLE.”
“I’ll reach out to them.”
““But I don’t know.”
““So I know they were fighting through a bunch of stuff,” he said.”
“Image zoom Credit: Valorie Darling“I know that they have struggled with the show and then kind of continuing on and doing their reality show and kind of where the show stopped and then where life began,” Harrison continued.”
“After the couple’s time on the show wrapped, they continued to appear in front of cameras on the Freeform series, Ben & Lauren: Happily Ever After?, which gave audiences an inside look at their life together post-Bachelor.”
“2016”
“They are really two of my favorite people we ve ever had on the show and Ben is a really good friend said Harrison 45 who firsthand watched the couple meet fall in love and get engaged on Higgins season 20 of the ABC reality series which premiered in January...”
“I love them both.”
“I really did not know that.”Image zoom Credit: David Livingston/Getty“Apparently I did not see that coming.”


"I'm sorry to hear that because I really care about them." On Monday, Higgins and Bushnell, 29, revealed their breakup to people in an exclusive statement. Higgins, along with Ashley iaconetti, an alumnus of the University, will launch a podcast with iHeart radio next week
"I'll contact them."
"But I don't know."
"So I know they're struggling with a lot of things," he said
Harrison continued: "I know they've been struggling for the show, and then continue to do their reality show, where the show stops, where life begins."
"After the couple's show, they continue to appear in front of the camera in the free form series. Ben and Lauren: are you happy from then on? Let the audience see their common life after they are single from the heart. "
“2016”
"They're really the two favorite people I've met on the show, and they were really good friends," said Harrison, 45, who witnessed the couple meet, fall in love, and get engaged in the 20th season of the ABC reality show series, which premiered in January. "
"I love both."
"I really don't know," photo scaling credit: David Livingston / Getty "obviously I didn't see that."



**Something goes wrong**
“It may be more important than ever that we make some people laugh this year.”Image zoom Brad Paisley and Carrie Underwood | Credit: Bob D'Amico/ABC/Getty...”
“...also about uplifting our community and our industry Humor is an important aspect...”
“VIDEO Carrie Underwood s Son Attends Superstar s Concert for the First Time He s Proud of His Momma In 2017 Paisley said he was grateful to have more distance from politics and that it s easier to joke about them in off years For the guitarist the event is...”
“We ve always tried to keep that in our minds but this year more than ever I hope that people don t take clips and things out of context that s the most frustrating part I think Image zoom Brad Paisley and Carrie Underwood Credit Bob D Amico CMA RELATED”
“Image zoom Credit: Bob D'Amico/ABC via Getty“We just want to make fun of things that are funny,” Underwood, told PEOPLE at the time.”
“Before the 2017 show, the two discussed their approach to making jokes in such a tense year for politics and culture.”
“Paisley, 45, and Underwood, 35, are known for the humor they bring to the show, and this year’s 52nd CMA Awards will likely be no different.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The superstars will take their spots on stage Wednesday, Nov. 14 in Nashville for country music’s biggest night, airing at 8 p.m. on ABC.”
“The pair will host the CMA Awards for the 11th year in a row, the Country Music Association announced Thursday.”


"It's probably more important than ever to make some people laugh this year." Image zooming Brad Paisley and Kelly Underwood | image source: Bob damiko / ABC / Getty “
“… At the same time, it is also an important aspect to enhance our sense of humor in our community and our industry... "
"Video Carrie Underwood's son took part in a superstar concert for the first time in 2017. He is proud of his mother. Paisley said that he is grateful for keeping a greater distance from politics. In casual years, it is easier for guitarists to make fun of them. This activity is..."
"We've been trying to keep that in mind, but this year I hope more than ever that people don't take it out of context, which is the most frustrating part, and I think image zooming has something to do with Brad Paisley and Kelly Underwood and Bob Amico CMA."
"The credit for zooming: Bob damico / ABC via Getty channel," Underwood told people at the time. "We just want to make fun of the funny things."
"Before the 2017 show, the two discussed the way they joked in such a tense year of politics and culture."
"Paisley, 45, and Underwood, 35, are famous for the humor they bring to the show, and this year's 52nd CMA awards may not be any different."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"These superstars will appear in Nashville on November 14 (Wednesday) for ABC's 8 p.m. country night."
The country music association announced on Thursday that they will host the CMA awards ceremony for the 11th consecutive year



**Something goes wrong**
“DEADLINE: Will there be any other Scandal and Murder actors crossing over besides the two leads?”
“You’ll see that crossover.”
“So now the pressure for us for Murder is just to match that level of excitement that they created.”
“I will say, the Scandal read-through, I, as an audience member, just found it so refreshing and fun, and it really felt like Annalise fit in that episode really well.”
“We kept getting closer and closer, and it just made more and more sense.”
“And then if anything bumps along the way, we just won’t do it.”
“At that point, we just thought about it because we didn’t want it to feel forced, and we just wanted it to happen really naturally.”
“So it was one of those serendipitous things where we both realized it was good for both characters, and it almost felt like we had been planning it since last season.”
“She actually pulled up a clip of something from Scandal and their side of the story coalesced perfectly.”
“I said, we don’t have to do it, Viola’s arc doesn’t need this, but it’s possible that their stories could cross really organically.”


"Deadline: in addition to these two clues, will there be other scandals and murder actors crossing the line?"
"You'll see that intersection."
"So now for us, the pressure of murder is just to match the excitement they create."
"What I want to say is that I see through the scandal. As an audience, I think it's so fresh and interesting. I really think annalis is suitable for that episode."
"We get closer and closer, and that makes more and more sense."
"If there's any difficulty along the way, we'll quit."
"At that time, we just thought about it, because we didn't want it to feel forced, we just wanted it to really happen naturally."
"So it's a coincidence that we all realize it's good for both characters and almost feel like we've been planning since last season."
"In fact, she has produced a fragment from the scandal and their views are perfectly integrated."
"I said, we don't have to do this. Viola's arc doesn't need this, but their stories can really cross organically."



**Something goes wrong**
“Sixty-five people are scheduled to testify against him.”
“In a later appearance on Megyn Kelly Today, Biles went into more detail about how Nassar's abuse had affected her and how she was in denial about out it.”
“'The new president, Kerry Perry, she flew down for a visit and we didn't talk [about] any of that.”
“...has heard from the new president of USA Gymnastics which employed Nassar but she said they did not discuss the abuse...”
“Biles later appeared in Megyn Kelly Today to tell how Nassar stole her trust and betrayed her It feels like he took a part of me that I can t get back Simone_Biles on Dr Larry Nassar MegynTODAY pic twitter com NCWBBg0rya Megyn Kelly TODAY MegynTODAY January 31 2018 She...”
“On Wednesday, Biles said it was 'ridiculous' that she had still not heard from its officials.”
“The US Olympics Committee, which Nassar operated under to carry out 'treatment' on the girls as they competed, has not offered them any apologies.”
“Like Judge Aquilina, the nation was repulsed by the extent of Nassar's abuse and has offered an outpouring of support for his victims.”
“'I was very happy, I wish she would have given him like a crazy number, like 3,000 years or something but other than that, she was a boss and she was absolutely amazing.'”
“Biles, who did not attend the hearings but wrote to the judge in a statement, said she was happy with the sentence her abuser received.”


"The plan is 65 people testifying against him."
"On Megan Kelly's show later today, beers tells more about how Nasar's abuse affected her and how she denied it."
"The new President Kerry Perry flew to visit, and we didn't talk about that."
“…… I heard about the new president of the American Gymnastics Association who hired Nasar, but she said they didn't discuss abuse... "
"Biers later appeared in Megan Kelly today to tell Nasar how to steal her trust and betray her, feeling that he took part in me, I can't tweet on Dr. biers picture website ncwbbg0rya Megan Kelly today Megan today January 31, 2018 she..."
"On Wednesday, beers said it was ridiculous that she had not heard from government officials."
"The US Olympic Committee, under the leadership of Nassar, has" treated "these girls, but has not apologized."
"Like judge aquilinna, people across the country are disgusted with the extent of Nasar's abuse and provide a lot of support to his victims."
"I'm very happy, I hope she can give him a crazy number, such as 3000 years or something, but besides, she's a boss, she's definitely a great person."
"Beers did not attend the hearing, but wrote to the judge in a statement saying she was happy with the verdict the perpetrators received."



**Something goes wrong**
“"Thanks for the messages," Del Rey said Sunday afternoon on Twitter, adding that her tour will march on and she "can’t wait to see everyone" in Atlanta on Monday.”
“Police have also confirmed that despite the seriousness of Hunt's attempt, he was unsuccessful in making any kind of physical contact with the singer.”
“As of Sunday, Hunt was being held without bail for charges of attempted kidnapping with a weapon and aggravated stalking with a credible threat.”
“Authorities said the man was carrying a knife and a ticket for the concert when he was arrested just a block away from the venue.”
“According to Orlando Police, officers arrested 43-year-old Michael Shawn Hunt of Riverview on Friday night outside of Del Rey's show at the Amway Center.”
“Photo of Lana Del Rey at the 2018 Grammys, by Timothy Kuratek—Lana Del Rey says she is "doing fine" after a Florida man was arrested for stalking the singer and threatening to kidnap her.”


"Thank you for your message," del Rey tweeted Sunday afternoon, adding that her tour will continue and that she "can't wait to see everyone in Atlanta on Monday."
"Police also confirmed that although Hunt's attempt was serious, he did not have any form of physical contact with the singer."
"As of Sunday, hunt was detained without bail on suspicion of attempted kidnapping with a gun and intensified tracking with credible threats."
"Authorities said the man was arrested with a knife and a ticket to the concert just one block from the venue."
According to Orlando police, 43 year old Michael Sean hunt was arrested Friday night outside Drey's performance at Amway center
"The photo of Lana Drey at the 2018 Grammy Awards was taken by Timothy kuratek," said Lana Drey, who "did a good job" after a Florida man was arrested for stalking the singer and threatening to kidnap her



**Something goes wrong**
“It would also free up a ton of space for a new nursery and multiple playrooms—just saying.”
“...leased from the Royal Household in Kensington Palace...”
“The renovation proposal claimed that the nearly 5 000 square foot expansion would free up the palace suites for the Royal Family and is required to allow for the accommodation of administration which must necessarily be moved out of rooms...”
“And there's plenty of room at Kensington Palace, since Prince William and Princess Kate recently added a huge, three-story extension to the royal residence in preparation for their move there from Amner Hall.”
“During a trip to Poland earlier this summer, after being gifted a toy for a newborn, Kate reportedly joked, "We will just have to have more babies!"”
“A little brother or sister for George and Charlotte isn't entirely unexpected.”
“The Duchess is being cared for at Kensington Palace."”
“Her Royal Highness will no longer carry out her planned engagement at the Hornsey Road Children's Centre in London today.”
“Kate's morning sickness was also mentioned in the statement, as an explanation for her absence at upcoming events: "As with her previous two pregnancies, the Duchess is suffering from hyperemesis gravidarum.”
“The Queen and members of both families are delighted with the news."”


"It will also free up a ton of space to build a new nursery and multiple playrooms."
“… From Kensington Palace, the royal family... "
"The renovation plan claims that the nearly 5000 square foot expansion will free up Palace Suites for the royal family, and requires that the executive department be allowed to stay, and the executive department must move out of the room..."
"Since Prince William and Princess Kate recently expanded a large three story house in the palace and are ready to move from amner palace to Kensington Palace, Kensington Palace has also a lot of space."
According to reports, earlier this summer, Kate got a newborn toy while traveling in Poland. She joked: "we can only have a few more children!"
"It's not entirely unexpected that George and Charlotte have a brother or sister."
"The Duchess is being looked after at Kensington Palace."
"Your Highness will no longer carry out her engagement plan at the West horn Road Children's centre in London today."
The statement also referred to Kate's morning sickness as an explanation for her absence from the upcoming event: "like the previous two pregnancies, the Duchess suffered from hyperemesis gravidarum."
"The queen and members of both families are happy with the news."



**Something goes wrong**
“I think, ‘Well am I supposed to run the country?’ I don’t think so.” Well, we think so!”
“I am the kind of person who tries to listen to signs.”
“In a candid new interview alongside her A Wrinkle in Time co-stars Reese Witherspoon and Mindy Kaling, Oprah Winfrey revealed she doesn’t pump her own gas.”
““I gotta just say, I wouldn’t know what to do,” she shared with E!”
“News.”
“Reese who pumps her own gas may we add quipped back You would it would come back to you Oprah replied I actually took someone to the airport recently and I was like make sure you have your ticket and...”
“...they were like What and I said They don t have tickets anymore...”
“'”But even though Oprah doesn’t pump her own gas or answer her own phone, she does pay her own bills and get her own coffee.”
“In fact, she recently had a super funny experience at Starbucks.”
““Can you imagine writing ‘Oprah’ on a coffee cup?” Mindy asked.”


"I thought, 'should I run the country? "I don't think so." Well, we think so! "
"I'm the kind of person who wants to hear the signal."
Oprah Winfrey, who co stars with Reese Witherspoon and Mindy Carlin in the wrinkles of the times, revealed in a frank new interview that she was not cheering
"I have to say, I don't know what to do," she said to e! "
"News."
"Come on, Reese. We can add that she joked that you would come back." Oprah replied, "I really took people to the airport recently. I want to make sure you have a ticket, and then..."
“… They're like what, I said they don't have tickets... "
"But even if Oprah doesn't pump her own gas or answer her own phone, she pays her own bill and buys her own coffee."
"In fact, she had a very interesting experience at Starbucks recently."
"Can you imagine writing 'Oprah' on a coffee cup? "Asked Mindy



**Something goes wrong**
“She says this has been the best few months she’s had on the show since she joined 16 years ago.” Happy Anniversary to all!”
““5-1-96…happy 22nd anniversary Boo… seems like yesterday to me… I’m sure it’s feels a lot longer to you…(honeymoon photo Capri, Italy… we’re still banned from that hotel… it was worth it),” he captioned some throwback photos of the couple.”
“Kelly Ripa celebrated two big anniversaries on Tuesday, May 1.”
“First off, she rang in 22 years of marriage with her husband, Mark Consuelos.”
“On top of that, the day marked one year of her hosting Live With Kelly with co-host Ryan Seacrest!”
“The TV personality took to Instagram to give sweet shout-outs to both Mark and Ryan.”
“For Mark, she posted a sweet video collage featuring a bunch of cute photos of the two.”
““Feliz Aniversario lover!”
“22 years.”
“You’re a human roller coaster that luckily I’m tall enough to ride.”


"She said it was the best months since she joined the show 16 years ago," happy anniversary
"On 1 May 1996 Happy 22nd anniversary, Shh It's like yesterday for me I believe it feels much longer for you (honeymoon photo, Capri, Italy We are still forbidden to enter that hotel It's worth it), "he added titles to some of the couple's retrospective photos
On Tuesday, May 1st, Kelly Ripa celebrated two important anniversaries
"First, she called her husband, mark Consuelos, who had been married for 22 years."
"Besides, this day marks the year when she and Kelly co host the live broadcast of Ryan Seacrest!"
"The TV celebrity gave mark and Ryan a sweet shout on instagram."
"For mark, she put up a sweet video collage with a bunch of lovely photos of them."
"Feliz aniversario, lover!"
"22 years."
"You're a human roller coaster. Fortunately, I'm tall enough to ride."



**Something goes wrong**
“Wonder Woman 1984 is set to hit theaters on Nov. 1, 2019.”
“They fall in love, but then Trevor rides off on a heroic suicide mission, sacrificing his life in order to prevent a deadly gas from being used in the war.”
“On Wednesday, director Patty Jenkins and star Gal Gadot both released stills from the upcoming movie, which will be titled, drum roll .”
“.”
“Wonder Woman 1984, because the film is set during the Cold War.”
“We’ll get to that in a minute.”
“But first, let’s address the biggest reveal from these new stills: Steve Trevor is alive!”
“Jenkins shared a still of Chris Pine reprising his role as Trevor with this caption: “Welcome to WONDER WOMAN 1984, Steve Trevor!”
“#WW84.” Let it be known that Pine is absolutely working the hell out of that 1980s-inspired wardrobe, wearing an all-black jumpsuit and a pair of worn-in Nike Cortez sneakers.”


Wonder woman 1984 will be released on November 1, 2019
They fell in love, but Trevor sacrificed his life in order to prevent the use of deadly gas in the war and carried out a heroic suicide mission
On Wednesday, director Patty Jenkins and starring Gail gado released stills of the upcoming film, entitled "the drum."
“.”
"Wonder Woman 1984" because it was set in the cold war
"We'll be there in a minute."
"But first, let's talk about the biggest revelation of these new stills: Steve Trevor is still alive!"
Jenkins shared a still photo of Chris pine replaying Trevor: "welcome to wonder woman 1984, Steve Trevor!"
"Let's know that Payne, wearing an all black jumpsuit and a pair of Nike Cortes sneakers, is absolutely working hard to build that 80's style wardrobe."



**Something goes wrong**
“And, for the record (no pun intended), we think he looks perfect as is.”
“We love Smith for his candor.”
“And the singer did the same in a recent interview.”
“Chatting with his friend Sarah Jessica Parker for V Magazine, the crooner admitted that he's struggled with body issues in the past.”
“(We feel you, Sam!)”
“When Parker asked her friend about self-image, Smith confessed that he's more comfortable in front of a camera now than he used to be.”
“But, he was in a particularly rough spot when he was shooting his first music videos.”
“"I just wasn’t happy with the way I looked, so I was trying to control the way the camera moved," Smith said.”
“"I got a bit obsessive.”
“I was constantly looking in the mirror, pinching my waist, weighing myself every day."”


"And, as a record (no puns), we think he looks perfect."
"We like Smith's frankness."
"The singer did the same in a recent interview."
"While chatting with his friend Sarah Jessica Parker for V magazine, the singer admitted that he had been fighting physical problems in the past."
"We feel you, Sam!"
"When Parker asked her friend about her self-image, Smith admitted that he was much more comfortable in front of the camera now than in the past."
"But when he made his first music video, he was in a particularly difficult situation."
"I'm just not satisfied with what I look like, so I try to control the way the camera moves," Smith said
"I'm a little obsessed."
"I keep looking in the mirror, pinching my waist and weighing myself every day."



**Something goes wrong**
“Anyone with information about her missing brother is asked to contact Blackfalds RCMP at 403-885-3300.”
“He he would never leave his unlocked home without those items nor his 7 beloved dogs.”
“Kim #centralalberta #blackfalds #reddeeralberta.'”
“Many thanks for reading this.”
“Please spread the world.”
“Help us bring him home safe.”
“'He’s a one of a kind brother.”
“Chris is 55 years old, 6 feet tall, 200 pounds, blue eyes, short brown hair, goatee, average build & usually wearing a waist length hooded winter coat with black gloves, blue jeans and calf high black winter boots.”
“'This is not like Chris.”
“'I think once everybody has thoroughly experienced the grieving process, then Michael Patrick King can go back and sort of ponder what he might want to do and how he might want to proceed,' she said in response to whether they might simply kill Samantha off.”


"Anyone with information about her missing brother, please contact the Royal Rangers at 403-885-3300."
"He will never leave his unlocked home, without these things, or his beloved seven dogs."
"King, central larberta, black, FAZ, red Alberta."
"Thank you very much for reading this article."
"Please spread the word."
"Help us take him home safely."
"He is an amiable brother."
"Chris is 55 years old, 6 feet tall, 200 pounds, blue eyes, short brown hair, goatee, average build & usually wearing a waist length winter coat, black gloves, blue jeans and calf high black winter boots."
"It's not like Chris."
"I think that once everyone has gone through the whole process of grief, Michael Patrick King can go back and think about what he might want to do and how he might want to continue," she said in response to whether they might kill Samantha



**Something goes wrong**
“– See more at…”
“Find here more about their relationship Dinner Date with Bella Thorne and Ella Ross Scott recently enjoyed a dinner date with Bella Thorne at Hollywood hotspot Catch L A and also disclosed that he has canceled plans with rumored love interest Ella Ross for a chance to sit down with...”
“Also About Scott Disick’s Wild Nights Partying With Bella Thorne and Ella Ross!!”
“Share thisLooks like Scott Disick has found himself a new Girlfriend!”
“Scott Disick and Bella Throne have been seen together for a couple of times and last they were seen partying the night away.”
“Are becoming an item?”
“Let’s Find out!”
“Bella Thorne and Scott DisickThe Keeping up with Kardashian star Scott Disick has been seen cozying up with Bella Thorne.”
“The couple was seen together on many occasions and also had dinner together at Catch LA in Hollywood on Monday and then they went to the celeb haunt the Nice Guy, according to ET.”
“An insider told ET that the couple later went to The Peppermint Club and listened to music.”


"– for more information, please visit..."
"Find out more about their relationship with Bella Thorne and Ella Ross Scott and their dinner date here. Recently, Ella Ross Scott had dinner with Bella Thorne in Hollywood's hot character capture Los Angeles, and revealed that he had canceled his plan with Ella Ross, who was rumored to be interested in love, and hoped to have a chance to sit down with her.... "
"And Scott Disick's carnival night with Bella Thorne and Ella Ross!"
"Sharing this looks like Scott Disick has found a new girlfriend!"
"Scott Disick and Bella Borden have been together several times, and the last time they were seen having a party outside."
"Becoming a project?"
"Let's have a look!"
"The co production of Bella Thorne and Scott Disick with Kardashian star Scott Disick is considered to be the co production of Bella Thorne."
According to ET, the couple had been seen together many times, had dinner together at catch La in Hollywood on Monday, and then went to the house of a good man haunted by celebrities
"An insider told et that the couple went to the mint club to listen to music later."



**Something goes wrong**
“...wrote Luann.”
“We care for each other very much, hope you respect our privacy during this sad time!'”
“Not so mellow yellow: She rocked a canary-coloured midi dressKeeping it simple: She also wore gold flip-flopsA source close to D'Agostino denied the claim, telling DailyMail.com: 'That's not true.”
“D'Agostino is also understood to have met up with an ex-girlfriend during the couple's recent trip to the Hamptons, leaving de Lesseps to attend co-star Jill Zarin's annual luncheon without him.”
“And when she uncovered more evidence of his affairs last month, de Lesseps confronted the businessman in a New York restaurant – sparking a physical fight that was reported at the time.”
“This comes after friends of Luann say she began investigating after being shown a photo of D'Agostino Jr, 50, kissing another woman by his ex-girlfriend – and her co-star – Ramona Singer, 60.”
“...t understand why this false rumor is coming at me...”
“Things may be getting even more interesting as according to Page Six the reality star has been spending time with ex Jacques Azoulay who she has insisted is just a friend as they are pictured together in March 2013 God knows I ve been going through enough recently I don...”
“Tough times: The 52-year-old reality star did not look too pleased while out and aboutReigniting the flame?”
“There’s no truth to the story of Jacques and me.”


"Luan wrote."
"We are very concerned about each other. I hope you respect our privacy in this sad moment!"
"It's not that mellow yellow: she's rocking a light yellow MIDI dress, keeping it simple: she's still wearing a gold flip flop. A source close to dagostino denied the claim, telling the Daily Mail "that's not true."
"It is understood that during the couple's recent trip to Hampton, dagostino also met an ex girlfriend who asked dreiseps to attend the annual luncheon of CO star Jill zalin without him."
Last month, when dreisepps found more evidence of his extramarital affair, she confronted the businessman in a New York restaurant, triggering a reported physical conflict at the time
"Luan's friend said she started investigating after seeing pictures of 50 year old D'Agostino Jr. kissing another woman, his ex girlfriend and her partner Ramona singer, 60."
"I don't understand why this rumor hit me..."
"Things may get more interesting because according to the report on page 6, the reality TV star has been spending time with former Jacques azoulay, and she insists that she is just a friend, because in their group photo in March 2013, God knows I've experienced enough recently, I don't know..."
"Tough times: the 52 year old reality star doesn't look happy when he's out and lighting the torch?"
"The story of Jacques and I is not true."



**Something goes wrong**
“He has no record, has never been accused of anything like this, and no one that knows him would ever think he would be in this type of situation.””
““You might read something or see him on ‘The Bachelorette,’ but the first thing about him is that he’s just a good kid from a really good family.”
“Jackson is at the center of the scandal along with fellow contestant Corinne Olympios, amid tabloid reports about an inappropriate sexual encounter.”
“Jackson broke his silence earlier this week, saying, “My character and family name has been assassinated this past week with false claims and malicious allegations.”In an exclusive interview with Variety, Jackson’s lawyer Walter Mosley says his client has suffered because of the recent swirl of coverage.”
““This has caused a lot of trauma — both physical and emotional injury,” says Mosley.”
““It’s been difficult for DeMario and his family.”
“He’s a celebrity for all the wrong reasons.”Mosley says his focus is on clearing his client’s name, and then exploring any legal remedies.”
“While he declined to say whether he will be taking legal action against the studio, network or Olympios, Mosley did say that a potential case may came after he views the footage from “Bachelor In Paradise,” which neither he nor Jackson have yet seen.”
““I have requested the tapes and I’m hoping to see the tapes next week,” he says.”
““The tapes are the real facts needed to vindicate DeMario’s name.”Given the serious nature of the complaints, Mosley says he supports the investigation, but says he questions the process given that the tapes should provide a clear answer.”


"He has no criminal record and has never been accused of such a thing. People who know him would not think that he would encounter such a situation."
"You may read something, or see him on bachelor, but the first thing about him is that he's just a good kid from a very good family."
"Jackson and other contestant Corinne Olympus were the focus of the scandal in the tabloid about an inappropriate sexual contact."
Jackson broke his silence earlier this week, saying: "my character and surname have been assassinated in the past week, with false charges and malicious charges." In an interview with variety, Jackson's lawyer, Walter Mosley, said his client suffered because of the confusion of recent reports
"It caused a lot of trauma, both physical and mental," Mosley said
"It's difficult for demario and his family."
"He became famous for the wrong reasons," Mosley said Mosley said his focus is to clear the names of clients and then explore any legal remedies
Although Mosley declined to say whether he would take legal action against the film company, the television network or Olympus, Mosley did say that after he watched the video of "Bachelor in heaven", there might be a potential case. Neither he nor Jackson has seen the film
"I've asked for the tape and I hope to see it next week," he said
"These tapes are the real facts needed to defend de Mario." Given the seriousness of the complaint, Mosley said he supported the investigation, but he said he questioned the process of the investigation as the tape should provide a clear answer



**Something goes wrong**
“The brand new security system they left behind probably spiked the price.”
“Only a few repairs to the roof and other minor stuff.”
“The home’s been vacant since Mama June bailed for an upgrade earlier this year…and we’re told they left the place in pretty good shape.”
“...ft. 3 bed, 1.5 bath home -- heavily featured on the cancelled reality show -- has put the house on the market for $45k, almost twice the $27k he bought it for 5 years ago.”
“The owner of the 1,368 sq.”
“EXCLUSIVEMama June, Sugar Bear and the rest of the 'Honey Boo Boo' clan have been a financial bonanza for their landlord, who stands to make a killing off their Georgia digs.”


"The new security system they left behind could drive up the price."
"It's just a few roof repairs and stuff like that."
"The house has been empty since Joan's mother checked out earlier this year to upgrade We were told they were in good condition when they left
“…… A three foot bed, a half bathroom house - which has sprung up on canceled reality shows - is on the market for $45000, almost twice as much as his $27000 five years ago. "
"Owners of 1368 square meters"
"Exclusive advertising Mama June, sugar bear and other members of the 'honey boo boo' family have always been the source of money for their landlords, and they will make a lot of money on the land in Georgia."



**Something goes wrong**
“"Thank you very much."”
“"The people that watch with us very Tuesday night and embrace the show that reflects positivity and hope and inclusion, we love you," the 40-year-old actor said in his speech.”
“The 2018 Screen Actors Awards ceremony was a big night for "This Is Us," and thanks to the hit NBC drama's stars Chrissy Metz and Justin Hartley, the entire Pearson family got to experience the magic.”
“"This Is Us" star Chrissy Metz, right, brought young actress Mackenzie Hancsicsak, who plays the 10-year-old Kate Pearson, to Sunday night's Screen Actors Guild Awards in Los Angeles.”
“Dimitrios Kambouris / Getty ImagesThat's because big-hearted Metz, 37, and Hartley, 40, brought along the young actors who play their characters as kids as their special guests to Sunday's event.”
“Just want 2 thank Miss @ChrissyMetz again 4 very graciously & selflessly giving up her plus one so I could attend the SAG awards.”
“Some of the kid ensemble didn’t appear in enough episodes 2 qualify, but when the adults found out, they stepped up & offered their plus one.”
“Thank U!”
“...pic twitter com P3DJ58CClU Mackenzie Hancsicsak MHancsicsak January 22 2018 Early Monday morning Mackenzie Hancsicsak 10 who plays the 10 year old version of Kate Pearson took to Twitter to thank Metz for bringing her as her guest explaining that some of the show s young cast members didn t...”
“...have enough screen time under their belts to have been invited on their own...”


"Thank you very much."
The 40 year old actor said in his speech: "the people who watched with us on Tuesday night embraced programs that reflected positivity, hope and tolerance. We love you."
"The 2018 screen actor awards ceremony is a big night for this is us. Thanks to the popular NBC TV stars Chris Metz and Justin Hartley, the whole Pearson family has experienced magic."
Chris Metz (right) from this is us takes young actress Mackenzie hancicsak to the Screen Actors Guild Awards ceremony in Los Angeles on Sunday night, where she plays 10-year-old Kate Pearson
"Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images" because Metz, 37, and Hartley, 40, brought their young actors who played their role as children as their special guests to Sunday's event. "
"I just want to thank Miss Chris Metz again for giving up her plus one very kindly and selflessly so that I can attend the sag award ceremony."
"Some children's troupes didn't show up in the second episode, but when the adults found out, they came forward and offered their plus sign."
"Thank you!"
“… Pic twitter com p3dj58cclu Mackenzie hancsicsak mhancsicsak in the early morning of Monday, January 22, 2018, Mackenzie hancsicsak 10, who plays the 10-year-old version of Kate Pearson, thanks Metz for inviting her as a guest on Twitter and explains that some of the young actors in the play have not... "
“… They have enough time to be invited to play alone... "



**Something goes wrong**
“She’d just made it up to smear me and to provoke me into a confrontation.”
“I’m not gay and she hadn’t heard that about me.”
“'Then we can make lots of money out of it.’ I stared at her and laughed: 'You must be joking, you deluded woman.'”
“Awaiting our first challenge, Omarosa sidled up to me and suggested the two of us have sex.”
“But nothing quite prepared me for her opening gambit as we waited for the details of the first challenge.”
“She’d become America’s most hated reality TV villain after her diabolical performance in the 2004 season of the regular Apprentice.”
“I knew OF her, obviously.”
“I met her a decade ago when we were cast together in the first season of Celebrity Apprentice in 2008.”
“This is a woman who would do anything to get what she wants - however shameless and shameful.”
“It’s her raison d’etre.”


"She just made it up to slander me and provoke my confrontation."
"I'm not gay, and she hasn't heard of me."
"Then we can make a lot of money from it." I looked at her and said with a smile, "you must be joking, you cheated woman."
"Waiting for our first challenge, Omarosa quietly came up to me and suggested that we two have sex."
"But as we waited for the details of the first challenge, I was unprepared for her opening remarks."
"Her demonic performance in the 2004 season of ordinary apprentice made her one of the most annoying reality TV villains in the United States."
"Obviously, I know her."
"Ten years ago, I got to know her in the first season of 2008's Apprentice."
"This is a woman who does everything to get what she wants - no matter how shameless and shameful."
"That's her reason."



**Something goes wrong**
“The series also stars Issac Ryan Brown, Navia Robinson, Jason Maybaum and Sky Katz.”
“Dava Savel and Michael Feldman are executive producers with Raven-Symoné.”
““Raven’s Home” was developed by Scott Thomas and Jed Elinoff, and created by “That’s So Raven” creators Michael Poryes and Susan Sherman.”
“Since premiering, the show has performed strongly in its Friday 8 p.m. timeslot and has become Disney Channel’s No.1 streamed series with nearly 4.5 million viewers on YouTube and 10 million VOD views.”
“6 million...”
“Raven s Home is currently in the midst of its first season which debuted this past July becoming the top live action cable television series premiere of the past two years among Kids 6 11 1 3 million viewers Tweens 9 14 1 5 million and Kids 2 11 1”
“The entire cast and crew have delivered a classic family sitcom that kids and families will be watching for many years to come,” said Adam Bonnett, Disney Channels Worldwide’s executive vice president of original programming.”
““We are incredibly proud of our first season and the fact that Raven has returned home to Disney Channel in a very big way.”
“About one year ago, Raven-Symoné departed “The View,” on which she was a co-host from 2015-2016, to develop “Raven’s Home” with Disney Channel, which required her to move from New York to Los Angeles.”
“Unbeknownst to the kids, Raven still catches glimpses of the future, and unbeknownst to Raven, her son has discovered he has the same ability to see into the future.”


The series also includes Isaac Ryan brown, navia Robinson, Jason maybaum and sky Katz
"Dawa Saville and Michael Feldman are executive producers of Raven Simone."
"Raven house was developed by Scott Thomas and Jed elinov, and created by Michael Boris and Susan Sherman, the creators of that's such a raven."
"Since its premiere, the show has performed strongly at 8pm on Friday and has become the number one streaming series of Disney Channel, with nearly 4.5 million viewers and 10 million VOD views on YouTube."
"Six million..."
"Ravens home is currently in the middle of the first season, premiering in July this year, becoming the top live action cable series premiered in the past two years among 6113 million children, 91415 million children and 211 children."
Adam bonnett, executive vice president of original programming for Disney global channel, said: "the entire crew and the crew have launched a classic family sitcom that children and their families will watch for many years to come."
"We're very proud of our first season, and raven came home to Disney Channel in a very big way."
"About a year ago, raven symon é left the view, which she co hosted in 2015-2016, to work with Disney Channel to develop Raven's home, which required her to move from New York to Los Angeles."
"Without the children's knowledge, raven can still see the future, and without Raven's knowledge, her son finds that he has the same ability to see the future."



**Something goes wrong**
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  635
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It can't come soon enough.”
“Dee poked fun at her co-star Fahy for sleeping between takes and “aggressively” consuming popcorn.”
“Freeform’s funny (and often emotional) series The Bold Type has garnered a loyal fan base as it follows Jane (Katie Stevens), Kat (Aisha Dee), and Sutton’s (Meghann Fahy) career moves and personal drama in New York City.”
“Season 2 wraps up on August 7 and fans are already wondering when does The Bold Type return for more hilarious incidents, workplace power moves, and refreshingly real drama.”
“There is no definitive premiere date for Season 3, but Freeform has debuted its previous two seasons during the summer months.”
“So, fans can probably anticipate new episodes in June or July of 2019.”
“TV Line actually confirmed Season 3 back in 2017 when the series announced its return for two more 10-episode seasons shortly after its first season, so it's coming.”
“You'll just have to wait a year for it.”
“According to the report, The Bold Type, which is based on former Cosmopolitan editor-in-chief Joanna Coles life, also brought in its current showrunner Amanda Lasher after the show's creator (Sarah Watson) had some creative differences with the network.”
“The lengthy wait may seem like forever to dedicated fans, but they can take comfort in knowing that Season 3 filming is happening right now.”


"Too soon."
Dee made fun of her partner Fay for sleeping in between filming and eating popcorn
"Freeform's funny (usually emotional) series the bold type has won loyal fans because it follows the career development and personal drama of Katie Stevens, Aisha Dee and Meghan Fahy in New York."
"The second season will end on August 7, and fans have been wondering when this bold style will return, with more funny events, workplace power trends and refreshing real plots."
"There's no definite premiere date for the third season, but freeform has launched the first two seasons in the summer months."
"So fans may be looking forward to a new show in June or July 2019."
"TV line actually confirmed the third season as early as 2017. At that time, shortly after the first season, it announced that it would broadcast two more seasons and 10 episodes, so it was about to be released."
"You have to wait a year."
"It is reported that this bold TV play based on Joanna Coles life, the former editor of cosmopolitanism, has also introduced Amanda Lasser, the current program operator, after the creator (Sarah Watson) has some creative differences with the TV network."
"The long wait seems to be forever for enthusiastic fans, but they can rest assured that the shooting of the third season is going on."



**Something goes wrong**
“Check out pictures from the event below, which, all things considered, looked like it turned out quite lovely:”
“His kids were present to help celebrate their new baby brother.”
“Kevin Hart and wife Eniko celebrated the upcoming arrival of their son, and did so in a lavish jungle-themed party attended by family and friends.”
“The event took place at the Calamigos Beach Club in Malibu.”
“During the party, the name of their son was revealed as Kenzo.”
“And to celebrate that, Hart wore clothing from the brand Kenzo, the little one’s name was emblazoned on the photo booth wall, and “KENZO” was spelled out on top of the dessert table in big blue letters.”
“Updates of the event were shared on Snapchat throughout the day, where Kevin did his best to show that he and Eniko are doing just fine following the controversial cheating and extortion scandal she had to deal with earlier this month.”
“Before the celebration took place, there was a report that the star had dished out $118,000 for the baby shower.”
“Despite that though, they cut corners on the animals, opting for golden retrievers with faux lion manes as opposed to actual big cats.”
“Kevin joked about it in a Snapchat video.”


"Take a look at the photos of the following activities. They look lovely from all aspects."
"His children were present to celebrate their new brother."
Kevin Hart and his wife, Eniko, celebrated their son's arrival at a huge jungle themed party attended by family and friends
"The event was held at the karamigos Beach Club in Malibu."
"During the party, their son was named Kenzo."
"To celebrate this, Hart wore Kenzo clothes, the name of the little guy was printed on the wall of the photo booth, and" Kenzo "was spelled on the dessert table in big blue letters."
"On this day, snapchat was sharing the latest development of the incident, and Kevin did his best to show that he and iniko were doing well after the controversial fraud and blackmail scandal she had to deal with earlier this month."
"Before the celebration, it was reported that the star had already spent $118000 on gifts for the baby."
Nevertheless, they cut corners on the animals and chose the golden retriever with a fake lion's mane instead of the real big cat
"Kevin joked in the snapchat video."



Number  637
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned to Marvel.com, follow @Avengers on Twitter, and Like “The Avengers” on Facebook for the latest on the Avengers as it develops!”
““Avengers: Infinity War” opens in theaters on April 27.”
“Watch the featurette above, and then grab tickets on Fandango!”
“Benedict Cumberbatch, Chris Pratt, and Robert Downey Jr. reflect on filming with heroes they’ve never shared the screen with before, while others reflected on the years and time spent together.”
“...it has meant to them over the time they ve spent together making MCU films...”
“We re not only weeks away from Marvel Studios Avengers Infinity War landing in theaters but also the 10 year anniversary from when the Marvel Cinematic Universe journey began with Iron Man In a new Family featurette the cast of Avengers Infinity War talk about their MCU family and what...”


"Please keep up with marvel, follow @ Avengers on twitter, and keep up with the Avengers like" Avengers "on Facebook
"Avenger: Infinite War" was released in cinemas on April 27
"Watch the special above and grab van Dango's ticket!"
"Benedict Cumberbatch, Chris Pratt and Robert Downey Jr. reviewed the shooting experiences of heroes with whom they had never shared a screen, while others looked back on their years together."
“… For them, it means the time they spent together shooting MCU movies.... "
"We're not only a few weeks away from Marvel studio's Avenger Infinite War landing in the cinema, but also a new family special," iron man, "the avenger Infinite War actors talk about their MCU family and what..."



**Something goes wrong**
“This week featured a double elimination and the bottom three artists were to perform again for the Instant Save.”
“[7]Week 4: Top 10 (May 8 & 9) [ edit ]The Top 10 performed Monday, May 8, 2017, with the results following on Tuesday, May 9, 2017.”
“5 Episode 2 Feb 28 edit Episode 3 March 2 edit Episode 4 March 6 edit Episode 5 March 7 edit Episode 6 March 13 edit Episode 7 March 14 edit Episode 8 March 15 edit This episode covered The Best of the Blind Auditions which included a recap and...”
“...show...”
“Blind auditions edit Color key Coach pressed I WANT YOU button Artist defaulted to this coach s team Artist elected to join this coach s team Artist eliminated with no coach pressing I WANT YOU button Episode 1 Feb 27 edit The coaches performed Waterfalls at the start of the...”
“Bolded names are artists who received the Coach Comeback and advanced to the Live Playoffs.”
“...are stolen artists names struck through within former teams...”
“Quizz Swanigan Dawson Coyle Hunter Plake Autumn Turner Felicia Temple Lauryn Judd RJ Collins Missy Robertson Blake Shelton Lauren Duski Aliyah Moulden TSoul Casi Joy Aaliyah Rose Felicia Temple Caroline Sky Andrea Thomas Enid Ortiz Dawson Coyle Ashley Levin Brennley Brown Valerie Ponzio Josh Hoyer Micah Tryba Note Italicized names...”
“Price Gaby Borromeo Gwen Stefani Brennley Brown Hunter Plake Troy Ramey Johnny Gates JChosen Quizz Swanigan Stephanie Rice Aaliyah Rose Brandon Royal Davina Leone Caroline Sky Jozy Bernadette Savannah Leighton Sammie Zonana Kenny P Alicia Keys Chris Blue Vanessa Ferguson Stephanie Rice Jack Cassidy Ashley Levin Anatalia Villaranda Lilli Passero...”
“Knockout rounds Stolen in the Battle rounds Stolen in the Battle rounds Eliminated in the Battle rounds Coaches Top 48 artists Adam Levine Jesse Larson Mark Isaiah Lilli Passero Hanna Eyre Johnny Hayes Josh West Malik Davage Davina Leone Autumn Turner Taylor Alexander Sheena Brook Kawan DeBose Julien Martinez Nala...”


"There was a double play this week, and the third from the bottom artist will perform again to get instant rescue."
"[7] week 4: Top 10 (May 8 and 9) [editor] top 10 was held on May 8, 2017 (Monday), and the results were announced on May 9, 2017 (Tuesday)."
"5 Episode 2 February 28 edit episode 3 March 2 Edit Episode 4 March 6 edit Episode 5 March 7 edit Episode 6 March 13 edit episode 7 March 14 edit episode 8 March 15 edit this episode covers the best blind auditions, including review and..."
“… Show
"Blind audition edit color button coach press I want you button artist default for this coach's team artist elected to join this coach's team artist eliminated no coach press I want you button Episode 1 February 27 edit coach performance waterfall start..."
"The bold name is the artist who accepted the coach's comeback and made it to the live playoffs."
“… The stolen artist's name was penetrated in the previous team... "
"Test swanegan Dawson Coyle Hunter Prak autumn Turner Felicia Temple Laurin Judd RJ Collins Missy Robertson black Sheldon Lauren duski alier Moulden Tsoul Cassie joy aliye rose Felicia Temple Caroline sky Andrea Thomas Enid Otis Dawson Coyle Ashley Levin brunley Brownie Valerie Ponceau Josh Hoyer Mika TRYBA note italicized name... "
Price Gabby Borromeo ogwin Stephanie brenley Brown Hunter praktroilamy Johnny gates Joson test svaneggen Stephanie rice aliye rose Brandon Royal Davina Leon Caroline sky jozborne det Savannah Leighton Sammy zona Kenny P Alicia key Chris blue Vanessa Ferguson Stephanie rice Jack Cassidy Ashley Levine, Anatolia verandali pacero... "
"Knockout stolen in battle stolen in battle eliminated in battle coach top 48 artist Adam Levine Jesse Larsen Marc Isaiah lil passello Hannah love Johnny Hayes Josh ximalik dawacchi Davina Leon autumn Turner Thaler calender sherna Brooke kavanderbos Julian Martin nesnara..."



**Something goes wrong**
“So let’s savor this new Grande ‘do before she’s onto the next — although, we’re pretty excited to see whatever that next color is.”
“Lavender certainly suits the candy-sweet pop goddess, but we know it won’t last for long.”
“Just scrolling through the #pastelhair tag on Instagram is giving us serious unicorn/fairy/magical hair envy.”
“Pastel hair colors have been trendy for a few years now, but we’re not nearly over them yet.”
“Of course, now that Ariana Grande has pastel lavender hair, we want pastel lavender hair.”
“Even though we’re having a hard time catching our breath between dye jobs, we must admit that Grande is absolutely slaying the hair game lately.”
“And before that, she was seemingly back to her natural brown after trying platinum blonde on for size in April.”
“He instagrammed the look, captioning it “Lavender dreams.”When we say we have Grande hairstyle whiplash, it’s because just days before her purple transformation, Grande went silver/cotton candy-blue for a Reebok campaign.”
“Freelance hairstylist behind her painted “God Is A Woman” locks, Josh Liu, helped Grande make a more permanent shift into pastels.”
“But after the shoot wrapped, Grande clearly wasn’t ready to say goodbye to those pastel hues just yet.”


"So let's have a taste of this new brand before she goes to the next stage - although we're happy to see what the next color is."
"Lavender is certainly suitable for sweet pop goddess, but we know it won't last long."
"Just scroll through the pastelhair tab on instagram and we'll be very jealous of Kirin / Fairy / magic hair."
"Pastel hair color has been popular for several years, but we haven't got rid of it completely."
"Of course, now Ariana grand has Lavender hair, we want Lavender hair."
"Although it's hard for us to catch our breath between dyeing our hair, we have to admit that Grande is definitely killing the hairstyle game these days."
"Before that, she tried on a platinum hair size in April and seemed to have returned to a natural brown."
He added the title "Lavender dream" to the shape on his website. When we say we have grand's haircut, it's because just a few days before her purple turn, grand went to silver / marshmallow blue for Reebok
Josh Liu, the freelance hairstylist behind her "God is a woman" hairstyle, helped to transform Grande into pastel for a longer time
"But at the end of the shoot, it's clear that grand is not ready to say goodbye to the soft tones."



**Something goes wrong**
“The production also features sets and costumes by Christopher Oram, lighting design by Natasha Katz, sound design by Peter Hylenski, video design by Finn Ross, puppet design by Michael Curry, hair design by David Brian Brown, and makeup design by Anne Ford-Coates.”
“The movie’s co-director and screenwriter, Jennifer Lee, also returned to pen the book.”
“Oscar-winning songwriting team Kristen Anderson-Lopez and Robert Lopez have written roughly a dozen new songs to accompany the film’s well-known hits.”
“Read: FROZEN STARS CAISSIE LEVY AND PATTI MURIN DISCUSS WHY BEING ‘QUIRKY’ MAKES THEM PERFECT DISNEY ROYALSThe musical marks the first adaptation of the 2013 hit film to expand upon the original story.”
“Flip through photos from the Denver engagement below:Get a First Look at Disney’s Broadway-Bound Frozen Get a First Look at Disney’s Broadway-Bound Frozen 5 PHOTOSPerformances will begin at Broadway St. James Theatre February 22, 2018; opening night is set for March 22.”
“Among those joining them are Jelani Alladin as Kristoff, John Riddle as Hans, Robert Creighton as Weselton, Kevin Del Aguila as Oaken, Timothy Hughes as Pabbie, and Greg Hildreth as Olaf.”
“The stage adaptation of the Oscar-winning animated hit, directed by Tony winner Michael Grandage stars Broadway alums Caissie Levy and Patti Murin as Elsa and Anna, respectively.”
“Performances will run at the Colorado venue through October 1; the musical will go on to make its Broadway premiere in 2018.”
“The pre-Broadway engagement of Disney’s Frozen officially opens at the Denver Center for the Performing Arts’ Buell Theatre September 14.”
“Get a First Look at Disney’s Broadway-Bound FrozenThe stage adaptation of the animated hit opens officially in Denver September 14 prior to a 2018 Broadway bow.”


"The work also includes Christopher Oram's set and costume, Natasha Katz's lighting design, Peter helensky's sound design, Finn Ross's video design, Michael Curry's puppet design, David Bryan Brown's hair design and Anne Ford cots's make-up design."
"Jennifer Lee, CO director and screenwriter of the film, came back to write the book."
"Oscar winning songwriting teams Kristen Anderson Lopez and Robert Lopez wrote about 12 new songs for the film's famous hit songs."
"Read: Frozen stars Kathy levy and Patty Mullin discuss why 'weirdness' makes them the perfect Disney royalty. The musical marks the first adaptation of a 2013 hit to expand the original story."
"Take a look at the engagement photos of Denver below: get the first glimpse of the Disney Broadway frozen version and the first glimpse of the Disney Broadway frozen version. The performance will start on February 22, 2018 at St. James' theater on Broadway; the opening night is set on March 22."
"They are joined by Gilani Aladdin as Christopher, John Riddell as Hans, Robert Clayton as Wesselton, Kevin del Aguilar as Okun, Timothy Hughes as Barbie, and Greg hildrez as Olaf."
The drama, based on the best animated film Oscar, is directed by Tony Award winner Michael grandch. Broadway alumni Kathy levy and Patty Mullin play Elsa and Anna respectively
"The show will be held in Colorado until October 1; the musical will premiere on Broadway in 2018."
"On September 14, the pre Broadway performance of Disney's" frozen "officially opened at the Buell theatre at the Denver performing arts center."
"Take a look at Disney's curling on Broadway, an animated hit that officially opened in Denver on September 14, followed by bowing on Broadway in 2018."



Number  641
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Everyone’s going to come to my house for dinner.’ George begins to say, ‘Listen, I want you guys to know how much you’ve meant to me and how much you mean to me in my life,’” recalled the restauranteur.”
““George had called me and ‘The Boys’ and said, ‘Hey, mark September 27, 2013, on your calendar.”
““There’s a group of guys we call ‘The Boys,’” Gerber said during a recent chat on MSNBC’s Headliners show.”
“The father of fashion’s It girl Kaia Gerber recalled a time in 2013 when Clooney gifted his closest friends one million dollars each, even paying their taxes for the year.”
“Image zoom Credit: David M. Benett/Dave Benett/GettyOn Tuesday, the actor’s best friend and Casamigos co-founder Rande Gerber revealed just how generous the two-time Sexiest Man Alive and first-time father really is.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“George, 56, and Amal, 39, welcomed Ella and Alexander in June in London.”
“The devices featured the logo of the actor’s Casamigos Tequila and came with a note “apologizing ahead of time” if the twins cried, according to the New York Post‘s Page Six.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Everyone will come to my house for dinner." George began to say, "listen, I want you to know how much you mean to me, how much you mean to my life," the owner recalled
"George called me and the kids and said," Hey, mark, September 27, 2013, on your calendar. "
"There's a group of people we call 'boys'," Gerber said on MSNBC's headlines
"The father of fashion it girl Kaia Gerber recalled that in 2013, Clooney gave his closest friends $1 million each, and even paid their taxes for that year."
"Thanks to image zooming: David M. Bennett / Dave Bennett / Getty on Tuesday, the actor's best friend and co-founder of casamigos, Rand Gerber, revealed just how generous the two sexiest men and first-time fathers are."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
In June, George, 56, and Amar, 39, met Ella and Alexander in London
According to page 6 of the New York Post, the devices carry the actor's casamigos tequila logo and a note of "early apology" if the twins cry
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



**Something goes wrong**
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Kris paid for everything and was happy to treat Khloe.”
“The Keeping Up With the Kardashians stars were spotted out shopping for baby gear together in Beverly Hills, Calif. on Wednesday, March 7.”
“Kris accompanied Khloe, who is eight months pregnant with a baby girl, to Petit Tresor and Couture Kids and picked up the tab for her daughter.”
“"They picked out nursery furniture and baby clothes while filming for the show," an eyewitness tells E!”
“News.”
“"Khloe was focused on neutral colors and a lot of pink items.”
“She loved looking at all the clothes and soft stuffed animals.”
“She was bending down and checking everything out, holding and feeling each item she looked at.”
“She was very involved as was Kris."”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Chris paid all the money and was happy to treat Khloe."
On Wednesday, March 7, the stars of the Kardashian family go shopping for baby products at Beverly Hills, California
"Chris accompanied Khloe, who was eight months pregnant with a baby girl, to the children's home of little tresor and couture to pay for her daughter."
A witness told e
"News."
"Khloe focuses on neutral colors and a lot of pink things."
"She likes to see all the clothes and soft toys."
"She bent down and examined everything, holding and touching everything she saw."
"She and Chris are engaged."



**Something goes wrong**
“She went on to act in other productions including Ragtime and Spring Awakening before landing the lead role as Rachel Berry in the Fox hit series in 2009.”
“The podcast duo then claimed the “Cannonball” singer’s career as a child actor was to blame since she started performing at an early age and it interfered with her education.”
“Lea Michele used a little humor to shut down a conspiracy theory that claims she is illiterate.”
“The theory first appeared in a Facebook Live video from the One More Thing podcast in July 2017, and it picked up steam again this week, catching the Glee alum’s attention.”
“After a fan tweeted that the actress, 31, was most likely “laughing her head off right now” about the rumors, Michele retweeted the message and denied it in the best way.”
““Loved READING this tweet and wanted to WRITE you back,” she quipped on Thursday, March 22.”
““Literally laughing out loud at all this love you!!”
“!”Loved READING this tweet and wanted to WRITE you back literally laughing out loud at all this love you!!!”
“❤️ https://t.co/YMHj4LCZaf — Lea Michele (@LeaMichele) March 22, 2018Another fan joined in on the joke and asked,“ if ur READING this wanna tell us tour dates?!”
“❤❤” and Michele responded: “Hoping to have all the info this week!”The podcast’s hosts, Jaye Hunt and Robert Ackerman, based their claims on a chapter in Glee alum Naya Rivera’s 2016 tell-all book, Sorry Not Sorry.”


"She starred in Rachel berry in 2009 fox hit Ragtime and Spring Awakening, and then in other works."
The podcast group later claimed that the "shell" singer's childhood acting career was the culprit because she started acting at a young age, which hindered her education
"Leah Michelle uses a little humor to refute a conspiracy theory that claims to be illiterate."
"This theory first appeared in the live Facebook video of" one more thing "Podcast in July 2017. It heated up again this week and attracted the attention of glee alumni."
"Some fans said on Weibo that the 31 year old actress was likely to" laugh up and down "at these rumors. Michelle forwarded the news and denied it in the best way."
On Thursday, March 22, she joked: "I like reading this micro blog, and I want to write back to you."
"I really love you!"
"!" I like reading this microblog very much. I want to reply to your letter. I really smile and say I love you! "
“ ❤️  https://t.co/YMHj4LCZaf-Lea  Michele (@ leamichele) on March 22, 2018, another fan joined the joke and asked, "if you read this article, do you want to tell us the tour date?"
“ ❤❤ Michelle replied: "hope to get all the information this week! "The podcast's hosts, Jaye hunt and Robert Ackerman, expressed their views based on a chapter in the 2016 book tell everyone from the glee club alum Naya Rivera. Sorry, not sorry."



Number  644
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Wedding In Vegas special in 1994”
“Bayside beauty Zack snagged the school s most sought after girl on the smash hit TV show Having his cake and eating it Zack played the field for a while at college before tying the knot with Kelly in the...”
“And now Saved By The Bell couple Mark-Paul Gosselaar and Tiffani Thiessen will enjoy a long-awaited reunion when he appears on the new series of her hit cookery show Dinner At Tiffani's.”
“Unfortunately for their more hardcore of fans, the beefcake will be bringing along his real-life wife Catriona McGinn for the gay affair.”
“Aloha: Saved By The Bell couple Mark-Paul Gosselaar and Tiffani Thiessen are to reunite on her cooking showAnnouncing the exciting guest appearance to Us Weekly, the 42-year-old said: 'I believe the most wanted and anticipated one.”
“My old co-star Mark-Paul Gosselaar and his wife, will be on the show.'”
“And the mother-of-two said she has a special little helper when preparing her delightful dishes on the Cooking Channel show - her five-year-old daughter Harper.”
“She said: 'She always says, "Mommy, you’re such a good cooker."”
“And it’s the way she says it, it’s quite cute.”
“'But she loves to get creative.”


"1994 Las Vegas wedding special"
"In the popular TV program" eat cake, eat cake ", Zac caught the most popular girl in the school. Zac played in the University for a period of time, and then married Kelly in Harry Potter..."
"Mark Paul gossell and Tiffany Tyson, who are now saved by the bels, will enjoy a long-awaited reunion at Tiffany's restaurant when they join her new series of hot cooking show dinners."
"Unfortunately, for their more committed fans, this man will bring his real-life wife, katriona McKinley, to a gay affair."
"Aloha: Mark Paul gossell and Tiffany Tyson, rescued by the bels, will reunite on her cooking show to announce an exciting guest appearance to us weekly." I believe the one I want and look forward to the most, "said Tyson, 42
"My old partner, mark Paul gossell, and his wife, will be on the show."
"The mother of two said she had a special little helper on the cooking Channel - her five-year-old daughter Harper."
She said, "she always says, 'Mom, you're a good cook.'"
"And the way she talks is lovely."
"But she likes to be creative."



Number  645
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Born with hip dysplasia, years of gymnastics further aggravated the condition and eventually led her to receiving a hip implant in 2008.”
“The West Virginia native, who retired in 1986, was inducted into the International Gymnastics Hall of Fame in 1997.”
““I’m really excited,” Carson said.”
““It’s so much more difficult than I thought it would be.”“I’ll be dancing with her and thinking I’m doing a really good job, and then I’ll look back at the video and I just look terrible,” he added with a laugh.”
““Once we started getting going, it was nothing like I ever imagined,” he said of training with Carson.”
“During an appearance on Good Morning America on Tuesday, the actor described his experience thus far to host Michael Strahan.”
“Milo Manheim and Witney CarsonManheim, who rose to fame as the star of this year’s Disney Channel original movie Zombies, will be season 27’s youngest competitor at 17 years old.”
“Ware and Smith divorced in 2012.”
“What if all three did?”The couple adopted their daughter, Marley, in 2008.”
““Sometimes, when I’m tired on the field, and I feel like I can’t go anymore, I just think, what if he had one more breath?”


"She was born with dysplasia of the hip, and years of gymnastics further aggravated her condition, which eventually led to her hip implant in 2008."
The West Virginia retired in 1986 and was inducted into the international gymnastic hall of fame in 1997
"I'm really excited," Carson said
He added with a smile: "it's much more difficult than I thought." "I'll dance with her and feel like I'm doing really well, then look back at the video and I just look terrible."
"Once we started training, it was totally different from what I thought," he said of training with Carson
"On Tuesday's Good Morning America show, the actor described his experience of hosting Michael Strahan so far."
Milo Mannheim and Vitelli Casson Mannheim have made their mark in this year's Disney Channel Original Movie zombie. They will be the youngest competitors in season 27 at the age of 17
"Will and Smith divorced in 2012."
"What if all three do it? "The couple adopted their daughter Mary in 2008."
"Sometimes, when I'm tired on the court and feel like I can't walk, I think, what if he takes a breath again?"



**Something goes wrong**
“News...”
““YASSS mother,” said user @an0riginal.”Source: Adele Resurfaces With Halloween Costume That’s Got Fans Shook | E!”
““Back ❤❤❤❤❤,” wrote user @seif.mohamed28.”
“Her return and mysterious costume have got fans shook.”
“The Halloween pics marked the first time she has shared photos of herself in months.”
“During her time away from the spotlight, she has posted on social media sparingly.”
““Also I can’t with this hair and make up,” she said.”
“Adele also shared another photo of her sporting the same hair and makeup while wearing a ruffled yellow top.”
““Happy Early Halloween & Happy Birthday Gorgeous,” she wrote.”
“The Grammy-winning singer wore a long sleeve glittering green dress with gold embellishments around the collar and sleeves, a colorful Chinese dragon trim and colorful star-patterned boots and wore a teased, frizzy hairstyle and elaborate show makeup.”


"News..."
Netizen @ an0original said: "Yass mother, Adele reappeared in a Halloween costume, and fans were shocked!"
"Back" ❤❤❤❤❤ "The user wrote @ SEF Muhammad 28."
"Her return and mysterious costume surprised fans."
"The Halloween photos mark the first time she has shared her own in months."
"During the time away from the spotlight, she was very cautious about posting on social media."
"I can't make up with this hairstyle either," she said
"Adele also shared another photo of her in a wrinkled yellow top with the same hair and make-up."
"Happy Halloween, happy birthday, wonderful," she wrote
"The Grammy award-winning singer wore a long sleeve glittering green dress with gold ornaments around the collar and sleeves, colorful Chinese dragon ornaments and colorful star shaped boots, a provocative curly hair and delicate show makeup."



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"Love to all of you!"”
“The 51-year-old actress and her boyfriend, 35-year-old British music producer Alex Da Kid, stepped out for dinner in London on Tuesday night, hours after Berry confirmed their relationship on Instagram.”
“Berry looked flawless as usual in a trench coat, black leather pants and boots, linking arms with her new beau, who kept it casual in a baseball shirt, sweats and white sneakers.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Halle Berry Stuns in Sheer Gown at 'Kingsman 2' London PremiereINSTARimages.comThe actress also has a sense of humor about recently reaching a huge milestone on Instagram.”
“Berry shared a photo of herself rocking a furry coat while sitting on the toilet in her bathroom, with her pants down and a glass of wine next to her.”
“The hilarious snap was in celebration of hitting two million followers on the platform.”
“"When 2M followers walk in on you," Berry joked.”
“All eyes were on Berry's Instagram account on Tuesday, when she shared a pic of her snuggling with Alex Da Kid, writing, "My balance."”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Love you all!"
The 51 year old actress and her boyfriend, 35 year old British music producer Alex Da kid, had dinner in London on Tuesday night, and berry confirmed their relationship on instagram a few hours ago
"Berry looks as perfect as ever in her windbreaker, black leather pants and boots. She's arm in arm with her new boyfriend, who's wearing a Baseball Shirt, a sports shirt and white sneakers to stay casual."
Exclusive: Halle Berry performs in a transparent robe at Kingsman 2 in London PremiereINSTARimages.com The actress also has a sense of humor about the huge milestone she recently achieved on instagram. "
"Berry shared a picture of her sitting on the bathroom toilet, shaking a fluffy coat, her pants down, and a glass of wine next to her."
"This funny snapshot is to celebrate the 2 million fans who have been clicking on the platform."
"When two million followers walk into you," berry joked
On Tuesday, all eyes were focused on Berry's instagram account, when she shared a picture of her cuddling up with Alex Da Kidd, which read: "my balance."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



**Something goes wrong**
“More:How common is sexual misconduct in Hollywood?”
“"They have shocked me to my core as I have never been abusive or violent in any way in my relations with women," the statement says.”
“A new lawsuit, filed Friday in Los Angeles County Superior Court, accuses the entrepreneur of rape, according to reports from The New York Times and Billboard.”
“The plaintiff, identified as Jane Doe, is seeking $10 million in damages for forcible rape, intentional infliction of emotional distress and negligent infliction of emotional distress, according to the outlets.”
“Simmons denies the charge as well as the other accusations of sexual assault and misconduct.”
“Per the lawsuit, the woman says she met Simmons, 60, at a concert she attended with her son.”
“After dropping her son off and spending some time together, the lawsuit says Doe hesitantly joined Simmons in his hotel room where she was raped.”
“More:Kimora Lee Simmons addresses sexual-misconduct allegations against ex Russell SimmonsMore:Russell Simmons denies new 'horrific' rape allegationsSimmons "vehemently" refuted all allegations in a statement issued to USA TODAY Monday per spokesperson Angela Pruitt.”
“"I have submitted myself to multiple lie detector tests.”
“Her agent wanted sex.”


"More: how common is sexual misconduct in Hollywood?"
"They shocked me because I never had any abuse or violence in my relationship with women," the statement said
According to the New York Times and billboard, a new lawsuit filed in Los Angeles County High Court on Friday accused the entrepreneur of rape
"According to media reports, the plaintiff, nameless, claimed $10 million for emotional distress caused by rape, intentional emotional distress and negligence."
"Simmons denies this and other sexual assault and misconduct charges."
According to the lawsuit, the woman said she met Simmons, 60, at a concert with her son
"After sending her son home and spending some time together, the lawsuit said DOE hesitated to join Simmons' hotel room where he was raped."
"More: Kimora Lee Simmons deals with sexual misconduct charges against former Russell. Russell Simmons denies new" terrible "rape charges. In a statement to USA today Monday, spokesman Angela Pruitt, samond" strongly "refuted all charges
"I've had multiple lie tests."
"Her agent wants sex."



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow TODAY.com writer Scott Stump on Twitter.”
“Filmmagic, Getty ImagesThe pressure is already on for Klum to somehow top herself for Halloween in 2018.”
“The supermodel unveiled her latest show-stopping costume at her 18th annual Halloween party in New York City on Tuesday night when she transformed herself into the werewolf from Michael Jackson's "Thriller" video.”
“Heidi Klum (left) has done it again for Halloween by transforming into the werewolf from Michael Jackson's "Thriller" video.”
“Getty Images"Michael Jackson's 'Thriller' video is so iconic and it is so fabulous that we had to redo that for Halloween so we're all learning this dance," Klum told Entertainment Tonight.”
“"Obviously, I'm not as good as Michael, no one ever will be as good as Michael, but I really tried my hardest."”
“Klum also had some friends dress up as zombies to complete the homage to the "Thriller" video, although she admits her dance moves aren't quite on the level of Michael Jackson.”
“Getty ImagesIt took a team of makeup artists from the studio ProRenFX seven hours to turn the 44-year-old mom of four into the werewolf, complete with prosthetic teeth and yellow contact lenses.”
“She documented the transformation on Instagram during the whole process.”
“"Look at this madness, what is not to love?"”


"Follow today writer Scott stump tweeted
"Film magic, Getty's image, Klum is under a lot of pressure on Halloween 2018."
On Tuesday night, the supermodel showed off her latest costumes at the 18th Halloween party in New York, turning herself into a werewolf from Michael Jackson's "Thriller" video
"Heidi Cramer (left) did it again on Halloween, turning from Michael Jackson's" Thriller "video into a werewolf."
"Getty Images" Michael Jackson's "Thriller" video is so iconic, it's so mythical that we have to redo Halloween, so we're all learning this dance, "Cramer told entertainment tonight."
"Obviously, I'm not as good as Michael, no one will be as good as Michael, but I really tried my best."
Cramer also asked some friends to dress up as zombies to pay homage to the thriller video, although she admitted that her dance steps were not as high as Michael Jackson's
"Getty imagesit took a team of makeup artists at pro renfx studio seven hours to turn the 44 year old mother of four into a werewolf, with dentures and yellow contact lenses."
"She recorded the changes in the process on instagram."
"Look at this madness. What's wrong with love?"



**Something goes wrong**
“2/3 — Twitter Safety (@TwitterSafety) October 12, 2017”
“We will be clearer about these policies and decisions in the future.”
“1/3 — Twitter Safety (@TwitterSafety) October 12, 2017The Tweet was removed and her account has been unlocked.”
“We want to explain that her account was temporarily locked because one of her Tweets included a private phone number, which violates our Terms of Service.”
“Here are the tweets:We have been in touch with Ms. McGowan’s team.”
“According to a tweet, Twitter suspended the account because she posted a “private phone number.” The company added that it is now in touch with McGowan.”
“...https://t.co/zjIty7ynnv — Shaun King (@ShaunKing) October 12, 2017After hours of silence, Twitter has finally issued a response.”
“In the meantime, my friend @rosemcgowan had her account suspended for calling out Harvey Weinstein for being a sexual predator.”
“Many noted how far-right and white supremacists still remain on the platform while voices like McGowan’s find themselves silenced.”
“#ROSEARMY #whywomendontreport A post shared by Rose McGowan (@rosemcgowan) on Oct 11, 2017 at 9:19pm PDTOthers on Twitter quickly rushed to her defense, noting how, more often than not, accounts that threaten even physical violence are allowed to stay.”


"2 / 3-twitter security (@ twittersafety) 12 October 2017"
"We will be more clear about these policies and decisions in the future."
"1 / 3-twitter security (@ twittersafety) on October 12, 2017, tweet was deleted and her account was unlocked."
"What we want to explain is that her account is temporarily locked because one of her microblogs contains a private phone number, which violates our terms of service."
"Here's your name. Twitter: we've been in touch with Ms. McGovern's team."
According to tweet, twitter suspended the account because she posted a "private phone number.". Twitter added that it is now in contact with McGowan
“... https://t.co/zjIty7ynnv- Sean King (@ Shaun king) on October 12, 2017, after hours of silence, twitter finally released a response
"In the meantime, my friend @ rosemagowan suspended her account for calling Harvey Weinstein a sex offender."
"A lot of people have noticed that when voices like McGovern find themselves suppressed, far right and white supremacists are still on the podium."
"# rosearm # why do women post a post shared by Rose McGowan (@ rosemagowan) at 9:19 p.m. on October 11, 2017? Tothers on twitter quickly defended her and pointed out that threatening and even physically violent accounts are usually allowed to stay."



**Something goes wrong**
“Oh, 'cause she's dead!"”
“Why?”
“...even made a cameo onscreen during "Look What You Made Me Do," reciting the line: "I'm sorry, the old Taylor can't come to the phone right now.”
“Her opening acts joined her for "Shake It Off," while she dedicated "Gorgeous" to boyfriend , pointing to him in the VIP area.”
“Blame Me Love Live New Year s Day Getaway Car Call It What You Want We Are Never Ever Getting Back Together and This Is Why We Can t Have Nice Things...”
“...before seguing into I Did Something Bad Gorgeous Style Love Story You Belong With Me Look What You Made Me Do End Game King of My Heart Delicate Shake It Off Dancing With Our Hands Tied All Too Well Black Space Dress Bad Blood Should ve Said No Don t...”
“News previously reported that last night Swift opened the show with "…Ready for It?"”
“Kevin Mazur/Getty Images for TASE!”


"Oh, because she's dead!"
"Why?"
“…… Even in "see what you want me to do," guest starred on the screen, reciting lines: "sorry, old Taylor can't come to answer the phone right now."
"Her opening line was in" shake off "with her, and she dedicated" gorgeous "to her boyfriend, pointing at him in the VIP area."
"Blame me for loving new year's Day travel. Whatever it is called, you think we will never be together. That's why we can't have good things..."
“… Before entering, I made some bad gorgeous style love stories. You belong to me. See what you want me to do. End the game. My heart King subtly shakes it off and dances. Our hands are tied too well. Black spacesuit is bad blood. I should say no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no, no
The news previously reported that swift last night with " Are you ready? "
"Kevin Mazu / Getty's picture of TASS!"



Number  652
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Though, it’s not like viewers are praying Celeste and her friends will be exposed for their hand in Perry's death — especially not in the current climate , where we’re learning just how prevalent sexual predation really is...”
“So, the figure lurking aroud our heroines feels like a reminder there will always be lies to cover up and someone who will find them.”
“Both stem from Perry, who’s dead.”
“The big questions of the series, like the true identity of Amabella’s biter and Jane’s rapist, have been answered.”
“No, because these five powerful women are finally living their best lives, as they deserve.”
“Yes, there’s a random person following the fivesome around while snapping clandestine photographs, but do you really care to find out who it is?”
“As you watch the final seconds of Big Little Lies, you have no questions left.”


"Nevertheless, the audience is not praying that Celeste and her friends will be exposed for their involvement in Perry's death - especially in the current climate, we are learning how widespread sexual predation is..."
"Therefore, the figure lurking around our heroine reminds us that there will always be lies to cover up and that someone will find them."
"It's all from Perry. He's dead."
"This series of important questions, such as the true identity of amabella's biter and Jane's rapist, have been answered."
"No, because these five powerful women are finally living the best life they deserve."
"Yes, there's a random person with five people taking secret photos, but do you really want to know who he is?"
"When you look at the big lie in the last few seconds, you have no problem."



**Something goes wrong**
“EXCLUSIVE: Nick Jonas Weighs In on Who's the Hotter Jonas Brother -- Him or Joe?”
“That would be "One of the most humble superstars...MY MAN @nickjonas."”
“The 24-year-old singer recently called out a fan on Instagram who mocked his height after taking a picture together.”
“EXCLUSIVE Nick Jonas Says He Wants a Lot of People to Have Sex to His Fifty Shades Darker Song A fan named Zak Hanzal posted a snap of himself posing with the pop star on Instagram this week mocking the...”
“...singer for his height...”
“"@nickjonas u need a few more inches bruhh," he wrote alongside the pic.”
“Jonas clearly didn't take the comment lightly, however, responding in the comments section, "You need some manners "bruh" I didn't need to stop to take that picture with you.”
“Just rude.”
“Very rude."”
“RELATED: Nick Jonas Reunites With Ex-Girlfriend Delta Goodrem in Matching OutfitsThe singer's fans also came to his defense, telling Hanzal to "grow up."”


Exclusive: Nick Jonas is weighing who Jonas's brother - he or Joe? "
"That would be 'one of the most humble Superstars My man @ Nick Jonas. "
"The 24-year-old singer recently named a fan on instagram and laughed at his height after taking pictures together."
"Exclusive Nick Jonas said he wanted a lot of people to have sex with his 50 degree song. A fan named Zach hanzar posted a photo of himself and the pop star on instagram this week, mocking... "
“… Because of his height
"Nick Jonas, you need a few more inches, brother," he wrote next to the photo
"Jonas obviously didn't belittle the comment, but, in the comment section, he responded," you need some politeness, "blu." I don't need to stop to take a picture with you. "
"That's rude."
"Very rude."
Related reports: Nick Jonas reunited with his ex girlfriend Delta Goodrem in matching clothes. The singer's fans also defended him and told hanzal to "grow up"



Number  654
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But it’s real, and that’s what it is.””
“I don’t pick and choose what I want to talk about, it’s all out there, whether you like it or you don’t.”
“...revealing how the couple worked through it and why they re doing better than ever...”
“PEOPLE Now caught up with the Vanderpump Rules star after Monday’s explosive episode, in which he finally confessed to cheating on his girlfriend of two-and-a-half years by sleeping with former SUR employee Faith Stowers.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“While Taylor, 38, said he’s feeling a “little rough” after having to relive the nightmare eight months after it happened, he’s “more concerned about Brittany and making sure she’s okay.”“We’ve kind of weathered the storm,” he explained.”
““We’re still going through it … [but] we’re in a great place now — probably better than we’ve ever been.”
“I can say the last eight months have been better than when we first started dating.”
“But yeah, it’s never good to watch this again.”
“My main concern is that Brittany’s okay and making sure she’s getting through this.”


"But it's true. That's what it is."
"I don't choose what I want to say. Whether you like it or not, everything is outside."
“… It reveals how the couple got through and why they are doing better than ever before. "
"After Monday's revelations, people are now catching up with the star of van der Pol's rules. He finally admitted that he had a relationship with faith Stowers, a former zur employee, and cheated his girlfriend of two and a half years."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Taylor, 38, said he felt a bit "uncomfortable" after eight months of nightmares, but he was "more concerned about Brittany and making sure she's OK." "We survived the storm," he explained
"We're still going through this (but) we are in a good position now - probably better than ever. "
"I can say that the last eight months have been better than when we first started dating."
"But, yes, it's not good to see it again."
"What worries me most is Brittany is OK, make sure she can make it."



**Something goes wrong**
“Most recently, someone drew prison bars over the star (which we also caught on camera) ... and then there was the second pickax incident earlier this summer.”
“Of course, this is just the latest hit job the President's star has received over the past couple years.”
“We're told no one filed a police report about the vandalism.”
“There appears to be a written message, too, using a Spanish language slur -- "F*** This P**o" -- and the 2 big swastikas are underneath the words.”
“The culprit does the deed quickly as people walk right by him without batting an eyelash, but two women seem to notice the tagging as he walks away.”
“You can see, it's already starting to fade.”
“Mind you, this was done Wednesday morning around 9 AM PT ... in broad daylight.”
“TMZ captured the crime in progress through our live stream feed on Hollywood Blvd., and you can see a man dressed in black bend down and scribble all over Trump's star.”
“Play video content 12/20/18 TMZ.comSome guy vandalized Donald Trump's star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame with swastikas ... and we got him on camera doing it.”
“It appears the swastikas from Wednesday morning had just been scrubbed before this latest incident.”


"Recently, someone painted prison railings on a star (we also photographed this scene with a camera)."... There was a second pick incident earlier this summer. "
"Of course, it's just the latest hot job the president's star has been given in the past few years."
"We were told that no one reported the vandalism to the police."
"There seems to be another written message, the taint of using Spanish -" f * * this p * * O "- two big Nazi crosses just below the word."
"When people passed him, the criminal did it quickly, but when he walked away, the two women seemed to notice the mark."
"You see, it's beginning to fade."
"Please note that this was done around 9 a.m. on Wednesday... In broad daylight
"TMZ captured the crime going on through our live video on Hollywood Blvd, where you can see a man in black stooping to doodle on Trump's star."
"Video content 12 / 20 / 18 someone at TMZ destroyed Donald Trump's star on Hollywood's walk of fame with the swastika... We photographed him
"It seems that the swastika on Wednesday morning was just scrubbed before this latest incident."



**Something goes wrong**
““Here’s Henry not long before he died,” the actor captioned a photo of his son on Twitter.”
“...the toddler s third birthday...”
“The Deadpool 2 star went on to remark that while Leah and Henry s two older brothers were devastated of course they had also helped Delaney endeavor to not go mad with grief In April Delaney also shared a touching tribute to his late son on what would have been...”
“...and developed his own method of getting from A to B shuffling on his beautiful little bum His drive to live and to love and to connect was profound added Delaney...”
“He was smart funny and mischievous and we had so many wonderful adventures together particularly after he d moved home following 15 months living in hospitals continued Delaney saying that even though Henry s tumor and surgery left him with significant physical disabilities his son had quickly learned sign language...”
“Image zoom Credit: Rob Kim/Getty“Henry was a joy.”
“Then the cancer returned last autumn and he died in January,” Delaney wrote in a statement shared on his Facebook page.”
“He had surgery to remove the tumor and further treatment through the early part of 2017.”
““Henry had been diagnosed with a brain tumor in 2016, shortly after his first birthday, following persistent vomiting and weight loss.”
“In February, the actor revealed that his son had died in January after battling brain cancer since 2016.”


"It's not long before Henry died," the actor tweeted, adding a title to his son's photo
“… My child's third birthday... "
"The star of death pool 2 went on to say that although Leah and Henry's two brothers were destroyed, of course they also helped Delaney not to go crazy and sad. In April Delaney also shared a touching respect for what his late son would be..."
“… And he developed his own method, from a to B, dragging his feet on his beautiful little ass. his desire for life, love and connection is profound, Delaney added
"He was smart, funny and naughty, and we had a lot of wonderful adventures together, especially after he moved home from the hospital after 15 months," Delaney continued. Although Henry's tumor and surgery severely disabled him, his son soon learned sign language... "
"Photo zooming credit: Rob Kim / Getty" Henry is a happy man
"Cancer recurred last fall and died in January," Delaney wrote in a statement on Facebook
"In early 2017, he underwent surgery to remove the tumor and further treatment."
"Henry was diagnosed with a brain tumor in 2016, shortly after his first birthday, due to persistent vomiting and weight loss."
"In February, the actor revealed that his son had been fighting brain cancer since 2016 and died in January this year."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“According to TMZ, the house where Demi Lovato lived in California was put up for sale for 9.5 million dollars.”
“(as we all do, obv), now you can actually get the chance to see, because her Hollywood Hills estate just hit the market, and it is good.”
“But like, it should be for $9.4 million, right?”
“Wowza.”
“The Agency has the listing for the sprawling property, which contains 4 bedrooms, 6 bathrooms, and 5,564 square feet on over an acre of land.”
“It's set behind gates, so it's extra private and exclusive, and has the chef's kitchen of our dreams, with state-of-the-art appliances, marble countertops, and is open to the backyard, where you'll find a zero-edge pool, grill, and gazebo.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“In 2016, Demi bought the house for 8.3 million dollars.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"According to TMZ, Demi Lovato's home in California was sold for $9.5 million."
"(as we did, obv), now you really have a chance to see it, because her Hollywood villa property has just come on the market and is very good."
"But should it be $9.4 million?"
"Wow."
The agency owns a list of the sprawling property, which includes four bedrooms, six bathrooms and 5564 square feet of land
"It's behind the gate, so it's very private and unique. It has our dream chef kitchen, state-of-the-art appliances, marble countertops, and it's open to the backyard, where you can find a zero side swimming pool, grill and terrace."
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"In 2016, Demi bought the house for $8.3 million."



**Something goes wrong**
“Once you're outfit is sorted, have a peruse of our favourite Halloween makeup looks, couples costumes, Halloween nail art ideas, pretty Halloween makeup ideas and makeup artists to follow for all the Halloween beauty inspo you need.”
“Check out these 21 scary as hell movies for Halloween to start feeling freaky.”
“Not quite in the mood yet?”
“...your creative juices flowing well in advance...”
“The creepiest Halloween makeup looks of 2020 to get your freak on Halloween The creepiest Halloween makeup looks of 2020 to get your freak on Advertisement Whatever you re leaning towards dressing up as we ve rounded up the best A list Halloween costumes of all time to help get...”
“After all, it is the most terrifying thing the majority of us have been faced with recently...”
“And while dressing up as a celebrity or character is usually the most popular route to go down, we're predicting a lot of green, germ-like 'Coronavirus' costumes this year.”
“Ciara's suited-up Beyoncé costume would work perfectly for those of you with a friend happy to don a similarly epic Jay-Z-inspired two piece, while Kourtney Kardashian's Ariana Grande look required little more than a high ponytail and pink mini dress.”
“...watching horror movies on the sofa with just a couple of friends you likely aren t looking to go all out...”
“Luckily for you we ve done some extensive costume research and have picked some seriously impressive celebrity looks to emulate we see you Heidi Klum queen of Halloween Advertisement If you re wary about the fact that you may well be wearing this costume for a socially distanced night in...”


"Once your costumes are sorted out, you can read our favorite Halloween make-up styles, lovers' clothes, Halloween manicure ideas, beautiful Halloween make-up ideas and makeup artists to provide you with all the Halloween beauty inspo you need."
"Look at these 21 halloween horror movies, you'll start to feel weird."
"Not in a good mood yet?"
“… Your creative juices flow ahead of time... "
"2020's Scariest Halloween make-up, make your Halloween freak 2020's Scariest Halloween make-up, make your freak advertised no matter how you tend to dress up, because we have collected the best list of Halloween costumes all the time to help get..."
"After all, this is the most terrible thing that most of us have faced recently..."
"Although dressing up as a celebrity or character is usually the most popular route, we predict that there will be a lot of green, bacteria like 'coronavirus' clothing this year."
"Ciara's Beyonce suit will be perfect for those who like to wear the same epic two-piece Jay-Z style, while Kourtney Kardashian's Ariana Grande looks only need a high ponytail and pink miniskirt."
“… Watching horror movies on the sofa with a few friends, you may not want to go all out... "
"Fortunately, we've done some extensive costume research and picked some impressive celebrity styling to imitate. We saw your Halloween ad for Queen Heidi Crum if you're very likely to wear this costume on a socially distant night in "We should be cautious about the facts."



**Something goes wrong**
““I mean don’t you think that’s like a little bit unprofessional?””
““But I do think it’s like inappropriate for her to talk to you and not to me,” Kim said.”
“The 37-year-old reality star has opted to professionally part ways with Stephanie Shepherd, her friend and assistant since 2013, a source close to the Kardashian family tells PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kim made a decision to let Stephanie go,” the insider says.”
““She was a good assistant but when Stephanie wanted to transition into a larger role with Kim’s brand and businesses, it just didn’t work.”
“Kim gave her the chance but after a short period of time it became clear that Stephanie just didn’t have the knowledge to take on a role like that.”
“Kim made an executive decision to part ways The source adds She s still friendly with the other sisters but she and Kim aren t really speaking Image zoom Stephanie Shepherd and Kim Kardashian Credit Source Kim Kardashian Instagram Image zoom Credit Stefanie Keenan Getty Images I was doing her...”
“...whole schedule doing her laundry booking travel putting the stroller together and all of these things...”
“But I wasn’t nervous.”


"I mean, don't you think it's a little unprofessional?"
"But I really don't think it's appropriate for her to talk to you instead of me," Kim said
A source close to the Kardashian family told people that the 37 year old reality star has chosen to part with her friend and assistant Stephanie shepherd since 2013
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"King decided to let Stephanie go," the person familiar with the matter said
"She's a great assistant, but it doesn't work when Stephanie wants to transition to a bigger role in Kim's brand and business."
"Kim gave her the chance, but after a short period of time, it was clear that Stephanie just didn't have the knowledge to take on such a role."
"Kim made an administrative decision to go her separate ways, the source added that she was still friendly with other sisters, but she and Kim didn't really say picture zooming Stephanie Shepard and Kim Kardashian credit source Kim Kardashian instagram picture zooming credit Stephanie kinangetti picture I'm doing her..."
“… The whole trip was doing her laundry, booking trips, putting baby carriages together, all these things... "
"But I'm not nervous."



Number  660
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I know Quinn is mine, but she’s also hers, and I just feel like whatever she wants for her is what I will come to terms with.”“Scandal” airs on Thursdays at 9 p.m. on ABC.”
““I’ve been such a cog in this huge wheel for seven years, and I’m just very used to Shonda making the best decisions for the characters,” Lowes says.”
“I felt very safe.”Shortly after the fake shooting, Quinn went into labor and had the baby with a little help from Rowan, his salesman friend who was previously a war medic, as well assome hallucinations of her friends.”
““We had our stunt coordinator — I had a stunt double — and we took things really slow.”
“...instructing me on how to do everything really safely which was incredible Lowes says...”
“Getting so physical while pregnant was horrifying at first for Lowes but when it came to the day of shooting the actual scene she shares she felt very well taken care of We had a medic on set at all times and we had an OB on set who was...”
“She was able to surprise Rowan when he came down to the bunker, and she attacked him — and this time when she begged him not to kill her until after her baby was born, it turned out that “mother and children first” reminder sunk in.”
““The stakes couldn’t be higher,” Lowes says of “Good People.”When Olivia showed up at Rowan’s and the father-daughter duo engaged in a standoff over the fact that he should shoot her but couldn’t, Quinn used a hairpin to unshackle her handcuffs.”
“...trade and that doomed both her and her unborn daughter...”
“People revealed Rowan kept Quinn in a bunker where she pleaded for her life clutching her pregnant stomach and saying that in B613 it was supposed to be mothers and children first that s the rule but then railed against Rowan for his inability to see that Olivia would never...”


"I know Quinn is mine, but she's also hers. I just think I'll take whatever she wants." "Scandal" was broadcast on ABC at 9 p.m. Thursday
"I've been on this huge wheel for seven years, and I'm used to shoda making the best decisions for the character," Ross said
"I feel safe." Shortly after the fake shooting, Quinn gave birth and gave birth with the help of Rowan, a friend of Quinn's salesman, a former battlefield medic, and some hallucinations of her friends
"We have stunt coordinators - I have stunt doubles - and we're very slow."
“… It's incredible how to teach me how to really do everything safely, "says Lois
"At the beginning, Lois felt terrible about her physical condition during her pregnancy, but when she filmed the real scene she shared, she felt that she was taken good care of. We always had a medical staff on the set, and we had an obstetrician on the set. He was..."
"When Rowan came to the bunker, she was able to give him a surprise. She attacked Rowan. This time, she begged Rowan not to kill her before the baby was born. As a result, the reminder of" mother and child first "gradually became popular
"The stakes couldn't have been higher," Lowes said of "good people." when Olivia showed up at Rowan's, the father and daughter were in a stalemate because he should have shot her, but he couldn't, and Quinn released her handcuffs with a hairpin. "
“… It's a deal. It's a deal for her and her unborn daughter. "
"It is revealed that Rowan keeps Quinn in a bunker. She pleads in the bunker and holds fast to her pregnant stomach. In b613, it should be mother and child first. This is the rule. But later, because Rowan can't see Olivia, she will never..."



**Something goes wrong**
““Usually what happens if they can’t settle after a period of time is one of the parties will file a complaint for divorce and let the courts start unwinding its process because you’re at a crossroads,” Ziegler says.”
“Image zoom Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan in 2009 | Credit: Masatoshi Okauchi/REX/ShutterstockAnd if they can’t come to an agreement, the situation would have to go public.”
““At this point, there is so much at stake, for him more than her, because they would be dividing the bulk of their assets.”
““Nobody knows if they did sign one or not, and both of their careers blossomed since — especially Channing’s,” Ziegler says.”
“Celebrity divorce attorney Vikki Ziegler says Tatum stands to potentially lose more in a divorce settlement if they didn’t have a prenup.”
“Various online estimates place his net worth in the range of $60 to $80 million.”
“Tatum also launched his own vodka line, Born and Bred, in February 2017.”
“He then made $29 million in 2015, according to the magazine.”
“Joe: Retaliation.”
“Forbes estimated that the actor made $60 million in 2013 for movies like The Vow, 21 Jump Street, Magic Mike and G.I.”


"Usually, if they can't settle after a period of time, one party will file a divorce lawsuit and ask the court to start withdrawing the proceedings because you are at a crossroads," Ziegler said
"2009 image zooming Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan | source: Masatoshi okauchi / Rex / shutterstock if they can't reach an agreement, the situation has to be made public."
"At this point, there are so many stakes for him than for her, because they will split most of their assets."
"No one knows if they've signed one or not and their career has been smooth since then, especially Channing," Ziegler said
"Celebrity divorce lawyer Vikki Ziegler said that if Tatum didn't have a prenuptial agreement, they might lose more in the divorce agreement."
"According to various online estimates, his net worth is between $60 million and $80 million."
"Tatum also launched his own vodka line in February 2017, which he was born and bred."
"He then made $29 million in 2015, according to the magazine."
"Joe: revenge."
Forbes estimates that in 2013, the actor made $60 million in movies like oath, 21 Jump Street, magic Mike and G.I



Number  662
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read on to see which four shoe trends celebrities wear with mom jeans.”
“And since two of them are casual and two are a bit fancier, there's something for every type of look you're going for.”
“...time...”
“A big part of wearing denim the right way is knowing which shoes to pair with them and we ve noticed that stylish celebs have really embraced four shoe trends in particular that make mom jeans look amazing every single...”
“The latest iteration of the trend is decidedly cool, flattering, and vintage-inspired (in contrast to the jeans that actual moms wore in the '90s).”
“As far as denim trends go, 2017 was undoubtedly the year of mom jeans, like it or not.”


"Please read on to see which four popular shoe stars will match mom's jeans."
"And because two of them are more casual and two of them are more fancy, every style you want has its own characteristics."
“… Time... "
"An important aspect of wearing jeans correctly is to know which pair of shoes to wear. We have noticed that fashion celebrities have really integrated into four kinds of shoe trends, especially to make mom's jeans look amazing..."
"The latest generation of this trend is absolutely cool, likable and retro (in sharp contrast to the jeans worn by real moms in the '90s)."
"In terms of jeans trends, 2017 is definitely a year for mom jeans, whether you like it or not."



Number  663
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Let women do the speaking up right now.”
“...compartmentalise or judge what is worse and what is not Driver continued...”
“They all hurt.”
“— Alyssa Milano (@Alyssa_Milano) December 16, 2017I have been a victim of each component of the sexual assault spectrum of which you speak.”
“And it is righteous.”
“(Thread) — Alyssa Milano (@Alyssa_Milano) December 16, 2017We are in a “culture of outrage” because the magnitude of rage is, in fact, overtly outrageous.”
“...in Glory Daze in 1995 responded to Damon s comments in a Twitter thread last Friday night that began Dear Matt Damon it s the micro that makes the macro Dear Matt Damon It s the micro that makes the macro...”
“Gosh it s so interesting how men with all these opinions about women s differentiation between sexual misconduct assault and rape reveal themselves to be utterly tone deaf and as a result systemically part of the problem profoundly unsurprising Minnie Driver driverminnie December 15 2017 Milano who worked with Damon...”
“Driver, Damon’s ex-girlfriend and “Good Will Hunting” co-star, responded to Damon’s comments in a series of tweets on Friday afternoon.”
“It just feels like it.”Dec. 15: The responseDamon’s interview was met with criticism, including from actresses Alyssa Milano and Minnie Driver.”


"Let the woman say it now."
“… Divide or judge which is worse and which is worse... "
"They're all hurt."
“-Alyssa Milano（@Alyssa_ Milano) on December 16, 2017, I was the victim of every component of what you call the spectrum of sexual abuse. "
"It's just."
"(thread) - Alyssa Milano (@ Alyssa)_ Milano) on December 16, 2017, we are in a "culture of anger" because the level of anger is actually obviously outrageous. "
“…… "Glorious daze" in 1995 responded to Damon's comments in a twitter post on Friday night. Dear Matt Damon, minimally invasive made Hong. Dear Matt Damon, minimally invasive made Hong... "
"My God, it's interesting how men who hold different views on the differences between female sexual misconduct, sexual assault and rape find themselves completely tone blind and become a part of the problem systematically, which does not surprise Minnie driverminni, who works with Damon. Milan, December 15, 2017..."
"The driver, Damon's ex girlfriend and co star of" have fun, "responded to Damon's comments in a series of microblogs on Friday afternoon
December 15: people interviewed have been criticized, including actresses Eliza Milano and Minnie deliff



Number  664
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Foster finalized his divorce from Yolanda Hadid in October after splitting from the Real Housewives of Beverly Hills alum in December 2015.”
“"David and her were affectionate.”
“The 33-year-old actress attended dinner with Foster and his daughters Sara, 36, and Erin, 35, Wednesday at Craig's restaurant in Los Angeles, according to Us Weekly.”
“AdvertisementSources said McPhee and Foster "spaced out" their arrivals at the restaurant because "they didn't want to draw attention to themselves."”
“E!”
“News reported, however, that the pair left the establishment together.”
“"It was a really nice dinner," an insider said.”
“"Everyone was joking around and giving him a hard time about his age, but David was loving it."”
“"[Katharine was] by his side the entire time," the source added.”
“He had his arm around her at times and they looked happy."”


"Foster divorced Yolanda Hadid in October after breaking up with the real housewife of Beverly Hills alum in December 2015."
"David and she are very close."
The 33 year old actress had dinner with foster and her daughter, Sarah, 36, and Irene, 35, at Craig's restaurant in Los Angeles on Wednesday, US Weekly reported
McPhee and foster "distracted" their guests at the restaurant because "they didn't want to draw attention to themselves," the source said
“E！”
"However, the news report said the two left the institution together."
"It was a very good dinner," said one person familiar with the matter
"Everyone's joking and making him feel bad about his age, but David likes it."
"[Catherine] has been with him all the time," the source added
"He hugs her sometimes, and they look happy."



Number  665
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I am set free from bondage and shame, I am a child of the most high God and he loves me exactly where I am, how I am, for who I am."”
“I believe this happened and it changes everything!”
“"Easter is not about a bunny, it's a reminder that my Jesus died on the cross for my sins and then rose from the dead defeating death!”
“"Jesus has changed my life," Bieber began the note, which he shared on Instagram.”
“On Sunday (April 1), the pop star shared a heartfelt message about the holiday from what appears to be the notes section of his cell phone.”
“Justin Bieber wants to remind his fans that Easter isn't just about a rabbit bringing eggs filled with candy.”


"I am free from bondage and shame. I am the child of the Supreme God. He loves me, where I am, how I am and who I am."
"I believe it happened. It changed everything!"
"Easter is not about a rabbit, it reminds me that my Jesus died on the cross for my sin, and then rose from the dead and conquered death!"
"Jesus changed my life," Bieber shared the note on instagram
"On Sunday (April 1), the pop star shared a heartfelt message about the festival, which seemed to come from the notes section of his mobile phone."
"Justin Bieber wants to remind his fans that Easter is more than just a rabbit bringing eggs full of candy."



Number  666
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I used to feel guilty about taking personal time,” she told Vogue of her private life, “but I also think I never met someone who was worth it before.””
“Now, in Vogue’s June cover story, Rihanna talks of a new, unnamed love in her life.”
“As Teen Vogue noted Tuesday, the rapper un-followed the singer.”
“This event comes just one day after the Met Gala, where Rihanna was a co-chair and the focus of much media attention.”
“Maybe Drake, her longtime admirer, just didn't want to see her grid anymore.”
“Stay tuned for more social-media signals of his unhappiness.”
“The original story continues below.”
“At the 2016 V.M.A.”
“Awards, when Drake professed his love to Rihanna as he presented her with the Video Vanguard Award, all eyes were on the two mega-stars, long rumored to have some kind of romantic connection.”
“What would happen next?”


"I used to feel guilty about taking up personal time," she told vogue of her private life, "but I also think I've never met anyone worth spending time before."
"Now, in vogue's June cover story, Rihanna talks about a new, nameless love in her life."
"As Teen Vogue pointed out on Tuesday, rapper UN is close behind."
"The event was held just one day after the metropolitan Gala, with Rihanna as co chairman and the focus of media attention."
"Maybe Drake, her longtime admirer, just doesn't want to see her again."
"Please continue to pay attention to more social media signals about his unhappiness."
"The original story continues below."
"V.m.a. in 2016."
"At the awards ceremony, when Drake showed his love to Rihanna when he presented her with the video Pioneer Award, everyone's eyes focused on the two superstars. There was a romantic connection between the two superstars that had been rumored for a long time."
"What's going to happen next?"



Number  667
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I like to keep the good carbs in my diet - I love pasta and Italian food - but I try to eat just that on the weekends and cut out carbs during the week.'”
“'For me, I just like to cut out bread.”
“Leggy Ashley Tisdale turns the sidewalk into a catwalk as she struts around in a tight mini dressAshley Tisdale certainly knows how to put her best foot - or leg - forward.”
“The 28-year-old confidently strode through Beverly Hills, California, on Tuesday showing off her toned pins.”
“The High School Musical star turned the short walk from a store to her car into a fashion show, strutting it for a crowd of fans and photographers.”
“Legs eleven: Ashley Tisdale confidently strode through Beverly Hills, California, on Tuesday showing off toned legsThe actress went for a punky yet feminine look wearing a tight mini dress featuring a pyramid pattern teamed with studded combat boots.”
“The Motel Rocks dress showed off Ashley's toned form as she made her way to her white Mercedes SUV.”
“For her day out and about the actress casually threw her hair atop her head in a messy bun and shaded her eyes in a pair of aviators.”
“Meant for walking The actress went for a punky yet feminine look wearing a tight mini dress teamed with studded combat boots Casual cutie For her day out and about the actress casually threw her hair atop her head in a messy bun and shaded her eyes in a pair...”
“...of aviators After spending her weekend with her boyfriend Christopher French Ashley indulged in a little me time on Tuesday...”


"I like to keep good carbohydrates in my diet - I like spaghetti and Italian food - but I try to eat them on weekends and cut down on carbohydrates for a week."
"For me, I just like to cut bread."
"The long legged Ashley Tisdale is wearing a tight miniskirt, turning the sidewalk into a T-shaped platform. Ashley Tisdale certainly knows how to extend her best foot or leg forward."
On Tuesday, the 28 year old strode confidently across Beverly Hills, California, showing off her sturdy brooch
The high school music star turned a short walk from a store to her car into a fashion show to show off to a group of fans and photographers
"11th leg: on Tuesday, Ashley Tisdale strode confidently across Beverly Hills, California, flaunting her strong legs. The actress wore a tight miniskirt with a pyramid pattern and studded combat boots, pursuing a low profile and feminine look."
"When Ashley walked up to her white Mercedes SUV, the dress of Motel rocks showed her figure."
"On her days out and about, the actress casually combed her hair into a messy bun and covered her eyes with a pair of pilots."
"For a walk, the actress wore a tight miniskirt and studded combat boots. She looked very feminine. When she goes out to play, she wears casual and lovely clothes, combs her hair into a messy bun and covers her eyes into a pair... "
“…… After spending the weekend with her boyfriend Christopher French Ashley, she indulged a little bit on Tuesday... "



**Something goes wrong**
“A rep for TV One had no comment.”
“He is also looking to block the release of the film, due to air on TV One on October 8.”
“Brown is suing for libel and slander and is seeking damages in excess of a million dollars.”
“Brown claims the casting call for the movie described him as "a hard drug user" who "devolves into violence and abuse towards his wife."”
“In the suit, Brown claims the production used information they obtained while working with him on his 2004 reality show,"Being Bobby Brown," and used it in the film without his permission.”
“He also claims there are "untrue" scenes that portray Brown as not loving Bobbi Kristina.”
“According to a lawsuit obtained by The Blast, Brown claims the film contains scenes that show Brown being violent towards his ex-wife, Whitney Houston.”
“Bobby Brown claims an upcoming TV movie about the life of his daughter, Bobbi Kristina Brown, is filled with lies — including claims of abuse — and he's filed a lawsuit seeking over $1,000,000 in damages.”


"A representative of station one has no comment on this."
"He also plans to block the release of the film, which will be on Channel one on October 8."
"Brown sued libel and libel for more than a million dollars."
Brown claimed that the film's cast described him as "a stubborn drug addict" who "degenerated into violence and abuse of his wife."
In the lawsuit, brown claimed that the film used information they got from the 2004 reality show "to be Bob Brown" with him and used it in the film without his permission
He also claimed that some "unreal" scenes depict brown as not in love with Bobbie Christina
"According to the lawsuit obtained by the explosion, brown claimed that there was a scene in the film in which Brown raped his ex-wife Whitney Houston."
"Bob Brown claims that an upcoming TV movie about the life of his daughter, Bob Christina Brown, is full of lies - including allegations of abuse - and he has filed a lawsuit for more than $1 million in damages."



Number  669
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“France: The nice thing about our show, what gave me comfort, is that we are the people you see on the show and we’re the same with our family and friends.”
“There’s comfort in the freedom of just going with it, enjoying those pauses and not feeling like you have to push it all the time.”
“We wanted to do transformations and makeovers for them that really make sense in the long-term.”
“It’s not a scary and taboo subject.”
“I liked talking through that with men and making ideas of gender and grooming feel more approachable.”
“Jonathan Van Ness: One thing for me that was challenging was just breaking through the idea of what a metrosexual was.”
“What was the most challenging aspect of taking on the makeovers of straight guys in Georgia?”
“Berk: In these days where every time you turn on your TV and you just get massively depressed or angry, we wanted to do TV that shows, “OK there’s going to be some hope for the world.” That is our biggest goal.”
“At the end of the day with everything that’s going on in our world why not just take a moment to have fun with five people who are your friends.”
“The original show made you feel good and allowed you to have fun — that was very important for us to keep.”


"France: the advantage of our program is that I feel comforted that we are the people you see in the program, and so are our family and friends."
"It's comforting to go with the flow and enjoy those pauses without feeling that you have to keep going."
"We want to do transformation and transformation for them, which is really meaningful in the long run."
"It's not a terrible and taboo topic."
"I like to discuss this with men to make the idea of gender and dress more approachable."
"Jonathan Vannes: one of the challenges for me is to break through the concept of urban beauty."
"What is the most challenging aspect of transforming heterosexual men in Georgia?"
Burke: now, every time you turn on the TV, you feel extremely depressed or angry. We want to do a TV show that says, "well, there will be some hope in the world." This is our biggest goal
"At the end of the day, what's going on in our world, why not spend some time playing with five of your friends?"
"Original shows make you feel good and have a good time - it's very important for us."



**Something goes wrong**
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Feedback Headlines Ireland Coronavirus World Video Photos Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة”
“Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English...”
“...msn news powered by Microsoft News web search Skip to Navigation Skip to Content Sign in Change language and content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
From 1575; Every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every Respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective Send MSN feedback to the title of Irish coronavirus world video photo, we thank you for your feedback "input..."
"Polska Polski Portugal Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomiswirlich Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rkiye t ü rk ι e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ p о C è me" "stage II"
“Deutsch España Español France français India English Indiaम2352; 2336; Indiaह2342; Indiaব2482; Indiaత3122; "Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italiano Magyarorsz á g Magyar Malaysia English Mexico Espa NIA ol Nederlands New Zealand English Norge Norsk bokm å L Ö sterreich Deutsch" Philippine English
“… MSN news by Microsoft News supports web search jump to navigation jump to content login change language and content African French French French French French Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canadian English Canada French Cesc Republic Chile Spanish Colombia Spain Denmark Denmark- Germany... "



**Something goes wrong**
“My actions alleged in the police report do not reflect my core values and my law abiding character.””
“I have the greatest respect for police officers and the job they do.”
“The Real Housewives of New York star entered her not guilty plea days before New Year’s.”
“De Lesseps, 52, was arrested in the early morning hours of Dec. 24 after attacking a police officer in Palm Beach — nearly a year after she wed now-ex-husband Tom D’Agostino in the Florida destination.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoomShe was charged with disorderly intoxication, battery on an officer/firefighter/EMT, resisting arrest with violence and threatening a public servant, according to the Palm Beach County Sheriff’s Office.”
“She had been discovered trespassing in a hotel room with an unidentified man, according to a police report.”
“The pair had entered the wrong room at the Colony Hotel in Palm Beach and refused to leave.”
“An assistant state’s attorney told the Palm Beach Post that de Lesseps slammed a door and kicked at least one police officer.”
“She also reportedly told people, “I’m going to kill you all,” before her arrest.”


"The conduct I allege in the police report does not reflect my core values and law-abiding character."
"I respect the police and their work the most."
"The real housewife of the New York star pleaded not guilty a few days before the new year."
Dreiseps, 52, was arrested after assaulting a police officer in Palm Beach in the early hours of December 24, nearly a year after she married her ex husband Tom dagostino in Florida
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Palm Beach County Sheriff's office said he was charged with alcoholism, beating a police officer / firefighter / first aider, resisting arrest with violence and threatening a civil servant
"According to police reports, she was found breaking into a hotel room illegally with an unidentified man."
"They went into the wrong room at the Colony Hotel in Palm Beach and refused to leave."
"An assistant state attorney told the Palm Beach Post that dreiseps slammed the door and kicked at least one policeman."
Before her arrest, she was also reported to have told people, "I'm going to kill all of you."



Number  672
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The teenager added that Chandler loves conservation and wildlife as much as she does, adding that it's helpful he's so strong as he can handle jumping on the crocodiles.”
“I think we forget to revel in the moment and revel in the now,' she said.”
“Speaking to US Weekly recently, the 54-year-old enthused over her 20-year-old daughter's relationship with Chandler, 21, saying: 'I really think that this is a long-term situation.”
“I mean, Chandler is perfect as well.'”
“She continued: 'I've never heard him swear.”
“He doesn't drink.”
“He's just awesome.”
“He's the kind of man you hope for your daughter, so I think I'm lucky.'”
“'I've never heard him swear, he doesn't drink, he's just awesome!'”
“Terri Irwin, 54, has revealed why her daughter Bindi's boyfriend Chandler Powell is 'the kind of man you hope for your daughter'However, when quizzed by the publication on whether a wedding is imminent, Bindi was quick to shut down speculation.”


"The girl added that Chandler loved protecting and wildlife as much as she did, adding that he was strong and able to cope with jumping on crocodiles, which helped her a lot."
"I think we forgot to be in the moment, in the moment," she said
"In a recent interview with us weekly, the 54 year old was enthusiastic about the relationship between her 20-year-old daughter and Chandler, 21, and said: 'I really think it's a long-term situation.'
"I mean, Chandler is perfect, too."
She went on, "I've never heard him swear."
"He doesn't drink."
"He's wonderful."
"He's the kind of person you want your daughter to be, so I think I'm lucky."
"I've never heard him swear, he doesn't drink, he's great!"
"Terri Irwin, 54, revealed why her daughter's boyfriend, Chandler Powell, is" the kind of person you want your daughter to be. ". However, when asked by the media whether the wedding is going to be held, Bingdi quickly dismissed the speculation



**Something goes wrong**
“Hopefully, in the next few weeks the wedding planning is really going to amp up!"”
“It's kind of a special time where there is a little bit of [a] lull and I'm really looking forward to spending some time with Nicole and work on that.”
“Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!”
“Nikki Bella and John Cena haven't announced a wedding date yet, but it's never too early to party.”
“Nine months after Cena asked for Bella's hand at WrestleMania 33, the WWE stars celebrated their engagement at a January 13 bash.”
“The details of the event were kept pretty mum, though guest and brow artist Olivia Wingen told E!”
“News that the bash was equally sporty and delicious.”
“"It was a beautiful day, great food, lots of football, and some amazing announcements for [E!”
“...show] Total Bellas," she said.”
“Not to mention, some amazing fashion!”


"I hope that in the next few weeks, the wedding plan will really make a big difference!"
"It's a special moment with a little calmness and I'm really looking forward to spending it with Nicole."
"Create a free profile to get unlimited exclusive videos, raffles, etc!"
"Nicky Bella and John Senna haven't announced their wedding date yet, but it's too early to party."
"Nine months after Seine proposed to Bella in wrestling 33, WWE stars celebrated their engagement at a carnival on January 13."
Although guest and eyebrow artist Olivia wingan told "E!"
"It's said that carnival is also full of sports and delicious food."
"It was a wonderful day, delicious food, a lot of football, and some amazing announcements!"
“… Show] totally Bellas, "she said
"Not to mention some amazing fashions!"



Number  674
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I was extremely humbled.”Watch Olympios speak out about the incident on Tuesday’s episode of “Bachelor in Paradise.””
““That’s what I’m a victim of.”
““Well of course, anything like this, it takes a toll on you,” Olympios told People.”
““It’s not easy to deal with.”
“I feel like it was kind of out of my hands and blown into the media.”
“It’s not really how I wanted it.”
“I obviously would’ve rather handled something like this privately.”
“It’s embarrassing.”
“It’s really hard.”
“There s no feeling like it having to wake up every day knowing that this is going on that people and the media are judging you In June production on the fourth season of Bachelor in Paradise was stopped briefly over allegations of misconduct surrounding a sexual encounter between DeMario...”


"I was very humble." Watch Olympia speak on the issue on Tuesday's singles in paradise
"This is my victim."
"Of course, things like this will cost you," Olympus told people
"It's not easy to deal with."
"I think it's a bit unexpected and flattered by the media."
"It's not what I really want."
"Obviously, I'd rather deal with things like this in private."
"It's embarrassing."
"It's really hard."
"People and the media judge you in June, and they don't feel like waking up every day. The production of the fourth season of" Bachelor in heaven "has been temporarily stopped because of accusations of improper sexual contact between demario..."



**Something goes wrong**
“To not continue and star in their movies much past that doesn't make sense.”
““I won an Oscar with Miramax.”
“You should go to the authorities.”
“No one said, ‘Hey, this is sexual harassment.”
““I told everyone I knew.”
“I think that's why Harvey stopped trying with me because he would never mess with the girlfriend of his star director,” she wrote.”
““I was just happy that Quentin was my protector.”
“Weinstein...”
“All these people wrote to me online I remember you telling me about that Quentin Tarantino corroborated that I told him about it right away that September Sorvino previously wrote in a guest column for The Hollywood Reporter that she believed her romantic relationship with Tarantino stopped further advances from...”
““The funny thing is at the time it happened, I told everyone I knew and a lot of people will tell you that,” said Sorvino.”


"It doesn't make sense not to continue to play in their past films."
"Miramax and I won the Oscars together."
"You should go to the authorities."
"No one said, 'Hey, it's sexual harassment.'"
"I told everyone I knew."
"I think that's why Harvey doesn't try to be with me anymore, because he'll never mess with his star director's girlfriend," she wrote
"I'm glad Quentin is my protector."
"Weinstein..."
"All of these people wrote to me online. I remember you told me about Quentin Tarantino and confirmed that I told him right away. Before September, sowino wrote in a guest column of Hollywood Reporter that she believed her romantic relationship with Tarantino prevented further progress..."
"Interestingly, when it happened, I told everyone I knew, and a lot of people would tell you," says sowino



Number  676
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From Closer WeeklyAshton Kutcher Jokes Daughter Wyatt Wants to “Kill” Baby Brother DimitriJimmy Kimmel Will Return in 2018 to Host the OscarsHoda Kotb on New Life With Baby Haley — “Motherhood Is the Best Job I’ve Ever Had””
“Part of this story originally appeared on NowToLove.com.”
“The TV host shared a new photo of his “happy and healthy” little boy via Instagram on Saturday, Oct. 21.”
““Young Billy is six months old today.”
“He is healthy and happy and we are all very grateful for your prayers, good wishes, thoughts, and support of @ChildrensLA and children’s hospitals in your area,” he wrote on the social media platform.”
“This update comes just one month after Billy made his first public appearance following his open-heart surgery.”
“Three months ago, Jimmy gave a similar update on Billy — and we’re so glad that he’s continuing to do better!”
““Billy is three months old and doing great,” the 49-year-old star wrote on Instagram alongside an adorable new photo of his little boy smiling at the camera at the time.”
““Thanks for the love and support.”
“Please remind your Congresspeople that every kid deserves the care he got.”The late night host tearfully revealed Billy’s birth and subsequent health problems during an emotional, 13-minute Jimmy Kimmel Live!”


More of yashton Kutcher in closer week joked that her daughter Wyatt wanted to "kill" her younger brother Dimitri Jimmy Kimmel, who will return in 2018 to host the new life of Oscar Hoda Kotb and baby Haley - "being a mother is the best job I've ever done"
"Part of the story first appeared in NowToLove.com Website. "
On Saturday, October 21, the TV host shared a new picture of his "happy and healthy" little boy through instagram
"Little Billy is six months old today."
"He is healthy and happy, and we all thank you very much for your prayers, good wishes, thoughts and the support of @ childrensla and your local children's Hospital," he wrote on the social media platform
"This update was released a month after Billy's first public appearance after open heart surgery."
"Three months ago, Jimmy gave Billy a similar update - we're glad he continues to do better!"
"Billy is three months old and doing well," the 49 year old star wrote on instagram, along with a lovely new photo of his little boy smiling at the camera
"Thank you for your love and support."
"Please remind your Congressman that every child should be taken care of." Late night hosts tearfully revealed Billy's birth and subsequent health problems in an emotional, 13 minute Jimi Kimmel scene



**Something goes wrong**
“"Photo Credit: Bravo...”
“So we'll see, and hopefully she can get out of it, be happy, and be fine.”
“Now Luann s co stars Dorinda Medley and Tinsley Mortimer share their thoughts on Luann s relapse and show their support for the former Countess Tinsley revealed that she was totally in shock when she heard about Lu s struggles during her appearance on Watch What Happens Live with Andy...”
“Cohen Wednesday night Tinsley went on to say that she was proud to see Luann come out on top after her arrest in Palm Beach Florida last Christmas Eve just as she had done following her own brush with the law in 2016”
“"I had a mugshot in Palm Beach, too, and I just feel like I turned it around, and I felt like she was doing that.”
“I felt like the cabaret show is so amazing, and I was just so proud of her," Tinsley said.”
“"It's just sad.”
“I wish her the best, and I hope she can work everything out.”
“""It's so sad that she's not here.”
“I feel so badly for her.”


"Photo source: great “”
"So we'll wait and see, and hope she can get out of it, be happy, and everything will be OK."
"Now Luan's co stars, Dorinda medley and Tinsley Mortimer, share their thoughts on Luan's relapse and express their support. Former Countess Tinsley revealed that when she heard Luan's struggle while watching life with Andy, she was completely shocked..."
"On Wednesday night, Cohen Tinsley went on to say that she was very proud to see Luan stand out after her arrest in Palm Beach, Florida, on Christmas Eve last year, just as she passed the law in 2016."
"I took a picture in Palm Beach, too. I just feel like I've turned it around. I think that's what she did."
"I think the song and dance performance is wonderful and I'm proud of her," Tinsley said
"It's sad."
"I wish her all the best and hope she can solve all the problems."
"It's so sad that she's not here."
"I'm so sorry for her."



**Something goes wrong**
“Next Up: Seven new sunscreens you need to know.”
““This is a great product for men, as the powder is light,” suggests Dr. Paul Friedman, M.D., director of the Dermatology & Laser Surgery Center in Houston Texas.”
“And, while we have our go-to sunscreens, we've decided to take a little extra precaution this year by adding makeup with SPF into our routine.”
“You can never be too prepared, right?”
“On the search to add some more sun protection into our beauty routine, we reached out to a few celebrity makeup artists for their favorite makeup products containing SPF.”
“From protective lip tints that add just the right amount of color to high SPF BB creams that create a barely-there layer of coverage, there are plenty of products that fulfill their purpose while also protecting our skin from the sun's harsh rays.”
“For the best makeup artist–recommended beauty products containing SPF, keep on reading.”
“Foundation Shiseido UV Protective Liquid Foundation SPF 42 $38 ShopWhen looking for makeup with SPF, senior makeup artist at Antonio Prieto Salon Kristine Cruz says it's important to look for products that provide both UVA and UVB coverage.”
“This foundation from Shiseido does just that, while also providing a nice layer of coverage that is water- and oil-resistant.”
“Lip Tint Fresh Sugar Tinted Lip Treatment SPF 15 $24 ShopFor those of you who have experienced a sunburn on your lips, you know the importance of a lip balm with SPF.”


"Next step: seven new sunscreens you need to know."
"It's a great product for men because the powder is very light," suggests Dr. Paul Friedman, director of the center for dermatology and laser surgery in Houston, Texas
"And when we're going to buy sunscreen, we've decided to take some extra precautions this year by adding SPF cosmetics to our daily lives."
"You can't be too well prepared, can you?"
"In order to add more sunscreen to our daily beauty, we contacted several celebrity makeup artists to find their favorite cosmetics containing SPF."
"From the protection of lip gloss with the right amount of color to the high SPF BB cream, there is almost no cover. There are many products that can achieve their purposes and protect our skin from the pain of sunlight."
"For the best makeup artist - Recommended beauty products with SPF, please continue to read."
"Foundation makeup Shiseido SPF 42$38 ShopAntonio Prieto Salon Kristine Cruz senior makeup artist said that it is important to find products that can cover UVA and cover UVB."
"Shiseido's foundation is like this. It also provides a waterproof and oil-resistant covering."
"Lip gloss fresh sugar Lip Balm SPF 15$24 bought for those who suffered sunburn on lips, you know the importance of using SPF lip gloss."



Number  679
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'”Watch Pitt’s surprise cameo above.”
“Our people and our memories will all burn.”
“Your legacy is pointless.”
““And I said, ‘Same as it is up there: changing at a pace not before seen in the history of man.”
““I was hanging out with LeBron James, and he said, ‘How’s the weather down there?’ because he’s tall,” he began.”
“After making his debut as the weatherman in 2017, Pitt’s character was later “fired” for being “crazy” and “a real nutjob.”These memories started flooding back as he tried telling a joke involving basketball star LeBron James.”
“They did.”
““Didn’t we fire you?” host Jim Jefferies asked.”
““We’ve got sunshine in the west, the south, the east, and over here in the north, the ice caps are melting and I am so so so so scared,” he said.”
“Climate change.”


"Look at Pete's unexpected Cameo up there."
"Our people and our memories will burn."
"Your legacy is meaningless."
"I said: 'the same as above: change at a rate unprecedented in human history.'"
"I was with LeBron James and he said," what's the weather like there? "? "Because he's tall," he began
"After his first role as a weather forecaster in 2017, Peter's role was later" fired "for being" Crazy "and" a real madman. ". When he tried to tell a joke about LeBron James, the basketball star, these memories began to pour into his mind
"They did it."
"Didn't we fire you? "Asked Jim Jeffries, the host."
"We have sunshine in the west, in the south, in the East, and in the north, the ice sheet is melting, and I'm very scared," he said
"Climate change."



**Something goes wrong**
“Watch: R. Kelly’s Alleged Hostage Breaks Her Silence About Sex Cult Accusations was originally published on globalgrind.com...”
“According to Buzzfeed reporter Jim Derogatis, who first reported the story, R. Kelly is currently being investigated by the FBI.”
“Her father Timothy believes she is suffering Stockholm Syndrome, a condition which sees hostages grow to love their captors.”
“I’ve never felt like a hostage or anything like that.” However, Jocelyn will not confirm whether or not she’s in a relationship or dating the 50-year-old singer.”
“It’s just not right.” When asked if she was being held involuntarily, she said, “Oh no, nothing like that.”
“I’m happy where I’m at and everything is okay with me.”Savage said of her parents, “I’m very heartbroken over what’s going on with this situation because it’s getting to a point where it’s getting too much.”
“I’m totally fine.”
“It just came to a point where it definitely has got out of hand.”
“She told TMZ, “I’m 21, I’m about to be 22 in a few days and I just mainly want to say that I am in a happy place with my life and I’m not being brainwashed or anything like that.”
“Jocelyn Savage, 21, whose family accused R. Kelly of holding their daughter hostage, says that she’s perfectly happy and safe — although she won’t reveal her whereabouts.”


Observation: Kelly's alleged hostages break her silence on sexual cult charges
"According to buzzfeed reporter Jim creatis, R. Kelly is currently under investigation by the FBI."
"Her father, Timothy, thinks she has Stockholm syndrome, which makes the hostages fall in love with their captors."
"I never felt like a hostage or something like that." However, joseline will not confirm whether she has a relationship or a date with the 50 year old singer
"It's not right." When asked if she was held involuntarily, she said, "Oh no, it's not like that."
Speaking of her parents, Savitch said: "I'm very happy where I am, everything is very good, I feel very sad about the present situation, because it has reached a point where people can't stand it."
"I'm fine."
"It's absolutely out of control."
She told TMZ, "I'm 21 years old, and I'll be 22 in a few days. I just want to say that I live in a happy place and I'm not brainwashed or anything like that."
The family of 21-year-old Jocelyn savage accused R. Kelly of taking their daughter hostage, saying she was very happy and safe - although she would not disclose her whereabouts



Number  681
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Yeah, Sofia, we said anything!”
“Now that Kourt is (potentially) single again, anything could happen.”
“The subject of Kourtney Kardashian having a fourth child has really been all the rage lately as a highly debated topic on Keeping Up With The Kardashians fans have naturally been back and forth about whether or not it ll actually happen and who s gonna be the daddy for...”
“...that matter...”
“But Kourt and her signature wit shut down the rumors on Instagram over Thanksgiving this week.”
“On Nov. 22, sister Kendall Jenner posted a lovely photo and video round-up of the Kardashian’s Thanksgiving celebrations on her Instagram.”
“In the video clip Kenny posted, you can see Kourtney’s hand on her stomach in a subconscious move that most soon-to-be mamas just can’t help but doing.”
“Naturally, it lead to some fan reactions.”
““Is Kourt pregnant?”
“?” One fan commented, reacting to the possible secret pregnancy.”


"Yes, Sophia, we didn't say anything!"
"Now that Kurt is (possibly) single again, anything can happen."
"The topic of Courtney Kardashian giving birth to her fourth child is really popular recently. As a controversial topic, Kardashian's fans naturally talk back and forth about whether it will really happen and who will be his father..."
“… That thing... "
"But Kurt and her signature wisdom shut down the rumors on instagram during Thanksgiving this week."
On November 22, sister Kendall Jenner posted a lovely picture and video of Kardashian's Thanksgiving celebration on instagram
"In the video clip released by Kenny, you can see Courtney's hand on his stomach, which is a subconscious action, and most expectant mothers can't help doing it."
"Naturally, it will arouse the reaction of some fans."
"Is Kurt pregnant?"
"?" one fan commented, responding to a possible secret pregnancy. "



Number  682
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News that the controversy could open up a dialogue about teen suicide, adding: “I just wanted it to come across in a way that kids would be frightened, but confused, and in a way that they would talk about it because it’s something that’s happening all the time.””
“‘as someone who contributed to the soundtrack for “13 Reasons Why”, I am obliged to tell you all that it’s kind of fucked,’ he wrote.”
“The show follows the story of a teenage girl who ultimately takes her own life, using flash backs of bullying and sexual assault.”
“It has drawn criticisms from schools and parents who accuse the show’s makers of ‘glorifying suicide’.”
“A school in Minnesota recently notified parents of the show, warning that it offers a a problematic depiction of high-school life.”
“New Zealand also created a entirely new rating for 13 Reasons Why which requires that those under 18 are only able to watch the show with a parent or guardian present.”
“AdvertisementRead more: 13 Reasons Why: five unanswered questions a second season could answerCar Seat Headrest contributed his song ‘Oh!”
“Starving’ to the soundtrack.”
“Taking to Twitter today (April 30) he also voiced his concerns for the show.”
“‘writers: please don’t tell kids how to turn their miserable and hopeless lives into a thrilling and cathartic suicide mission.”


A source said the controversy could open a conversation about teenage suicide, adding: "I just hope that children can understand it in a way that is both scared and confused, and hope that they can talk about it, because it happens all the time."
"As someone who contributed to the soundtrack of the thirteen whys, I have to tell you, it's all fucked up," he wrote
"The play tells the story of a young girl who eventually commits suicide, using flashbacks of bullying and sexual assault."
"This has aroused criticism from schools and parents who accuse the producers of" beautifying suicide. "
A school in Minnesota recently informed parents of the play, warning that there was something wrong with its description of high school life
"New Zealand has also created a brand new rating, with 13 reasons for requiring people under 18 to watch only in the presence of their parents or guardians."
Read more ads: 13 reasons: 5 unanswered questions in season 2: car seat headrest contributed his song "Oh!"
The soundtrack of "hungry"
"He also expressed his concerns about the program on twitter today (April 30)," he said
"Writers: please don't tell children how to turn their miserable and desperate life into a stimulating and cathartic suicide mission."



Number  683
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We hope Loretta recovers soon!”
“...next week...”
“However Lynn s doctors have still advised her to stay off the road while she is recuperating It s certain that she will have to postpone her upcoming shows including the one in Alabama Theater tomorrow and Penn s Peak...”
“She is currently under medical care and is responsive and expected to make a full recovery.”
“A statement on behalf of Lynn was released on her official Facebook page:“American country music legend Loretta Lynn was admitted into a hospital in Nashville last night after she suffered a stroke at her home in Hurricane Mills, Tennessee.”
“Country music singer-songwriter Loretta Lynn (85) was admitted to the hospital on Thursday after suffering a stroke.”


"We hope Loretta will recover soon!"
“… Next week... "
"However, Lynn's doctor still advises her not to go on the road during her rest. She will definitely postpone her upcoming performances, including tomorrow's performances at the Alabama theater and the peak of Pennsylvania..."
"She is currently receiving medical care and is very responsive and is expected to fully recover."
Lynn's official Facebook Page published a statement on behalf of Lynn: "Loretta Lynn, an American country music legend, was admitted to a hospital in Nashville last night after suffering a stroke at her home in Hurricane Mills, Tennessee."
"Country singer and songwriter Loretta Lynn, 85, was admitted to hospital on Thursday with a stroke."



Number  684
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"And there’s no place she’d rather have me be than right back here."”
“"You guys gave my mom the greatest gift ever by employing me on the Today show because she could watch me every single morning in her kitchen and I know that she did," he said.”
“But it seems Pattie Daly Caruso prepared to say goodbye nearly two decades before her fatal heart attack on Sept. 17 at her Palm Desert, Calif. home.”
“Daly shared on Instagram Wednesday that he and his sister, Quinn Daly, had unearthed a letter from his mom who was then "in the thick of her breast cancer battle" in 1998.”
“"She clearly thought she might not make it," Daly captioned a snapshot of the letter.”
“"We never knew."”
“Caruso lived to be 73.”
“"Take good care of yourselves and each other," the letter reads.”
“I'm so proud of you!”
“Each of you have brought me so much joy!”


"She doesn't want me to stay here, either."
"You gave my mom the best gift ever and hired me on today's show because she could watch me in the kitchen every morning and I knew she did," he said
"But Patty Daly Caruso seems ready to say goodbye 20 years before the heart attack on September 17 at her home in the Palm Desert, California."
Daley said on instagram Wednesday that he and his sister Quinn Daly found a letter from his mother. In 1998, his mother was "in a battle of breast cancer."
"She obviously thought she might not make it," Daly added a headline to the snapshot of the letter
"We never know."
"Caruso lived to be 73."
"Take care of yourself and each other," it read
"I'm so proud of you!"
"Each of you has brought me so much happiness!"



Number  685
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s just awesome.”Watch the video above.”
““I will eventually make my to Arkansas and continue this lovely family reunion,” she said.”
“She said she’d like to visit Dodd’s home as well.”
“Also Read: How Scarlett Johansson's 'Rough Night' Became the Rare Studio Comedy That's LGBT-FriendlyThe actress doesn’t plan on making it a one-night stand with her lookalike, gushing to Colbert about how nice she was — and calling her a “lush” in an endearing way.”
““So she came last night to the ‘Rough Night’ premiere, and we did get kind of trashed,” Johansson said.”
“And when Dodd, now 72, confirmed that she was “drunk as a skunk” in the picture, Johansson knew she had to meet her and “see your drunk face.”Thursday night, she finally got to see it.”
““This woman looks exactly like me.”Also Read: Scarlett Johansson Invites Elderly Doppelganger to Get Drunk at 'Rough Night' Premiere (Video)Reddit user DenverJoel had posted a photo of said doppelganger, then-22-year-old grandmother Geraldine Dodd, on the site.”
““So I looked at this link online,” she told Colbert.”
“On Friday’s episode of CBS’ “Late Show,” Johansson told host Stephen Colbert that despite the fact that she has “no social media presence,” several people alerted her to the existence of her doppelganger and she had to see for herself.”
“In April, Scarlett Johansson invited a Redditor’s grandmother with whom she shared a striking resemblance to the opening night of her new movie “Rough Night.” This week, the two finally met at the raunchy bachelorette comedy’s New York premiere — and apparently knocked back more than a few.”


"She's wonderful." Look at the video above
"I will eventually return to Arkansas and continue this wonderful family reunion," she said
"She said she also wanted to visit Dodd's home."
As like as two peas, a wild profusion of vegetation, and a hard work of the night, Scarlett Johansson's "hard night" how to become a rare studio comedy, a friendly actress who is gay and bisexual, does not intend to stand up with her, and she tells Colbert how good she is - and calls her "lush" in a love way.
"So she came to the premiere of hard night last night and we were really messed up," Johnson said
When Dodd, 72, confirmed that she was "as drunk as a skunk" in the picture, Johnson knew she had to see her, "look at your drunken face." On Thursday night, she finally saw it
"This woman looks as like as two peas." It also said: Scarlett Johnson invited the elderly doppelganger to get drunk at the premiere of rough night. Reddit user Denver Joel posted a photo of her grandmother, Geraldine Dodd, then 22, on the website
"So I read the link online," she told Colbert
"On CBS's" evening show "Friday, Johnson told host Stephen Colbert that although she" doesn't have social media, "several people reminded her that she had to see her bisexual presence in person."
In April this year, Scarlett Johansen invited a grandmother of redito. She and her grandmother have amazing similarities, just like the premiere night of her new film "night of barbarism". This week, the two finally met at the premiere of the obscene bachelor comedy in New York, and were apparently hit back by a lot of people



Number  686
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See all of Carter's tweets below.”
“When that happened, it made me have much more appreciation for what I have now.”USA TODAY has reached out to Carter's representatives for further comment on his tweets.”
“The singer, 29, posted a string of tweets early Wednesday morning detailing his struggle with a hiatal hernia, which he called "a terrible stress condition that affects me having an appetite" and "an eating disorder."”
“"By the way y'all wanna know why I'm so skinny?"”
“Carter wrote in his first tweet on the subject.”
“"It's because @ 19, i was diagnosed with a hiatal hernia, I didn't choose that.”
“...be kind to me."”
“According to the Mayo Clinic's online database, a hiatal hernia occurs when part of the stomach pushes upward into the diaphragm, often causing heartburn and other symptoms, including "feeling especially full after meals."”
“"I'm sorry, sometimes I really wish I did look better, or I eat more like y'all say, this life doesn't come w much stability," Carter continued.”
“"If you don't believe me ask my brother he was there when I was 19 diagnosed.”


"Look at all of Carter's tweets below."
"When this happens, it makes me more grateful for what I have now." Today, the United States has contacted Carter's representative to make further comments on his twitter
The 29 year old singer posted a series of microblogs on Wednesday morning detailing his struggle with hiatal hernia, which he called "a terrible state of stress that affects my appetite" and "eating disorder."
"By the way, do you want to know why I'm so thin?"
"Carter wrote on the first tweet about this topic."
"Because of @ 19, I was diagnosed with hiatal hernia, I had no choice."
“… Be nice to me. "
According to the Mayo Clinic's online database, hiatal hernia occurs when a part of the stomach is pressed up into the diaphragm, which usually causes heartburn and other symptoms, including "feeling particularly full after meals."
"I'm sorry, sometimes I really want to look better, or eat as much as you say. It's not a stable life," Carter continued
"If you don't believe me, ask my brother, he was there when I was 19."



Number  687
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch a preview of “The Voice” season 14 below.”
““It’s a very real, organic relationship.”“The Voice” season 14 premieres Feb. 26 at 8 p.m. on NBC.”
““We haven’t ever really had a defensive move or an offensive-defensive move, so we came up with the block,” executive producer Audrey Morrissey says.”
““It really sort of speaks to the real competition.”The block button prevents a coach from adding a new artist to their team.”
“The coaches this season, veterans Adam Levine and Blake Shelton as well as rookie Clarkson and season 12 winner Alicia Keys, can only use their block buttons on one artist for the entire first round of the competition.”
“When a coach hits the block button with the name of the other three coaches, the coach who hit it automatically turns around.”
“The “blocked” coach only discovers they are blocked if they press their button.”
“If the coach doesn’t press their button, the block is still available for another audition.”
““You have to do it based on voice alone, so [we] really kept the sanctity of the blind audition with that,” Morrissey says.”
“Season 14 of the show will also introduce a save button that will allow a coach to save an artist they just eliminated during the knockout round.”


Watch the preview of sound Season 14 below
"It's a very real, organic relationship." "The voice" Season 14 will premiere on NBC at 8 p.m. on February 26
Executive producer Audrey Morrissey said: "we never really took defensive or offensive action, so we came up with a block."
"It's sort of an illustration of real competition." The stop button prevents coaches from adding new artists to their team
"This season's coaches, veteran Adam Levin and black Sheldon, rookie Clarkson and season 12 champion Alicia case, can only use the square button on one artist in the whole first round."
"When a carriage presses the stop button of the names of the other three carriages, the carriage that hits it will automatically turn around."
"Blocked" coaches will only find that they are blocked if they press their button
"If the coach doesn't press their button, the block can audition again."
"You have to do it just by sound, so [we] really keep the sanctity of blind auditions," Morrissey said
"Season 14 will also feature a save button that allows coaches to save artists they just eliminated in the knockout."



Number  688
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cast members Daisy Ridley, Adam Driver, John Boyega, Oscar Isaac, Lupita Nyong’o, Domhnall Gleeson, Kelly Marie Tran and Joonas Suotamo will be returning, as well.”
“We’ll have to wait until December 2019 to know for sure.”
“Given how things worked out for him during The Last Jedi, however, it’s hard to say if he’ll be doing so as a translucent blue ghost.”
“Also returning is Mark Hamill.”
“Beginning filming next week.https://t.co/BUCl4H8aRT pic.twitter.com/ezEaLzijLq — Star Wars (@starwars) July 27, 2018Rogue One, of course, took a slightly uncanny valley approach to recreating a young Leia with actress Ingvild Deila and a little bit of the old Industrial Light & Magic.”
“With the support and blessing from her daughter, [Billie Lourd], we have found a way to honor Carrie’s legacy and role as Leia in Episode IX by using unseen footage we shot together in Episode VII.”Meet the cast of Star Wars: Episode IX.”
“We were never going to recast, or use a CG character.”
““Finding a truly satisfying conclusion to the Skywalker saga without her eluded us.”
““We desperately loved Carrie Fisher,” Abrams said in a press release tied to the announcement.”
“Rather than recreating the character with CGI, however, director/co-writer J.J. Abrams will be resurfacing unseen footage from The Force Awakens.”


"Actors Daisy Redley, Adam deliff, John boyga, Oscar Isaac, Lupita Nino, domnal Gleason, Kelly Mary Tran and Jonas sotamo will also return."
"We'll have to wait until December 2019."
"However, given his performance in the last Jedi operation, it's hard to say if he would look like a translucent blue ghost."
"Mark Hamill is back, too."
"The next week is shooting httpshttp://t.co/BUCl4H8aRTpic.twitter.com/ezEaLzijLq- "Star Wars" (@ starwars) July 27, 2018 "rogue one" of course takes a slightly mysterious valley approach to recreate a young Leia with actress ingvild deila and a little old industrial light and magic. "
"With the support and blessing of her daughter, [Billie Lauder], we found a way to commemorate Carrie's legacy and play Leia in Episode 9 by using the invisible lens we shot together in Episode 7."
"We never intended to recast, or use CG characters."
"We didn't come to a really satisfying conclusion, without her Skywalker legend."
"We love Carrie Fisher very much," Abrams said in a press release related to the statement
"However, Director / co-author J.J. Abrams will not use CGI to recreate the character, but will recreate the invisible scenes in the force awakening."



Number  689
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“While Rivera had previously filed for divorce in November 2016, she filed a request for dismissal in October 2017.”
“They welcomed their son in September 2015.”
“...engagement to rapper Big Sean ended...”
“In early December the former Glee actress filed for divorce from Dorsey for a second time after more than three years of marriage citing irreconcilable differences Image zoom Credit Gregg DeGuire WireImage Naya Rivera and Ryan Dorsey in 2016 The pair married in July 2014 just three months after her...”
“He had minor injuries consistent with his claims, and further showed authorities a video taken during the alleged incident.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Naya Rivera Files for Divorce from Ryan Dorsey for a Second TimeDorsey claimed to the responding deputy that Rivera struck him in the head and face.”
“Dorsey added a simple caption of, “⛄Happy Holidays⛄.”On Nov. 25, Rivera was arrested and charged with misdemeanor domestic battery after an alleged altercation with her husband Dorsey in Kanawha County, West Virginia, police confirmed to PEOPLE.”
““I’m so thankful for this little dude, my main man, the sweetest boy I know.❄️⛄ ❄️.”Image zoom Credit: Ryan Dorsey/InstagramRyan and Josey DorseyA day before Christmas, Dorsey shared an adorable photo of the two together posing in front of an inflatable snowman.”
“Image zoom Credit: Ryan Dorsey/InstagramRyan Dorsey and son JoseyImage zoom Credit: Ryan Dorsey/InstagramJosey Dorsey“#Winter17 Happy Holidays, Merry Christmas, & wishing you all a happier & healthier Happy New Year from them Dorsey dudes,” the proud father wrote in the caption of the video.”
“While Rivera was nowhere to be seen in Dorsey’s post, the father and son seemed to enjoy their holiday with food, pre-Christmas shopping and posing in front of their Christmas tree.”


"Although Rivera had previously filed for divorce in November 2016, she filed for employment in October 2017."
"They had their son in September 2015."
“… The engagement to rapper big Sean is over... "
"In early December, the former glee star filed for divorce with Dorsey for the second time after more than three years of marriage on the grounds of irreconcilable differences between the two, including Gregg deguire, Naya Rivera and Ryan Dorsey) in 2016, they got married in July 2014 three months after her marriage... "
"He was slightly injured, in line with his statement, and further showed the authorities a video taken in the alleged incident."
"Related video: Naya Rivera filed for divorce from Ryan Dorsey for the second time. Dorsey claimed to his deputy that Rivera hit him in the head and face."
Dorsey added a simple title ⛄ Happy holidays ⛄ Police confirmed to the public that on November 25, Rivera was arrested and charged with misdemeanor after a quarrel with her husband Dorsey in Kanawa County, West Virginia
"I'm so grateful to this little guy, my hero, the cutest boy I know. ❄️⛄  ❄️ "Image zooming credit: Ryan Dorsey / instagram Ryan and Josie Dorsey shared a lovely picture of them taking a group photo in front of an inflatable Snowman one day before Christmas."
"Credit for image zooming: Ryan Dorsey / instagram Ryan Dorsey and his son Josey credit for image zooming: Ryan Dorsey / instagram Josey Dorsey" ා winter17 happy holidays, Merry Christmas and a happier and healthier new year, Dorsey brothers, "the proud father wrote in the title of the video
"Although we can't find Rivera in Dorsey's post, the father and son seem to enjoy their holiday, eating, shopping before Christmas and posing in front of the Christmas tree."



Number  690
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...no LaBeef After LaBeouf s arrest on Saturday morning he s probably be trying to avoid any LaBeef for a while...”
“I mean I can still get inspired like when an actor comes on Sway and starts spittin some fire like Shia Shia was nice man LaBeouf was a beast and there will be no disrespect cause I don t want...”
“I know what she did last summer in the front seat of my Caddy no I don t drive a Hummer I m trying to keep it clean cause I m a father and a daddy if you know what...”
““Crash into me with ‘Cruel Intentions’ and I’ll take away your girl and do some things that we won’t mention,” he rapped.”
“His spitfire verses continued with mentions of the presidential election, his movie “Cruel Intentions” and jealousy.”
“...rapped...”
“If I m gonna take a shot I m not planning on missing Bob Lee swagger with the Smith and Wesson But I can duck down too Got P tatted on my arm so I keep Roc around too he...”
““This is so not right, man,” Phillippe, 42, said before pulling out his pre-written lyrics.”
“The “Shooter” actor appeared on SiriusXM’s “Sway in the Morning” on Tuesday and showed host Sway Calloway that he’s more than just an actor, director and writer.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Is Ryan Phillippe the rapper we never knew we needed?”


“… Without labeef, after LaBeouf was arrested on Saturday morning, he may try to avoid labeef for a while... "
"I mean, when an actor changes and starts shooting fire, like Shia is a good man, Labov is a beast, there's no disrespect, because I don't want to..."
"I know what she did in the front seat of my caddie last summer no, I don't drive Hummer, I want to keep it clean because I'm a father and a father, if you know anything..."
"Run into me with 'cruel intent' and I'll take your girl and do something we won't talk about," he said softly
"His flamethrowers continue to refer to the presidential election, his films" brutal intent "and jealousy."
“… Knock... "
"If I'm going to take a picture, I'm not going to miss Bob Lee's group photo with Smith and Wesson, but I can also squat down and have tattoos on my arms, so I'll leave rock with me too, he..."
"That's not right, man," Philip, 42, said before taking out his pre written lyrics
The "shooter" actor appeared on Sirius XM's "swing in the morning" on Tuesday, showing host sway Calloway that he is more than just an actor, director and writer
"Click to send this email to a friend (open in a new window) is Ryan Phillippe a rapper we didn't know we needed?"



Number  691
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Marriage Boot Camp Reality Stars: Family Edition premieres Friday at 9 p.m. ET/PT on WE tv.”
“To see more from the intense confrontation, watch the exclusive video above.”
“"I get pissed and I can't take this s***!," an emotional Abraham said through her tears as she stormed off the set of Marriage Boot Camp Reality Stars.”
“RELATED: Kendra Wilkinson, Farrah Abraham Confront Loved Ones on 'Marriage Boot Camp'Things came to a head when Abraham brought up a 2010 altercation the two had, and the resulting confrontation between mother and daughter became too much to bear.”
“"That is totally wrong," Danielsen fired back, shaking her head as Abraham continued to list her grievances.”
“When asked why she said that, Abraham explained that it was "probably from all the pain I've been through in my life," before directing her attention to her mother, alleging that Danielsen kept "abusive behavior around me continuously."”
“RELATED: 'Teen Mom OG' Star Farrah Abraham Splits From Boyfriend Simon SaranET exclusively debuts a dramatic sneak peek from Friday's series premiere, in which the 25-year-old is confronted with past "hurtful" comments she's made about Danielsen -- at one time saying "then f***ing die already."”
“Teen Mom OG's Farrah Abraham is one of four reality stars at the center of WE tv's new series, Marriage Boot Camp Reality Stars: Family Edition, and she's facing off against her mom, Debra Danielsen, with whom she's had a contentious relationship.”
“Oh, family drama.”


"Marriage camp reality show star: Family Edition" will premiere on we TV at 9 p.m. EDT on Friday
"To learn more about the intense confrontation, watch the exclusive video above."
"I'm angry. I can't stand this! "When she rushed out of the reality show set of marriage training camp, an emotional Abraham said with tears streaming down his face."
"Related reports: Kendra Wilkinson and Farah Abraham confronted their relatives at the" marriage recruits training camp ". When Abraham mentioned the quarrel between them in 2010, it reached the peak, and the confrontation between mother and daughter caused by it became unbearable."
"That's totally wrong," Danielson replied, shaking her head as Abraham continued to complain
"When asked why she said that, Abraham explained that it was" probably because I've experienced all the pain in my life "and then turned her attention to her mother, claiming that Danielson was" constantly abusing me. "
"Related reports: Farra Abraham, star of" teenage mom og ", broke up with her boyfriend Simon salanette. At the premiere on Friday, the 25-year-old gave an exclusive dramatic peek in the face of past" hurtful "comments on Danielson - she once said," then die. "
"Farra Abraham of young mother Ogg is one of the four reality TV stars in our new series" reality TV stars of marriage boot camp: family version ". She fights her mother Debra Danielsen, and her relationship with her mother has always been controversial."
"Oh, family drama."



Number  692
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...has amassed 438 000 signatures and there is still enthusiasm among LMS fans about the show coming back especially following Roseanne s return...”
“It became a rallying cry for conservatives with a petition launched that called for ABC to bring back a show that appeals to a broad swath of Americans who find very few shows that extol the virtues with which they can identify namely conservative values A year later the petition...”
“It’s the fans!”
“When I heard the offer to create more episodes of Last Man Standing, I did a fist pump so hard I threw my back out.”
“Now we get the news from Fox that it’s time to get back out on that diamond – hell yes, I’m excited!”
“It leaves you sitting in the dugout, holding a bat and puzzled.”
““Team LMS was in the sixth inning, ahead by four runs, stands were packed and then for no reason, they call off the game.”
““Excited?,” he said today.”
“Allen has been vocal about his disappointment over the cancellation of Last Man Standing by ABC and his hope to see it come back.”
“Created by Jack Burditt, Last Man Standing stars Allen as Mike Baxter, a married father of three girls, who tries to maintain his manliness in a world increasingly dominated by women.”


“… Having accumulated 438000 signatures, LMS fans are still enthusiastic about the return of the show, especially after rosani's return... "
"This became a rallying slogan of conservatives. They launched a petition calling on ABC to launch a new program to attract the majority of Americans. They found that few programs can praise the virtue they can identify with, that is, conservative values. A year later, the petition..."
"It's the fans!"
"When I heard that someone suggested making a few more episodes of the last man standing, I gave a hard punch and threw it all out on the back."
"Now that we've got news from fox, it's time to get back to diamonds - hell, yes, I'm excited!"
"It makes you sit in the lounge, clubbing, at a loss."
"The LMS team led by four points in the sixth inning, the stands were packed and the game was cancelled for no reason."
"Excited? "He said today."
"Allen has been expressing his disappointment at ABC's cancellation of the last substitute and he wants to see it come back."
"The last man" is written by Jack Birditt. Allen plays Mike Baxter, the father of three married girls. In a world increasingly dominated by women, he tries to maintain his masculinity



Number  693
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Which of today’s TVLine Items piques your interest?”
“* MTV’s Fear Factor returns with 10 new episodes on Sunday, Feb. 25 ay 7 pm.”
“* Ernie Hudson (Ghostbusters) is set to play dad to Gabrielle Union in NBC’s unnamed Bad Boys spinoff pilot, Deadline reports.”
“Paris Berelc (Mighty Med) and newcomer Isabel May play best friends looking forward to starting high school together, even as one of them undergoes cancer treatment.”
“* The Netflix comedy series Alexa & Katie will premiere Friday, March 23, per Deadline.”
“...in their natural elements, spending time with family and making music in recording studios.”
“* Rapture, an eight-episode hip-hop series, will premiere on Netflix on Friday, March 30, showing artists such as Nas, Dave East and T.I.”
“The Chemist tells the story of a former U.S. government agent who made enemies with her coworkers and is offered a way to clear her name, though to do so lands her a very dangerous situation.”
“Well…* Twilight author Stephanie Meyer’s thriller novel The Chemist is being made into a television series, according to our sister site Deadline.”
“Ready for more of today’s newsy nuggets?”


"Which of today's tvline projects interests you?"
"* MTV's fear factor is back, with 10 new episodes on Sunday, February 25, at 7pm."
"Enie Hudson will play father in NBC's unnamed bad boy split pilot Gabriel's League, deadline."
"Maybe Paris Med and the new Isabel are good friends looking forward to going to high school together, even if one of them is undergoing cancer treatment."
*The Netflix comedy series Alexa & Katie will premiere on March 23 (Friday) before the deadline
“… In their natural element, spend time with family and music studio. "
"* rapture is an eight episode hip-hop series that will premiere on Netflix on March 30 (Friday), showcasing artists like NAS, Dave East and T.I."
"The chemist tells the story of a former U.S. government agent who had feud with her colleagues and was offered a way to clear her name, even though it would put her in a very dangerous situation."
"Well "Twilight author Stephanie Meyer's thriller the chemist is being adapted into a TV series, according to our sister website, deadline
"Are you ready for today's new nuggets?"



Number  694
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I had my fling, and I was very fortunate,” he remarked.”
“He didn’t dwell on his Hollywood career or regret losing it.”
“He made the Westerns “The Burning Hills” (Natalie Wood) and “They Came to Cordura” (Gary Cooper, Rita Hayworth).”
“The films included such war dramas as “Battle Cry” (with Van Heflin) and “Lafayette Escadrille” (Clint Eastwood in a small role).”
“Hunter made a flurry of movies in the latter half of the 1950s, aimed at capitalizing on his popularity with young girls.”
“Warner Bros., alert to the increasingly important youth market, signed him to a contract.”
“...handsome face and muscular build appeared on magazine covers...”
“We ll call you Tab Hunter With no dramatic training Hunter was cast in a minor role in the 1950 drama The Lawless The fuss over the young actor began two years later when he appeared bare chested opposite Linda Darnell in the British made Island of Desire Soon his...”
“Hunters.” Agent: “That’s it!”
“Do you have any hobbies?” His client answered, “I ride horses.”


"I have my fun and I'm lucky," he said
"He didn't indulge in his Hollywood career, and he didn't regret losing it."
He produced Westerns "burning mountain" (Natalie Wood) and "they come to Cordura" (Gary Cooper, Rita Hayworth)
The films include war dramas such as "battle cry" (with van hevlin) and "Lafayette escadelle" (Clint Eastwood as a minor character)
Hunt made a series of films in the latter half of the 1950s to take advantage of his popularity among young girls
Warner Bros. is wary of the increasingly important youth market and has signed a contract with him
“… Handsome face and muscular physique appear on the cover of the magazine... "
"We call you tab hunter. There is no drama training. Hunter played a minor role in the 1950 drama lawlessness. Two years later, when he appeared naked on the island of desire made in England to fight Linda Darnell, people began to make a fuss about this young actor..."
"Hunter." Agent: that's it
"Do you have any hobbies? His client replied, "I ride a horse."



Number  695
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and prove that you can be a phenomenal mother but at the same time you can find time for yourself and it s okay...”
“I feel like there s a huge stigma the moment you have kids you re not allowed to drink you re not allowed to put makeup on how dare you take time to work out Added Farley There s just this stereotype that Nicole and I love to shut down...”
“...long way since her hard partying days on the original Jersey Shore...”
“Over the weekend, the MTV star celebrated Mother’s Day with her husband Roger Mathews and their two children: son Greyson Valor, 2, and daughter Meilani Alexandra, 3½.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After enjoying brunch, the couple spent the day at home with their little ones.”
“In a photo shared with PEOPLE, the adorable family of four is all smiles in the park.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoom Credit: MTVJenni “JWoww” Farley and Roger Mathews with daughter Meilani and son GreysonFarley, 32, also dedicated an adoring post to her children on Instagram.”


“… Prove that you can be an extraordinary mother, but at the same time you can find time for yourself, it doesn't matter... "
"I think the moment you have a baby, you have a huge shame. You are not allowed to drink, you are not allowed to make up, how dare you take the time to exercise," Farley added. "Nicole and I like to get rid of this stereotype..."
“… It's been a long time since her hard party life on the Jersey coast
"Last weekend, the MTV star celebrated Mother's day with her husband, Roger Mathews, and their two children: two-year-old son, Greyson valor, and three-and-a-half-year-old daughter, meilani Alexandra."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After brunch, the couple spent the day at home with their children."
"In the photos shared with people, a lovely family of four is smiling in the park."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
Photo scaling credit: MTV Jenni "jwoww" Farley and Roger Mathews, along with daughter meilani and son Greyson Farley, 32, also contributed an adoring post for her children on instagram



Number  696
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The One Love Manchester concert reportedly raised more than £2 million in three hours, which will go towards the We Love Manchester Emergency Fund.”
“One Love Manchester The crowd at the 'One Love Manchester' benefit concert.”
“The former Oasis frontman performed following rumours that an Oasis reunion could be on the cards, however Noel Gallagher was not seen at the event.”
“After the show Liam wrote on Twitter: "What an amazing night last night pure love vibrations nobody comes close to Manchester love forever..."Oh and if anybody's seen rkid tell him he can come out now as you were LG."”
“Posting another tweet, he then said that he would like to apologise for his brother's absence on the night and that he was "very disappointed".”
“One Love Manchester Show all 12 1 /12 One Love Manchester One Love Manchester Concert goers queue outside Old Trafford Cricket Ground ahead of the One Love Manchester tribute concert in Manchester.”
“AFP/Getty Images One Love Manchester Music fans embrace outside the Old Trafford Cricket Ground ahead of the One Love Manchester tribute concert in Manchester.”
“AFP/Getty Images One Love Manchester A woman sunbathes as police officers patrol around Old Trafford Cricket Ground ahead of the One Love Manchester tribute concert in Manchester.”
“AFP/Getty Images One Love Manchester Manchester residents cheer as survivors walk to Old Trafford cricket grounds for the concert @AlexScapensMEN/Twitter One Love Manchester Women wearing I Love MCR T-shirts arrive at the Old Trafford Cricket Ground ahead of the One Love Manchester tribute concert in Manchester.”
“AFP/Getty Images One Love Manchester Armed police look-on as fans begin to arrive at the Old Trafford Cricket Ground ahead of the One Love Manchester tribute concert.”


"It is reported that the one love Manchester concert raised more than 2 million pounds in three hours, which will be used for the we love Manchester emergency fund."
"One love Manchester attracted audiences at the 'one love Manchester' charity concert."
"The former oasis manager's performance was due to rumors that oasis might reunite, but Noel Gallagher didn't show up at the event."
After the performance, Liam tweeted: "it was a wonderful night last night, pure love, no one can get close to Manchester, forever love..." Oh, if anyone sees rkid, tell him he can come out like you now. "
"He posted another microblog and said he wanted to apologize for his brother's absence that night. He was" very disappointed. "
"One Love Manchester Show all 12 1/12 One Love Manchester One Love Manchester concert audiences line up outside Old Trafford cricket field before the Manchester One Love Manchester tribute concert."
"Before the One Love Manchester tribute concert in Manchester, fans of One Love Manchester hugged outside the Old Trafford cricket field."
"Agence France-Presse / Getty pictures a love Manchester a woman sunbathing as police patrol in front of the Old Trafford cricket field at a love Manchester tribute concert in Manchester."
"Agence France-Presse /Getty Images One Love Manchester Manchester residents cheered as survivors walked to the Old Trafford cricket field for a concert @AlexScapensMEN/Twitter One Love Manchester, Ms. I Love MCR T-shirt, arrived at the Old Trafford cricket field before the Manchester One Love Manchester memorial concert."
"AFP / Getty pictures" one love Manchester armed police are watching fans arrive at the Old Trafford cricket stadium before the one love Manchester salute concert



Number  697
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She said "yes," and Ohanian replied to the post to say, "And you made me the happiest man on the planet."”
“In December, she and Reddit co-founder Ohanian took to his site to announce their engagement with a cartoon of the moment he (or rather his avatar) got down on one knee.”
“This isn't be the first time Williams has surprised fans by sharing big personal news in the form of a picture.”
“And for those doing the math in their heads, yes, 20 weeks along means that Williams was already 9 weeks pregnant when she won the Australian Open women's singles championship in January!”
“RELATED: Serena Williams names her top tennis player of all time, and the move she'd stealBuzzfeed's Jarett Wieselman captured the shot before it vanished and shared it on Twitter — along with several exclamation points and a couple of heart emoji.”
“"20 weeks," she wrote in the caption.”
“RELATED: After Australian Open win, Serena Williams posts loving tribute to sister VenusOn Wednesday, Williams posted a brief blink-and-you'd-miss-it Snapchat story showing off a sporty yellow swimsuit and what seemed to be a baby bump.”
“Her publicist, Kelly Bush Novak, confirmed to TODAY that Williams is "expecting a baby this fall."”
“️️ pic.twitter.com/u2RfhSzlcB — Jarett Wieselman (@JarettSays) April 19, 2017Congratulations are in order for both Williams and fiance Alexis Ohanian, as the woman behind the Serena Slam sensation has revealed that she's pregnant with their first child.”
“Serena Williams is pregnant!!”


"She said 'yes,' and Ohanian replied, 'you made me the happiest person on the planet.'"
Last December, she and reddit co-founder o'hanian announced on his website that they were engaged to a cartoon about the moment he (or rather his avatar) fell on one knee
"It's not the first time Williams has shared personal news in the form of pictures, which has surprised fans."
"For those of you who think about it in your head, yes, 20 weeks means Williams was nine weeks pregnant when he won the Australian Open women's singles in January!"
"Related story: Serena Williams named her the best tennis player of all time. Her steal was captured before the ball disappeared, and shared this photo on twitter - as well as a few exclamation marks and a few heart charts."
"20 weeks," she wrote in the title
"Related reports: after winning the Australian Open, Serena Williams sent a post to sister Venus on Wednesday, and Williams published a short blink and snapchat story you'll miss, showing a sports yellow swimsuit and something that looks like a baby lump."
Her publicist Kelly Bush Novak confirmed today that Williams "will have a baby this fall."
“️️  pic.twitter.com/u2RfhSzlcB -Jarett wieselman (@ Jarett says) on April 19, 2017, Williams and her fiance Alexis Ohanian are going to congratulate each other, because the behind the scenes agent of Serena Grand Slam revealed that she is pregnant with their first child. "
"Serena Williams is pregnant!"



Number  698
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“So grateful!”
“Sarah Michelle Gellar celebrated the series' anniversary on Saturday by sharing a handful of never-before-seen pics from the show, as well as some selfies with her former cast mates.”
“"I don’t think it’s a coincidence that the anniversary of #btvs is the same week as #internationalwomensday," Gellar wrote on Instagram.”
“"I have always believed that the world is changed by your example, not by your opinion.”
“We have all learned a lot from Buffy, and the best part is, that never ends."”
“She then shared a quote that her character, Buffy Summers, said in season seven's episode "Bring on the Night": "From now on, we won’t just face our fears, we will seek them out.”
“We will find them, and cut their hearts out one by one.”
“There is only one thing on earth more powerful than evil, and that’s us."”
“"Scroll through for some behind the scenes pictures, then and now (hopefully there will even be some you have never seen) #buffyslayday," she added.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Thank you so much!"
On Saturday, Sarah Michelle Gellar celebrated the anniversary of the show by sharing with former crew members some photos she had never seen before, as well as some self portraits
"I don't think it's a coincidence that BTV's anniversary is the same week as international women's day," Gellar wrote on instagram
"I always think that the world is changed by your example, not by your opinion."
"We've all learned a lot from buffy, and best of all, it never ends."
Later, she shared a passage from her character, Buffy summers, in the seventh season of nightfall: "from now on, we should not only face our own fears, but also look for them."
"We need to find them and cut their hearts off one by one."
"There is only one thing on earth more powerful than evil, and that is us."
"Scroll through some of the behind the scenes photos and now (hopefully there will be some you've never seen) # buffyslayday," she added



Number  699
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the meantime, you can listen to the first two singles from the album, "Crying in the Club" and "I Have Questions."”
“Cabello's first solo album, The Hurting The Healing The Loving, will be released later this year.”
“It was a dramatic split, involving contradictory statements and angry social media posts, and no one really knew what to think.”
“Tasos Katopodis/Getty Images for iHeartCould there even be a Fifth Harmony with only four members?”
“Apparently, yes.”
“The remaining members -- Lauren Jauregui, Normani Kordei, Ally Brooke, and Dinah Jane -- are proving Fifth Harmony will go on without Cabello.”
“Jason Koerner/Getty Images for iHeartMediaIn fact, they just released their first Cabello-free song, titled "Down," at the beginning of this month.”
“Cabello is also making new music and even collaborated with Ed Sheeran on an upcoming single.”
“So now that the dust has settled a bit on her breakup with the band, fans are all wondering if Cabello has any regrets.”
“In a recent interview with AMP Radio, the 20-year-old said,Obviously I wish it wouldn't have been like that because I just, you know, peace... but like I said, I wish them the best.”


"In the meantime, you can listen to the first two singles of the album," crying in the club "and" I have a problem. "
Cabello's first solo album, hurt and heal of love, will be released later this year
"It's a dramatic split involving contradictory statements and angry social media posts, and no one really knows what to think."
"Tasos Katopodis / Getty Images for iheartc can have a fifth harmony even if there are only four members?"
"Obviously, yes."
"The rest of the group - Lauren guerregee, normany Cordy, Ellie Brooke and Dinah Jane - are proving that without Cabello," fifth harmony "will continue."
"Jason Koerner / Getty Images for iheartmediain in fact, they just released their first free Cabello song called" down "earlier this month."
"Cabello is also working on new music and even working with ED Sheeran on an upcoming single."
"So now that her breakup with the band is over, fans are wondering if Cabello has any regrets."
"In a recent interview with amp radio, the 20-year-old said: 'obviously I hope that's not the case, because I just, you know, peace... But as I said, I wish them all the best. "



Number  700
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN’s Carma Hassan contributed to this report.”
“An investigation supported by video surveillance showed Williams did not violate the other driver’s right of way, the Palm Beach Gardens Police said in an investigative report obtained by CNN affiliate WPBF.”
“NEW YORK, NEW YORK - JANUARY 27: A patient is brought into a Brooklyn hospital that has seen a high number of Covid-19 patients on January 27, 2021 in New York City.”
“With the overall infection rate across the state on the decline and 72% of healthcare workers now having received the COVID-19 vaccine, Governor Andrew Cuomo has announced that some restrictions in New York may be lifted in the near future.”
“According to the Governor this will not include indoor dining.”
“(Photo by Spencer Platt/Getty Images)US President Joe Biden speaks to staff of the US State Department during his first visit in Washington, DC, February 4, 2021.”
“US Representative Marjorie Taylor Greene, Republican of Georgia, leaves her office on Capitol Hill on February 4, 2021 in Washington, DC.”
“INDIAN WELLS CA MARCH 13 Venus Williams of the United States shows her emotion after her straight set victory against Lucie Safarova of the Czech Republic in their third round match during day eight of the BNP Paribas Open at Indian Wells Tennis Garden on March 13 2017 in Indian...”
“Wells California...”
“(Photo by Clive Brunskill/Getty Images)(CNN) —Tennis star Venus Williams has reached a settlement in the wrongful death suit centered around a fatal car accident, according to court documents.”


"CNN's Kama Hassan contributed to this report."
"An investigation supported by video surveillance showed that Williams did not violate another driver's right of way," Palm Beach Garden police said in an investigation report obtained by CNN's wpbf
New York, January 27, 2021: on January 27, 2021, a patient was taken to a hospital in Brooklyn, which treated a large number of covid-19 patients in New York City
"With the overall infection rate in the state declining, 72% of health care workers have been vaccinated with the covid-19 vaccine. Governor Andrew Cuomo announced that some restrictions in New York may be lifted in the near future."
"According to the governor, that doesn't include eating indoors."
(Photo by Spencer Platte / Getty) on February 4, 2021, US President Biden addressed US State Department staff during his first visit to Washington, D.C. "
On February 4, 2021, Republican representative Marjorie Taylor green of Georgia left her office on Capitol Hill in Washington
"Indiana wells, California, March 13, Venus Williams USA showed her emotions after her straight set victory over Czech Republic's lucisa farova on the eighth day of BNP Paribas open in Indiana Wells Tennis garden March 13, 2017 in India..."
"Wells, California..."
According to court documents, Tennis Star Venus Williams has reached a settlement over a wrongful death lawsuit centered on a fatal car accident



Number  701
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ozark is produced by Bateman’s Aggregate Films in association with Media Rights Capital.”
“Bateman directed multiple episodes from the first and second season and serves as an executive producer along with Mundy, Dubuque and Williams.”
“The stakes are even higher than before and the Byrdes soon realize they have to go all in before they can get out.”
“Marty and Wendy (Linney) struggle to balance their family interests amid the escalating dangers presented by their partnerships with the power-hungry Snells, the cartel and their new deputy, Ruth Langmore (Julia Garner), whose father Cade has been released from prison.”
“With Del out, the crime syndicate sends their ruthless attorney Helen Pierce to town to shake things up just as the Byrdes are finally settling in.”
“In the current second season, Ozark, headlined by Bateman and Laura Linney, continues to follow Marty Byrde (Bateman) and his family as they navigate the murky waters of life within a dangerous drug cartel.”
“While the second season did not seem to match the buzz and outsized popularity of the first, Ozark remains a hit Netflix series that also gets steady awards recognition, making the Season 3 renewal a no-brainer.”
“Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See AllOzark, created by Bill Dubuque and Mark Williams, was one of the big breakouts of 2017, with its freshman season believed to be one of the most streamed shows of that summer.”
“Chris Mundy is set to return as executive producer and showrunner.”
“A little more than a month after the second season of Netflix’s Ozark was released, the drama series starring, directed and executive produced by Jason Bateman has been renewed for a 10-episode third season.”


"Ozak is co produced by Bateman's converged film company and media rights capital."
Bateman has directed series one and two and worked as executive producer with mondy, dubke and Williams
"The stakes were higher than before, and the byds soon realized that they had to go all out to get out."
"Marty and Wendy (lini) are trying to balance their family interests, because the danger brought by their cooperation with power hungry Snell, cartel and their new deputy Ruth ramore (Julia Garner) is escalating, and her father Cade has been released from prison."
"After Dale was out, the gang sent their ruthless lawyer, Helen Pierce, to town and messed up when the byds finally settled down."
In the current second season, led by Bateman and Laura Linney, ozak continues to follow Marty bird (Bateman) and his family, sailing in the dark waters of life in a dangerous drug trafficking group
"Although the popularity and popularity of the second season seems to be lower than that of the first season, Ozark is still a popular series of Netflix and has won stable awards, which makes it easy to renew the contract in the third season."
"The prime time panic - pilot guide and direct series orders - see allozark, created by bill Dubuque and Mark Williams, was one of the big breakthroughs of 2017, and the freshman season was considered one of the hottest shows of that summer."
"Chris mondy will return as executive producer and entertainer."
"More than a month after Netflix's second season of Ozarks, the third season of the 10 episode TV series starring, directing and directing Jason Bateman."



Number  702
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Continue on for the rest of this Beetlejuice Cast Update!”
“Geena Davis as Barbara MaitlandFun fact: Over a decade after Beetlejuice, Davis and Jeffrey Jones both starred in 1999’s Stuart Little.”
“Alec Baldwin as Adam MaitlandFun fact: Beetlejuice was only Baldwin’s third feature film after starting off as a TV actor.”
“Winona Ryder as Lydia DeetzFun fact: Ryder beat out Juliette Lewis for the part of Lydia, thanks to her role as Rina in the 1986 teen flick Lucas.”
“Michael Keaton as BetelgeuseFun fact: Despite being the namesake of the film, Betelgeuse is on-screen for only about 17 minutes.”
“Considering this and in celebration of this Burton classic’s 30th anniversary, The Hollywood Reporter takes a look at what the Beetlejuice cast has been up to in the years since, to see how they’ve “jump(ed) in the line” in other projects.”
“For example, the movie was the 10th highest-grossing film that year and was met with both box office and critical success, bringing in $164.6 million at the domestic box office (adjusted for inflation) and winning an Academy Award for makeup design.”
“The song by Harry Belafonte was released in 1956 but found a new audience after being featured in a memorable scene in Beetlejuice, which was released on March 30, 1988.”
“For instance, it’s only natural since the “Banana Boat Song (Day-O)” really has been stuck in our heads for 30 years.”
“Let’s re-visit with the Beetlejuice Cast!”


"Continue with the rest of this update!"
"Gina Davis as Barbara Maitland interesting fact: in the decade after Beatles juice, Davis and Jeffrey Jones starred in Stuart Little in 1999
"Alec Baldwin as Adam maitranfen fact: Beatles juice is Baldwin's third feature film after a TV actor."
"The funny fact that Winona Ryder plays Lydia Dietz: Ryder beat Juliet Lewis to play Lydia, thanks to her role in the 1986 teen film Lucas."
"Fun story of Michael Keaton as Betelgeuse: although it has the same name as the film, Betelgeuse's release time is only 17 minutes."
"With that in mind, to celebrate the 30th anniversary of Burton classic, Hollywood reporters came to see what the Beatles juice actors did in the years that followed and how they were" eager "to try other projects."
"For example, the film was the tenth highest box office film of that year, and the box office and reviews were successful. It brought us $164.6 million (excluding inflation) to the domestic box office and won the Oscar for makeup design."
Harry Belafonte's song was released in 1956, but in the Beatles juice, which was released on March 30, 1988, the song appeared in an unforgettable scene and attracted new audiences
"It's natural, for example, because 'day-o' has been in our minds for 30 years."
"Let's take the actors and have a look again."



**Something goes wrong**
“Time to upgrade Michael Scott's "World's Best Boss" mug to "World's Hottest Boss."”
“"I'm very excited."”
“But as Jimmy Fallon found out on The Tonight Show Tuesday, the commotion over Steve Carell's salt-and-pepper hair has not gone to his head.”
“"You're a stud muffin, and I told you I liked your look," Fallon told his guest.”
“"I go, 'Dude, I like your look' backstage and you were very humble.”
“You go, 'Thank you very much.”
“It's just, what?”
“It's gray hair — big deal.'"”
“But Fallon isn't the only one feeling this way.”
“Photos of the actor's gray mane went viral last week, causing people to stop and pay attention.”


It's time to upgrade Michael Scott's "world's best boss" mug to "the world's hottest boss."
"I'm excited."
"But, as Jimmy Fallon discovered on Tuesday's tonight show, the fury caused by Steve Carrell's salt and pepper hair didn't reach him."
"You're a muffin with a stallion," Fallon said to the guest. "I told you I like the way you look."
"I said backstage, 'man, I like the way you look,' you're modest."
"You go, thank you very much."
"Just, what?"
"The hair is gray - it's no big deal."
"But Fallon is not the only one who feels that way."
"Last week, the actor's gray mane became popular and attracted people's attention."



Number  704
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check the original Instagram post below.”
“Ansel Elgort is nominated for a Golden Globe for "Best Performance by an Actor in a Motion Picture - Music or Comedy."”
“"Nyc snowstorm no worries baby will give u a ride," Ansel tweeted with his repost.”
“Drifting and doing stunts during the snowstorm, better known as the "bomb cyclone," with a busted headlight, Elgort doesn't hold back taking the Baby Driver car out for a spin.”
“Ansel Elgort showed off his skills in the snow in an Instagram post yesterday (January 3) and shared it once again with a playful PSA-esque tweet today (January 4).”
“He may not be "Baby" but he'll be your driver.”


"See the original instagram post below."
Ansel elgott was nominated for the Golden Globe for "best film actor performance - music or comedy."
"Don't worry about the New York blizzard, baby will give you a ride," Ansel tweeted
"Drifting and doing stunts during the blizzard, commonly known as" Bomb whirlwind ", the headlights are broken, and elgert can't bear to drive the baby driver's car for a ride."
"Ansel elgott showed his skills in the snow in instagram's post yesterday (January 3), and today (January 4) he shared it on a playful PSA style microblog."
"He may not be 'baby', but he will be your driver."



Number  705
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Bad Times at the El Royale” opens Oct. 12.”
“Hemsworth in 2012 s The Cabin in the Woods from a script he co wrote with Joss Whedon...”
“Over the course of one fateful night everyone will have a last shot at redemption before everything goes to hell Bridges received his seventh Oscar nomination last year for Hell or High Water Goddard received an Academy Award nom in 2016 for best adapted screenplay for The Martian and directed...”
“...run down hotel with a dark past...”
“I m not really a priest It s not quite clear from the trailer why the characters have come to the El Royale and the studio s description of the plot is somewhat obscure Seven strangers each with a secret to bury meet at Lake Tahoe s El Royale a...”
“Goddard also produced “Bad Times.”Bridges is warned by the clerk, “This is not a place for a priest, father,” and admits later in the trailer, “Can I confess something to you?”
“Cailee Spaeny, Lewis Pullman, and Nick Offerman also star, with Drew Goddard directing from his own script.”
“Bridges plays one of seven strangers who meet at the El Royale over the course of a single night, including a shirtless Chris Hemsworth, a gun-toting gangster played by Dakota Johnson, Cynthia Erivo’s singer, and a vacuum cleaner salesman portrayed by Jon Hamm.”
“A disheveled Jeff Bridges highlights the latest trailer for Fox’s noir thriller “Bad Times at the El Royale,” portraying a decidedly unreligious priest at a run-down Lake Tahoe hotel on the California-Nevada border.”


"Bad times at the Royal Gallery" will open on October 12
"In 2012, hamsworth and Jos Wheaton co authored a play, one of which is the cabin in the woods..."
"On a fateful night, everyone will have a last chance of redemption. Before everything goes to hell, bridges won the seventh Oscar nomination for" hell or high water "last year, and Goddard won the best adapted screenplay" Martian "and director award in 2016..."
“… Dilapidated Hotel, dark past... "
"I'm not a real priest. It's not clear from the trailer why these characters come to the Royal Gallery. The studio's description of the plot is a little obscure. Each of the seven strangers has a secret to be buried in the Royal Gallery in Lake Tahoe..."
Godard also made bad times. Bridges was warned by the clerk, "this is not the priest's place, father," he admitted at the back of the trailer. "Can I confess something to you?"
Kelly sperney, Lewis Pullman and Nick Overman are also stars, and drew Goddard directs according to his own script
One of bridges's seven strangers meets the royal family one night, including a shirtless Chris Hemsworth, a gunslinger by Dakota Johnson, a singer by Cynthia erevor, and a vacuum cleaner salesman by Jon ham
"A ragged Jeff Bridges highlights the latest trailer for Fox's black thriller" bad times for the El Nino royal family, "depicting an absolutely unbelievable clergyman in a dilapidated Lake Tahoe Hotel on the California Nevada border



**Something goes wrong**
“Luddington: That played out amazing.”
“Meredith Grey has an opportunity to teach and heal by just being who she is in this show and in the hearts and minds of the people who watch it.”
“I don't know if I believe in coincidences but it's a fascinating moment of alchemy that these episodes are airing now.”
“Vernoff: This story was broken before #MeToo and before the Harvey Weinstein story came out.”
“Did the sexual harassment "reckoning" that's happening across the country and in Hollywood play a role in this story at all?”
“How much of the domestic abuse storyline was plotted out before the season started?”
“(Click here to read our exclusive interview with Vernoff and co-star Alex Blue Davis.)”
“Thursday's Grey's also featured an important transgender story in which new intern Casey disclosed some deeply personal information to Bailey.”
“Also worth noting: The phone number used for the title of Thursday's episode is for the National Domestic Violence Hotline (an idea that co-star Giacomo Gianniotti came up with), as Luddington filmed a PSA for the organization that aired at the end of the episode.”
“Below, showrunner Krista Vernoff — who has been outspoken about what Hollywood can do to change its culture of sexual harassment — and star Camilla Luddington talk with THR about the timely storyline, Grey's star Ellen Pompeo's candid interview and what's next for Jo.”


"Luddington: it turned out great."
"Meredith gray has the opportunity to teach and heal others by playing her part in the show and in the hearts of the audience."
"I don't know if I believe in coincidence, but it's a fascinating alchemy moment and these episodes are now on air."
"Vernoff: this story was broken before the story of maito and Harvey Weinstein."
What's the role of sexual harassment "reckoning" in the story that happened all over the country and Hollywood? "
"How many stories of domestic abuse were planned before the season began?"
"(click here to read our exclusive interview with vernov and co star Alex bloom Davis.)
"Thursday's gray magazine also featured an important transgender story, in which new intern Kathy revealed some profound personal information to Bailey."
"It's also worth noting that the phone number used in the title of Thursday's episode is the National Domestic Violence Hotline (an idea put forward by CO star Giacomo gianniotti), because rudington shot a PSA for the group, which is broadcast at the end of the episode."
"Next, Krista vernoff, the host of the show, is outspoken about what Hollywood can do to change its sexual harassment culture - talking with Camilla Luddington and thr about timely storylines, the candid interview with Gray's star Ellen Pompeo, and Joe's next move."



Number  707
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When asked when the big day will be,...Read full article...”
“"Because I feel like...I don't know, I feel like it's good to both do things."”
“"It's an engagement ring," Sheeran said.”
“Responding to the marriage speculation, Sheeran told Sky News at the award show that it's an engagement ring that he's wearing.”
“Sheeran recently was photographed wearing the ring during a performance in London and continued to fuel marriage speculation by wearing the same ring to the 2018 Brit Awards on Wednesday.”
“The "Perfect" singer has been sparking marriage rumors in the last week after being spotted wearing what looks like a wedding ring.”
“Did Ed Sheeran and Cherry Seaborn secretly tie the knot?”


"When asked when the big day will be Read the full text... "
"Because I think I don't know. I think it's good to do both. "
"It's an engagement ring," Sheeran said
"For marriage speculation, Sheeran told Sky News at the awards ceremony that it was his engagement ring."
"Sheeran was recently photographed wearing the ring at a performance in London and wearing the same ring at the 2018 British awards on Wednesday, continuing to spark marital speculation."
The "perfect" singer was found wearing a ring that looked like a wedding ring last week, sparking rumors of a coup
"Is ed Sheeran and Cherie schoburn secretly married?"



**Something goes wrong**
“He moved to Moscow to train at a higher level at age 10, then to Southern California to work with the top American coach Frank Carroll.”
“An investigation has been initiated; measures are being taken to identify and detain suspects.”Born in Almaty, Ten was part of Kazakhstan’s Korean minority.”
““As a result of a brawl, citizen Denis Ten was stabbed.”
““Denis Ten caught two unidentified persons trying to steal mirrors from his car,” the Almaty Department of Internal Affairs said.”
“Ten lost a significant amount of blood, and doctors said CPR was administered for two hours, but in vain.”
“Russian and Kazakh news media reported that two men had been trying to steal mirrors from Ten’s car.”
“Ten was taken to the hospital after the attack and died a few hours later.”
“Denis Ten, an Olympic bronze medalist in men’s figure skating in 2014, died on Thursday at age 25 after being stabbed in Almaty, Kazakhstan.”


"When he was 10 years old, he moved to Moscow for higher level training and then went to Southern California to work with top coach Frank Carroll in the United States."
"An investigation has been initiated; measures are being taken to identify and detain suspects." Ten men born in Almaty are members of the Korean minority in Kazakhstan
"Denise was stabbed because of the fight."
"Dennis Teng caught two unidentified people trying to steal mirrors from his car," the Almaty interior ministry said
"Ten people lost too much blood, and doctors said CPR took two hours, but it didn't work."
"The Russian and Kazakh news media reported that two men tried to steal mirrors from ten cars."
"Ten people were taken to hospital after the attack and died a few hours later."
"Denis ten, the 2014 Olympic bronze medalist in figure skating, was assassinated in Almaty, Kazakhstan, on Thursday at the age of 25."



Number  709
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mike Fleiss, Elan Gale, Bennett Graebner and Nicole Woods are the executive producers.”
“Hosted by Chris Harrison, "The Bachelorette" is a production of Next Entertainment in association with Warner Horizon Unscripted & Alternative Television.”
“...it's Becca Kufrin!”
“The most dramatic conclusion ever to "The Bachelor" abruptly ended Becca Kufrin's happily ever after with Arie Luyendyk Jr., but that's just the start for America's sweetheart as she is named the next Bachelorette for season 14 - premiering on MONDAY, MAY 28 on ABC!”
“The highly anticipated announcement was made on the live "The Bachelor: After the Final Rose" Special.”
“RELATED: Watch The Bachelor Finale now on ABC.com>>The gut-wrenching finish to Becca Kufrin's romance with Arie Luyendyk Jr. left Bachelor Nation speechless.”
“In a change of heart, Arie broke up with America's sweetheart just weeks after proposing to her – stealing her fairytale ending and her future.”
“Now, the humble fan favorite and girl next door from Minnesota returns for a second shot at love, starring on "The Bachelorette," when it premieres for its 14th season on MONDAY, MAY 28 (8:00-10:01 p.m. EDT), on The ABC Television Network, streaming and on demand.”
“The announcement was made on the live "The Bachelor: After the Final Rose" special.”
“SEE BECCA IN A DELETED SCENE FROM THE BACHELORWith the help of her family and friends, Becca was able to pick up the pieces and put the focus back on herself, moving forward with her life.”


"Mike fries, Elan Gail, Bennett grabner and Nicole woods are executive producers."
"Bachelor" by Chris Harrison is the next entertainment to work with Warner horizon screenless
“… I'm Becca Coughlin
The most dramatic ending in the history of bachelor abruptly ends the happy lives of Becca kufrin and Arie luyendyk Jr., but this is only the beginning of American sweetheart, because she is nominated as the next Bachelor in Season 14, which will premiere on ABC on Monday, May 28
The much anticipated news was announced in the live broadcast of the "Bachelor: after the last rose" special
Related report: let's see the ending of bachelor now ABC website > > the heartbreaking ending of the romantic story between Becca kuflynn and Ariel luyandik Jr. silences the bachelor country. "
"In order to change her mind, Ellie broke up with her a few weeks after proposing to American sweetheart - stealing her fairy tale ending and future."
"Now, the favorite girl next door from Minnesota is back, starring in bachelor, and will premiere Season 14 on ABC's streaming and on-demand programs on Monday, May 28 (8:00-10:01 p.m. EST)
"The news was announced in the live special" Bachelor: after the last rose. "
"In a deleted bachelor scene, with the help of family and friends, Becca picks up the pieces again, focuses on herself and continues her life."



Number  710
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article contains material from the Associated Press...”
“We don't even, we have separate rooms and stuff'" Daniels said.”
“And he brushed it aside, said, 'Oh yeah, yeah, you know, don't worry about that.”
“"I asked.”
“Cooper said.”
“"Did he mention his wife or child at all in this?"”
“Inside Melania Trump's Mysterious First Year at the White HouseCooper noted during the interview with Daniels that Melania Trump had given birth just a few months before Daniels' encounter with Donald Trump.”
“The first lady is scheduled to stay in Florida with her son for at least a week.”
“Asked Monday whether Melania Trump had seen the interview, her spokeswoman, Stephanie Grisham, told NBC News, "She's focused on being a mom and is quite enjoying spring break at Mar-a-Lago while working on future projects."”
“Adult film star Stormy Daniels sat down with Anderson Cooper on CBS' "60 Minutes" Sunday to clarify reports about her alleged affair with President Donald Trump.”


"This article contains materials from the Associated Press..."
"We don't even have it, we have separate rooms and things," Daniels said
"He threw it aside and said," Oh, yes, you know, don't worry about that. "
"I asked
"Cooper said
"Did he mention his wife or children in this matter?"
"In the first year of Melania Trump's mysterious entry into the White House, Cooper pointed out in an interview with Daniels that Melania trump had just given birth a few months before Daniels met Donald Trump."
"According to the plan, the first lady and her son will be in Florida for at least a week."
Asked on Monday if Melania trump had seen the interview, Stephanie Grisham, her spokesman, told NBC: "she's focused on being a mother and enjoys spring break in malago while working on future projects."
Adult star Stormy Daniels sat down with Anderson Cooper on CBS's 60 minutes on Sunday to clarify reports that she was involved with President Donald Trump



Number  711
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It seems like everybody knows that that is the first stop on the awards train.””
““I have never worked with a television network or client that wasn’t concerned about getting in front of the Hollywood Foreign Press Assn.,” adds Licata.”
“But this year, wedged between the saccharine Hallmark films and tree-lighting specials, is a slew of prestige programs that are bowing just in time to make a mark with Golden Globes voters.”
“Given the Hollywood Foreign Press Assn.’s history of celebrating new, underdog and sometimes populist programming, it’s no wonder.”
“The body has a proven track record of putting emerging series and actors on the map for awards consideration.”
“Look no further than the 2018 Globes darling, “The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel,” which secured a comedy series win for Amazon and comedy actress victory for its leading lady Rachel Brosnahan.”
“Although the pilot dropped in spring 2017, the rest of its first season came at the end of last November.”
“And after the HFPA recognized the show in January, the Television Academy followed suit with the Emmys in September, awarding Amy Sherman-Palladino’s series eight trophies.”
““I have always seen a correlation between new shows that were honored at the Golden Globes and shows that went on to secure Emmy nominations — not always wins, but certainly acknowledgement,” says Richard Licata of Licata & Co., whose company worked with Amazon on awards strategies.”
““The HFPA is inadvertently almost offering a service to Academy members who are overwhelmed by the voluminous programming out there by saying, ‘You can watch a lot of other shows, but these are five shows that you probably should not miss.”


"It seems that everyone knows it's the first station of the train."
"I've never worked with a television network or a client who doesn't care to appear in front of the Hollywood Foreign Media Association," Ricardo added
"But this year, sandwiched between the saccharin logo movie and the Christmas tree lights feature is a series of prestigious shows that just made their mark among the Golden Globe voters."
"Given that Hollywood Foreign Press Assn. celebrates the history of new, backward, and sometimes populist programs, it's not surprising."
"The agency has a good track record of considering new episodes and actors in awards."
"Take another look at the global darling of 2018, the great lady Messer, which won the comedy series for Amazon and the comedian for its heroine Rachel brosnahan."
"Although pilots declined in the spring of 2017, the rest of the first quarter was at the end of November last year."
In January this year, after HFPA approved the TV series, the TV academy held an Emmy award ceremony in September to award Amy Sherman Palladino's eighth TV series trophy
Richard Licata of Licata & Co. said: "I've always seen a connection between new programs that won the Golden Globe Awards and those that later won Emmy nominations - not always, but definitely recognized."
"By accident, HFPA is almost providing services to college members who are inundated by a lot of programs. They say," you can watch a lot of other programs, but these are five programs that you probably shouldn't miss. "



**Something goes wrong**
“(Ok, I'm crying.)”
“I'm not crying, you are!”
“...happy birthday to my angel on earth."”
“...every day with you is the best day of my life.”
“...my love grows for you a thousand miles a minute.”
“I know you won’t remember much about the first year of your life but i pray that you’ll never forget to keep sharing your joy and laughter with the world.”
“...i wish you could stay this little forever and i could protect that contagious smile and laugh of yours.”
“...i just couldn’t have dreamt you up, storm.”
“"how did i get so lucky to have such a sweet, smart, happy baby.”
“In honor of Stormi's first year, Kylie shared an Instagram post that is guaranteed to induce tears.”


"Well, I cried."
"I didn't cry, you did!"
“… Happy birthday to my angel on earth. "
“… Every day with you is the best day of my life. "
"My love for you grows a thousand miles a minute."
"I know you won't remember much about the first year of your life, but I pray you'll never forget to share your happiness and laughter with the world."
“…… I hope you will always be like this. I can protect your infectious smile and laughter. "
“…… I just can't dream of you, storm
"How could I be so lucky to have such a lovely, smart and happy baby."
"To commemorate Tommy's first year, Kelly shared an instagram post that guaranteed tears."



**Something goes wrong**
“...and her husband William Tell...”
“...that it s much more pleasant to have someone politely ask if it is okay before groping your midsection WATCH Former Bachelorette Ali Fedotowsky Opens Up About Her Biggest Parenting Mishap This is the first child for the fashion designer...”
“...a Baby Shower Lauren Conrad and her first child are already being showered with love...”
“The Hills alum, 31, celebrated her baby shower on a sunny Saturday with her friends.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““So lucky to have these wonderful ladies in my life!” she captioned a photo shared on her Instagram story showing her with a group of girlfriends donning sunglasses while posing by a pool.”
““They spoiled me with a beautiful shower today.”Conrad’s baby bump was on full display in a blue and white striped maxi dress that was fitted above her growing belly.”
“The reality star and fashion maven also teased a small part of the shower for her Instagram followers: a cake with white flowers and berries.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


“…… Her husband William told... "
“…… It's much more pleasant to be politely asked if you can do it before touching your middle watch. Former bachelor Ali fedotowsky has revealed her biggest parenting problem, which is the fashion designer's first child... "
“… Lauren Conrad and her first child have been bathed in love... "
Thirty one year old Sears Arum celebrated her baby shower with her friends on a sunny Saturday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Lucky to have such a good woman in my life! "She shared a photo on instagram of her posing with a group of girlfriends in sunglasses by the pool."
"They gave me a beautiful bath today and spoiled me." Conrad's small lump is fully displayed on a long blue and white striped skirt that fits her growing stomach
"The reality star and fashionista also teased a small part of the shower for her instagram fans: a cake with white flowers and berries."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  714
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But while it might take many years for him to be in charge over Great Britain, George (and his sister) totally rule our hearts today!”
“Toby Melville / AFP/Getty ImagesGeorge is third in line to the British throne, after his father, Prince William, and grandfather, Prince Charles.”
“But as Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank may have discovered, having little princes and princesses running around means you risk getting upstaged.”
“Princess Charlotte and Prince George at the wedding of Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank on Friday.”
“AFP/Getty ImagesWhich is exactly what happened.”
“Princess Charlotte, 3, and Prince George, 5, who served as a bridesmaid and page boy at the royal wedding at St. George's Chapel in Windsor Friday, were adorably charming as always.”
“(Little Prince Louis, who is just 5 months old, appears to have stayed at home.)”
“Charlotte has learned that waving is the way to go for a royal greeting the crowd:Princess Charlotte offers a hello to the crowd as she arrives in a car to the wedding.”
“WPA Pool / Getty ImagesCharlotte offers another wave to the crowd while heading into Windsor Castle.”
“ReutersEven if she hasn't necessarily mastered climbing steps:A little whoops for Charlotte!”


"But, although he may take many years to run Britain, George (and his sister) completely rules our hearts today!"
Toby Melville / AFP / Getty Images George is the third in line to the British throne, after his father Prince William and grandfather Prince Charles
"But, as Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank may have discovered, having a little prince and a little princess running around means that you could be robbed of the limelight."
"Princess Charlotte and Prince George are at the wedding of Princess Eugenie and Jack Brooksbank on Friday."
"AFP / Getty pictures, that's what happened."
"Princess Charlotte, 3, Prince George, 5, is as charming and lovely as ever as a bridesmaid and maid of honor at the royal wedding of St. George's Church in Windsor on Friday."
"The little prince Louis, who is only five months old, seems to be staying at home
Charlotte learned to wave as a royal greeting: Princess Charlotte, when she drives to the wedding, says hello to the crowd
"WPA pool / Getty Images Charlotte provides another wave for the crowd going to Windsor Castle."
"If she's not sure she's good at rock climbing, meet again at seven: a little bit, my God, Charlotte!"



Number  715
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After they bring the new baby home, Kim just wants to enjoy her family.””
“Kim is trying to eliminate as many concerns as possible.”
“...since she was robbed in Paris robbery in October 2016”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians star, 37, showed off her new grill, which read “KIM” on her lower teeth, on Snapchat and her Instagram stories Wednesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Guess what I’m doing today, guys,” she teased her fans in the video as she gave a close-up look at the grill.”
“Model and DJ Sita Abellan was with Kardashian West and couldn’t help but admire the gold jewelry, saying, “Oh, work!”Image zoom DJ Sita Abellan and Kim Kardashian West as the reality star shows off her new grill.”
“| Credit: Kim Kardashian InstagramThe mother of two has opted for more understated jewelry pieces recently.”
“However, the last time the reality star wore a grill – and posted about it – was days before she was robbed in Paris.”
“Kardashian West shared a photo of her gold and diamond grill on September 29, 2016, and captioned the photo with three diamond emojis, “.”Image zoom Kim Kardashian West on September 29, 2016, sharing a look at her gold grill and a $4 million ring.”


"After they brought the new baby home, Kim just wanted to enjoy her family."
"Kim Jong Il is trying to allay as many concerns as possible."
“… Since October 2016, she was robbed in a robbery in Paris
"The 37 year old" keep up with Kardashian "star showed off her new grill on snapchat and instagram on Wednesday, with" Kim "on her lower teeth
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Guess what I'm doing today, guys," she teases her fans in the video as she takes a close look at the grill
Model DJ Sita abellen, with Kardashian West, couldn't help admiring the gold jewelry and saying, "Oh, work! "When the reality star shows off her new grill, zoom in on DJs Sita Abram and Kim Kardashian West."
"| credit: the mother of two recently chose a more low-key jewelry."
"However, the last time the reality star wore a grill - and posted online - was a few days before she was robbed in Paris."
"Kardashian West shared a photo of her gold and diamond grill on September 29, 2016, adding three diamond emoticons to the title of the photo," "zoom in picture" Kim Kardashian West shared her gold grill and a $4 million ring on September 29, 2016. "



Number  716
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo: Rob Latour / ShutterstockSee all of the celebrity looks from the Met Gala 2017 red carpet:”
“Consider it a lesson in how to do boudoir-inspired dress on the red carpet and beyond.”
“Too many accessories would have been overkill, and Jenner did well to eschew them in favor of barely there makeup and not much else besides a knowing smile.”
“The choice of footwear felt like a more directional alternative to, say, last season’s transparent shoe, a Jenner style signature.”
“She extended the spangly statement to pointed pumps in the same finish.”
“Jenner’s slip also featured a bold cut-out across the front, which showed off her toned midriff and felt true to the night’s avant-garde theme.”
“Jenner, who also stars in the brand’s latest lingerie campaign, opted to leave little to the imagination—especially with the dress’s open back, which revealed a major flash of a matching black thong to make a statement both coming and going.”
“When the model turned out on last night's Met Gala red carpet, she wore a glitter-flecked La Perla slip that seemed to be channeling Rihanna’s infamous naked dress from the 2014 CFDA/Vogue Fashion Fund awards.”
“Kendall Jenner is no stranger to showing a little skin, whether in her street style or strutting down the Victoria’s Secret runway.”


"Photo: Rob Latour / shutterstock view all the celebrities on the red carpet of the 2017 metropolitan celebration:
"It's a lesson in how to wear boudoir style clothes on the red carpet and other occasions."
If there are too many accessories, it's too much. Jenna avoids accessories very well and only likes to make up reluctantly. There are not many other accessories except knowing smile
"Compared to last season's transparent shoes (Jenner style signature), the choice of shoes makes people feel more directional."
"She used the same sentence pattern to extend the joke to the sharp pump."
"Jenna's halter top also adopts a bold hollow out design on the front, showing her strong middle and lower hem, making people feel the avant-garde theme of the night."
"Jenner also plays in the latest underwear activity of the brand. He chooses not to leave any imagination space, especially the open back of the skirt, revealing the main shining point of matching with the black thong, which can explain the problem all the time."
"When the model appeared on met gala's red carpet last night, she wore a shiny La Perla note that seemed to guide Rihanna's infamous nude dress at the 2014 CFDA / vogue Fashion Fund Awards."
"Kendall Jenner is familiar with the street style and swaggering on Victoria's Secret catwalk."



Number  717
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While we are unaware of any type of inappropriate behavior involving him and anyone affiliated with the show we will swiftly address any alleged violations of our standards of conduct Although B B has been sued for sexual harassment before Batali s own alleged inappropriate sexual misconduct has not previously...”
“...positive work environment An ABC spokesperson said in a statement ABC takes matters like this very seriously as we are committed to a safe work environment...”
““I apologize to the people I have mistreated and hurt.”
“Batali did not deny all the allegations, saying that they “match up” with ways he has behaved.”
“ABC, where Batali has co-hosted the daytime show The Chew since 2011, has also asked the chef to step away from the show “while we review the allegations that have just recently come to our attention,” a spokesperson said.”
“In a statement to Eater, Batali said that he is stepping away from the day-to-day operations of his businesses for an unspecified period of time.”
“It was the first formal complaint about Batali, who was reprimanded and required to undergo training, according to the company.”
“According to a spokesperson for Batali & Bastianich Hospitality Group — the restaurant-management services company that provides support to around 24 restaurants owned by, among others, Batali and Joe Bastianich — in October 2017, a B&B restaurant employee officially reported inappropriate behavior by Batali to the company.”
“Batali was reprimanded for inappropriate behavior in the workplace as recently as two months ago.”
“The woman whose allegations are described above has never worked for Batali, though she works in the restaurant industry.”


"Although we are not aware of any type of misconduct involving him and anyone associated with the show, we will promptly deal with any suspected violation of our standards of conduct, even though B B has been charged with sexual harassment and Batali himself has not been suspected of sexual misconduct before..."
“…… A spokesman for ABC said in a statement that ABC takes such issues very seriously because we are committed to a safe working environment... "
"I apologize to the people I abused and hurt."
Batali did not deny all the charges, saying they were "consistent" with the way he acted
"ABC, Batali, who has been co hosting the daytime show the chew since 2011, has also asked the chef to leave the show, while we review the charges that have just come to our attention recently," a spokesman said
In a statement to eater, Batali said he would withdraw from the company's day-to-day operations for an uncertain period of time
"According to Batali, this is the first formal complaint against Batali, who was reprimanded and asked to receive training."
"According to a spokesman for Batali & bastianich hospitality group, in October 2017, a B & B restaurant employee formally reported Batali's misconduct to the company. Batali is a restaurant management service company that supports about 24 restaurants owned by Batali and Joe bastianich. "
"Batali was condemned just two months ago for misconduct in the workplace."
"The woman in question has never worked for Batali, even though she works in the catering industry."



Number  718
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’ll say that the one thing we talked about is he absolutely doesn’t need to die, because it’s not like I’m leaving on bad terms.”
“Were there alternate ways in which Barba could leave, like him dying?”
“Read our full interview to get the scoop:ENTERTAINMENT WEEKLY: Was it your decision to leave the series?”
“And why did he decide to leave SVU now?”
“What’s next for him after that?”
“Following his departure, Esparza is temporarily returning to his Broadway roots for a Chess revival at the Kennedy Center.”
“Danny Pino, who joined the show in season 13, was the show’s last big exit back in season 16.”
“After Christopher Meloni exited in season 12, fellow originals Richard Belzer and Dann Florek both left in season 15.”
“As for Barba, SVU fans may see him again soon.”Though SVU has been on for 19 seasons, the show hasn’t seen too much turnover in recent years.”
“Raúl is family and we look forward to seeing his talent shine in new projects.”


"What I want to say is that one of the things we talked about is that he absolutely doesn't need to die because I didn't leave on bad terms."
"Is there any other way to get Baba to leave, like he's dead?"
"Read our full interview for the exclusive: Entertainment Weekly: did you decide to leave the series?"
"Why does he decide to leave SVU now?"
"What's next for him after that?"
After leaving, espaza will temporarily return to his hometown on Broadway to hold a chess Renaissance at the Kennedy Center
Denny Pinot joined the show in season 13, making it its last big exit in season 16
"After Christopher Melloni quit in season 12, Richard Belzer and Dane Florek, both of the original works, left in season 15."
"As for Baba, SVU fans may see him again soon." Although SVU has been on the 19 seasons, but in recent years the audience rating is not too high
"Raul is a family and we are looking forward to seeing his talent shine in the new project."



Number  719
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I wanted to stay married forever,” the singer recently told host Wendy Williams.”
“We are and will always be united in our support of each other and our family.”“It wasn’t my plan.”
“The Double Dutchess hitmaker, 42, took a trip down memory lane on Instagram, posting images of her past Halloween looks.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Fergie shared a throwback photo with Duhamel from the 2015 Casamigos Tequila Halloween party – in addition to costumes as a Toddlers and Tiaras contestant and mistress of the dark Elvira.”
“The pair attended the star-studded 2015 event as Karl Lagerfeld and his cat, Choupette.”
“The former Black Eyed Peas member then shared a photo with the duo’s 4-year-old son Axl Jack ahead of trick-or-treating.”
“Duhamel was not pictured.”
““Off to Never Never Land,” she captioned the snap of Axl dressed as Peter Pan while she went as his sidekick, Tinker Bell.”
“Image zoom Credit D Dipasupil FilmMagic Image zoom Credit Andrew Rocke Splash News Fergie recently told InStyle she lets her son be the boss when it came to my costume for trick or treating every year But when he wanted to be the boy who won t grow up she...”


"I want to stay married forever," the singer recently told host Wendy Williams
"We are and will be united to support each other and our families." "It's not my plan."
The 42 year old doubles player posted photos of her past Halloween look on instagram's memory tour
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Fergie shared with Duhamel a retrospective photo from the 2015 casamigos tequila Halloween Party - in addition to wearing a Toddler Costume, a crown contestant and dark Elvira's mistress."
"The two took part in the 2015 star studded event as Carl Lagerfeld and his cat joppert."
"The former Black Eyed member then shared a photo with their 4-year-old son, aks jack, before" trick or treat. "
"Duhamel wasn't photographed."
"To never land," she captioned Akers' snapshot with Peter Pan's costume, while she was his partner, jingle jingle
"Picture scaling credit D. dipper film magic picture scaling credit Andrew Locke splash news Fergie recently told InStyle that she let her son be the boss when it comes to my clothes don't give trick or treat every year, but when he wants to be a boy who won't grow up with her..."



Number  720
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared in The Sun.”
“However, her doctor did say she could carry a baby to term prompting Kim, who has been warned not to get pregnant again, to ask if she'll carry her baby.”
“Kim, who is mother to daughter North and son Saint with husband Kanye West, suffers from placenta accrete, which causes multiple complications during pregnancy and birth.”
“Kim has been warned she could bleed to death if she tries to have another child.”
“Kris Jenner offered to carry Kim Kardashian’s third baby if it was safe for her to do so.”
“And in the latest episode of “Keeping Up with the Kardashians,” Kim asks her 61-year-old mother if she’ll carry her baby for her after finding out that Kris is healthy enough to do it.”
“KIM KARDASHIAN: 'I CAN'T TRUST ANYBODY'She asked her: “Do you want to carry mine?”Kris replied: “If I really thought that I could carry it for you and it would be born OK, I would do it in two seconds, I really would.”
“But it’s really dangerous.”Kourtney also offered to be a surrogate for Kim, who has been warned not to get pregnant again due to complications during her last pregnancies.”
“Kourtney chimed in: “I already offered myself so don’t act like you’re the only Mother Theresa in here.”It all started when Kris revealed that a mysterious aristocrat got in touch with her asking to use her genes to have a baby.”
“The matriarch was told of how they wanted to buy one of her eggs as he believes her offspring would fit seamlessly into their royal lineage KIM KARDASHIAN POSES IN BIKINI AFTER FLU DIET Kris said she was stunned to receive the letter from a highly esteemed royal of European...”


"This article was originally published in the sun."
"However, her doctor did say that she could hold the baby to term, which prompted Kim, who was warned not to get pregnant again, to ask if she would hold the baby."
"Kim and her husband, Kanye West, are a mother and daughter, North and son, saint. She has placenta accreta, which causes a variety of complications during pregnancy and childbirth."
"Kim was warned that if she tried to have another child, she could bleed to death."
"Chris Jenner offered that she could have Kim Kardashian's third child if it was safe."
In the latest episode, follow Kardashian's family, Kim asks her 61 year old mother if she would like to help Chris hold her baby after she finds out that she is healthy enough to hold her baby
Kim kardashan: "I can't trust anyone," she asked, "do you want to take mine? Chris replied, "if I really thought I could carry it for you, it would be born, I would finish it in two seconds, I really would."
"But it's really dangerous." Kurtney also offered to be Kim's surrogate mother, who was warned not to get pregnant again because of complications during her last pregnancy
Courtney echoed: "I've offered it, so don't pretend you're the only Mother Teresa here." It all started when Chris revealed that a mysterious aristocrat contacted her and asked to use her genes to have children
"The matriarch was told that they wanted to buy one of her eggs because he believed that her offspring would seamlessly integrate into their royal lineage - Kim Kardashian posed in a bikini because flu dietkris said she was shocked to receive a letter from a highly respected member of the European royal family..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Decked out in a light blue denim jumpsuit, she kept her newly-fit body hidden after showing it off in concert the night before.”
“...the So Excited singer...”
“Yes, I separated from my husband, we are in court and the rest is in God's hands.'”
“She told fans in the clip, shared in May: 'I just want to keep it real with you guys for a second.”
“...performing...”
“Back at it The pop star has just resumed her tour after welcoming her first child Eissa in January with estranged husband Wissam Al Mana Janet previously said her divorce from Wissam was in God s hands in a special video posted to announce her plans to return to live...”
“The songstress is currently in the process of divorcing the Qatari business magnate following their split in April 2017 after five years of marriage.”
“The Scream hitmaker had called off her Unbreakable World Tour in April 2016, in order to have her first child, at the age of 50.”
“The pop star has just resumed her tour after welcoming her first child Eissa in January, with estranged husband Wissam Al Mana.”
“...and told fans 'This is me'Janet was also reportedly overwhelmed during the first show of her State of the World tour in Louisiana on Thursday, when she performed the same track.”


Dressed in a light blue denim jumpsuit, she showed off her new figure at the concert the night before last and hid it
“…… That singer who is so excited... "
"Yes, my husband and I are separated, we are in court, and the rest is in God's hands."
"In a video she shared in May, she told fans: 'I just want to be realistic with you for a second.'
“… Show... "
"Back here, the pop star has just resumed her tour, welcoming her first child, Asha, with her separated husband, wissam al mana Janet, in January. Janet previously said in a special video that her divorce from vissam is in the hands of God. This video is to announce her plan to return to life... "
"The singer is currently divorcing the Qatari business tycoon, who broke up in April 2017 after five years of marriage."
"Scream killer canceled her unbreakable world tour in April 2016 to give birth to her first child at the age of 50."
The pop star welcomed her first child, Aisha, in January and has just resumed her tour after spending time with her estranged husband, wissam al mana
“…… And tell the fans, "this is me.". Janet was also reported to be overwhelmed during the first performance of the world tour in Louisiana on Thursday, when she performed the same track



Number  722
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Engagement talk isn't just between the two of them, even some of Harry's closest aides are quietly expecting news before the end of the year."”
“"It's, of course, very serious and both Harry and Meghan are focused on the future," a source previously shared with us.”
“...is in the air...”
“And as the pair continues to celebrate one year of dating some can t help but wonder if an engagement is in the future While the ultra private twosome keeps fans guessing those close to Harry and Meghan know love...”
“They just want to get really close to the animals and the people.”
“"There may be some luxury but there will be a big element of daring stuff, too.”
“"Harry knows exactly where to stay on a trip like this and he's also worked closely with a trusted tour guide who has helped with arrangements and organizing excursions," our insider shared.”
“A source also revealed that a Botswana safari, trip to Okavango Delta and more was on the agenda.”
“"The couple's latest destination comes shortly after vacationing in Africa in celebration of Meghan's recent 36th birthday.After arriving in Botswana, Meghan celebrated her special day with close friends of Harry.”
“"It's one thing to experience them at ground level, but high up is where you really get to see how spectacular the view is and just how enormous it is.”


"It's not just the two of them who are engaged. Even Harry's closest assistant is quietly looking forward to the news before the end of the year."
"Of course, it's very serious, Harry and Megan are focused on the future," a source shared with us earlier
“… In the air... "
"As they continue to celebrate their one-year date, some people can't help wondering if they will be engaged in the future, while the extremely private couple let fans guess that the people around Harry and Megan know about love..."
"They just want to really get close to animals and people."
"There may be some luxury, but there will also be something bold."
"Harry knows where to stay on such a trip, and he works closely with a trusted tour guide, who helps arrange and organize short trips," our insider shared
"A source also revealed that the Botswana wildlife zoo and Okavango Delta tour have been included in the agenda."
"The couple's closest destination is to celebrate Megan's recent arrival in Botswana shortly after her recent 36 year old holiday in Africa. Megan and Harry's close friends celebrate her special day.
"It's one thing to experience them on the ground, but you can really see the spectacular scenery and the huge landscape on the high ground."



Number  723
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It will be the beginning of Meghan's new life, which promises to be more glamorous than she could have dreamed, although not all castles and tiaras will be, because the life of a real is also full of dangers.”
“Namely, a kiss.”
“...for.”
“The highlight of the event will be the two-mile procession that the newlyweds have planned through the streets of Windsor so they can greet supporters and give the tens of thousands of pickers exactly what they have been waiting.”
“We are going to get a new member of the family, a fresh wedding dress to obsess and undoubtedly a lot of adorable images of Prince George and Princess Charlotte as they watch their uncle tie .”
“If everything goes as planned, The wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle promises to be a gift for real fans.”


"This will be the beginning of Megan's new life. Her new life will be more charming than she imagined, although not all castles and crowns will be like this, because a real person's life is also full of danger."
"That is to say, a kiss."
“… For the sake of. "
"The highlight of this event will be the two mile parade that the newlyweds plan to hold on the streets of Windsor so that they can greet their supporters and give tens of thousands of selectors what they have been waiting for."
"We're going to get a new member of the family, a new wedding dress obsession and no doubt Prince George and Princess Charlotte as they look at their uncle tie a lot of lovely images."
"If everything goes according to plan, the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel is expected to be a gift for real fans."



Number  724
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  725
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From Michael Chaaradvertising...”
“Check out more on Instagram @MikeChaar.”
“A naked Chrissy Teigen wears only salad emojis in a hilarious Instagram post.”
“Chrissy Teigen isn’t afraid to make a salad in the most natural way: nude!”
“Social media and Twitter queen Chrissy Teigen recently took to her Instagram page to post a hilarious photo last Sunday, March 4, 2018.”
“Looking gorgeous as always, in what was not a staged photo at all, hopped onto social media au naturel, sporting nothing but two salad emojis.”
“A currently pregnant Teigen, posed in her modern kitchen making a salad and was covered up with a well-placed towel and some emojis.”
“Via PEOPLE In addition to the hilarious photo the Lip Sync Battle co host who has announced that she and hubby John Legend are currently expecting baby number two captioned the photo saying Plz don t shame me I am a strong proud salad making woman just being natural and...”
“...trying to live my life advertising The model announced last month that she and husband Legend are having a baby boy...”
“The star is taking her pregnancy public, as she has been documenting most of it for her fans to see.”


"More ads from Michael Zara..."
"In Instagram@MikeChaar See more information on the
"In a funny instagram post, a naked Chris tegan only wore a salad expression."
"Chris tegan is not afraid to make salad in the most natural way: naked!"
"Chris Teigen, Queen of social media and twitter, recently posted a funny picture on instagram, Sunday, March 4, 2018."
"It looks as gorgeous as ever. In a photo that is not a stage photo at all, I jump on the social media au naturel. There is nothing but two salad expressions."
Tegan, a pregnant woman, makes salads in her modern kitchen, covered with a towel and some emoticons
"In addition to this funny photo, the co host of the mouth fight also announced that she and her husband John Legend are currently pregnant with baby 2, and wrote in the title of the photo," please don't make me feel ashamed. I'm a strong and proud salad making woman, just natural and... "
“… Trying to live my life, the advertising model announced last month that she and her husband legend has a boy
"The star made her pregnancy public because she had recorded most of it for her fans to see."



Number  726
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In June, Twitter explained why: Some tweets that seemingly violate its terms of service are nevertheless “newsworthy” and therefore in the public interest to keep up.”
“In fact, it appeared that Trump’s account was essentially protected from being deactivated over Terms of Service violations.”
“Duysak, a twenty-something with Turkish roots who was born and raised in Germany, was working as a contractor for a fixed term for the last part of his stay in the U.S. under a work and study visa.”
“We were among those looking for the contractor, and through a string of events found out his name, Bahtiyar Duysak, and got him to agree to talk to us in a town in Germany.”
“If it was intentional, why did it happen?”
“If it was an accident, how could it happen?”
“Reporters started immediately trying to find the now-former Twitter contractor to try to figure out what happened.”
“The story could have ended there, but it didn’t.”
“Moments later, it followed up with more information: a contractor, on his last day of work, was responsible.”
“— Sarah Hagi (@geekylonglegs) November 3, 2017Twitter, in its turn for more transparency, quickly announced that the account’s shutdown was accidental.”


In June, twitter explained why some tweets that appear to violate its terms of service are still "newsworthy" and therefore in the public interest
"In fact, it seems that Trump's account is basically protected from being suspended for breach of terms of service."
"Duissac is Turkish, in his 20s. He was born and raised in Germany. During his last time in the United States, he was a contractor with work and study visa."
"We were one of the people looking for a contractor, and through a series of events we found his name bahtiyar duysak and asked him to agree to talk to us in a town in Germany."
"If it's intentional, why?"
"If it was an accident, how could it happen?"
"Reporters immediately started trying to find the current twitter former contractor and try to figure out what happened."
"The story could have ended there, but it was not."
"After a while, it provided more information: a contractor, on the last day of his work, was responsible."
——Sarah Haji (@ geekylonglets) on November 3, 2017, twitter announced that it was accidental that the account was closed soon in order to improve transparency



Number  727
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He even visited her while she was on the road during the 'DWTS' tour months ago."”
“She was at Pierson's birthday party last week.”
“She just took him to that James Hinchcliffe race they both posted about on Instagram (see her post here, and his here) and were acting affectionate like a couple there.”
“Pierson is best known for the 2015 romantic comedy “Naomi and Ely's No Kiss List” and his role as Thomas Forrester on “The Bold and the Beautiful.”Getty A source revealed, "Sharna and Pierson are together.”
“News reports that Sharna is dating actor Pierson Fodé!”
“E!”
“Fans love the chemistry between “Dancing with the Stars” partners Sharna Burgess and Bonner Bolton, but alas, they are not a couple.”


"A few months ago, when she was touring DWT, he even called on her."
"She went to Pearson's birthday party last week."
"She just took him to the James Hinchcliffe game, and they both posted on instagram (see her post, his post here) and acted like a couple there."
"Pearson is best known for his romantic comedy Naomi and Erie's kiss list in 2015 and his role as Thomas Forrest in bold and beautiful." "Shana and Pearson are together," Getty revealed
"The news reports say that Shana is dating actor Pearson Ford!"
“E！”
"Fans love the chemistry between dance with the stars partner Shana Burgess and Bonner Bolton, but alas, they're not a couple."



Number  728
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Also here’s a zoomed in version of Fake Ed, just because it’s creeping me out a little:OK, well, see you in my nightmares!”
“...other I never said I was a Photoshop expert guys pls...”
“FYI this is the real Ed Sheeran Cheers Tom for the specs x A post shared by Ed Sheeran teddysphotos on Feb 21 2018 at 10 00am PST And here s Fake Ed and Real Ed standing next to each...”
“That’s the fake Ed Sheeran.”
“That photo above?”
“...at a cat cafe in London, the singer is perfectly captured down to his guitar, tattoos, and look of slight bewilderment.”
“Unveiling it (him?)”
“This Ed Sheeran Wax Figure Is So Spot-On, It’s Going To Give Me NightmaresMadame Tussauds is known for their creepily spot-on celebrity wax figures, and the latest Ed Sheeran offering is no different.”


"There's also an enlarged version of fake ed, just because it gives me the creeps. Little: OK, OK, goodbye in my nightmare!"
“… I've never said that I'm a Photoshop expert. Please... "
"For reference only, this is the real ed Sheeran. Here's a toast to Tom's specification X. This is a post shared by ED Sheeran Teddy on February 21, 2018 at 10 AM Pacific Standard Time (PST). This is fake ed and real ed standing next to each other..."
"That's a fake ed Sheeran."
"The picture above?"
“…… At a cat cafe in London, the singer was perfectly captured with guitar, tattoos and a slightly confused expression
"Unveil it (him?)
"This wax figure of ED Sheeran is so attractive that it will give me nightmares. Tussauds is famous for its thrilling celebrity wax figures, including the latest ed Sheeran



Number  729
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In mid-October, The Hollywood Reporter published an interview with Isa Hackett — daughter of author Philip K. Dick and executive producer of Amazon series Man in the High Castle — in which she alleged Price propositioned her at San Diego Comic-Con in 2015.”
““We are cooperating with the investigation into this matter.”WATCH: Jeffrey Tambor Dedicates His SAG Award to Transgender Men and WomenThe allegations against Tambor come more than a month after the former head of Amazon Studios, Roy Price, resigned following a sexual harassment claim that was brought against him.”
““Anything that would diminish the level of respect, safety and inclusion so fundamental to our workplace is completely antithetical to our principles,” Soloway told The Hollywood Reporter.”
“A spokesperson for Amazon Studios, the production company behind the Jill Soloway-created dramedy, confirmed to the outlet that they have launched an investigation.”
“Barnes accused the actor “of implied inappropriate behavior,” according to Deadline.”
““I am appalled and distressed by this baseless allegation.”The Golden Globe and Emmy-winning actor’s denial is in response to claims Tambor’s former assistant, Van Barnes, reportedly made this week in a private Facebook post.”
““I adamantly and vehemently reject and deny any and all implication and allegation that I have ever engaged in any improper behavior toward this person or any other person I have ever worked with,” Tambor, 73, continued.”
“In a statement to Deadline on Wednesday, the Transparent star said, “I am aware that a former disgruntled assistant of mine has made a private post implying that I had acted in an improper manner toward her.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“...harassment claims brought against him by a former assistant...”
“I adamantly and vehemently reject and deny any and all implication and allegation that I have ever engaged in any improper behavior toward this person or any other person I have ever worked with Jeffrey Tambor said in a statement to Deadline Jeffrey Tambor adamantly and vehemently denies the sexual...”


"In mid October, the Hollywood Reporter published an interview with Issa Hackett, the daughter of writer Philip K. Dick and executive producer of Amazon's novel the man in the high castle. In the interview, she said that Issa Hackett put forward a price request to her at the 2015 San Diego comics conference."
"We are cooperating with the investigation of this matter." Observation: Geoffrey Temple dedicates his sag award to transgender people. Tambor's charges come more than a month after Roy price, the former head of Amazon studios, resigned over sexual harassment charges
"Anything that reduces respect, security and tolerance is against our principles," soloway told the Hollywood Reporter
"An Amazon studio spokesman confirmed to the media that they had launched an investigation. Amazon studio is the production company behind Jill soloway's production of "dramedy."
Barnes accused the actor of "suggestive misconduct," according to deadline
"I am shocked and distressed by this groundless accusation." Van Barnes, a former assistant to Golden Globe and Emmy winner Tambor, denied the claim in a private post on Facebook this week, according to reports
"I firmly reject and deny any suggestion or allegation that I have done anything improper to this person or anyone else I have worked with," the 73 year old continued
In a statement ahead of Wednesday's deadline, the transparent star said: "I know that one of my ex hairdressers wrote a personal post suggesting that I had taken improper actions against her. Get news, feature and other push notifications. "
“…… The former assistant charged him with harassment... "
"I firmly reject and deny any and all hints and accusations that I have ever made to this person or any other person, and I have ever said in a statement with Geoffrey Tambor," Geoffrey Tambor firmly and resolutely denies sex



Number  730
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: French Police Arrested 17 People in Connection With Kim Kardashian West's Paris Robbery...”
“...of committing gun violence...”
“The trip was a significant milestone for the 37-year-old reality star, and she wrote on her website about what it was like to return for the same event—Paris Fashion Week—and how her life has changed since the experience.”
“"I went back to Paris to witness Kanye's BFF, Virgil Abloh, make history with his first collection and runway show for Louis Vuitton during Mens Fashion Week.”
“It was such an emotional trip!"”
“KKW wrote in a blog post on her site.”
“"For me, it was the perfect time to come back to a place where I fell in love, but also a place where I suffered great trauma."”
“Kardashian West explained that she was only in France for 12 hours before returning to the United States for Teyana Taylor's listening party (Kanye West produced the singer's upcoming album).”
“Kardashian West also said that having her husband with her and beefing up her security made her feel more safe.”
“"Emotionally, I feel calm.”


"Related reports: French police arrested 17 people in connection with the robbery of Kim Kardashian West in Paris..."
“… Gun violence... "
"This trip is an important milestone for the 37 year old reality TV star, who wrote on her website how she felt about going back to Paris fashion week to participate in the same event, and how her life has changed since her experience."
"I went back to Paris to see Kanye's BFF, Virgil abloh, make history for Louis Vuitton's first collection and runway show during men's fashion week."
"What a moving trip!"
"Kkw wrote on his website's blog."
"For me, this is the best time to go back to a place where I fell in love, and a place where I suffered a lot."
"Kardashian West explained that she only stayed in France for 12 hours and then returned to the United States to attend Tyana Taylor's Concert (Kanye West produced the singer's upcoming album)
"Kardashian West also said that having her husband with her enhances her sense of security and makes her feel more secure."
"Emotionally, I feel calm."



Number  731
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...even comments...”
“I really can wake up one day and feel like Malibu but then I can also feel like I want to be Roy Orbison You really opened up the gender fluidity conversation to the point where you can dress in male clothes in the Younger Now video and no one...”
“...did recently say of the Wrecking Ball video I m never living that down You know I should f king be grateful every f king day for that song and I am...”
“I think little parts of everyone that I ve been in my life are starting to come through in this one kind of era of the music that I m doing because I really can embrace what I ve been before rather than trying to distance myself from it You...”
“I feel like I have nothing to prove.”
“I wanted to be more straightforward… [I’m] saying, ‘I want to sell records so this is how I’m going to be’.”
““Yes, actually.”
“Is that the intention?”
“And that might just be the point…After everything you’ve done recently, putting out something a bit more ‘normal’ is just about the most subversive thing you could do.”
“Beneath the surface, Miley is still preaching the same liberties – but in a package that wouldn’t shock a vicar.”


“… Even comment... "
"I can really wake up one day and feel like Malibu, but I can also feel that I want to be Roy Orbison. You really open up the dialogue of gender mobility, so that you can wear men's clothes in the younger now video, no one..."
“…… Recently, did you mention the video "I will never live" of "the ball of destruction"? You know I should be grateful for that song every day. I am... "
"I think a small part of everyone in my life is beginning to experience the music age I'm engaged in, because I can really embrace my previous experience instead of trying to keep a distance from you..."
"I don't think I have anything to prove."
"I want to be more direct (I) said, "I want to sell records, so that's what I'm going to do."
"Yes, in fact."
"Is that the end?"
"That may be the point After you've done so much recently, it's almost the most disruptive thing you can do to launch something more "normal."
"Under the surface, Miley is still preaching the same freedom - but the packaging won't shock the priest."



Number  732
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Ocean's 8 is released in UK cinemas on 18 JuneThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Viewers will also be able to watch cameos from other a-listers including Dakota Fanning, James Corden, Olivia Munn, Katie Holmes and Hailey Baldwin.”
“Last week, Rihanna teased a second trailer on her Instagram which introduced each character and the role they play within the much-speculated-about plot.”
“It’s a beautiful thing.”The female reboot of the heist movie franchise does indeed feature some of Hollywood’s top-talent including Cate Blanchett, Sandra Bullock, Mindy Kaling, Sarah Paulson, Helena Bonham Carter and Awkwafina.”
“We genuinely love each other and we’re so there for each other.”
“Now, we’re friends.”
“...competition and catfights but we were all collaborating all the time...”
“When asked by Hoda Kotb what it was really like to work with a roster of female a listers Hathaway said It s been really amazing to watch the way certain members of the media have wanted us to fight each other and the way they wanted there to be...”
“The 35-year-old actress spoke about her time filming Ocean’s 8 and addressed rumours that having such an all-star cast resulted in conflicting egos.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Ocean's 8 was shown in British cinemas on June 18. This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide email addresses. "
"Audiences can also watch the guest appearances of other first-line stars such as Dakota Fanning, James Colden, Olivia moon, Katie Holmes and Haley Baldwin."
Last week, Rihanna posted a second trailer on her instagram, which describes each character and their role in the much speculated plot
"It's a beautiful thing." The heroine of the robbery series does have some of Hollywood's top talents, including Kate Blanchett, Sandra Bullock, Mindy Carlin, Sarah Paulson, Helena Bonham Carter and octafina
"We love each other sincerely, we exist for each other."
"Now, we are friends."
“… Competition and fighting, but we've been working together... "
"When Hoda Kotb asked about the feeling of working with a women's A-list, Hathaway said it was really amazing to see the way some media members wanted us to fight each other and the way they wanted us to be there..."
"The 35 year old actress talked about the time she made ocean 8 and the rumors that there was such an all star cast that led to a clash of self-esteem."



Number  733
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— Bitch.”
“Them.”
“Badges of military regiments – she inspects some troops, she wears the badge of them to do it.”
“And the brooch is ALWAYS significant.”
“QE also does hundreds and hundreds of appearances, and maybe 95% or higher, she wears a brooch.”
“Badges of military regiments – she inspects some troops, she wears the badge of them to do it,” @SamuraiKnitter wrote.”
“A Twitter user who goes by the handle @SamuraiKnitter tweeted extensively about the “brooch warfare.”Queen Elizabeth “does hundreds and hundreds of appearances, and maybe 95% or high, she wears a brooch.”
“According to E!News, Queen Elizabeth wore different brooches during Trump’s three days in the United Kingdom, with each broach having special significance, as described on the blog From Her Majesty’s Jewel Vault.”


"Bitch."
"They."
"Corps Badge - she checks some troops, she wears their badge to do it."
"Brooches always make sense."
"QE will also appear hundreds of times, maybe 95% or more, she is wearing a brooch."
"Corps Badge - she checks some troops, she wears their badge to do these things," wrote @ Samurai knitter
A twitter user posted a lot of news about "Brooch war" on twitter. Queen Elizabeth "appeared hundreds of times, maybe 95% or more, she was wearing a brooch."
"According to e! The source said that during Trump's three days in the UK, Queen Elizabeth wore different brooches, and each Brooch had a special meaning, as described in her Majesty's jewelry store's blog



Number  734
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In 1973, he co-founded the Frank Silvera Writers’ Workshop in support of black playwrights, and he continues to contribute to Artists for a New South Africa and the Campaign for Female Education.”
“Image zoomFreeman received the life achievement award at the ceremony this year for his work in film, in addition to his humanitarian accomplishments.”
“There was one question on everybody’s minds after Morgan Freeman gave his life achievement award speech at the 2018 Screen Actors Awards: Who was the mystery celebrity that the 80-year-old actor called out during his speech?”
“As Freeman began his acceptance speech on Sunday, he paused for a moment to abruptly call out another member of the audience.”
“And while the actor didn’t elaborate on who he was talking about at the time, backstage he let reporters in on a little secret — it was Lily Tomlin!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Yeah.”
“That was Lily Tomlin,” he explained at the 2018 SAG Awards press room at The Shrine Auditorium in Los Angeles on Sunday.”
““She’s a wonder in herself and I’ve always loved her.”
“I see her, I say hello.”Tomlin was also the recipient of the SAG life achievement award at least year’s ceremony.”


In 1973, he co founded Frank sylvera writers studio to support black playwrights and continue to contribute to the artists and women's education movement in New South Africa
"Image zoom Freeman won the life achievement award at this year's awards ceremony, not only for his humanitarian achievements, but also for his work in film."
"After Morgan Freeman delivered his life achievement award speech at the 2018 Screen Actors awards, everyone has a question in mind: who is the mysterious celebrity that the 80 year old actor called out in his speech?"
When Freeman began his acceptance speech on Sunday, he stopped for a moment and suddenly called out another audience
"Although the actor didn't specify who he was talking about, backstage he let reporters know a little secret - that is Lily Tomlin!"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Yes."
"That's Lily Tomlin," he explained in the press room of the 2018 sag awards ceremony at the temple auditorium in Los Angeles on Sunday
"She's a miracle in itself, and I've always loved her."
"I saw her. I said hello." Tomlin is also the winner of the sag Life Achievement Award, at least at a year's ceremony



Number  735
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kate attends a global mental health summit in a lavender dress she’s worn out before in London in October 2018.”
“Getty ImagesKate's going for an ultra classic, super-approachable aesthetic.”
“Meghan wearing pantyhose for Prince Charles’s 70th birthday party in London in May 2018.”
“Wearing more dresses and skirt-sets, putting on the pantyhose—we really see her embracing a lot of these traditional markers of royal style."”
“"That seems to be Meghan's approach as she assimilates into the royal family.”
“Dr. Akbari adds that those in this situation are typically the best-dressed people in the room (ahem, Meg's got that on lock), because they feel like they don't have leeway, and they're not looking to draw more attention to themselves.”
“...effective in your setting...”
“The research I ve done on how individuals self present in somewhat homogenous situations be it corporate environments or whatever is that if you already stand out which certainly Meghan does as an American coming from Hollywood you aren t looking to accentuate your differences as you try to be...”
“Max Mumby/Indigo Getty Images"Meghan's every style choice is under the microscope right now, and I think she knows that by making more conformist choices that are in line with traditional royal protocol, it will earn her greater internal clout," Dr. Akbari says.”
“Meghan wears a matching skirt-set at Buckingham Palace during the Trooping the Colour ceremony in June 2018.”


"In October 2018, Kate was in London wearing the lavender skirt she used to wear to attend the global mental health summit."
"Getty imageskate pursues a super classic, super approachable aesthetics."
"Megan wore pantyhose to Prince Charles' 70th birthday party in London in May 2018."
"With more skirts and skirts and pantyhose, we really see her embracing a lot of these traditional royal style logos."
"This seems to be Megan's way of integrating into the royal family."
"Dr. Akbari added that people in this situation are usually the best dressed people in the room (well, MEG locked this up) because they don't feel like they have room to maneuver and they don't want to get more attention."
“… Effective in your environment... "
"The research I've done on how individuals present themselves in a certain degree of homogenization - whether it's the corporate environment or whatever - if you've come to the fore - Megan certainly does as an American from Hollywood, then you're not trying to be Emphasize your differences when you're talking about it. "
Dr. Akbari said: "Max Moby / indigo Getty pictures" Megan's every style choice is now under the microscope, and I think she knows that by making more conventional choices in line with traditional royal etiquette, she will gain more internal influence
"In June 2018, Megan wore a matching dress at the rehearsal ceremony at Buckingham Palace."



Number  736
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They really are,” he revealed on Ellen in September.”
““The kids are putting on the heat.”
“...caused even more controversy for the pair since they were taken just a few months after Pitt s first marriage ended...”
“So that was probably the most defining moment when he decided that we would all be a family Image zoom Credit Frazer Harrison Getty That June the couple appeared in an extensive photo spread for W magazine entitled Domestic Bliss which featured the stars posing as husband and wife which...”
“We were playing with cars on the floor of a hotel room, and we both heard it and didn’t say anything and just looked at each other.”
“It was amazing.”
“According to the 2006 Vogue story, Maddox “just out of the blue called him Dad.”
“Later, Jolie Pitt would reveal that it was Pitt’s relationship with Maddox that helped encourage them to take the leap and become a couple.”
“...we d earlier allowed ourselves to believe Domestic Bliss Though reps for the couple continued to publicly deny a romance between them the stars were spotted on vacation together in April 2005 and photographs featuring Pitt helping Maddox build sandcastles sent the press into a frenzy...”
“I was quite content to be a single mom Image zoom Mr and Mrs Smith Credit 20th Century Fox Jolie maintained that they remained very very good friends after the movie wrapped although they realized at the end of the shoot in 2004 that it might mean something more than...”


"They really are," he told Allen in September
"The children are angry."
“… It's more controversial for the couple because they were taken away a few months after Pete's first marriage ended... "
"So that was probably the most decisive moment when he decided that we would all be the image of a family, Fraser Harrison Getty, in June, the couple appeared in an extensive photo dissemination of W magazine entitled family happiness, which included stars pretending to be husbands and wives, which..."
"We were playing with cars on the floor of our hotel room, and we both heard, said nothing, just looked at each other."
"It's amazing."
According to 2006 vogue, Maddox "suddenly called him Dad"
"Later, Julie Pitt will reveal that it was Pitt's relationship with Maddox that led them to take this step and become a couple."
“…… We earlier allowed ourselves to believe in the happiness of the family, although the couple's representatives continued to publicly deny their romance - the stars were found out on holiday together in April 2005, and the media went crazy with Peter's photo of helping Maddox build the sandcastle... "
"As a single mother, I'm very satisfied. The 20th Century Fox Jolie couple insisted that they were still very, very good friends after the movie ended, even though they realized at the end of 2004 that it might mean more things..."



Number  737
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We will find out at the season 6 reunion.”
“Here’s where wires got crossed: the rest of the guys who were listening thought Tom said, “hook up” instead of “hang out.”News quickly spreads through the resort to the rest of the cast and lines are immediately drawn in the sand.”
“On the seasonal cast trip to Playa del Carmen, Jax spotted Kristen hanging out poolside early one morning — still up from partying the night before.”
“Oh, and he also says he saw her and James in the hot tub together the night before.”
“Now, not only do these two have history, but their significant others (Carter and Raquel, respectively) are not on the trip.”
“Also though, this is JAX TALKING.”
“The devil is in the details, then (AKA the closed captioning, mercifully provided by the show).”
“On the golf course later, Tom Sandoval asks James if he'd “hung out” with Kristen and, innocently enough, James responds in the affirmative.”
“For whatever reason (JK, it’s tequila), no one quite remembers Tom and James’ exact conversation, culminating in Kristen and James having a screaming match at dinner.”
“How does this story end?”


"We'll find out at the party in season six."
"That's the crux of the problem: other people who are listening think Tom is talking about" chat up "rather than" hang out. ". The news soon spread to other actors, and the lines were drawn in the sand
"On a seasonal tour of Carmen beach, Jakes found Christine hanging out by the pool early in the morning - she hadn't been to a party the night before."
"Oh, he also said he saw her and James in the hot tub the night before."
"Now, not only do these two people have history, but other important people (Carter and Lacker, respectively) are not on the journey."
"But that's what Jax is saying."
"Well, the devil is in the details."
Later, on the golf course, Tom Sandoval asked James if he would "play with Christine", and James naively said yes
"For whatever reason (JK, tequila), no one remembers the exact conversation between Tom and James, and eventually Christine and James yelled at dinner."
"How does the story end?"



Number  738
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#prayfordemi.””
“Demi had a well documented struggle with substance abuse for years.”
“See it, here.”
“After Demi Lovato, 25, was rushed to the hospital for an alleged overdose, her ex, Joe Jonas, 28, shared his shock over the distressing news.”
““Like all of you I am thinking of @ DDLovato right now.”
“She needs our prayers and support.”
“We all know how strong you are Demi.”
“# prayfordemi,” he wrote on Twitter.”
“His message comes after it was reported that Demi was found “unconscious” in her Hollywood Hills home before she was administered Narcan and then taken to a nearby hospital.”
“Currently, she’s “awake and with her family who want to express thanks to everyone for the love, prayers and support.”


“#prayfordemi。”
"Demi has been fighting drug abuse for many years."
"Here, you see."
"After Demi Lovato, 25, was rushed to the hospital on suspicion of drug abuse, his ex girlfriend Joe Jonas, 28, was shocked by the sad news."
"Like you, I'm thinking about @ ddlovato now."
"She needs our prayers and support."
"We all know how strong you are, Demi."
"Prayfordemi," he wrote on twitter
Earlier, it was reported that Demi was found in a "coma" at her home in Hollywood villa, then received nacon treatment and was sent to a nearby hospital
Currently, she is "awake, with her family, thanking them for their love, prayer and support."



Number  739
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jay Z has the crowd sing Happy Birthday to Beyoncé & I'm melting #TIDALXBMIA #MadeInAmerica pic.twitter.com/ZwrdWjM7HS — Damn Deryl (@DerellaDeVil) September 4, 2017Jay made the crowd sing happy birthday to Beyoncé, my guy really making things right at home — Cam Taylor (@Coolant23) September 4, 2017Cheers, Beyoncé!”
“...for the tissues...”
“MadeInAmerica HappyBirthdayBeyonce Beyonce JaYZ A post shared by Music Choice musicchoice on Sep 3 2017 at 8 05pm PDT After overcoming troubles in their marriage something fans got an honest glimpse of through Beyoncé s Lemonade and Jay Z s 4 44 Jay Z s romantic gesture had fans grabbing...”
“Jay Z led the crowd in a Happy Birthday sing-a-long for @Beyonce @miafest.”
“Beyoncé's birthday is Monday, but the celebrations started early.”
“The superstar, who recently gave birth to her twins, Sir and Rumi and is mom to Blue Ivy, smiled and swayed along as everybody chimed in to send their beloved queen early birthday wishes.”
“News, before he asked the fans to join in on serenading Mrs. Carter.”
“Happy Birthday my love,” the rapper said according to E!”
“Beautiful Bey is in the house tonight.”
“#PressPlay: The crowd helps #JayZ sing happy birthday to #Beyonce at the #MadeInAmericaFestival #IssaHoliday via: @jxcyre A post shared by The Shade Room (@theshaderoom) on Sep 3, 2017 at 8:06pm PDT"Shout out to Beyoncé.”


"Jay z let the audience sing happy birthday to Beyonce & I'm melting" tidalxbmia " pic.twitter.com/ZwrdWjM7HS -Darn Deryl (@ derelaldevil) on September 4, 2017, Jay asked the audience to sing happy birthday to Beyonce. My people really did a good job at home - cam Taylor (@ coolant23) to September 4, 2017, Beyonce! "
“… For organizations... "
"Made in America happy birthday Beyonce Beyonce jayz at 8:05 p.m. on September 3, 2017, music choice music choice shared a post. After overcoming the troubles in marriage, fans saw a real moment through Beyonce's lemonade and jay z s 444, and jay z's romantic gesture attracted the fans' attention..."
"Jay z leads the audience to@ Beyonce@miafest I sang a happy birthday song. "
"Beyonce's birthday is Monday, but the celebration started very early."
The superstar, who recently gave birth to twins Sir and Rumi, is blue Ivy's mother. She walks around with a smile and everyone sends birthday wishes to their beloved queen
"News, before he invited his fans to sing Mrs. Carter's Serenade."
"Happy birthday, my love," said the rapper, according to e! "
"Beautiful bay is at home tonight."
“# PressPlay:2017 At 8:06 p.m. on September 3, 2003, the audience helped jayz in the "made in America Festival" Issa holiday by: @ jxcyre's post shared in the shade room (@ theshadroom) "shout to Beyonce."



Number  740
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...star revealed her new dark brown locks on Instagram She added So excited for this change but I ll always stay true to my roots...”
“We are told to make sacrifices in life if it's true love well in this case it's me.”
“The 32-year-old revealed her new dark brown locks after visiting a West Hollywood salon on Thursday.”
“'Been wanting to experiment like this for a long time n here it is,' she wrote about her hair color change on Instagram and flaunted the sexy new do.”
“Scroll down for videoNew do: Kendra Wilkinson revealed a new brunette look on ThursdayShe added: 'So excited for this change but I’ll always stay true to my roots.'”
“Ever since first meeting Hugh Hefner in 2004, the model has been instantly recognizable from her platinum blonde tresses.”
“There's been plenty of change for the former playboy star this month, not least of all her announced split from husband Hank Baskett.”
“'Today is the last day of my marriage to this beautiful man,' she confirmed in an emotional Instagram post.”
“Wow: The 32-year-old showed off her new tresses after leaving the salon in West Hollywood'I will forever love Hank and be open but for now we have chosen to go our own ways.”
“I'm beyond sad and heartbroken because i did believe in forever, that's why I said yes but unfortunately too much fear has gotten in the way.”


“…… The star showed off her new dark brown hair on instagram, and she is very excited about the change, but I will always be loyal to my roots... "
"We're told to make sacrifices in life, and if it's true love, then in this case, it's me."
"The 32 year old woman showed off her new dark brown hair after visiting a salon in West Hollywood on Thursday."
She wrote about her hair color changes on instagram and showed off her sexy new hairstyle
"Scroll down to see the new video done: Kendra Wilkinson revealed a new black hair look on Thursday, adding: 'such an exciting change, but I'll always be loyal to my roots.'"
"Since she first met Hugh Hefner in 2004, the model has been recognized immediately by her golden hair."
"The former Playboy star has changed a lot this month, especially when she announced her separation from her husband, Hank Basquet."
"Today is my last day to marry this beautiful man," she said excitedly on instagram
"Wow: the 32 year old lady showed off her new hair after leaving the salon in West Hollywood and said," I will always love Hank and open my heart, but now we choose to go our own way. "
"I'm no longer sad and sad, because I believe forever, that's why I say yes, but unfortunately too much fear has been gained in the way."



Number  741
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Rob Kim/Getty Images for Alice + Olivia]”
“One source has revealed to E!”
“However, the goodbye did not happen before the couple made out for around 20 minutes.”
“Kourtney dropped Younes at his home.”
“They had their car at the valet station of the hotel.”
“According to another source, the couple left at 9 o’clock in the morning.”
“They apparently had breakfast in their room before checking out.”
“They often got to that hotel, even though they keep things quite “discreet.”This time, they checked in on Wednesday night and checked out on Thursday morning.”
“News that the hotel is their favorite hangout.”
“In fact, the couple is seen at the hotel quite frequently.”


"[rob King / Getty pictures selected for Alice + Olivia]"
"A source revealed to e!"
"However, after the couple had been making out for about 20 minutes, the farewell did not begin."
"Courtney sent yones home."
"They park in the valet parking area of the hotel."
"Another source said the couple left at 9 am."
"They obviously had breakfast in their room before they checked out."
They often go to that hotel, although they are "cautious". This time, they check in on Wednesday night and check out on Thursday morning
"The news that this hotel is their favorite place to go."
"In fact, the couple showed up a lot in the hotel."



Number  742
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Flawless: The simple look was signature for Victoria's style in recent years, which has also carried into her own brandsAmazing: With the look she certainly proved why she was worthy of such a fashion honour...”
“X vb #spicegirls #friendshipneverends (sic).'”
“And Victoria Beckham proved why she was worthy of such an award as she led the People's Choice Awards red carpet on Sunday in a statement white trouser suit.”
“The 44-year-old stood out in the lightly-coloured ensemble as she attended the star-studded event at Santa Monica's Barker Hangar.”
“Gorgeous Victoria Beckham was putting on a stylish display in a chic white trouser suit on Sunday night as she led the star studded People s Choice Awards in Santa Monica Ever the style icon Victoria showed off her trim figure in the classic white blazer and matching trousers teamed...”
“...with a lace slip style vest and black heels...”
“The mother-of-four sported her signature smile with her brunette tresses pulled into a low-key up-do.”
“Victoria's trip to the awards also proved to be a hectic outing as she also took to Instagram to reveal she was having to do her hair in the car en route to the event.”
“Looking good Ever the style icon Victoria showed off her trim figure in the classic white blazer and matching trousers teamed with a lace slip style vest and black heels Amazing The 44 year old mother of four had her ageless complexion on full display with a simple bronzed smoky...”
“...eye contoured cheeks and a nude lip Hurry up...”


"Flawless: simple modeling is the symbol of Victoria's style in recent years, which is also reflected in her own brand design: she uses this modeling to prove why she deserves such fashion honor..."
“X vb#spicegirls#friendship neverends（sic）。”
"On Sunday, Victoria Beckham wore a white trouser suit to lead the red carpet of the people's Choice Award, which proves why she deserves such an award."
"The 44 year old stood out in a light ensemble at a starry event in Santa Monica's Barker hangar."
"On Sunday night, the gorgeous Victoria Beckham, wearing chic white trousers and leading the star studded people's Choice Awards in Santa Monica, shows her fashion side. Victoria Beckham, the fashion icon, shows her slim figure in classic white suit and matching trousers ”
“… With lace tank top and black heels... "
"The mother of four has her signature smile, pulling her dark hair into a low-key upper body."
"Victoria's award trip has also proved to be a busy outing because she also revealed on instagram that she had to have her hair done in the car on the way to the event."
"It looks good. Victoria, the fashion icon, shows her slim figure in her classic white coat and matching trousers, lace vest and black high-heeled shoes. Surprisingly, the mother of four, 44, shows her eternal skin color with a simple bronze smoked shoe..."
“… Eye contour, cheek and bare lip quick... "



Number  743
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It was bizarre, it was like, what else are you supposed to wear at the beach?” he said.”
““I love you @kellyripa…keep killing it.”Consuelos reiterated his surprise when a viewer called in to ask about the incident on WWHL.”
“...get used to it he continued...”
“Yes she s wearing a bikini at age 47 and will no doubt wear one for many years to come Image zoom Mark Consuelos If that offends you in some way if it triggers you or some other psychosis you re suffering from I suggest you get over it and...”
““She works extremely hard in her professional life and her commitment to exercise, healthy diet is admirable and the benefits show.”
“As a playful tribute to my wife who I’m proud of in endless ways,” he wrote in the comments section.”
“I posted this pic of the women I most admire.”
“Well, now I’m not.”
“But I wanted to be above it.”
“Probably should’ve earlier arguably.”


"It's strange, like, what else should you wear on the beach? "He said
"I love you @ Kelly Ripa Keep killing it. " When an audience called to inquire about the wwhl incident, Consuelos reiterated his surprise
“… Get used to it, he continued
"Yes, she wore a bikini when she was 47, and there is no doubt that she will wear a bikini for many years to come, if it offends you in some way, if it triggers you or other mental illness you are suffering from, I suggest you overcome it, and then..."
"She has worked extremely hard in her career, her commitment to exercise and healthy eating is admirable, and the benefits are obvious."
"As an interesting tribute to my wife, I am proud of her in endless ways," he wrote in the comments
"I posted this picture of the woman I adore the most."
"Well, now I'm not."
"But I want to go beyond it."
"Maybe I should have said it earlier."



Number  744
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She wants to spoil her surrogate and show her gratitude,’ a source claimed.”
“TMZ was the one that reported that Kim’s KKW Fragrance didn’t pass the standards in Australia, New Zealand, and more countries.”
“Is she copying Kylie Jenner’s style?”
“???”
“#kimkardashian A post shared by Kim Kardashian Snapchats ?”
“(@kimksnapchats) on Dec 9, 2017 at 12:32am PST‘I cut my hair even shorter today.”
“Do we like it or is it too short?’ Kim asked on Snapchat on Friday night.”
“Kim’s new look brings to our minds a past style that sported by her youngest sister.”
“The two sisters were seen rocking similar looks and hairstyles throughout the years lots of times.”
“In other news, Kim is currently facing a backlash from outraged customers after her perfume failed to enter their countries.”


"She wanted to spoil her surrogate mother and express her gratitude," a source claimed
"TMZ has reported that Kim's KKW perfume has not passed standards in Australia, New Zealand and more countries."
"Is she imitating Kelly Jenner?"
“???”
"A snapshot post shared by Kim Kardashian?"
"(@ kimksnapchats) December 9, 2017, 12:32 am PST, I cut my hair short today."
"Do we like it or is it too short? "Kim asked at snapchat on Friday night."
"Kim's new look brings us a style of the past, that's her little sister's style."
"Over the years, people have seen the two sisters put on similar shapes and hairstyles many times."
"In other news, Kim is facing fierce objections from angry customers, because her perfume has not entered their country."



Number  745
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Articles:”
“Once Upon a Time returns to ABC on Fridays at 8 p.m. A premiere date for the new fall season has yet to be announced.”
“Lana Parrilla, Colin O’Donoghue, and Robert Carlyle will all return in their staple roles and join forces with adult Henry and Lucy to face the greatest challenge that the residents of the Enchanted Forest have ever encountered.”
“West) and his daughter Lucy (Jane the Virgin’s Alison Fernandez).”
“...tumblrAs shown in the Season 6 finale, the forthcoming season will revolve around a very grown-up Henry (played by The Walking Dead’s Andrew J.”
“We’ll just have to wait and see if the show’s newest additions can fill in the void left by these beloved characters.”
“Clearly, things weren’t looking so good for the show after it lost key cast members Jennifer Morrison, Ginnifer Goodwin, Josh Dallas, Emile de Ravin, Jared Gilmore, and Rebecca Mader in a rather shocking casting shake-up.”
“As of now, details about the five latest additions are scarce, but expect some new information to trickle down at the Once Upon a Time panel at Comic Con San Diego.”
“Both Gabrielle Anwar (Burn Notice) and Dania Ramirez (Devious Maids) have signed on as full-fledged series regulars, while Adelaide Kane (Reign), Mekia Cox (Chicago Med), and Rose Reynolds (Poldark) have been given recurring roles.”
“ABC’s fan favorite, fantasy drama Once Upon a Time is getting a major creative reboot in Season 7, along with a batch of fresh, new faces.”


Related articles:
"There was a time when I came back to ABC at 8pm on Friday, and the premiere date of the new season has not been announced yet."
"Lana parrilla, Colin o'donoho and Robert Carlisle will all return in their main roles and join hands with the grown-up Henry and Lucy to face the biggest challenges faced by the residents of the magic forest."
"West" and his daughter Lucy (Alison Fernandez of the Virgin Mary of Jane)
“… At the end of the sixth season, the coming season will revolve around a very mature Henry (by the walking dead Andrew J
"We can only wait and see if the latest addition to the show can fill the gap left by these lovely characters."
"Obviously, it's not so good after the crew lost key actors like Jennifer Morrison, Ginny Goodwin, Josh Dallas, Emile delavin, Jared Gilmore and Rebecca mad."
"So far, the details of the five latest additions are rare, but some new information is expected to emerge at the once-a-time symposium at the San Diego anime show."
"Gabriel Anwar (Burn Notice) and Dania Ramirez (cunning maid) have signed a full-fledged set of rules, while Adelaide Kane (in power), mekia Cox (Chicago medicine), and rosereynolds (boheir) have been given repeated roles."
"Once upon a time, ABC fans' favorite fantasy show, will have a major creative restart in season 7, as well as a number of new faces."



Number  746
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It could really help her and Zayn take their couple twinning to all new heights.”
“Now the only question is will this photo shoot convince Gigi to finally take the plunge and make the cut for real...”
“The faux style was meant to evoke Jean Seberg s character in the iconic French New Wave film Breathless giving the images a 1960s feel as well as a chic and modern twist on her fourth consecutive Stuart Weitzman campaign...”
“For the campaign, Weitzman decided to switch things up, putting their favorite model in a pixie cut wig by Shay Ashual.”
“But there’s something else striking about these images aside from the footwear–Gigi’s brand new beauty look!”
“It Girl approved Cling ankle boot...”
“In the first image the Vogue cover star wears a black trench coat slung around her shoulders paired with the brand s over the knee white heeled Tiemodel boot and in the second wears a white button down with the...”
“The model returned as the face of the high-end shoe brand for their Fall/Winter 2017 in a series of stark, minimalist black and white images shot by the legendary photographer and personal friend of Gigi, Mario Testino .”


"It really helps her and zayn take their twins to a new level."
"The only question now is whether this photo can convince Gigi to finally make a bold attempt and really get out of the game..."
"This kind of imitation style is to arouse Jean Seberg's role in the iconic French new wave film panting, which gives people a sense of the 1960s. It is also the chic and modern turning point when she took part in Stewart weizman's election campaign for the fourth time in a row..."
"For the sake of the campaign, weizman decided to change the status quo and let their favorite model wear Shay ashual's elf cut wig."
"But apart from shoes, there's something else remarkable about these photos - Gigi's new beautiful look!"
"It girl approved ankle boots..."
"In the first photo, the fashion cover star is wearing a black windbreaker hanging on her shoulder, matching with brand s knee white heel lace up boots. In the second photo, she is wearing a white button with a hem of...."
"The model returned as a spokesperson for high-end shoe brands in a series of stark, minimalist black-and-white photos taken by legendary photographer and Gigi's personal friend Mario Testino."



Number  747
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And he still is doing what he loves—music!”
“Romeo Santos Unveils His Wax Figure at Madame Tussauds (PHOTOS)Although he might not have known much about the music industry back then, that's not the case now.”
“The 36-year-old star shared a video of himself singing a cappella to his song "Sobredosis," and it's as impressive as it gets.”
“...times become a top executive at Tidal and work with artists like Drake and Usher...”
“Romeo Santos Became The 1st Latino To Light Up The Empire State Building With Album Golden Little did that young Romeo know that he d go off to join one of the most successful Latin groups then go off to have a spectacular solo career sell out Yankee Stadium multiple...”
“"In 2000 with my friend Randy, without knowing a thing about the music industry, only doing what I love," the singer captioned the video.”
“We see the bachata king sitting in a stairwell just playing the guitar and hitting those notes that only he can hit.”
“Romeo Santos shared this TBT from almost 18 years ago of himself and a friend.”
“He's always had it, and here's the proof!”


"He's still making the music he loves!"
"Romeo Santos unveiled his wax figure (photo) at Madame Tussauds Wax Museum. Although he may not know much about the music industry at that time, it is not the case now."
"The 36 year old star shared an impressive video of himself singing an unaccompanied chorus for his song" sobredosis. "
“…… The times became an executive of Chaozhou people, working with artists such as Drake and usher... "
"Romeo Santos became the first Latino to light up the Empire State Building with his album a little bit of gold. The young Romeo knew that he would join one of the most successful Latin groups, and then have a spectacular personal career and sell out many Yankee stadiums..."
"When I was with my friend Randy in 2000, I knew nothing about the music industry and just did what I liked to do," the singer wrote in the video
"We see King Bachata sitting in the stairwell playing the guitar, playing notes that only he can play."
"Romeo Santos shared his TBT with a friend 18 years ago."
"He always has it. That's the evidence!"



Number  748
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Jenner later shared the first photo of her newborn daughter, which quickly became the most-liked Instagram post of all time with over 17 million likes.”
“I understand you're used to me bringing you along on all my journeys," she wrote in a statement, before sharing an intimate Youtube video of her pregnancy journey.”
“"I'm sorry for keeping you in the dark through all the assumptions.”
“February 1 and shared the news via her Instagram account...”
“A post shared by Kylie Jenner Snapchats kylizzlesnapchats on Mar 1 2018 at 1 32pm PST A post shared by Kylie Jenner Snapchats kylizzlesnapchats on Mar 1 2018 at 1 22pm PST After keeping her pregnancy a secret for the entire nine months the 20 year old gave birth on...”
“Kylie showed off her post baby body with a series of snapchats along with flowers gifted to her from her baby s father rapper Travis Scott...”
“READ MORE Kylie Jenner welcomes baby girl with video The top five conspiracy theories about Kylie Jenner Kylie Jenner posts picture of her new baby my angel baby is 1 month old today A post shared by Kylie kyliejenner on Mar 1 2018 at 2 50pm PST Earlier this week...”
“"My angel baby is 1 month old today," she captioned the photo.”
“Instagram / Kylie Jenner "My angel baby is 1 month old today."”
“With hair styled and an immaculately made-up face, she leans against what looks like a garage door with her daughter in her arms.”


"Jenner later shared her first photo of her new daughter, which quickly became the most popular post instagram has ever seen, with more than 17 million hits."
"I know you're used to me taking you on all my trips," she wrote in a statement She then shared an intimate video of her pregnancy on YouTube
"I'm sorry I kept you in the dark."
"On February 1, she shared the news through her instagram account..."
"Kylie Jenner snapchats kylizzlesnapchats shared a post at 1:32 p.m. Pacific Standard Time on March 1, 2018. Kylie Jenner snapchats kylizzlesnapchats shared a post at 1:22 p.m. Pacific Standard Time on March 1, 2018. She kept her pregnancy secret for nine months. She was 20 years old in I have a baby
"Kelly used a series of snapshots to show her baby's body after birth, and the flowers that her baby's father, rapper Travis Scott, gave her..."
"Learn more Kylie Jenner welcome baby girl with video about Kylie Jenner's five conspiracy theories Kylie Jenner released photos of her new baby my angel baby is only 1 month old today Kylie Kylie Jenner shared a post at 2:50 PM PST earlier this week on March 1, 2018..."
"My baby angel is only a month old today," she wrote under the title of the photo
"Instagram / Kylie Jenner" my angel baby is only one month old today
With neat hair and a perfect face, she leaned against the garage door with her daughter in her arms



Number  749
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The ex factor: The couple split last summer after beginning an on-off relationship in 2014 (pictured at the Teen Choice Awards in July 2016)The couple were then pictured enjoying a stroll through Manhattan on Tuesday, appearing to mark the beginning of a public reunion.”
“'Brooklyn and Chloe arrived together and she was chatting with other guests about how they had got back together,' a source explained.”
“Making the most of her long lean legs she slipped into a thigh skimming LBD adding a casual touch in a pair of Dr Martens Leggy The plunging dress featured a babydoll neckline revealing a glimpse of her tanned decolletage And just hours later Chloe Moretz appeared to confirm the...”
“Girls' night out!”
“Speaking to People magazine, Madison confessed: 'I can't do long distance.'”
“But on Wednesday the singer, who spent much of the summer with Brooklyn in LA, confirmed they had decided against embarking on a relationship due to the long distance.”
“He's great, he's a cutie, he's one of my best friends ... We hang out almost every day.'”
“But we're both very busy ...”
“Admitting they were into each other, she told AOL at the time: 'We are definitely crushing on each other.”
“In July, Madison appeared to confirm her relationship with Brooklyn, revealing they 'hang out almost every day'.”


"The first factor: the couple broke up last summer after a breakup in 2014 (photo taken at the youth choice awards ceremony in July 2016), and then the couple were photographed walking in Manhattan on Tuesday, which seems to mark the beginning of a public reunion."
"Brooklyn is with Chloe and she's talking to other guests about how they got back together," one source explained
"To make the most of her slender legs, she put on a LBD that skips her thighs, adding a casual feel to a long Dr Martens leg. The drop dress features a baby's curled neckline revealing a suntanned stripper, and a few hours later Chloe Moretz seemed to confirm that... "
"Girl's night!"
"I can't run long distances," Madison said in an interview with people magazine
"But on Wednesday, the singer, who spent the summer with Brooklyn in Los Angeles, confirmed that they had decided not to fall in love because of the distance."
"He's great, he's cute, he's one of my best friends... We are together almost every day
"But we're all busy..."
"Admitting that they love each other, she told AOL at the time:" we must be fighting each other. "
"In July, Madison seemed to confirm her relationship with Brooklyn, revealing that they were" together almost every day. "



Number  750
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I am excited to join MTV’s ‘Teen Mom OG.’ I look forward to sharing my experiences and hope that I can help others on their journey,” she captioned the post.”
“Confirming the news, the 27-year-old mother of three shared a shot of herself posing with her children, while a small film crew stood in the background.”
“...announced they would be leaving the show...”
““We’re not returning to Teen Mom this season.”
“The network told us they don’t want to show Ryan as a recovering addict,” Mackenzie told E!”
“News on Friday, claiming that MTV “did want to enter a contract with our unborn baby and have the baby film with Ryan’s parents so it would look like someone else is raising it.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“They want to want to talk about us but they don t want to pay us and film us Ryan remarked alleging that even though he s sober now his ex Maci Bookout and fellow Teen Mom OG star told MTV she s not going to film unless I enter...”
“...rehab again and quit the show The couple announced earlier this year that they are pregnant with their first child...”
“Additionally, Ryan has 9-year-old son Bentley with Bookout, while Mackenzie has 4-year-old son Hudson with ex Zachary Stephens.”
“Image zoom Mackenzie Standifer Edwards and Ryan Edwards | Credit: Mackenzie Edwards/InstagramEdwards also spoke out against MTV on Friday as he shared a powerful message about addiction on Instagram.”


"I'm very happy to join MTV's young mom og.". I look forward to sharing my experience and hope I can help others on the journey, "she wrote in the title of the post
"To confirm the news, the 27 year old mother of three shared a picture of herself and her children, with a small camera crew standing in the background."
“… Announce that they will withdraw from the show... "
"We're not going back to teenage moms this season."
"The network told us they didn't want Ryan to be a recovering addict," McKenzie told e! "
Friday's news claimed that mtv "really wants to sign a contract with our unborn child and make baby movies with Ryan's parents, so it looks like someone else is raising a child." Get news, feature, etc
"They want to talk about us, but they don't want to pay us and the movie. We Ryan said that even if he's sober now, his former MACI booking and colleague teenage mom og star told MTV that she won't go to the movie unless I enter..."
“… The couple announced earlier this year that they were pregnant with their first child
"In addition, Ryan has nine year old sons Bentley and bookout, while Mackenzie has four year old sons Hudson and former Zachary Stephens."
"Image zoom Mackenzie standifer Edwards and Ryan Edwards | image source: Mackenzie Edwards / instagram Edwards also publicly opposed MTV on Friday because he shared a powerful message about addiction on instagram."



Number  751
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"I really valued that time, for me as well, although i didn't think it at the time."”
“"I think you can get quite consumed by a relationship when you're younger.”
“After meeting at university, the pair were close pals for more than a year and lived in a shared house together before romance finally blossomed.”
“When asked about the moment they first laid eyes on each other, William said he would have to "wrack his brains" to remember it.”
“But Kate on the other hand remembers the moment perfectly, and it's fair to say it understandably probably wasn't her most cool and collected moment.”
“(Image: PA)During the couple's engagement interview back in 2010 she recalled the moment she first saw her future husband.”
“She said: "I actually went bright red when I met you and scuttled off feeling very shy about meeting you.”
“"William wasn't there for quite a bit of the time initially, he wasn't there from Fresher's Week, so it did take a bit of time for us to get to know each other.”
“"But we did become very close friends from quite early on."”
“How sweet!”


"I really cherish that time, even though I didn't think so at that time."
"I think you will be consumed by a relationship when you are young."
"After they met in college, they were close friends for more than a year. They lived together in a shared house. Later, their relationship finally blossomed."
When asked about the moment when they first met, William said he had to "rack his brains" to remember
"But Kate, on the other hand, has a fresh memory of that moment. Understandably, it may not have been her calmest and most calm moment."
"(photo: PA) during the couple's engagement interview in 2010, she recalled the moment when she first met her future husband."
"When I met you, I really blushed and was afraid to see you," she said
"William wasn't here for a long time at the beginning, and he hasn't been since freshman week, so it did take us a while to get to know each other."
"But we became very close friends very early on."
How sweet



Number  752
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In response, Kim, who is ride-or-die for her sisters in the end, commented, "Nice pics from your 'boys trip'."”
“...the one of my Lord.”
“Why?”
“Luckily, thanks to things like Instagram, fans know the sisters eventually buried the hatchet.”
“Say it isn't so, Kourt!”
“Aye, aye, aye.”
“In the following episodes, Kourt even pondered taking her children and celebrating the holidays separately from everyone else.”
“In the show, fans watched in wonder as she shouted over the phone to Khloé how "disgusting" she feels being a part of the famous clan.”
“Thanks to things like finding a new therapist and her then-growing relationship with Younes Bendjima, Kourtney described feeling disconnected and, for lack of better words, "so over" her family's dynamic.”
“Fans are just now learning through current KUWTK episodes that while we were all busy scouring the earth for clues about Kylie Jenner and Khloé Kardashian's pregnancies, Kourtney was at a personal crossroads.”


In response, Kim, who was riding or dying at the end of her sisters, commented: "nice photos from your 'boy trip'"
"My master"
"Why?"
"Fortunately, thanks to things like instagram, fans know that the sisters have finally laid the groundwork."
"Say no, Kurt!"
"Yes, yes, yes."
"In the next few episodes, Kurt even considered taking his children and other people to celebrate the festival separately."
"During the show, fans were surprised to see her shouting to Heroe on the phone, how disgusting she is as a member of this famous tribe."
"Thanks to finding a new therapist and her growing relationship with yones benjima, coultney described herself as feeling disconnected from the outside world and was very disappointed that" her family was full of vitality "due to the lack of better language."
"Fans have just learned from the current" kutke "show that kurtney is at a personal crossroads while we are all busy searching the earth for clues about Kelly Jenner and Carol Kardashian's pregnancy."



Number  753
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also isn’t ruling out any other alternative paths to acting and teases that she might be interested in pursuing politics one day.”
“The actress is now promoting her new film Adrift alongside her costar, Sam Claflin.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“...experiences outside of this industry and fall in love with acting again and Big Little Lies did that for me Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE”
“Image zoom Shailene Woodley Credit Slaven Vlasic Getty While Woodley says she wouldn t change the Divergent series for the world she reveals filming the last one was a bit of a hard experience for everyone and that was really what made me think I need to have some human...”
“Image zoom Nicole Kidman, Shailene Woodley and Reese Witherspoon on Big Little Lies | Credit: Hilary Bronwyn Gayle/Courtesy HBO“I read it, fell in love with it, and Laura, who I had worked with on The Fault in Our Stars, called me and that was really the push,” she said.”
“'”Her refusal to read the script might have ended things before they began, but her agents insisted she read it before she said no, telling her Reese Witherspoon, Nicole Kidman and Laura Dern were involved.”
““I didn’t know what it was or who was involved, I just said, ‘Thanks, I’m still not interested.”
“'”“They respected me and didn’t send me anything for almost a year until Big Little Lies,” Woodley said.”
“I called my agents and said, ‘Please don’t send me any more scripts; I need to explore other avenues.”


"She did not rule out any other way of acting, and joked that she might be interested in politics one day."
The actress is working with her partner Sam crawling to promote her new film "drifting."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
“…… I fell in love with acting again after my experience outside this industry, and those big and small lies made me want to keep up with the latest news of people. "
"Image zooming shawlin Woodley credits Slaven fraccighetti, and Woodley says she won't change the different series in the world, and she reveals that filming the last one is a bit of a difficult experience for everyone, which really makes me feel I need some people..."
"Nicole Kidman, Shereen Woodley and Reese Witherspoon in little lies | source: Hilary Bronwyn Gayle / HBO" I read the book and fell in love with it, Laura, who worked with me to deal with the mistakes in our star and called me, which was the real driving force, "she said
"Her refusal to read the script may have ended before it started, but her agent insisted that she read the script before saying no and told her that Reese Witherspoon, Nicole Kidman and Laura Dean were all involved."
"I don't know what it is, I don't know who is involved, I just say, thank you, I'm still not interested."
"They respected me and didn't send me anything for nearly a year until I lied," Woodley said
"I called my agent and said, please don't send me any more scripts, I need to explore other ways."



Number  754
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And as much as I’d like to believe that these Brown memes would never get to that place, the internet has unfortunately shown itself to be more than capable of becoming the worst version of itself when given a chance.”
“Each reaction to the irony moves the goalposts a little bit each time, to the point that it can become hard to know what field you’re playing on.”
“...gay men with her car and a recent variation that ascribes false stories of hateful racism to Brown...”
“Like this one a completely farcical tale of Brown throwing a hot McDonald s McCafé beverage at someone wearing a gay pride T shirt There are also crasser more to the point variations which mainly consist of an obviously bad photoshop of Brown saying that she wants to run over...”
“#TakeDownMillieBobbyBrown — bash (@HlGHPRlNCESS) November 18, 2017That spawned the “Millie Bobby Brown is homophobic” meme, with the accompanying troll hashtag #TakeDownMillieBobbyBrown, that’s circulated in the past few days, which has a few variations that resemble those initial reactions.”
“...one day i saw millie bobby brown in the mall and i asked for a selfie and she said "i don't take selfies with fags, homo sex is sin" and broke my iphone X. i couldn't stop crying i'm so ashamed.”
“What drives the joke further is the trollish response of asking for proof of this nonsense story and then @Kelsfiona responding with an obviously fake image:That meme spurred this very similar, also ridiculous fake story about Brown being homophobic:it's time to share my story.”
“A troll account, @Kelsfiona — who changed their account to @Kelsbich, which is now suspended — tweeted a preposterous, fabricated story about meeting Brown at the airport, which ends with Brown stomping on a hijab.”
“In fact, the meme actually started in November 2017 with portraying Brown as anti-Islam.”
“Brown seems like a such a sweet, honest young girl, which is why contrasting her image with such heinous statements evokes a reaction.”


"Although I would like to believe that these brown memes will never appear in that place, unfortunately, the Internet has proved that it has the ability to be the worst version of itself once it has the chance."
"Every reaction to sarcasm moves the goalpost a little bit so that it's hard to know where you're playing
“… The gay man in her car and a recent variant blame Brown for the false story of racism and hatred. "
"Like this completely funny story, brown throws a hot mccaffey drink to people wearing gay proud T-shirts and has crasser more focused changes, mainly including an obviously bad Photoshop. Brown says she wants to surpass..."
"Takedownmilliebobbybrown bash (@ hlghprlness) on November 18, 2017, it gave birth to the meme of" milliebobbybrown is homophobia ". Along with the troll label" takedownmilliebobbybrown ", it has spread in the past few days, and it has some variants similar to the original reaction."
“…… One day I saw Millie Bob Brown in the mall. I asked for a selfie. She said, "I don't take selfie with fags. Homosexuality is a crime." then she broke my iPhone X. I can't help crying. I'm so ashamed. "
"What makes this joke go further is a prank like answer, asking for proof of this nonsense, and then @ kelsfiona uses an apparently false answer data chart: that meme stimulates this very similar and ridiculous false story phobia about Brown is H: is that right? It's time to share my story
"A troll account, @ kelsfiona - he changed his account to @ kelsbich, and now it's suspended - tweeted a ridiculous, fabricated story about meeting Brown at the airport, and finally Brown stamped his headscarf."
"In fact, this meme actually started in November 2017, portraying brown as an anti Islamic image."
"Brown seems to be such a sweet, honest young girl, that's why it's a reaction to compare her image with such heinous remarks."



Number  755
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are still open to try and settling this without judicial intervention.”Neither a rep nor an attorney for Spears immediately returned a request for comment.”
““This is the choice they have made, and they will now have to deal with it.”
“Federline, 40, claims that Spears’ increased earnings compared with his decreasing income create “an extreme disparity” in their sons’ lifestyles from her home to his, documents obtained by The Blast revealed Tuesday.”
“Federline alleged in the documents that his work as a DJ nets him less than 1 percent of Spears’ reported $34 million income because he is “less of a name” than he was in 2008 when he took in six figures.”
“The former backup dancer claims he earns roughly $3,000 per month but that he doesn’t know how much Spears, 36, truly earns because she has allegedly refused to turn over her tax returns or reveal her income.”
“The couple, who were married from 2004 to 2007, agreed at the time that Spears would make $20,000 monthly child support payments to Federline for sons Sean Preston, 12, and Jayden James, 11.”
“She also gave him $1.3 million at the time of their split.”
“Spears agreed to the terms through her father, Jamie, who controls her finances through a conservatorship to this day following her highly publicized breakdown in 2007.”
“Since then, she’s landed two lucrative Las Vegas residencies, gone on tour, released four new albums, five compilation albums, 18 fragrances and a lingerie line.”
“Federline laments in the documents that Spears is a single woman who lives alone in a 13 264 square foot Neoclassical Italianate villa on 21 acres of land in a gated community with an elevator a library a media game room 3 500 bottle wine cellar an additional 1 200”


"We are still willing to try to resolve this matter without judicial intervention." Neither a representative of spears nor a lawyer immediately responded to requests for comment
"It's a choice they made, and they have to face it now."
Federline, 40, claimed that the increase in Spears' income caused a "significant difference" in their son's lifestyle compared with the decrease in his income, documents obtained by the explosion revealed on Tuesday
"Federline claims in the document that his work as a DJ makes him less than 1% of the $34 million reported by spears because he is" not worthy of the name "of his six figure income in 2008
"The former backup dancer claims that he earns about $3000 a month, but he doesn't know what the 36 year old's real income is because he is said to have refused to hand in his tax returns or disclose his income."
"The couple, who got married between 2004 and 2007, agreed that spears would pay Federline $20000 a month in alimony, Sean Preston, 12, and Jaden James, 11."
"When they broke up, she gave him back $1.3 million."
"Spears agreed to these terms through her father, Jamie, who has been controlling her finances as a housekeeper since her much publicized collapse in 2007."
"Since then, she has won two lucrative Las Vegas residences, touring, distributing four new albums, five compilation albums, 18 perfume and a series of underwear."
"Federline laments in the document that Spears is a single woman living alone in a 21 acre, 13264 square foot neo classical Italian villa, a gated community with elevators, libraries, media game rooms, 3500 bottle cellars and another 1200 cellars."



Number  756
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“American Horror Story: Cult airs Tuesdays at 10/9c on FX.”
“But either way, isn't the fun of theorizing what really matters?”
“The next ones, however, that's where all the fun begins...”
“This one really is pretty vague, to be honest.”
“Maybe Ally dies, maybe she kills people and gets all bloody in the process.”
“Seeing as this a horror series, this doesn't really give too much away.”
“This American Horror Story: Cult Theory Suggests Winter Is the Real Big BadThe first credit to appear onscreen, Sarah Paulson's name is splashed with blood.”
“Let's break it down point-by-point.”
“So what might the Cult opening credits reveal?”
“You may unsubscribe at any time.”


"American horror story: a cult show on FX at 10 / 9 on Tuesday."
"But anyway, isn't the fun of theorizing important?"
"But for the next few times, all the fun starts here..."
"To be honest, it's really vague."
"Maybe Ellie's dead, maybe she'll kill, and bleed in the process."
"Given that it's a horror series, it doesn't reveal much," he said
"This American horror story: the cult theory holds that winter is the first time a real villain appears on the screen, and Sarah Paulson's name is splashed with blood."
"Let's break it down bit by bit."
"What will the opening ceremony of the cult reveal?"
"You can unsubscribe at any time."



Number  757
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She responded to Adele's post with some love, saying ... "And I will always love you!"”
“Whatever the occasion ... it caught Dolly's attention.”
“Unclear why exactly Adele's shouting her out right now -- although it was Dolly's birthday a little over a week ago.”
“We wish We could possess an ounce of your ability."”
“We love you!”
“Adele gave Dolly major props with the caption ... "The effortless queen of song, Dolly Parton!”
“The "Hello" singer played dress up to virtually become the iconic country star -- blonde wig, pantsuit, and lots of cleavage ... while clutching a guitar.”
“Adele did her best Dolly Parton impersonation ... and it's now Dolly approved.”


"She was full of love for Adele's post, she said..." I love you forever! "
"On any occasion... It caught Dolly's attention
"It's not clear why Adele is calling her out now - even though it was Dolly's birthday more than a week ago."
"We hope we can have a little bit of your ability."
"We love you!"
"Adele gave dolly some important props, which said..." Easy queen, Dolly Parton
The "hello" singer dressed up as an iconic country star - blonde hair, pants, and lots of cleavage... "Clutching the guitar."
"Adele did her best to imitate Dolly Parton... Now Dolly's approved



**Something goes wrong**
“Don’t miss Glee every Saturday at 20:00 UAE on America Plus and OSN SERIES HD – the same week as it airs in the US”
“I’ll rubbish reality television, take a bath or a shower, give myself a nice little face mask and go to bed.”
“Of course, she’s gorgeous.”
“So I get Rachel.”
“Boys didn’t look at me in high school and think I was the pretty girl.”
“I was never pretty enough to be the pretty girl and I was never quirky enough to be the quirky girl.”
“I was always told that I wasn’t pretty enough to be on television.”
“I grew up in a high school where if you didn’t have a nose job, money and if you weren’t thin, you weren’t cool, popular, and beautiful.”
“I am an unconventional beauty.”
“Rachel’s status is quite often seen as very geeky, you can relate to that?”


"Don't miss the United Arab Emirates' glee show on America plus and OSN series HD at 20:00 every Saturday - the same week in the United States"
"I would throw away the reality show, take a bath or shower, give myself a nice little mask and go to bed."
"Of course, she's beautiful."
"So I found Rachel."
"In high school, boys didn't look at me and thought I was the beautiful girl."
"I've never been beautiful enough to be a pretty girl, and I've never been eccentric enough to be an eccentric girl."
"There are always people who say I'm not beautiful enough to be on TV."
"I grew up in a high school, where if you don't have a nose, no money, if you're not thin, you're not cool, unpopular, or beautiful."
"I'm a different beauty."
"Can you understand that Rachel's status is often seen as a geek?"



**Something goes wrong**
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews subscribe to our new podcast ‘In Case You Missed Us’ below!”
“She was also on Bachelor Pad and Bachelor in Paradise and dated The Bachelorette‘s Kiptyn Locke until they split in 2014.”
“The Bachelor‘s Tenley Molzahn married to her longtime boyfriend, Taylor Leopold.”
“The happy pair tied the knot in a romantic outdoor ceremony on Friday, April 27.”
“The TV personality, 33, shared the news with a photo of them on their honeymoon at Omni La Costa Resort & Spa in California on Sunday, April 29, and gave an update on their life as newlyweds.”
““Friday was simply the best day of our lives, but yesterday waking up as his wife made it even better!” she captioned a snap of them surrounded by pink flowers.”
““Soaking up time with just one another – mini-mooning is the way to go!”
“Thank you @omnilacosta for giving us this beautiful space to rest & enjoy being newlyweds!”
“!”Guests who attended the nuptials also shared photos from the wedding and reception on Instagram as they congratulated the couple.”
“Molzahn shared snaps of herself and Leopold leading up to their big day.”


"For the latest celebrity news and interviews, please subscribe to our new podcast 'in case you miss us'!"
"She also dated kiptin Locke in bachelor's apartment and Bachelor in heaven until they broke up in 2014."
The bachelor, Stanley morzan, married her old boyfriend, Tyler Leopold
The happy couple married at a romantic outdoor wedding on Friday, April 27
The 33 year old TV celebrity shared their honeymoon at the omni La Costa Resort & Spa in California with a photo on Sunday, April 29, and gave an update on their newly married life
"Friday is the best day of our lives, but yesterday his wife made it even better! "She drew a subtitle on the picture surrounded by pink flowers."
"Enjoy time with others - little moon is the best choice!"
"Thank @ omnilacosta for giving us this beautiful rest space and enjoying our newlywed life!"
"!" while congratulating the couple, the wedding guests also shared photos of the wedding and wedding banquet on instagram. "
"Molzahn shared photos of her and Leopold before the big day."



**Something goes wrong**
“Image zoom Credit: Arie Luyendyk Jr./Instagram...”
“They fueled up with some tasty-looking fish tacos before calling it a day.”
“Image zoom Credit: Arie Luyendyk Jr./InstagramImage zoom Credit: Arie Luyendyk Jr./InstagramCapturing all those ocean-side images caused the couple to work up an appetite.”
“Image zoom Credit: Lauren Burnham/InstagramImage zoom Credit: Lauren Burnham/InstagramBurnham isn’t much better herself, with Luyendyk Jr. writing “caught ya,” and “she’s still at it,” on two shots of her taking in the views from a rocky cliff at Freshwater Beach.”
““Lol here we go again,” she said on a video of Luyendyk Jr. snapping the scenery with his phone, and then pointing at her once he realized he’d been discovered.”
“Gave Lauren BurnhamShe also caught the race car driver/realtor playing tourist.”
“RELATED VIDEO: All About the Bold 3.5-Carat Engagement Ring Bachelor Arie Luyendyk, Jr.”
“Image zoom Credit: Arie Luyendyk Jr./InstagramImage zoom Credit: Lauren Burnham/Instagram“Bye Darling Harbour,” Burnham captioned this photo of her and her fiancé — who proposed to Burnham after infamously breaking up with his original choice, newly minted Bachelorette Becca Kufrin — while they were sailing the high seas.”
“The neighborhood boasts restaurants, gardens, museums and cruises — the first and last of which the reality stars tested out for themselves, as Luyendyk Jr.’s avocado toast and Burnham’s boat-side pictures prove.”
“Image zoom Credit: Lauren Burnham/InstagramImage zoom Credit: Lauren Burnham/InstagramRELATED VIDEO: Lauren Burnham Says She’s Hoping to a Start a Family With Arie LuyendykBurnham posted more photos of their adventure on her Instagram Stories, including their jaunt through the sightseeing hotspot of Darling Harbour.”


"Image scaling credit: Arie luyendyk Jr. / instagram..."
"They had some yummy looking fish tacos, and then it was over."
"Image zooming thanks to Arie luyendyk Jr. / instagram image zoom thanks to Arie luyendyk Jr. / instagram capturing all these pictures on the ocean side make the couple have a big appetite."
"Image zooming credit: Lauren Burnham / instagram image zoom credit: Lauren Burnham / instagram Burnham himself is not much better. Young luyandick took two photos on the rocky cliff of Tanshui beach, and wrote" catch you "and" she's still there "respectively
"Haha, here we are again," she said in a video of young luyandik taking pictures of the scenery on his mobile phone. When he realized he was found, he pointed to her and said
"To Lauren Burnham, and she's got a racer / real estate agent for a tour."
"Related video: all about the bold 3.5 carat engagement ring by bachelor Ali luyandik, small."
"Thanks to Arie luyendyk Jr / instagram image zoom, thanks to Lauren Burnham / instagram's" goodbye to Darling Harbor ", Burnham added the title to this picture of her and her fiance, who, while sailing on the high seas, disreputably broke up with their first choice, the new Bachelor Becca kufrin and proposed to Burnham."
"The neighborhood is proud of restaurants, gardens, museums and cruise ships - the first and last of which were personally experienced by reality TV stars, as evidenced by young luyandick's avocado toast and Bynum's boat side photos."
"Image zooming source: Lauren Burnham / instagram image zooming source: Lauren Burnham / instagram Related videos: Lauren Burnham said she wanted to get married with Arie luyendyk Burnham, and she posted more adventure photos on instagram, including their trip to Darling Harbor."



**Something goes wrong**
“Louis Vuitton and Repossi jewelry Photo Getty Images Wiz Khalifa in Thom Browne Photo Getty Images Stacy Martin in Miu Miu Photo Getty Images...”
“Keri Russell in Rag Bone and David Webb jewelry and Matthew Rhys Photo Getty Images Yolanda Hadid and Anwar Hadid Photo Shutterstock Future in custom H M Photo Getty Images Thandie Newton in Monse Photo Getty Images Olivia Cooke and Lucas Hedges in Burberry Photo Getty Images Rila Fukushima in...”
“Lyons with Buccellati jewelry and Paul Feig Photo Shutterstock Aziz Ansari in Ermenegildo Zegna Couture Photo Shutterstock Natasha Poly in Michael Kors Collection Photo Getty Images Kate Bosworth in Tory Burch Photo Getty Images Frank Ocean in Balmain Photo BFA Shutterstock Alexander Skarsgård in Ermenegildo Zegna Couture Photo Getty Images...”
“Ysaunny Brito and Olivier Rousteing in Balmain Photo Getty Images A AP Rocky and Ashton Sanders in Calvin Klein by Appointment Photo BFA Shutterstock Celine Dion in Versace and Bulgari jewelry Photo Getty Images Kiko Mizuhara in Margiela Photo Getty Images Daria Strokous in Christian Dior Photo Getty Images Jenna...”


"Louis Vuitton & amp; rebosey jewelry Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set Photo Set..."
"Kerry Russell in rag bone and David Webb in jewelry and Matthews in customized h m photography by Yolanda Hadid and Anwar Hadid by sandy Newton in Mons photography by Olivia cook and Lucas hedge by Burberry photography by Rila Fukushima in..."
Lyon with bucherati jewelry and Paul Figg photo shutterstock Aziz Ansari in Ermenegildo Zegna fashion photo shutterstock Natasha Pauli in Michael Coles collection photo Getty photo Kate Bosworth in toliburg photo Getty photo Frank ocean in balman photo BFA Shutterstock Alexandria scargas road in Ermenegildo Zegna fashion photography Getty "image..."
"Isani Brito and Olivier rostan in balman, Daria strokus in Christian Dior, Jenna, Daria strokus in Calvin Klein, Versace, Bulgari jewelry, margara mizuhara..."



**Something goes wrong**
“[Laughs] The love of my wife for her loving me the way she does and holding me down the way she does has been everything for me.”
“My older kids know everything about me and they still love me.”
“Was there any part of you that was reluctant to replay the more negative parts of your life in the movie?”
“It was a very peaceful meeting, but I was letting her know that not only did I live, but I’m the biggest thing since sliced bread right now.”
“She was so elated and shocked to see me, she gave me a big hug.”
“I didn’t forget her name.”
“Her name was Mrs. Schwartz.”
“When [1988’s] Don’t Be Cruel came out, we was on tour so I went up to the school to see her.”
“One of my teachers told me I would never make it to be 17.”
“Have you started thinking about your 50th birthday?”


(laughter) my wife's love for me is her love for me. Her love for me is everything she has for me
"My older kids know everything about me, and they still love me."
"Are you reluctant to repeat the more negative parts of your life in movies?"
"It was a very quiet meeting, but I wanted her to know that I was not only alive, but the biggest thing since slicing bread."
"She was very happy and shocked to see me and gave me a big hug."
"I didn't forget her name."
"Her name is Mrs. Schwartz."
"When don't be cruel came out in 1988, we were on tour, so I went to school to see her."
"One of my teachers told me that I would never be 17."
"Have you started thinking about your 50th birthday?"



**Something goes wrong**
“1 500 Wedding Favours 700 Luxury Facilities 4 000”
“Floristry 16 000 Photography 3 500 Videography 4 000 Cake 2 600 Stationery 5 125 Music 6 750 Bridesmaids Outfits 2 250 Flower Girls and Page Boys Outfits 1 698 Church Fees 456 Decoration and Production 6 000 Hair and Makeup 1 700 Groomswear 6 050 Veil 2 000 Entertainers...”
“...posh...”
“It is estimated the wedding will cost 15 times more than the average big day - despite the power couple opting to have their reception at Pippa Middleton's £6million family home.”
“The Middleton's have shelled out £4,000 for "luxury" outdoor toilets complete with fresh linen and posh soaps.”
“Here is the wedding day - by numbers.”
“1.”
“Venue/Marquee – £65,000Although the reception is being hosted at the Middleton's home, they are still expecting 350 guests, meaning a huge - and deluxe - marquee is required.”
“(Image: Sunday Mirror)This, Bridebook estimates, will start at £25,000 but can easily go much higher.”
“Even though it's May, that's no guarantee of good weather either.”


"1500 weddings, 700 sets of discount, 4000 sets of luxury facilities"
"Flower art 16 000 photography 3 500 video 4 000 cake 2 600 stationery 5 125 music 6 750 Bridesmaid clothing 2 250 flower children clothing 1 698 church expenses 456 decoration and production 6 000 hair and makeup 1 700 bridegroom oath 6 050 veil 2 000 artists..."
“… Fashion... "
"It's estimated that the cost of the wedding will be 15 times higher than the average big day - even though the powerful couple chose to hold a wedding banquet at Pippa Middleton's 6 million pound home."
The Middletons spent 4000 pounds on a "luxury" outdoor toilet with fresh linen and high-end soap
"It's the wedding day - by number."
“1.”
"Venue / tent - ￡ 65000 although the reception is held at Middleton's home, they still expect 350 guests, which means a huge luxury tent is needed."
"(photo source: Sunday Mirror) bridebook estimates that the price will start at 25000, but it will easily be much higher."
"Even if it's may, there's no guarantee that the weather will be fine."



**Something goes wrong**
“Click through the gallery below to see The View hosts through the years!”
“You can catch Whoopi, Joy Behar, Sara Haines, Jedidiah Bila, Paula Faris, and Sunny Hostin weekdays at 11 a.m. EST on ABC.”
“I’ve got movies I need to direct, I got books I gotta finish.”She added, “This was great, and I love doing it, but you know, it’s been a while.” We’re just glad that Whoopi had a change of heart!”
“I’ve got stuff to do.”
““Because I have to go and grow.”
““I have to do it, baby,” the Sister Act star said.”
“Back in September 2016, Whoopi shared during a visit to The Wendy Williams Show that she “probably wouldn’t” return for Season 21 of the show.”
“Watch the video below to see what Whoopi revealed about coming back!”
“In a new interview with E News, the 61-year-old actress opened up about her 10-year-long stint on the ABC talk show — and shared what gave her a change of heart about returning.”
“There have been a plethora of rumors going around for the past year that Whoopi Goldberg would not be returning for Season 21 of The View, however, the actress says that wasn’t entirely true.”


"Click the gallery below to see the host view over the years!"
"At 11 a.m. EST on weekdays, you can see UBI, Joey Bihar, Sarah Haines, jedidia bila, Paula Faris and sunshine Horst on ABC."
"I've got movies to direct and books to read," she added. "It's great. I love doing it, but you know, it's been a while." We're glad UBI changed his mind! "
"I have something to do."
"Because I want to grow up."
"I have to, baby," said the sister
"Back in September 2016, Whoopi said in an interview with Wendy Williams that she" probably won't "come back for season 21."
"Watch the video below and see what Whoopi reveals back!"
"In a recent interview with e-news, the 61 year old actress made public her 10-year working experience on ABC talk show and shared the reasons why she changed her mind about the return."
"In the past year, there have been a lot of rumors that UBI Goldberg won't be back in the 21st season of point of view, but the actress said it's not entirely true."



Number  765
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[15]Filmography [ edit ]Film [ edit ]Television [ edit ]”
“[6]Hudson starred in The WB series The Mountain from 2004 to 2005; the show was canceled after 13 episodes.”
“He is known for his roles as Adam Rhodes in the CBS comedy series Rules of Engagement (2007–2013), Jeff Fordham on the ABC musical drama series Nashville (2013–2015) and Wes Gardner in the Fox horror comedy Scream Queens.”
“He appeared as one of the main cast members of the ABC sitcom Splitting Up Together, produced by Ellen DeGeneres.”
“Early life [ edit ]Hudson was born in Los Angeles to Academy Award-winning actress Goldie Hawn and musician Bill Hudson.”
“[1] After his parents divorced in 1980, he and his sister, actress Kate Hudson, were raised in Colorado by their mother and her partner, actor Kurt Russell.”
“He has four half-siblings: Emily and Zachary, from his biological father's marriage to actress Cindy Williams; Lalania, from another of his father's relationships in 2006; and Wyatt, from his mother's relationship with Kurt Russell.”
“[2]Hudson is of Italian, English, German, and Hungarian-Jewish (from his maternal grandmother) descent.”
“[3][4] He was raised in the Jewish faith.”
“[5]Career [ edit ]Hudson appeared opposite his mother in 1999, comedy film The Out-of-Towners and later starred in several teen movies, like The Smokers, and Going Greek.”


"[15] cinematography [editor] film [editor] TV [editor]"
"[6] Hudson starred in the WB series mountain from 2004 to 2005, which was cancelled after 13 episodes."
"He is famous for playing Adam Rhodes in CBS comedy series" rules of engagement "(2007-2013), Jeff fudham in ABC musical series" Nashville "(2013-2015), and Wes Gardner in fox horror comedy" Scream Queen. "
He is one of the leading actors in the ABC sitcom splitting together, produced by Ellen DeGeneres
"Early life (Editor) Hudson was born in Los Angeles, the son of Oscar winning actress Goldie horn and musician bill Hudson."
After his parents divorced in 1980, he and his sister, actress Kate Hudson, were raised in Colorado by his mother and her partner, actor Kurt Russell
"He has four half brothers and sisters: Emily and Zachary, from his father's marriage to actress Cindy Williams; laranya, from his father's other relationship in 2006; Wyatt, from his mother's relationship with Kurt Russell."
Hudson is Jewish in Italy, England, Germany and Hungary
"He grew up in the Jewish faith."
In 1999, Hudson starred in a comedy film "the man out of town", which was opposite to his mother. Later, he appeared in several teen films, such as "the smoker" and "to Greece"



Number  766
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Like us at Hollywood Walk of FameFind your favorite star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame...”
“RuPaul's first prominent national exposure came in 1989 with a featuredrole dancing in the B52’s Love Shack music video.”
“As an author, RuPaul has published two books: Lettin' It All Hang Out (1995) and Workin' It!”
“As a recording artist, RuPaul has co-written and co-produced 14 studio albums to date, including Foxy Lady (1996), Champion (2009), Glamazon (2011), Born Naked (2014), and American (2017).”
“In 1996, RuPaul landed a TV talk show on VH1, The RuPaul Show and taped over 100 episodes with co-host, Michelle Visage while simultaneously co-hosting a morning drive radio show on WKTU, also with Michelle Visage.”
“In 1995, he became the first spokesperson for M.A.C Cosmetics, raising millions of dollars for the M.A.C AIDS Fund and becoming the first man to land a major cosmetics campaign.”
“Julie Newmar (1995), But I'm a Cheerleader (1999), Hurricane Bianca (2016), the Comedy Central series Broad City (2017), and the Netflix original series Girlboss (2017).”
“As an actor, RuPaul has appeared in more than 50 films and television shows both in and out of drag including Crooklyn (1994), The Brady Bunch Movie (1995), To Wong Foo, Thanks for Everything!”
“RuPaul achieved international fame with the release of the single, Supermodel (You Better Work), which was included on his debut album Supermodel of the World (1993).”
“In the mid-eighties, he settled in New York City where he became a popular fixture on the nightclub scene, earning himself the title: Queen of Manhattan.”


"It's like we're looking for your favorite star on the Hollywood Walk of fame..."
"The first time rupaul was exposed nationwide was in 1989, when he performed a special dance in B52's love house music video."
As a writer, he published two books: lettin'it all hang out (1995) and workin'it
"As a recording artist, rupaul has co authored and produced 14 studio albums, including foxy lady (1996), Champion (2009), Glamazon (2011), born nude (2014) and American (2017)."
In 1996, rupaul broadcast a talk show on VH1 TV talk show "rupaul show" and recorded more than 100 episodes with co host Michelle visage. At the same time, he co hosted a morning driving radio program with Michelle visage in wktu
In 1995, he became the first spokesperson for M.A.C cosmetics, raised millions of dollars for the M.A.C AIDS Fund, and became the first person to launch a major cosmetics campaign
"Julie Newmar (1995), but I'm a cheerleader (1999), hurricane Bianca (2016), comedy center series wide city (2017), and Netflix original series girl boss (2017)."
"As an actor, Rubel has appeared in more than 50 films and TV series, including" kruklin "(1994)," Brady Bunch "(1995) and" for Huang Fu ". Thank you for everything!"
Rupaul is famous internationally for his single "you better work", which was included in his first album "Supermodel of the world" (1993)
In the mid-1980s, he settled in New York and became a frequent nightclub guest, thus winning the title of "Queen of Manhattan"



Number  767
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When I think of her then, which is how I choose to think of her, she was this feisty, spirited little girl.”Moran died on April 22 from complications of cancer.”
“She was always the kid on the set, in a way.”
“I had no idea she was ill whatsoever.”
“Related: Erin Moran likely died of cancer complications, officials say“It’s been a rough time,” Howard said on “The Talk.” “The Erin event really did hit hard.”
“The photo was captioned, “Celebrating the life of #ErinMoran #HappyDaysFamily.”Howard recently spoke out about the loss of his on-screen sister saying he had “no idea” she was sick.”
“Scott Baio, who played Chachi Arcola, the love interest of Moran’s character, Joanie Cunningham on “Happy Days,” tweeted a group photo of castmates Ron Howard, Marion Ross, Anson Williams, Cathy Silvers and Don Most.”
“Story highlights Erin Moran's former 'Happy Days' co-stars gathered for a private memorial in her honor on Wednesday Moran died on April 22 after battling cancer(CNN) —The cast of “Happy Days” gathered to remember actress Erin Moran on Wednesday.”


"When I think of her, I choose to think of her like this. She is a lively, lively little girl." Moran died of cancer complications on April 22
"In a way, she's always been a kid on set."
"I had no idea she was ill."
Related reports: Irene Moran is likely to die of cancer complications, the official said, "this is a difficult period," Howard said in the "conversation," Irene incident really hit a lot. "
The title of the photo is "Celebrating the life of Irene Moran's happy family.". Howard recently talked publicly about the loss of his sister on screen, saying he "didn't know" that she was ill
"Scott bio, who plays Charlie acola as Moran's Joanne Cunningham character in happy time, tweeted pictures of cast's partners Ron Howard, Marion Ross, Anson Williams, Cathy silvers and don moss."
"The story highlights Irene Moran's former" happy time "co stars in a private memorial service in memory of Irene Moran on Wednesday. The actors of" happy time "gathered on Wednesday to remember actress Irene Moran."



Number  768
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe she won’t miss it…””
“She’s got plenty!”
“His bandmate Kimberly Schlapman couldn’t help but joke: “We’ll take her award and put it on our shelf.”
““I think Taylor tweeted that she loves us,” Sweet said in the press room later that night.”
“LOVE YOU @littlebigtown and CMAs,” Swift tweeted on Wednesday night.”
““In NYC for SNL rehearsals.”
“To the fans, to country radio, thanks for being so good to us.”Though the “Look What You Made Me Do” singer — whose sixth studio album Reputation is released Friday — wasn’t at the show, the 27-year-old was there in spirit, following along with the live telecast.”
“She couldn’t be here tonight with us.”She continued, “Taylor, wherever you are, thank you for writing this beautiful song, and loving songs and loving Nashville.”
“We want to say thanks to Taylor Swift.”
““We’re really grateful that [bandmate] Philip [Sweet] checked his email one night and that song was in his email.”


"Maybe she won't miss..."
"She has a lot!"
"We're going to put her on our shelves," his band mate Kimberly Shipman joked
"I think Taylor tweeted that she loved us," swift said in the press room that night
"Love you @ little bigtown and CMAS," swift tweeted on Wednesday night
"SNL rehearsal in New York."
"Thank you fans, thank you country radio, thank you for being so nice to us." Although the "look what you made me do" singer, whose sixth studio album is due to be released on Friday, didn't show up, the 27 year old singer was spiritually present after the live broadcast
"She can't be with us tonight," she continued, "Tyler, no matter where you are, thank you for writing this beautiful song, love song, love Nashville."
"We want to thank Taylor Swift."
"[band mate] Philip [sweet] checked his email one night and the song was in his email. We really appreciate it."



Number  769
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sadly, the islands were badly hit by this year’s hurricane season so the royal couple might have to look elsewhere.”
“As for the honeymoon, Antigua’s Prime Minister invited Harry to spend his honeymoon on the Caribbean islands of Antigua and Barbuda during a visit in Nov. 2016 (making the royal turn “bright red,” according to sources on the ground).”
“In March, Markle joined Prince Harry at a wedding in Jamaica for one of his close friends.”
“Harry was photographed driving the actress into the Middleton home later that day after picking her up from London after the ceremony.”
“Later that month, she attended part of the wedding of Kate Middleton’s sister, Pippa, to financier James Matthews.”
“Markle attended her first public event with Harry in May this year, at the Coworth Park Polo Club in Ascot, England.”
“The week before, Harry had made a 1,700-mile detour from his tour of the Caribbean to visit Markle at her Toronto home.”
“A few days later they were spotted while on a date to see the hit play The Curious Incident of the Dog in the Night-Time in London’s West End.”
“Prince Harry and Markle were photographed in public together for the first time in Dec. 2016, shopping for a Christmas tree at the Pines and Needles store in London.”
““It is not right that a few months into a relationship with him that Ms. Markle should be subjected to such a storm.”When have Prince Harry and Meghan Markle appeared together in public?”


"Unfortunately, these islands have been badly hit during this year's hurricane season, so the royal couple may have to look elsewhere."
"As for honeymoon, Antigua's prime minister invited Harry to honeymoon in November 2016 when he visited the Caribbean islands of Antigua and Barbuda (which, according to local sources, made the royal family" bright red ")
In March, mark and Prince Harry married a close friend of his in Jamaica
"Later in the day, Harry was photographed picking her up from London to Middleton's home after the wedding."
Later that month, she attended part of Kate Middleton's sister Pippa's wedding to financier James Matthews
In May, markel and Harry took part in her first public event at cowers Park Polo Club in Ascot, UK
"The week before, Harry made a 1700 mile detour from the Caribbean to see Marcel at her home in Toronto."
"A few days later, they were found out on a date in the west end when they were watching the hit TV series the strange incident of dogs at night
"In December 2016, Prince Harry and markel took their first public photo when they were shopping for a Christmas tree at a pine needle shop in London."
"It's not right that Ms. markel will suffer such a disturbance after a few months with him." When will Prince Harry and Megan markel appear in public together? "



Number  770
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[4]MTV Generation Award [ edit ]MTV Trailblazer Award [ edit ]Multiple nominations [ edit ]Film [ edit ]The following movies received multiple nominations:Television [ edit ]The following television series received multiple nominations:”
“[3] Winners are listed first, in bold.”
“[2]Winners and nominees [ edit ]The full list of nominees was announced on May 3, 2018.”
“[2]Presenters [ edit ]The first few presenters were revealed on May 23, 2018 with the performers.”
“[1]Performers [ edit ]MTV announced the first few performers on May 23, 2018.”
“The ceremony was hosted by Tiffany Haddish.”
“It was the 27th edition of the awards and the second to jointly honor movies and television.”
“Similar to the 2016 MTV Movie Awards, the event was not aired live and was pre-recorded on June 16 prior to its June 18 broadcast date.”
“The 2018 MTV Movie & TV Awards was held on June 16, 2018, from the Barker Hangar in Santa Monica, California, U.S. and was broadcast on June 18, 2018.”


"[4] MTV generation Award [editor] MTV Pioneer Award [editor] multiple nominations [editor] film [editor] the following films won multiple non award threats: TV series [editor] the following TV series won multiple nominations:
[3] The winners are shown first in bold
"[2] the full list of winners and nominators [editors] nominators was announced on May 3, 2018."
"[2] host [editor] the first batch of hosts were announced with the performers on May 23, 2018."
"[1] performer [Edit] MTV announced the first batch of performers on May 23, 2018."
"The ceremony was presided over by Tiffany hadish."
"This is the 27th golden statue award and the second time that film and television works have been jointly commended."
"Similar to the 2016 MTV Film Awards, the event was not broadcast live, and was prerecorded on June 16 before the broadcast date of June 18."
"The 2018 MTV film and Television Awards will be held on June 16, 2018 in the Barker hangar in Santa Monica, California, and broadcast on June 18, 2018."



**Something goes wrong**
“...and Prince William did an impromptu walkabout outside of Windsor Castle where royal fans have already set up camp ahead of tomorrow s festivities...”
“The Canadian actor shared photos from his trip to the U.K. on Thursday where he is joined by Bellisario.”
“...arrived in England and are preparing for her royal wedding to Prince Harry in a special way...”
“Her costar and on-screen husband Patrick J. Adams shared a sweet photo on Instagram Friday evening of castmates Rick Hoffman, Gina Torres, Sarah Rafferty and Abigail Spencer all enjoying a meal at the Barn Restaurant just hours before the royal wedding.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““The last supper #royalwedding,” Adams, 36, wrote in the caption.”
“The actor, who wed Pretty Little Liars star Troian Bellisario in December 2016, also had some sweet words to share with Meghan, also 36, on Twitter before going to bed.”
““Going to bed now and thinking a lot about the strange surreal and wonderful day my friend Meghan is going to have tomorrow.”
“Meghan – wherever you are – we are so grateful to be here to watch you both take this monumental step together.”
“Love deeply and live well.”


“…… Prince William took an impromptu walk outside Windsor Castle. The Royal fans have camped before tomorrow's celebration
The Canadian actor shared a picture of Bellisario during a trip to the UK on Thursday.
“…… Arriving in Britain, she is preparing for her royal wedding with Prince Harry in a special way... "
"Her partner and screen husband, Patrick J. Adams, shared a sweet picture on instagram Friday night of caster's partners, Rick Hoffman, Gina Torres, Sarah Lafferty and Abigail Spencer, all dining at the barn restaurant hours before the royal wedding."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Adams, 36, wrote in the title: "the last supper, the royal wedding."
"The actor married troian Bellisario in December 2016 and shared some sweet words with Megan, also 36, on twitter before going to bed."
"Go to bed now and think about my friend Megan's fantastic, surreal and wonderful day tomorrow."
"Megan - no matter where you are - we are very grateful to be here to see you take this milestone together."
"Love deeply, live well."



**Something goes wrong**
“The two actresses met for the first time at the 2017 Cannes Film Festival where Brown gave the newcomer some important interview tips.”
“Brooklyn Prince, the 7-year-old breakout star of The Florida Project, told PEOPLE on Thursday that she considered Brown her “best friend” and “favorite Facetime person.”“I just love her,” Prince said.”
“Image zoom Credit: Millie Bobby Brown InstagramImage zoom Credit: Millie Bobby Brown InstagramImage zoom Credit: Millie Bobby Brown InstagramWhile Brown may have been far from most of her friends physically, it doesn’t seem as though they were completely out of reach.”
“A change in conditions Wednesday allowed some airlines to do evacuation flights, but then the ash cloud moved once again, forcing many of the rescue flights to be cancelled.”
“RELATED VIDEO: ‘Stranger Things’ Star Millie Bobby Brown Gives Her Beauty Tips in an Adorable Insta StoryThousands of travelers have been stranded in Bali since Mt Agung erupted 4 days ago.”
“...with the staff of The Mulia Bali a luxury resort...”
“Sending all my love to Bali Until next time virginaustralia Brown didn t appear to mind the unplanned days spent in Bali as she shared photographs of herself meditating on the grass underneath a bright sun taking a walk along a paved road surrounded by vibrant green trees and smiling...”
“I truly hope everyone there stays safe.”
““But most of all, my thoughts and prayers are with the people whose lives have been affected by this.”
“...cannot thank you enough Also to the Balinese people who are the sweetest kindest and most humble people I ve ever met she added...”


"The two actresses met for the first time at the Cannes Film Festival in 2017, and Brown gave the newcomers some important interview skills."
Brooklyn prince, 7, a star of the Florida project, told people on Thursday that she thinks Brown is her "best friend" and "favorite FaceTime person." I just love her, "prince said
"Image scaling credit: Millie Bob Brown instagram image scaling credit: Millie Bob Brown instagram image scaling credit: Millie Bob Brown instagram while Brown may be physically far away from most of her friends, but it seems they are not completely out of reach."
"Conditions changed on Wednesday and some airlines were able to carry out evacuation flights, but then the ash cloud moved again, forcing many rescue flights to be cancelled."
"Related video: 'strange thing' star Millie Bob Brown gives her beauty tips in a lovely insta story. Thousands of tourists have been trapped in Bali since the Argonne volcano erupted four days ago."
“… With the staff of Mulia Bali, a luxury resort... "
"Send all my love to Bali, until the next time, Virginia stralia Brown doesn't seem to mind spending an unplanned day in Bali, because she shares photos of herself meditating on the grass in the sun, walking on the asphalt road surrounded by green trees and smiling..."
"I really hope everyone there is safe."
"But most of all, my thoughts and prayers are with those whose lives have been affected."
"I'm also very grateful to the Balinese, the kindest and most modest Balinese I've ever seen." She added



Number  773
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“June 2, 7:08 a.m. PT This story has been updated with more details about Sunday's U.S. and Canadian TV coverage.”
“Etan Vlessing contributed to this report.”
“The former ABC Family cable network will air the star-studded benefit show live on Sunday for American audiences while a one-hour highlights special will air that night on ABC.”
“Freeform and ABC stations will air Sunday s Ariana Grande benefit concert in Manchester England in the U S ABC morning show Good Morning America said Friday morning that viewers could watch the concert on many of our ABC stations after the NBA Finals and also on Freeform live advising...”
“...viewers to check their local listings...”
“The star-studded One Love Manchester event will start on Sunday at 7 p.m. U.K. time/2 p.m.”
“ET and raise money for the victims of the bomb attack.”
“Grande will be joined by such big names as Justin Bieber, Katy Perry, Miley Cyrus, Coldplay, Pharrell Williams, Usher, Niall Horan and Take That at Manchester's Old Trafford Cricket Grounds, less than two weeks after a bomber killed 22 people after a Grande concert in the city.”
“Freeform is the network formerly known as ABC Family, which focuses on teenagers and young adults.”
“Freeform and ABC are both part of the Walt Disney Co Freeform formerly known as ABC Family and also owned by ABC parent the Walt Disney Company will air the full concert live at 2 p m ET PT while ABC will air a one hour highlight special following the...”


"At 7:08 a.m. on June 2, Pt has updated more details about Sunday's us and Canadian TV coverage."
"Etan vlessing contributed to this report."
"The former ABC home cable network will broadcast the star studded welfare program live to American audiences on Sunday, while ABC will broadcast an hour long special program that night."
"Freeform and ABC TV will air the s Ariana Grande benefit concert in Manchester, England, on ABC morning show good morning america on Sunday. On Friday morning, audiences can watch concerts on many of our ABC TV stations and freeform live after the NBA finals... "
“… View audience of local list... "
"The star studded love Manchester event will start at 7 p.m. on Sunday and at 2 p.m. UK time."
"To raise money for the victims of the bomb attack."
"Glen will go to Old Trafford cricket ground in Manchester with big name players such as Justin Bieber, Katy Perry, Millie Cyrus, Coldplay, Farrell Williams, usher, Neil Holland, and a bomber killed 22 people less than two weeks after a Glen concert in Manchester."
Freeform, formerly known as ABC Family, is mainly for teenagers
"Both freeform and ABC are part of Walt Disney's freeform, formerly known as the ABC Family and owned by ABC's parent company. Walt Disney will broadcast the full content of the concert live at 2:00 p.m. EDT, while ABC will broadcast it live at And then an hour's special. "



Number  774
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here’s What to Know About Legal Sports tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“Here\u2019s what you should know the Are Betting Billions on Super Bowl LV.”
“...const FP = you make money from sports betting leading up to the Super Bowl?”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's some knowledge about legal sports, which can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. These skills are provided by some experts who are famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers. "
"Here's what you should know, they bet billions on Super Bowl Lv."
“… Const FP = did you make money from sports gambling before the super bowl? "



Number  775
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Demi Lovato continues her legacy of raising the bar for entertaining audiences around the world and for spotlighting social issues that need the most attention.””
““Danica Roem is a trailblazer whose win in Virginia showcased both how young people and marginalized communities can impact voting results and how every American deserves an opportunity to work hard and achieve their dreams,” Ellis added.”
“...and Roem as two strong and inspirational women who embody the need for all Americans to stand together united and to take action today against any form of discrimination and oppression in an email statement sent to HuffPost...”
“I wanted to have her in the audience with me tonight because I feel like we have been through some of the same things and now we get to share this experience together Among those to applaud the gesture was GLAAD President and CEO Sarah Kate Ellis who praised Lovato...”
“She is actually the first out and seated transgender state legislator in American history, and when I heard that, I was just completely inspired by it,” she said.”
““We connected because I heard her story.”
“News that her decision to attend the AMAs with Roem was in line with the anti-bullying theme of her hit, “Sorry Not Sorry,” which she performed during the show.”
“Neilson Barnard via Getty ImagesThe pop superstar, who is an outspoken LGBTQ rights ally, told E!”
“Lovato, 25, looked stunning as she walked the red carpet with Roem, who made history when she was elected to the Virginia House of Delegates earlier this month, defeating Republican incumbent Bob Marshall.”
“Demi Lovato didn’t miss the opportunity to make a profound statement of inclusion at the American Music Awards Sunday, arriving with transgender lawmaker Danica Roem.”


"Demi Lovato continues her tradition of raising standards to entertain audiences around the world and to focus on the most important social issues."
"Danica ROM is a pioneer, and his victory in Virginia shows not only how young people and marginalized communities influence voting results, but also that every American should have the opportunity to work hard and realize his dream," Ellis said
“…… Roma, two strong and inspiring women, expressed the need for all Americans to unite and take action against any form of discrimination and oppression in an email to the HuffPost post
"I want her to come with me tonight because I think we've gone through some of the same things, and now we can share that experience together. The applause is from Sarah Kate Ellis, President and CEO of GLAAD, who praised Lovato..."
"She's actually the first cross gender state senator in American history to come out and sit down, and when I heard that, I was totally inspired by it," she said
"We contacted because I heard her story."
"It is reported that she has decided to participate in AMAS with Ron, which is consistent with the anti bullying theme of her hit song" I'm sorry, I'm not sorry "on the show
Nelson Barnard told "E!" through Getty pictures of the pop star, an outspoken Gay Rights League
"When Lovato, 25, and Roma walked on the red carpet, they looked beautiful. Earlier this month, Roma made history by defeating Republican president Bob Marshall to become a member of the Virginia House of Representatives
"Demi Lovato didn't miss the opportunity to make a deep statement at the American Music Awards on Sunday. She arrived with transgender congressman Danica ROM



**Something goes wrong**
“While relatively uncommon, you still face the risk of developing a pulmonary embolism, or blood clot, which can be fatal.”
“Fifteen percent of women permanently lose nipple sensation.”
““I don’t think it plays a role in the least,” Dr. Rowe said.”
“While New Yorkers notoriously vote blue, that doesn’t stop them from going for Ivanka’s look.”
“Both Democrats and Republicans want to look like the first daughterPolitical affiliation seems to have little influence when it comes to plastic surgery.”
“Yes, deep down, maybe.”Next: Party lines are irrelevant on this matter2.”
“Do they want to be her?”
““Maybe they just like the look, but also that [Ivanka’s] a powerful woman, self-confident, part of the first family.”
“Rowe has a theory on what draws his clients to Ivanka’s elegant features.”
“[it’s been] maybe four a month; one a week.”Since the summer of 2016, nearly 50 clients have asked Dr. Rowe to give them the Ivanka look.”


"Although relatively uncommon, there is still a risk of pulmonary embolism or blood clot, which can be fatal."
"15% of women lose nipple sensation permanently."
"I don't think it works at all," Dr. Luo said
"Although New Yorkers are famous for voting blue, it doesn't prevent them from choosing the look of Ivanka."
"Both Democrats and Republicans want to look like the first daughter political faction that seems to have little influence on plastic surgery."
"Yes, maybe deep down." Next step: party lines don't matter in this case
"Do they want to be her?"
"Maybe they just like it, but they also think (Ivanka) is a powerful woman, confident and part of the first family."
"Luo has a theory of what attracts his client Ivanka's elegant features."
"About four times a month, once a week." Since the summer of 2016, nearly 50 clients have asked Dr. Luo to make them look like Ivanka



**Something goes wrong**
“Vote now to decide who will take home the trophy on July 10!”
“Best Play: All of these reigned on the SportsCenter Top 10, but which one will wear the ESPY crown?”
“In a crowded field of MVP candidates, vote now to determine who will walk to the ESPY podium.”
“Bid to win• More ESPYS• Donate to the V FoundationBest Athletes: So many athletes, so little time.”
“Here's your chance with the ESPYS Auction.”
“Want to help the V Foundation fight cancer?”
“ESPYS Auction Want the chance to win an incredible experience?”
“Vote now to decide which of these achievements is truly ESPY-worthy.”
“Vote Now:Best Performance: The past 12 months have given us many heartwarming and heartbreaking moments.”
“Make sure to tune in to The ESPYS, hosted by Tracy Morgan, on July 10 at 8 pm | 7 pm central on ABC.”


"Vote now on who will win the trophy on July 10!"
"Best play: all of these occupy the top 10 of the sports center, but who will wear espy's crown?"
"With a crowd of MVP candidates, vote now on who will be on the ESPY podium."
"Win more espy donate to V Foundation's best athletes: so many athletes, so little time."
"This is your chance to participate in the espys auction."
"Want to help V foundation fight cancer?"
"Does espys auction want to win an incredible experience?"
"Now vote on which of these achievements is really worth showing off."
"Vote now: the best performance: the past 12 months have given us many warm and heartbreaking moments."
"Please be sure to watch the espys program hosted by Tracy Morgan on ABC CCTV from 8pm to 7pm on July 10."



**Something goes wrong**
“The two-part documentary special, “Elizabeth Smart: Autobiography” debuts on A&E on November 12 and 13.”
“Sarah Walker directs from a teleplay by Tory Walker.”
“Barbara Lieberman and Tom Patricia also executive produce the movie with Elizabeth Smart serving as producer.”
““I Am Elizabeth Smart” is executive produced by Steve Michaels, Jonathan Koch and Joan Harrison of Asylum Entertainment, Allison Berkley and Joseph Freed of Marwar Junction Productions.”
“Now, in “I Am Elizabeth Smart,” Elizabeth herself, as a producer and on-screen narrator, explores how she survived, and confronts the truths and misconceptions about her captivity.”
“A film about the kidnapping was rushed on the air shortly after the incident, but it shied away from the reality of what Elizabeth went through.”
“She was starved, drugged, raped and subjected to bizarre religious rituals until, nine months later, she enabled her own rescue.”
“He brought her to a hilly encampment where, with his twisted accomplice Wanda Barzee (Deirdre Lovejoy), he held Elizabeth captive.”
“In June 2002, Elizabeth Ann Smart (Alana Boden) was a 14-year-old girl when she was abducted from her Salt Lake City home by religious fanatic Brian David Mitchell (Skeet Ulrich).”
“Part of a cross-network event with A&E, Lifetime’s “I Am Elizabeth Smart” is the definitive, authorized movie about the harrowing kidnapping of Elizabeth Smart, told from her perspective and with her full participation.”


The two-part documentary special "Elizabeth Smart: Autobiography" will premiere at a & E on November 12 and 13
"Sarah Walker directed from a TV play by Tory walker."
"Barbara Lieberman and Tom Patricia are also executive producers of the film, with Elizabeth Smart as producer."
I am Elizabeth Smart is written by Steve Michaels, Jonathan Koch and Joan Harrison, Allison Berkley and Joseph free of Marwar junction product
"Now, in I'm Elizabeth Smart, Elizabeth herself, as a producer and on-screen narrator, explores how she survived and faces the truth and misunderstanding of her imprisonment."
"Shortly after the incident, a film about kidnapping was broadcast quickly, but it evaded the reality of Elizabeth's experience."
"She suffered from starvation, drug abuse, rape and bizarre religious rituals, and it was only nine months later that she was able to save herself."
"He takes her to a camp on a hill, where he and his accomplice Wanda baze (deldrelov Joey) take Elizabeth captive."
In June 2002, Elizabeth Ann smart (Arana Boden) is kidnapped from her home in Salt Lake City by religious fanatic Brian David Mitchell (Skeeter Ulrich) at the age of 14
"I am Elizabeth Smart" is a part of a & E cross network activities, is an authoritative authorized film, tells the story of Elizabeth Smart who was kidnapped, tells the story from her point of view, and gets her full participation



**Something goes wrong**
““Queer Eye” is now streaming on Netflix.”
“— Tom Jackson (@TomJack20176306) February 28, 2018RELATED: ‘Queer Eye’ Is Back: First Look At New Fab Five As Heartwarming Trailer Is UnveiledNetflix rebooted the popular makeover show, “Queer Eye”, starring the fab 5, Tan France, Antoni Porowski, Bobby Berk, Karamo Brown and Jonathan Van Ness.”
“I will always love ❤️ her more than anything!!!!!!!”
“She will always be the love ❤️ of my life.”
“Just to let the world  know, Abby and I are no longer together.”
“I cry  like a baby  ever time I watch it.”
“I just watched my episode for about the 20th time.”
“...well...”
“IM PANICKING IM PANICKING IM CRYING https t co 6sawSQAU1X Brie Larson brielarson March 9 2018 RELATED Queer Eye Guys Give Netflix Nerds Team A Makeover Jackson has put his fans through a rollercoaster of emotions originally Tweeting that he and Abby had broken up which many did not take...”
“After initially reporting they had broken up, Jackson surprised fans, including Brie Larson, with the happy news that he and Abby are an item once more.”


Strange eye is now playing on Netflix
——Tom Jackson (@ tomjack20176306) February 28, 2018 related report: "strange eye" is back: when the warm Trailer opens, first look at the new Fab 5. Netflix relaunched the popular Makeover Show "strange eye," starring Fab 5, Tan France, Antoni porowski, Bobby Berk, karamo brown and Jonathan Van Ness
"I love you forever ❤️  She's more important than anything
"She will always be my love ❤️  "My life."
"Just to let the world know that Abby and I are no longer together."
"Every time I look at it, I cry like a baby."
"I just watched about 20 episodes."
“… Well
"I panicked. I panicked. I cried. HTTPS t Co 6sawsqau1x brie Larson brielarson on March 9, 2018, the queer eyed guy gave Netflix nerds a new look. Jackson made his fans experience an emotional roller coaster. At first, he said on twitter that he broke up with Abby, but many people didn't accept it..."
"After the initial report of their breakup, Jackson was pleasantly surprised to tell his fans, including Bree Larson, that he and Abby are a couple again."



**Something goes wrong**
“And keep scrolling to see her 10 best looks of all time.”
“Strings in theaters Friday...”
“But lucky for us, the 41-year-old Oscar winner (and former model) doesn’t settle for something less than spectacular.”
““Charlize’s style is sexy and sophisticated,” says stylist Leslie Fremar, who has been dressing the actress since she starred in 2008’s Hancock.”
““She doesn’t really follow the trends but, instead, she makes choices based on her body and what she feels comfortable in.”
“And since she doesn't go for anything too elaborate, the clothes never really take over.”
“She wears the looks— they don’t wear her.”Over the years, Theron has developed a fashion formula that always seems to land her on the best-dressed list.”
“Her trademarks?”
“Clean silhouettes, a modern neutral palette with a touch of embellishment, and lots of plunging necklines, which her stylist says is a fave.”
““She’s tall and lean with broad shoulders, so deep-Vs are great on her because they bring the eye down,” adds Fremar.”


"Continue scrolling through her 10 most beautiful photos ever."
"String performance at the theatre on Friday..."
"But fortunately, the 41 year old Oscar winner (former model) is not content with something less spectacular."
Leslie fremar, a stylist, said: "Charlize's style is sexy and sophisticated, and she has been dressing Charlize since she starred in Hancock in 2008."
"She doesn't really follow the trend, but makes choices based on her body and comfortable environment."
"And because she doesn't like too delicate clothes, they will never catch on."
Over the years, Theron has invented a fashion formula that always seems to put her on the best dressed list
"Her trademark?"
"Clean silhouette, modern neutral tone with a little embellishment, and a lot of low neckline, her stylist said it was her favorite."
"She's tall and thin, with broad shoulders, so deep vs fit her well because they make her eyes look down," frema added



**Something goes wrong**
“Just nice, nice people.””
“He’s a physician and has twins, too.”
“...k a...”
“Carlos), the wide-eyed baby boy who tags along with Zach Galifianakis, Bradley Cooper and Ed Helms in Las Vegas.”
“And there’s no mistaking him four years later in The Hangover Part III, in theaters Friday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““The cheeks kinda give it away, right?” his mom, Carrie Holmquist, jokes to PEOPLE.”
“In honor of the third installment (the last of the series, promises director Todd Phillips), we give you a trio of little known, fun facts about the littlest member of the franchise.”
“1.”
“HE WAS SURROUNDED BY THE LADIES IN VEGASLittle ladies, that is.”


"Just good people, good people."
"He's a doctor and has twins."
“… Answer... "
"Carlos," a big eyed baby boy fighting alongside Zac gallianakis, Bradley Cooper and ED Helms in Las Vegas
"There's no doubt that the third part of hangover, four years later, will be on at the cinema on Friday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The cheek's a little exposed, isn't it?"? "His mother, Carrie Holmquist, was always joking."
"In honor of the third (the last of the series, Todd Phillips's promise), we're going to tell you three little-known and interesting stories about this little guy."
“1.”
"He's surrounded by ladies in plain clothes, that is to say, little ladies."



**Something goes wrong**
“You’re a good mom because you obviously care enough to be worried about it."”
““I always just go by what makes me feel good.”
““There’ve been things that fans have pointed out on Instagram that, for the most part, I was actually grateful for,” she said.”
“And while internet trolls can be quick to criticize celebrity moms on the social-media platform, Decker says she’s actually gained a few valuable tips from commenters.”
“Let’s start working out and tone up this booty again.’ And it makes you feel good, but for the most part, I don’t worry about it.”Decker isn’t shy about sharing sweet family moments with her 2.7 million Instagram followers.”
“Once I’m done breastfeeding, that’s when I get that ammunition to be like ‘OK, let’s get healthy again.”
“I don’t know how women do that — more power to them, but I would rather spend all that time taking care of them.”
“It’s impossible — all my time is spent taking care of an infant.”
“And so as soon as I have my kids, I really just focus on breastfeeding and spending time with them and not thinking about getting my body back.”
““I don’t think I’ve ever felt pressure to look a certain way,” she said.”


"You're a good mom because you obviously care about it."
"I always feel good."
"Some of the things fans pointed out on instagram, to a large extent, I'm actually grateful," she said
"While the Internet Troll can quickly criticize celebrity moms on social media platforms, Decker says she actually gets valuable advice from reviewers."
"Let's start exercising and make this trophy more beautiful again." It makes you feel good, but for the most part, I'm not worried about it. "Decker has no qualms about sharing sweet family moments with 2.7 million instagram fans."
"Once I've finished breastfeeding, I've got ammunition like this:" OK, let's get back to health. "
"I don't know how women do it - give them more power, but I'd rather spend all my time looking after them."
"It's impossible - I spend all my time looking after a baby."
"So once I have kids, I really just focus on breastfeeding, spend time with them, and don't think about getting my body back to health."
"I don't think I've ever felt the pressure to look like myself," she said



Number  783
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now I look back on it and I’m like, ‘Girl, be proud of that!’”Read more from Stewart’s interview and see photos from the cover story here.”
“You’re a boy,’ or whatever, and I was so offended, horrified and embarrassed.”
“The actress who is currently dating model Stella Maxwell opened up about her expansive approach to her sexuality and her love life as well as a number of other topics including fame resting bitch face and being a woman in...”
“Trump s America in the September issue of Harper s Bazaar...”
“In one of a series of selected quotes from the magazine’s cover story, Stewart responded to a question about relationships by employing a grilled cheese analogy.”
““Yeah, totally,” she told the magazine when asked if she would be open to dating men in the future.”
““Some people aren’t like that.”
“Some people know that they like grilled cheese and they’ll eat it every day for the rest of their lives.”
“I want to try everything.”
“If I have grilled cheese once I m like That was cool what s next Regardless of what term she s using or not using to define her sexuality Stewart hasn t allowed what others think about her love life...”


"Looking back now, I thought," girl, you have to be proud of it! "Read more about Stewart's interview and see the photos in the cover story here."
"You're a boy, 'or something. I'm angry, scared, embarrassed."
"The actress, who is dating model Stella Maxwell, has made public her attitude towards her sexuality and love life, as well as other topics, including fame, face and in Be a woman. "
"Trump's America in the September issue of Harper Fair..."
In a series of selected quotes from the magazine's cover story, Stewart answers a question about relationships with the metaphor of grilled cheese
"Yes, exactly," she told the magazine when asked if she would date a man
"Some people are not like that."
"Some people know they like roast cheese and will eat it every day for the rest of their lives."
"I want to try everything."
"If I've ever eaten grilled cheese, I think it's cool. No matter what terms she uses to define her sexual orientation, Stewart doesn't allow others to think about her love life..."



Number  784
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And for more breaking news: I am NOW retiring from being Cameron Diaz’s spokesperson.”Diaz married rocker Benji Madden in 2015.”
““That’s so awesome.”
“Story highlights Actress sits down to chat with her "Sweetest Thing" co-stars Industry has speculated about star's status for months(CNN) —Being out of the limelight may be “The Sweetest Thing” for Cameron Diaz right now.”
“The actress recently reunited with her co-stars from that 2002 comedy, Selma Blair and Christina Applegate, for an interview with Entertainment Weekly to reminisce about the film.”
“The topic of the trio having not reunited was brought up.”
“Applegate noted that she sees Blair (their children are friends), and Blair in turn asked Diaz about a possible reunion.”
““Maybe I should, you know, I mean, I’m down,” Diaz said.”
““I’m literally doing nothing.”Applegate said she is “semi-retired” and hasn’t worked for years as she’s been focused on being a mom.”
“I’m totally down,” Diaz said.”
“CAMERON DIAZ is NOT retiring from ANYTHING,” Blair tweeted.”


"There's more breaking news: I'm no longer a spokesman for Cameron Diaz." Diaz married rock singer Benji Madden in 2015
"Great."
"Story highlights" the actress sat down to chat with her "sweetest thing" partner, and the industry has been speculating for months about the star's status (CNN) -- for Cameron Diaz, it may be "sweetest thing" to be out of focus now
The actress recently reunited with the 2002 comedy stars Selma Blair and Christina Applegate in an interview with entertainment weekly to recall the film
"The topic of three people not reunited has been raised."
Applegate noticed that she met Blair (whose child was a friend), and Blair asked Diaz if there was any possibility of a reunion
"Maybe I should, you know, I mean, I'm down," Diaz said
"I really didn't do anything." She's "semi retired" and hasn't worked for years because she's focused on being a mom, she said
"I totally collapsed," Diaz said
"Cameron Diaz will not retire from anything," Blair tweeted



Number  785
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related VideosRelated: A Brief History of All the Times the Kardashians Have Gone Blonde...”
“The color change, it seems, was enough of a makeover for Kardashian for now.”
“On Monday, Kardashian shared videos on her Instagram Story in which she simultaneously showed off her newly blonder hair color and bounced daughter True Thompson on her hip, in an impressive feat of motherly multitasking.”
“Though Kardashian didn t go into detail about her hair change she did quip while sporting an Instagram filter that sent diamonds shooting out of her face in every direction that the animation captured how I feel with this new...”
“...hair...”
“Tracey Cunningham, hairstylist to the stars, was significantly more effusive.”
“She reposted two of Kardashian's selfie videos on her own Instagram page, writing in one caption, "@khloekardashian I love you #platinumblonde I love doing your hair color."”
“Cunningham went on to explain the extensive process of layering various highlights on different sections of Kardashian's hair, from roots to ends, in order to achieve the chic icy shade, adding, "You were so patient."”
“Perhaps not wanting to spend even more time in Cunningham's chair, Kardashian seems to have opted to retain her pre-platinum mid-length style rather than hopping on the current celeb-favorite lob train.”
“Still other newly "icy"-tressed stars include Rose Byrne, Sophie Turner, and Pete Davidson.”


"Related video: a brief history of all the golden age of the kardashians..."
"Now it seems that the color change is enough for Kardashian to change her face."
"On Monday, Kardashian shared her story video on instagram, in which she also showed her newly dyed golden hair and flicked her daughter true Thompson to her hip, an impressive feat of motherly multitasking."
"Although Kardashian didn't elaborate on her hair changes, she joked when using the instagram filter that the filter would shoot diamonds from her face in all directions, and the animation captured my feelings about this new product..."
“… Hair... "
"Tracey Cunningham, the star hairdresser, is obviously more passionate."
"She forwarded two of Kardashian's self portraits on her instagram page, and wrote in one of the Titles: '@ KhloeKardashian I love you # platinum blonde I love do your hair color'
Cunningham went on to explain the extensive process of layering different highlights in different parts of Kardashian's hair, from the root to the tip, to achieve chic cool tones, adding: "you're so patient."
"Kardashian may not want to spend more time in Cunningham's chair. She seems to have chosen to keep the style of the trousers in front of platinum instead of jumping into the current celebrity favorite lob training."
Other new ice tree stars include rose Bourne, Sophie Turner and Peter Davidson



Number  786
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I’m not an eye roller, but I would be like f–k off,” she said.”
“I’m always touching people, like, ‘Hey!’”She added that she doesn’t even remember seeing the The Game actress at SoulCycle.”
““I’m really nice at SoulCycle actually, because once my endorphins kick in I’m actually almost too friendly.”
““Well you can’t go by that,” Theron said of the false story.”
““What a bitch,” the Monster actress joked.”
“During a round of “Plead the Fifth,” Cohen recapped the rumors and asked Theron what really happened.”
“I’m just being honest.”Then, Dish Nation reported that Theron, 41, was “so pissed off” that she demanded SoulCycle ban Mowry from their spin classes.”
“Charlize was just mean.”
“I know how to approach another celebrity.”
““I wasn’t over-the-top.”


"I'm not an eye opener, but I'll be like f – K off," she said
"I always touch people, like 'Hey! "She added that she didn't even remember seeing a game actress in soul cycle."
"In fact, I'm very good at the soul cycle, because once my endorphins start to secrete, I'm actually too friendly."
"Well, you can't say that," Theron said of the wrong story
"What a bitch," joked the monster actress
In a "fifth defense," Cohen restates the rumors and asks Theron what happened
"I'm just telling the truth." Then, dish nation reported that Theron, 41, was "very angry" and asked them to ban the use of soulcycle Mowry in their rotation class
"Charlize is mean."
"I know how to approach another celebrity."
"I didn't cross the line."



Number  787
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“KELISxLEBUN was in association with burger restaurant Le Bun.”
“Blend the milkshake until smooth.”
“Her 2003 hit ‘Milkshake’ went on to have global success – bagging a Grammy Award nomination in the process – but Kelis has never actually revealed the recipe for the iconic drink.”
“Now, she has finally shared her recipe, to coincide with National Chocolate Milkshake Day (Sept 12).”
“AdvertisementReleasing a step-by-step video, the secret ingredient for ‘My Milkshake’ has turned out to be none other than Baileys.”
“Watch the video here and see the step-by-step guide below that.”
“1.”
“Combine 3 oz Baileys, 8 oz of ginger beer, four scoops of chocolate ice-cream five pieces of candied ginger and a half teaspoon of cayenne pepper in a blender with ice.”
“2.”
“3.”


"Kelixlebun has something to do with Le bun hamburger."
"Mix the milkshake well."
"Her 2003 hit" milkshake "was a global success - a Grammy nomination in the process - but Kelly never revealed the formula for this iconic drink."
"Now, she finally shared her recipes to tie in with the national chocolate milkshake day (September 12),"
"The ad released a step-by-step video and it turned out that the secret ingredient of my milkshake was Bailey."
"Watch the video here and see the step-by-step guide below."
“1.”
Mix 3 ounces of Bailey, 8 ounces of ginger beer, 4 teaspoons of chocolate ice cream, 5 slices of ginger sugar and half teaspoon of chili powder with ice in a blender
“2.”
“3.”



Number  788
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read Daniel Dae Kim’s full Facebook message here:”
“...which he ll serve as an executive producer...”
““By now many of you have heard the news, and I’m sad to say it is true.”
“I will not be returning to ‘Hawaii Five-0’ when production starts next week.”
“Though I made myself available to come back, CBS and I weren’t able to agree to terms on a new contract, so I made the difficult choice not to continue,” the actor posted Wednesday morning on Facebook.”
“Last week, Variety reported that Kim and his co-star Grace Park would be departing the CBS procedural ahead of its eighth season, due to a dispute with CBS Television Studios to reach pay equality with co-stars Alex O’Loughlin and Scott Caan.”
“Insiders said Kim and Park’s final offer from the studio was 10-15% less than O’Loughlin and Caan, who each also each have lucrative back end deals on the show.”
“Since the announcement of the duo’s departure, fans have been critical of CBS’s failure to reach parity with the series’ two Asian actors, while keeping two Caucasian stars on the show.”
“The social media chatter comes after critics have targeted CBS for its lack of diverse leading roles for women and actors of color, in comparison to the other broadcast networks.”
“In Kim’s Facebook message, the actor thanked his fans, while addressing Hollywood’s diversity problem, specifically for Asian American actors.”


"Read Daniel DAE Kim's full Facebook message here:
“… He will be the executive producer... "
"Now many of you have heard the news, and I'm sorry to say it's true."
"I'm not going back to Hawaii 5-0 when shooting starts next week."
"Although I allowed myself to come back, CBS and I couldn't agree on the terms of the new contract, so I made a tough choice not to continue," the actor said on Facebook on Wednesday morning
"Last week, variety reported that Kim and his co stars Grace Park will leave CBS before the eighth season of CBS due to a pay equality dispute with CBS television studios over their co stars Alex O'Loughlin and Scott caan."
"Insiders said that the final offer of Kim Jong Un and park Geun hye is 10% - 15% lower than olaflin and Kaan, and their back-end transactions in the program are also very rich."
"Since the announcement of the departure of the pair, fans have been criticizing CBS for failing to reach the same level as the show's two Asian actors, while keeping two white stars on the show."
"Before social media chatting, critics have targeted CBS, which lacks a diverse leadership role for women and actors of color compared to other radio and television networks."
"In Kim's Facebook message, the actor thanks his fans and talks about Hollywood's diversity, especially for Asian American actors."



**Something goes wrong**
“In contrast to Alexander, George said Ella is “very elegant and all eyes.””
““Like, checking IDs on the way into the nursery,” George continued.”
“...away from the trend of unique baby names sweeping through Hollywood...”
““[We] didn’t want to give them one of those ridiculous Hollywood names that don’t mean anything,” George told Paris Match in an interview published Saturday.”
““They’ll already have enough difficulty bearing the weight of their celebrity.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We figured these kids are going to be looked at a lot and watched and [have their] every move sort of judged, and we wanted them to at least have a break with the names,” he previously told Entertainment Tonight.”
““So we looked for some sort of normal names.”
“We didn’t have any great inspiration.”
“It wasn’t Alexander the Great and Ella Fitzgerald.”Image zoom George and Amal Clooney | Credit: Franco Origlia/Getty ImagesWant all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


Unlike Alexander, George said Ella was "very elegant and sharp."
"For example, check your ID card on the way into the nursery," George continued
“… A unique baby name far away from fashion sweeping Hollywood
"We don't want to give them meaningless Hollywood names," George told the Paris game in an interview published on Saturday
"It's hard for them to bear the pressure of celebrities." Get push notification containing news, functions, etc
"We think these kids will get a lot of attention, their every move will be judged, and we hope they can at least rest on their names," he said in an interview with entertainment tonight
"So we found some common names."
"We don't have any good ideas."
"This is not Alexander the great and Ella Fitzgerald." Zoom in and out George and Amar Clooney | photo source: Franco Aurelia / Getty Images browse through all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements and celebrity mom blogs? "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  790
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...just in my heartache you re literally just knifing it and just churning it RELATED Nikki Bella Officially Cancels Wedding to John Cena Again I ve Ruined Everyone s Fairy Tale Bella is now seeing a life coach and focusing on finding her own happiness outside of a relationship...”
“I’m just not ready yet.”And while she’s more at peace with the single life, she’s still adjusting to her new normal.”
“Nikki opened up about how she’s moving on from ex John Cena in the three months since their split, saying her love life is not a top priority at the moment.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It feels like, you know, when you get married and the next day people are like, ‘When are you having kids?’ and it’s like, ‘I just got married.’ I feel like it’s the same thing.”
“When you become single, it’s like, ‘Oh, are you dating?”
“!’ ” she told PEOPLE at the WWE Evolution on Sunday.”
““Honestly, I’m so not interested.”
““I’m trying to heal, and I’m not healed yet,” she said.”
“I have the utmost respect for John but I know this is what s best for me When everyone was saying what I was going through was fake for ratings and all that Bella previously told Cosmopolitian and when you re really going through it it s like you re...”


“… Just when my heart aches, you're really just fabricating it and stirring it up. Niki Bella officially cancelled her wedding with John Senna. Once again, I ruined everyone's fairy tale. Bella now sees a life coach and focuses on finding a relationship other than her own happiness... "
"I'm just not ready." Although she is relatively calm about her single life, she is still adapting to her new normal
"Nicky made it public how she came from John cena in the three months after their breakup. She said her love life is not a top priority at the moment."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's like, you know, when you get married, the next day people say, 'when do you have children? "It's like, 'I just got married.' I think it's the same. "
"When you're single, it's like," Oh, are you dating? "
"!" she told people at the WWE evolution Conference on Sunday. "
"To be honest, I'm not really interested."
"I'm trying to heal, but I'm not," she said
"I respect John very much, but I know it's the best for me, because everyone says that everything I've been through is false ratings. Bella told cosmopolitan before, when you really experience it, you're like..."



Number  791
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Steve Carell and Timothée Chalamet Talk About Reality of Addiction in Beautiful Boy Featurette...”
“Chalamet also acted in another 2018 Academy favorite, Call Me By Your Name, for which he received his first nomination.”
“Shortly after his feature film debut in Jason Reitman’s drama Men, Women & Children, he gained recognition for his supporting role in Greta Gerwig’s Lady Bird, which was nominated for five Oscars, including Best Picture.”
“I just figured — I don’t know what I figured.”Of course, the New York City native has secured much more substantial roles since then.”
“They didn’t even cut anything.”
“...wept for an hour because I just figured my part was bigger...”
“It was surreal because it s a huge IMAX theater and I really had no career at this point so I was like the fraud a little bit in the room The Oscar nominee continued I saw it and I loved it but I went home to my dad and...”
““I forgot about this — I really haven’t thought about this moment until right now,” he reminisced with a smile on his face.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“It’s part of the journey to success, certainly, but that doesn’t make it any less sad for the 22-year-old actor, who had a minor role in the 2014 blockbuster Interstellar starring Matthew McConaughey.”


"Related video: Steve Carrell and Timothy chalamit talk about the reality of addiction in beautiful boy..."
"Chalamit also starred in another most popular film at the 2018 Oscars," call me your name, "for which he won his first nomination
Shortly after his feature film premiere in Jason Reitman's drama men, women and children, he was recognized as a supporting role in Greta Gerwig's Lady Bird, which won five Oscar nominations including best picture
"I just want - I don't know what I'm thinking." Since then, of course, the New York native has gained more substantive roles
"They didn't even cut anything."
“… Crying for an hour, because I think my role is more important... "
"It's surrealistic, because it's a huge IMAX cinema, I really don't have a career at this point, so I'm like a liar in the room with a bit of an Oscar nomination to go on. I see it, I like it, but I go home to my father and..."
"I forgot about it - I didn't really think about it until now," he recalled with a smile
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Of course, it's part of the journey to success, but it doesn't make the 22-year-old actor less sad. He played a minor role in the 2014 blockbuster Star Trek starring Matthew McConnell."



Number  792
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Showbiz 411 was the first to report the twins’ birth.”
““Blue is so excited to be a big sister!”Beyoncé and Jay Z tied the knot in 2008 and recently celebrated their ninth wedding anniversary.”
“It’s even better than they wished for,” a source exclusively told Us earlier this year.”
““They have been trying for a long time and now to be blessed with twins they are so over the moon.”
“The couple’s new twins join their daughter Blue Ivy, 5.”
“Although she had to pull out of her headlining Coachella appearance, she attended the Grammys, the Beauty and the Beast premiere and the inaugural Wearable Art Gala at the California African American Museum.”
“We are incredibly grateful that our family will be growing by two, and we thank you for your well wishes.”The “Hold Up” singer documented her pregnancy on social media and made several red carpet appearances while expecting.”
““We have been blessed two times over.”
““We would like to share our love and happiness,” Beyoncé captioned an Instagram photo of her bare bump at the time.”
“Queen Bey, 35, announced in February that she and the rapper, 47, were expanding their family.”


"Show business 411 is the first to report the birth of twins."
"Blue is so excited to be a big sister! "Beyonce and jay z married in 2008 and recently celebrated their ninth wedding anniversary."
"It's even better than they hoped," one source told us exclusively earlier this year
"They've been trying for a long time, and now they've gone too far to get the blessing of the twins."
"The couple's new twins are with their five-year-old daughter, blue ivy."
"Although she had to pull out of her headlines, cochella appeared at the Grammy Awards, the beauty and beast premiere and the first wearable art party at the California African American Museum."
"We are very grateful that our family will triple, and we thank you for your blessing." The "hold up" singer recorded her pregnancy on social media and made several appearances on the red carpet during her pregnancy
"We were blessed twice."
"We want to share our love and happiness," Beyonce added a title to a photo of her as a time barren woman on instagram
In February, the 35 year old queen announced that she and the 47 year old rapper would expand their family



Number  793
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“9 Portland OR Moda Center November 10 Seattle WA Tacoma Dome November 16 San Jose CA SAP Center November 17 Sacramento CA Golden 1 Center November 20 Los Angeles CA The Forum November 24 Las Vegas NV MGM Grand...”
“FL Amway Arena October 23 Memphis TN FedEx Forum October 28 Nashville TN Bridgestone Arena October 30 New Orleans LA Smoothie King Center November 1 Dallas TX American Airlines Center November 2 Houston TX Toyota Center November 4 Kansas City MO Sprint Center November 6 Denver CO Pepsi Center November...”
“NY KeyBank Center October 4 Boston MA TD Garden October 5 Uncasville CT Mohegan Sun Arena October 7 Newark NJ Prudential Center October 11 Brooklyn NY Barclays Center October 14 Raleigh NC PNC Arena October 16 Charlotte NC Spectrum Center October 19 Miami FL American Airlines Arena October 20 Orlando...”
“Nicki Minaj Future s NickiHndrxx Tour September 21 Baltimore MD Royal Farms Arena September 23 Washington DC Capital One Arena September 26 Detroit MI Little Caesars Arena September 28 Chicago IL United Center September 29 Cincinnati OH US Bank Arena October 1 Toronto ON Air Canada Centre October 2 Buffalo...”
“Check out the NickiHndrxx site for full details.”
“Tickets for the NickiHndrxx Tour go on sale to the public on June 15th at 10 a.m. local time, with a presale planned for June 12th.”
“The rapper is also scheduled to headline this year’s Made in America Festival in Philadelphia on Labor Day weekend.”
“The tour is Minaj’s first since her Pinkprint Tour ended in March 2016.”
“Following the U.S. dates, Minaj and Future will take NickiHndrxx abroad in February with a two-month jaunt through Europe.”
“A month after Queen‘s arrival on August 10th, the 28-date trek will begin September 21st in Baltimore and loop around North America before concluding November 24th in Las Vegas.”


"9 Portland Or Moda center November 10 Seattle Washington Tacoma Dome November 16 San Jose, California SAP center November 17 Sacramento gold 1 Center November 20 Los Angeles forum November 24 MGM Las Vegas, Nevada..."
"Amway Arena, Florida October 23, FedEx Forum, Memphis, Tennessee October 28, Bridgestone arena, Nashville, Tennessee October 30, King rasmussy center, New Orleans November 1, American aviation center, Dallas, Texas November 2, Toyota Center, Houston, Texas November 4, mossflint center, Kansas City November 6, Pepsi Center, Denver November 1 January... "
"New York key bank center October 4 TD garden Boston Massachusetts October 5 Sun arena ucasville Connecticut October 7 Prudential Center Newark New Jersey October 11 Brooklyn New York Buckley center October 14 Raleigh PNC arena North Carolina October 16 Charlotte spectrum Center North Carolina October 19 Miami Florida American airlines competition October 20, Orlando... "
"Nicki Minaj future s nickihndrxx tour September 21, Royal farm arena, Baltimore, Maryland September 23, an arena in the capital of Washington, D.C. September 26, Caesar Jr., Detroit September 28, Chicago Illinois Union Center September 29, Cincinnati, Ohio Bank of America arena October 1, Toronto Air Canada Center October 2, Buffalo..."
"Check out the nickihndrxx site for details."
"Tickets for the Nicki hndrxx tour will be available to the public at 10 a.m. local time on June 15, with pre-sale planned for June 12."
"Rappers also plan to make headlines at the made in America festival in Philadelphia this Labor Day weekend."
"This tour is Minagi's first since the lithography tour ended in March 2016."
"After the US date, Minaj and future will take Nicki hndrxx abroad in February for a two month trip to Europe."
A month after her arrival on August 10, the long march on August 28 will begin in Baltimore on September 21 and tour North America before ending in Las Vegas on November 24



Number  794
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It doesn’t have to be defined the way that we, in Western culture, define it as beginnings and ends.”In March, Dunham was photographed out and about with a different guy, who she was seen wrapping her arm around him as they left dinner together.”
““I’ll always wear it because love is a really cool, powerful, eternal thing,” she said.”
“Image zoom Jack Antanoff and Lena Dunham | Credit: Lena Dunham/instagramDays after PEOPLE confirmed Dunham and Antonoff’s split, she briefly addressed the breakup during a livestream on Instagram, saying she was still wearing a ring that Antonoff had given her.”
“She also jokingly wished her ex, who does not have any children, a happy Father’s Day.”
““Best friends 4ever,” she wrote alongside the image.”
“In the photo, Dunham leaned against Antonoff’s shoulder, while the Bleachers frontman flashed a big grin.”
“Last month, the actress shared a cozy selfie of the pair on Instagram.”
“Image zoom Lena Dunham and Mystery Man | Credit: WAGO / BACKGRIDDunham, 32, and Antonoff, 33, called it quits in January after five years of dating but have remained close friends in the months since.”
“Dunham looked casual for the afternoon outing, wearing a blue and white shirt-dress for the occasion while her date donned a t-shirt and shorts.”
“In one shot, the mystery guy affectionately kissed Dunham.”


"In western culture, we don't have to define it as the beginning and the end." In March, Dunham was photographed with another man, putting his arm around him as they left dinner together
"I'll wear it all the time because love is a really cool, powerful, timeless thing," she said
"Image zooming Jack antanoff and Lena Dunham | image source: Lena Dunham / instagram a few days after people confirmed that Dunham and Antonov were breaking up, she briefly talked about the break-up on instagram live, saying that she was wearing a ring Antonov gave her."
"She also jokingly wished her childless ex a happy father's day."
"Best friend ever," she wrote next to the photo
"In the photo, Dunham is leaning on Antonov's shoulder while the grandstand manager grins
"Last month, the actress shared a warm self portrait on instagram."
"Image zooming Lina Dunham and mystery man | image source: Wago / Buckley Dunham, 32, and Antonov, 33, announced their separation in January after five years of dating, but they have been close friends for several months since."
Dunham was casual during the afternoon outing, wearing a blue and white shirt and skirt, while her date was wearing a T-shirt and shorts
"Once, the mysterious man gave Dunham a deep kiss."



Number  795
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fitness Training All about Fitness Power Girl Fitness An Ed Fitness Motivación Muscle Fitness Magazine Muscle Fitness Hers Yo soy fitness Rutina Fitness Adicción Fitness GYM VidaFit Pasion Fitness Strongman Fitness Dieta Fitness Black Fitness LA Fitness RE Fitness Anytime Fitnes weight loss diet fitness lose weight...”
“...download weight loss program here : The new mom capped off her public message with some words of encouragement to her 26 million followers.”
“Two months after welcoming her first child , daughter True Thompson , the reality star has naturally become a subject of interest in the realm of diet and fitness.”
“The Kardashian sister has even taken to her website to chronicle her health and fitness journey toward her postpartum weight loss goals.”
“...download weight loss program here : However, she wants to be transparent about her hard work and, as a result, has shot back at reports to the contrary.”
“"I truly dislike when people report I've lost a tremendous amount of weight in a short amount of time or when people claim I'm doing these ridiculous diets.”
“It's really setting the wrong tone," she tweeted late Monday.”
“"I believe in making lifestyle changes when it comes to my food."”
“Dieting is great but dieting doesn't typically create long lasting results," she continued.”
“"I also believe that working out is so incredibly healthy and should be done to each individuals own rhythm of life.”


"Fitness training all about the strength of fitness girl fitness an ED fitness exercise muscle fitness magazine muscle fitness her yo soy fitness rutina fitness adicion fitness fitness fitness vedafit pacion fitness strongman fitness Dita fitness black fitness La fitness re fitness anytime fitnes diet fitness weight loss..."
“…… Download the weight loss plan here: the new mother said a few words of encouragement to 26 million fans at the end of her public speech. "
"Two months after her first child, daughter Jean Thompson, the reality TV star has naturally become a hot topic in the field of diet and fitness."
"Sister Kardashian even recorded on her website her health and fitness journey to achieve her goal of postpartum weight loss."
“…… Download the weight loss program here: however, she wants to be transparent about her hard work, so she refutes reports to the contrary
"I really don't like people saying that I've lost a lot of weight in a short time, or that I'm on these ridiculous diets."
"It's really the wrong tone," she tweeted on Monday night
"I believe in lifestyle changes in diet."
"Dieting is great, but dieting usually doesn't produce lasting results," she continued
"I also believe that exercise is so healthy that everyone should have their own pace of life."



Number  796
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...in May that Season 7 which launches Oct 6 will be without such core cast members as Ginnifer Goodwin Snow Josh Dallas Charming and Jennifer Morrison Emma...”
“West who plays the adult version of Henry Mills said that viewers will see Regina and Henry interact in a way that you ve never seen them Meanwhile Once co creator Adam Horowitz pointed out that the pair s relationship is central to the show and remains so ABC announced...”
“...a Work in Progress Amid Trailer Backlash ABC Says This led series co creator Edward Kitsis to quip The Queen Formally Known as Regina will also work New cast member Andrew J”
“I think we re all still discovering who she is it s refreshing When a journalist wanted to know the name that the other characters will now call Regina Parilla replied cagily I can t tell you you ll have to tune in Also Read Marvel s Inhumans Is Still...”
“I’m still discovering her.”
““This version of Regina is something else.”
“...looks very different she feels different She s no longer in charge Parrilla continued...”
“She s a little rough around the edges Also Read Once Upon a Time Creators Defend Cast Shakeup Amidst Fan Outcry Parilla acknowledged that other returning characters will emphasize unfamiliar aspects of their personalities in the new season but that this will be especially true for the Evil Queen She...”
“When we meet her, this other version of Regina, she’s working in a bar.”
““I’m no longer in pantsuits — I’m in denim and rock T-shirts.”


“… In season 7, which will be launched in May and October 6, there will be no core actors like Jennifer Goodwin snow, Josh Dallas Piman and Jennifer Morrison Emma... "
"West, who plays the adult version of Henry Mills, says that audiences will see Regina and Henry interact in a way you've never seen before, while CO creator Adam Horowitz points out that their relationship is at the heart of the show, and ABC still announces that..."
“… ABC, a production in the trailer, said the co-author of the series, Edward kitsis, joked that the queen, officially known as Regina, would also work with new actor Andrew J
"I think we're still finding out who she is. It's refreshing. When a reporter wanted to know the names of other characters now called Regina parrilla, cagliary replied," I can't tell you that you have to watch, and you have to watch Marvel's inhuman is still... "
"I'm still finding her."
"This version of Regina is another thing."
“… It looks very different, she feels different, she's no longer in charge, parrila continued
"She's a bit rough on the edge and also read once the creator defended the cast in the fans' strong protest. Parrilla admits that the other characters returned will emphasize their personality in the new season's unfamiliar aspects, but it will be especially true for the evil queen of her..."
"When we met her, another version of Regina, she worked in a bar."
"I'm not wearing pants anymore - I'm wearing jeans and a rock T-shirt."



Number  797
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They have three children: Violet, 11; Seraphina, eight; and Samuel, five.”
“The former couple, who filed for divorce in April, have remained amicable.”
“And on Monday, Lindsay Shookus and the actor, 44, stepped out together for a morning beverage run in Brentwood, California.”
“Ben and the Saturday Night Live producer, who shared a sweet moment on their way out of the shop, have been seeing each other 'one and off' since 2015, according to UsWeekly.”
“Happy: Lindsay Shookus and the actor stepped out together for a morning beverage run in Brentwood, California on MondayNews of their relationship became public last week.”
“For their morning day date, the former New York resident flashed her legs in a classic black dress, adding white trainers.”
“The TV executive, 37, wore her blonde locks loose and went makeup free.”
“Ben, who grinned ear to ear, dressed in casual wear, opting for jeans and a black shirt.”
“Looking good Ben and the Saturday Night Live producer who shared a sweet moment on their way out of the shop have been seeing each other one and off since 2015 according to UsWeekly Staying close News of their relationship became public last week The happy duo gazed into each...”
“...other s eyes as they headed back to their car...”


They have three children: Violet, 11; Seraphina, 8; Samuel, 5
"The former couple, who filed for divorce in April this year, have been very friendly."
On Monday, Lindsay schokus and the 44 year old actor attended a morning reception in Brentwood, California
Ben and the live producer on Saturday night shared a sweet time on their way out of the store. They have been "in love at first sight" since 2015, US Weekly reported
Happy: Lindsay schokus and the actor went to Brentwood, California, Monday morning for a drink. Last week, their relationship was made public
On their morning date, the former New York resident wore a classic black dress, a pair of white sneakers and sparkling legs
The 37 year old television director has loose blonde hair and no makeup
"Ben grinned and wore casual clothes, jeans and a black shirt."
"Ben, who looks good, and the live producer on Saturday night shared a sweet moment on their way out of the store. They have been meeting since 2015. According to us weekly standing close, their relationship was made public last week, and the happy couple gazed at each other..."
“… Other people's eyes, because they go back to their cars... "



Number  798
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Bryan actually photographed her daughter Laila for the cover of PEOPLE magazine back in December 2015, a shoot which confirmed the swirling reports of her second adoption.”
““I get it because he’s more fun and has better treats,” she joked, alluding that he is her kid’s favorite.”
“The Oscar-winning actress was surrounded by her loved ones as she attended a dinner for twelve in her honor at celebrity-haunt Mr. Chow in Beverly Hills on Thursday, July 26.”
“Accompanied by her boyfriend of nearly three years Bryan Randall, the star happily had her 8-year-old son Louis and 5-year-old daughter Laila by her side according to E!”
“News.”
“Of course, the upscale Chinese restaurant was also brimming with Hollywood luminaries.”
“Birthday girl!”
“Sandra Bullock looked lovely in a floral print dress for her special dinner Photo: Grosby GroupThe Ocean’s 8 leading lady was joined by her recent costar Sarah Paulson and girlfriend Holland Taylor.”
“Another celebrity attendee spotted going into the private party room on the upper section of the famous eatery was Jason Bateman, who was joined by his wife Amanda Anka.”
“Other guests were not confirmed.”


"Brian took a picture of her daughter Lyra for the cover of People magazine in December 2015, which confirmed the rumors about her second adoption."
"I understand it's because he's more fun and better paid," she joked, implying that he was her child's favorite
On Thursday, July 26, the Oscar winner attended a 12 person dinner in memory of her at Beverly Hills celebrity haunt Stephen Chow, surrounded by her relatives
According to e
"News."
"Of course, this upscale Chinese restaurant is also full of Hollywood celebrities."
"Birthday girl!"
"Sandra Bullock looks cute in a print dress for a special dinner: the leading actress of grobie group ocean 8 is photographed with her recent partner Sarah Paulson and girlfriend Holland Taylor."
Another celebrity found in the private party room on the top floor of the famous restaurant was Jason Bateman, who was joined by his wife Amanda ANKA
"The other guests have not been confirmed."



Number  799
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Scott Disick (left) and Sofia Richie | Credit: Andrew Toth/GettyThe duo circulated the event together, posing for pictures, talking to guests, and laughing with DuJour publisher Jason Binn and former Miami Beach mayor Philip Levine.”
“The couple coordinating their looks — she in a body-hugging, long-sleeved black mini dress and he in black pants and a black button-down exposing his chest.”
“Witnesses say Richie and Disick were “very touchy” as the 34-year-old Keeping Up with the Kardashians star supported his 19-year-old girlfriend and her budding modeling career.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The couple arrived together at the Confidante Hotel, and although Richie posed solo on the red carpet, the lovebirds were seen, “chatting and kissing throughout the night,” sources tell PEOPLE.”
“The twosome, who are in town for Art Basel, attended a glamorous party for DuJour magazine, of which Richie is currently the cover star.”
“Scott Disick & Sofia Richie Seen 'Kissing All Night' During First Official Event as a CoupleAfter proving they are most certainly still together earlier this week in Miami, Scott Disick and Sofia Richie continued their romantic vacation Wednesday night in the Magic City.”


"Zoom in and out Scott Disick (left) and Sofia Richie | source: Andrew TOS / Getty, the couple spread the news, posed for photos, talked to guests, and laughed with Dojo publisher Jason bean and former Miami Beach mayor Philip Levin."
The couple reconciled their looks - she wore a tight long sleeve black miniskirt, while he wore black pants with a black button sticking out of his chest
Witnesses said rich and Dick were "very sensitive" because the 34 year old Kardashian star supported his 19-year-old girlfriend and her budding modeling career
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The couple came to the confidante hotel together, and although rich posed alone on the red carpet, people saw the couple," the source told people. "They were chatting and kissing all night."
"The two were in Basel for an art show and a glamorous party for DURU magazine, of which Ritchie is currently the cover star."
At their first official event, Scott Disick and Sophia Ritchie saw "kissing all night" as a couple. Earlier this week, Scott Disick and Sophia Ritchie proved in Miami that they were still together. Scott Disick and Sophia Ritchie continued their romantic holiday in magic city on Wednesday night



Number  800
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It makes me ill every time I talk about him.””
““I don’t want to talk about this.”
“...the half of it...”
“PEOPLE Now caught up with Shannon ahead of Friday’s Mama June: From Not to Hot finale, and the reality star dished on the drama that went down at her ex’s wedding when his wife Jennifer Lamb invited Shannon’s estranged mother.”
“(Watch the full frosty encounter here!)”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““You have to love people from a distance sometimes, and when the [fame] came about, she totally changed,” says Shannon, 37, of her mother Sandy.”
““She was not supportive.”
“She wanted to sell crazy stories and wanted to start trouble.”“They love the drama, so hey, let them stay with the drama with Sugar Bear and Jennifer,” she adds.”
““I can stay out of it and be myself!”And despite Lamb’s attempts to sabotage Shannon’s daughters’ diets with sweet treats, Shannon insists “Jennifer and Sugar Bear have nothing to do with my kids.”“Y’all are seeing how Sugar Bear really is,” she says.”


"Every time I mention him, I feel uncomfortable."
"I don't want to talk about that."
“… Half... "
"People caught up with Shannon before Friday's" Mom in June: never had a hot ending. "The reality star put on a play at her ex-wife's wedding when his wife, Jennifer lamb, invited Shannon's separated mother."
"Watch the complete frost encounter here!"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Shannon, 37, said of her mother Sandy: "sometimes you have to love someone from a distance. When [fame] comes, she's completely changed."
"She doesn't support it."
"She wants to sell crazy stories and make trouble." "They love the show, so hey, let them go on with the show with sweet bear and Jennifer," she added
"I can stay out and be myself! Despite lamb's attempts to disrupt Shannon's daughter's diet with sweets, Shannon insisted: "Jennifer and sugar bears have nothing to do with my children."



Number  801
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Essentially, I’m pregnant … but really, I’m pregnant!””
“❤️ #happylaborday#27weeks,” she captioned the image, which was shared on Labor Day.”
“Daphne Oz showed off her growing baby bump on Monday when she posted a photo of herself enjoying the final days of summer at the beach.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The mom-to-be, 31, shared an adorable Instagram photo, which showcased her sporting a cute ruffled and pink bikini as she cradled her bump.”
““Bye, summer.”
“☀️ bye, second trimester.”
“ hello, sweater weather!!”
“Oz confirmed her pregnancy back in June on her Instagram page, when she shared a sweet shot of herself sharing a kiss with husband John Jovanovic.”
““That sangria looks so good, but I’m on a cleanse this week,” she said.”


"Basically, I'm pregnant But really, I'm pregnant! "
“ ❤️  #"Happy Labor Day for 27 weeks," she wrote under the title of the picture, which was shared on labor day
"On Monday, daphneoz released a photo of herself enjoying the last days of summer on the beach, showing her growing lump."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 31 year old mother to be shared a lovely instagram photo of her holding her lump and wearing a lovely pink bikini with ruffles
"Goodbye, summer."
“ ☀️  Goodbye, second trimester. "
"Hello, sweater weather!"
"Oz confirmed her pregnancy on instagram in June when she shared a sweet picture of herself kissing her husband, John Jovanovic."
"That Sangria looks good, but I'm washing this week," she said



Number  802
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He has voiced Sergeant Floyd Pepper, and The Associated Press notes that during his career he has also stepped into the roles of Big Bird and Count von Count.”
“That said, Vogel has plenty of experience as well.”
“And as NPR's Rose Friedman notes, Whitmire wasn't just a one-Muppet man: He has also played Bert's best pal Ernie, Rizzo the Rat and Beaker, among other characters.”
“Whitmire, who first joined the Muppets in 1978, had served as the man behind the frog since the death of show creator Jim Henson in 1990.”
“The spokesperson did not immediately comment on the reason for the switch.”
“He will be replaced by longtime show veteran Matt Vogel.”
“Steve Whitmire, the puppeteer who for 27 years has performed as Kermit the Frog, is no longer voicing the green lead of the various Muppets TV programs and films, a spokesperson for The Muppets Studio confirmed to NPR.”
“After 27 Years, Kermit The Frog Is Getting A New VoiceEnlarge this image toggle caption Tonya Wise/Invision/AP Tonya Wise/Invision/APTelevision's most famous amphibian is set to get a new voice.”


"He voiced Sergeant Freud pepper, and the associated press noted that in his career, he also played big bird and count Fung."
"That is to say, Vogel also has rich experience."
As NPR's Rose Friedman says, whitmir is more than a puppet. He has also played the roles of Bert's best friend Ernie, mouse Rizzo and beaker
Whitmeer first joined the puppet band in 1978 and has been a behind the scenes conductor of frogs since the death of program creator Jim Hansen in 1990
"The spokesman did not immediately comment on the reasons for the switch."
"He's going to be replaced by longtime veteran Matt Vogel."
A spokesman for the puppet studio confirmed to NPR that the puppet actor Steve whitmeer, who has played Kermit the frog for 27 years, is no longer the green star of various puppet TV shows and movies
"27 years later, Kermit the frog got a new sound. Magnifying this picture shows that Tonya wise / invision / AP Tonya wise / invision / aptv's most famous amphibian will get a new sound."



Number  803
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Darling, nobody needs to listen to that,” Carey told TMZ while waving her hand back and forth while walking out of a Los Angeles restaurant.”
“Mariah Carey, however, had nicer things to say to Fergie, including some advice amid the backlash.”
“Williams slammed Fergie after the 47-year-old singer’s rendition of “The Star-Spangled Banner” fell flat with viewers during Sunday night’s NBA All-Star game.”
“Though she said Fergie was “the best,” Williams said the singer “needs auto-tune.”"There are only a few people who can sing raw... and Fergie is not one," Williams said during her show.”
“"She needs auto-tune.”
“Jen Lopez needs auto-tune.”
“Janet [Jackson] needs auto-tune.”
“Beyoncé needs auto-tune."”
“Fergie said she was sorry for the panned performance.”
““I've always been honored and proud to perform the national anthem and last night I wanted to try something special for the NBA.”


"Honey, no one needs to hear that," Kelly said to TMZ as she walked out of a restaurant in Los Angeles, waving back and forth
"But Maria Carey said something nice to faggie, including some advice."
Williams attacked Ferguson after the 47 year old singer's Star Spangled Banner hit the audience in the NBA all star game on Sunday night
Williams said that although she said Fergie was "the best," the singer "needs to tune automatically" and "only a few people can sing stiffly... "Fergie is not one," Williams said on the show
"She needs to tune automatically."
"Jan Lopez needs to tune automatically."
"Janet [Jackson] needs to tune automatically."
"Beyonce needs to tune automatically."
"Fergie said she was sorry for the terrible performance."
"I've always been honored and proud to sing the national anthem, and last night I wanted to try something special for the NBA."



Number  804
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...in the summer of 2017 while she was filming Marriage Boot Camp with Baier...”
“I just kind of sat down and thought about it and realized that it was a big step in my life and it was a good thing actually and I was really happy within 30 minutes Portwood and Glennon met...”
““This is a boy, a very stubborn baby boy.”
“Super stubborn,” the doctor joked referring to the multiple attempts to get him to shift his position.”
““He gets it from his mom,” quipped Portwood’s boyfriend, Andrew Glennon.”
““I have three sisters so I thought it would be a girl for some reason.”
“But this is great, this is fantastic.”An ecstatic Portwood let out an audible gasp and clapped her hands together.”
“And daughter Leah, 9, (with ex Gary Shirley) is just as excited that boy will be joining the family.”
“Shirley and his wife Kristina, however, have some reservations.”
““She’s always said, like, that was on her Christmas list, she wanted a baby brother, she wanted a baby brother but she put it like from us” Kristina told Shirley.”


“…… In the summer of 2017, when she and bell filmed marriage training camp... "
"I just sat down and thought about it and realized that it was a big step in my life, which is actually a good thing. I'm really happy to meet porterwood and Glennon in 30 minutes..."
"This is a boy, a very stubborn baby boy."
"Super stubborn," the doctor joked, referring to repeated attempts to get him to change his stance
"He got it from his mother," joked Andrew Glennon, Portwood's boyfriend
"I have three sisters, so I think for some reason it's going to be a girl."
"But it's great, it's great." An ecstatic Portwood gasped, hands folded
"Her 9-year-old daughter, Leah (with former Gary Shirley), is just as excited about the boy joining the family."
"However, Shirley and his wife Christina have some reservations."
Christina told Shirley: "she always said, like, it's on her Christmas list, she wants a brother, she wants a brother, but she wrote it from us."



Number  805
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  806
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  807
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hart said of Gad: 'I can honestly say that he’s a friend now.'”
“We definitely got a crash course in pretending to be each other’s friend.'”
“The 37-year-old actor shared a shot in which he was posed with Jake Gyllenhaal on the set of their 2010 romantic comedy Love & Other Drugs, which also co-starred Hathaway.”
“The Hollywood, Florida native wrote: '#tbt Wow.”
“Here’s an oldie but a goodie.”
“#jakegyllenhaal and I behind the scenes during #loveandotherdrugs.'”
“Scroll below for videoBuddies: Anne Hathaway, 35, and Josh Gad, 37, had a laugh on social media Saturday after Gad excluded her from a throwback post.”
“The stars were snapped together in 2010 in HollywoodThe 35-year-old actress chimed in about her exclusion from the social media post, as she left a comment reading, 'I’m not sure if you’ll remember me but I was in Love and Other Drugs with you.”
“My name is Annie?”
“'Anyway, I hope you are well!”


"Hart said of GAD: 'to be honest, he's my friend now.'"
"We must have a crash course and pretend to be each other's friends."
The 37 year old actor shared a photo with Jack Gyllenhaal on the set of their 2010 romantic comedy love and other drugs, also co starring Hathaway
"TBT wow," wrote the Hollywood native in Florida
"It's an old song, but it's a good one."
"Jack Gyllenhaal and I performed behind the scenes in love and other drugs."
"Scroll to the video friends below: Anne Hathaway, 35, and Josh Gard, 37, laughing on social media because gard refused her reply."
"In 2010, the two stars took a group photo in Hollywood. "I'm not sure you remember me, but I've been in love with you and other drugs," the 35 year old actress interrupted, saying she was excluded from social media posts
"My name is Anne?"
"Anyway, I hope you're fine!"



Number  808
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For Twitter updates, follow @YahooStyle and @YahooBeauty.”
“(Photo: Getty Images)Read more from Yahoo Style + Beauty:Follow us on Instagram, Facebook, and Pinterest for nonstop inspiration delivered fresh to your feed, every day.”
“(Photo: Getty Images)Outfit #5She slipped the LV heels back on for the last stop of the day at Music Choice.”
“(Photo: Getty Images)Outfit #4Gomez switched up her look completely with a Miu Miu set and Gianvito Rossi heels.”
“(Photo: Getty Images)Outfit #3A Victor Glemaud look was paired with the heels for her Morning Mash Up interview with SiriusXM.”
“(Photo: Getty Images)Outfit #2The star slipped into this Christopher Kane dress for her visit to Elvis Doran and The Morning Show.”
“Outfit #1Gomez started her day in a navy dress by Jacquemus, paired with the LV heels.”
“But her biggest feat was wearing the same Louis Vuitton heels for all but one of the day’s outfits.”
“...at the end of a busy press day for Gomez who managed to pull multiple ensembles in less than 24 hours...”
“...date night A post shared by Selena Gomez selenagomez on Jun 5 2017 at 5 34pm PDT A post shared by Selena Gomez selenagomez on Jun 5 2017 at 5 34pm PDT A post shared by Selena Gomez selenagomez on Jun 5 2017 at 5 35pm PDT The date came...”


"For twitter updates, follow @ Yahoo style and @ Yahoo beauty."
"(photo source: Getty Images) read more from Yahoo style + Beauty: follow us on instagram, Facebook and pinterest to get fresh inspiration every day."
"(photo source: Getty Images) Costume: she put on LV heels again at the last stop of music choice."
"(photo source: Getty Images) costume ᦇ 4gomez changed her look with Miu Miu suits and gianvito Rossi heels."
"(photo source: Getty Images) Victor glemaud dressed up with high heels for her morning mashup interview with Sirius XM."
"(photo source: Getty Images) costume the star wore this Christopher Kane dress to visit Elvis Doran and the morning show."
"This dress starts her day with jacquemus Navy Dress and LV heels."
"But her greatest achievement is that she wears the same Louis Vuitton heels in all her clothes except one."
“… At the end of Gomez's busy day, he managed to play more ensembles in less than 24 hours... "
“… On date night, Selena Gomez selenagomez shared a post at 5:34 p.m. on June 5, 2017. Selena Gomez selenagomez shared a post at 5:34 p.m. on June 5, 2017. It's time for Selena Gomez selenagomez to share a post at 5:35 p.m. on June 5, 2017... "



Number  809
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’ve had a bunch of seizures, y’all just never hear about them.””
““This isn’t my first, second, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh seizure.”
““I’m prone to seizures,” Wayne said in 2012, months after the rapper suffered a seizure aboard another private jet flight, which also forced an emergency landing and a Texas hospitalization.”
“The rapper spent at least one night at an Omaha hospital during that ordeal.”
“In June 2016, Wayne’s private jet made an emergency landing in Omaha, Nebraska after the rapper had a seizure during a Milwaukee-to-California flight.”
“Despite efforts to get the rapper discharged in time for the Las Vegas show, doctors recommended that the rapper stay hospitalized for a few days, especially considering the multiple occurrences of Wayne suffering a seizure mid-flight.”
“He was transported to the city’s Northwestern Memorial hospital, where he had another minor seizure, Reuters reports.”
“Everyone at Drai’s wishes Lil Wayne a speedy recovery during this time.”Wayne was reportedly found unconscious at his Chicago hotel room Sunday after suffering a seizure.”
““Our priority is the health and well-being of our artists.”
““Due to unforeseen circumstances Lil Wayne will be canceling his previously scheduled performance,” Las Vegas’ Drai’s nightclub said in a statement Sunday.”


"I've had seizures many times, you've never heard of them."
"This is not my first, second, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh seizure."
"I'm prone to seizures," Wayne said in 2012, a few months ago, when rappers had seizures on another private plane, which also forced emergency landing and Texas hospitalization
"In that ordeal, the rapper stayed at least one night in Omaha hospital."
"In June 2016, Wayne's private plane made an emergency landing in Omaha, Nebraska, when the rapper had a seizure on a flight from Milwaukee to California."
"Despite efforts to get the rapper out of the hospital in time for the Las Vegas show, doctors advised the rapper to stay in hospital for a few days, especially given Wayne's multiple seizures during the flight."
He was taken to the city's northwest Memorial Hospital, where he had another mild seizure, Reuters reported
"Everyone in Drey wants Lille Wayne to recover soon in this period of time." According to reports, Wayne was found in his Chicago hotel room on Sunday when he was unconscious and had an epileptic seizure
"Our first priority is the health and well-being of artists."
"Due to unforeseen circumstances, Lille Wayne will cancel his scheduled performance," the Las Vegas dray nightclub said in a statement on Sunday



Number  810
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Eklund and Kaplan are now parents to twins: daughter Milla and son Fredrik Jr.”
“The couple had twins via surrogate in November 2017 after a failed attempt in which a previous surrogate sadly suffered a miscarriage.”
“During the dot-com bubble, he started a music production company called Cave Entertainment.”
“He worked in Stockholm, London, Singapore, and Tokyo before he moved to New York City.”
“He was the CEO of a company of 45 employees at the young age of 23.”
“Early career: In 1999, he founded an internet company called Humany with his father, Klas Eklund, and former Swedish Prime Minister Carl Bildt.”
“He worked at the financial newspaper known as the Finanstidningen for a time before starting a club called Billy with a number of his friends.”
“He later returned to Sweden and studied at the Stockholm School of Economics; however, he did not graduate.”
“The first time he visited New York City, he was blown away and vowed to return there to work later in life.”
“Eklund was an American high school exchange student at Edina High School in Edina, Minnesota.”


"Eklund and Kaplan are now the parents of the twins: daughter Mira and son Frederick the younger."
"The couple gave birth to twins through surrogacy in November 2017. A previous surrogate mother miscarried, but failed."
"During the Internet bubble, he founded a music production company called Cave Entertainment."
He worked in Stockholm, London, Singapore and Tokyo before moving to New York
"At the age of 23, he was the CEO of a company with 45 employees."
Early career: in 1999, he co founded an Internet company called "humanity" with his father Klaas Eklund and former Swedish Prime Minister Carl Bildt
"He worked for finanstidningen, a financial newspaper, for a while and then started a club called Billy with some friends."
He later returned to Sweden to study at the Stockholm School of economics, but did not graduate
"The first time he visited New York City, he was blown away by the wind and vowed to return to work there in the future."
Eklund is an exchange student at Edina high school in Edina, Minnesota



Number  811
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Maguire and Meyer have two children together: daughter Ruby, 9, and son Otis, 7.”
““He’s extremely private and prefers to stay home, and she’s very social and has tons of girlfriends,” the source explained.”
““As devoted parents, our first priority remains raising our children together with enduring love, respect and friendship.”At the time, sources close to the couple told PEOPLE that personality differences led to their split.”
““After much soul searching and consideration we have made the decision to separate as a couple,” read the statement to PEOPLE.”
“Maguire and Meyer announced their decision to separate after nine years of marriage in October 2016.”
“All net proceeds from the capsule collection, which features six necklaces, will benefit Baby2Baby — an organization that provides low-income families with the basic necessities that every child deserves.”
“Meyer designed the new jewelry collection with Jenna Dewan Tatum, who also attended the event.”
“The former couple were all smiles as they posed for a photo together.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The actor stepped out to support his ex-wife Jennifer Meyer at the launch of her new jewelry collection benefiting Baby2Baby in Los Angeles on Thursday night.”


Maguire and Meyer have two children: nine year old daughter Ruby and seven year old son Otis
"He is very private and likes to stay at home, while she is very social and has a lot of girlfriends," the source explained
"As loyal parents, our top priority remains to bring up our children with lasting love, respect and friendship." At the time, sources close to the couple told people that personality differences led to their breakup
"After careful consideration, we decided to separate as a couple," the statement read
"Maguire and Meyer announced in October 2016 that they decided to separate after nine years of marriage."
"The full net income of the capsule series, including six necklaces, will benefit baby2baby, an organization that provides low-income families with the basic necessities that every child should get."
"Meyer, together with Jenna Dewan Tatum, designed a new jewelry collection, and she also attended the event."
"When the first two took a group photo, they were all smiling."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The actor supported his ex-wife, Jennifer Meyer, at the launch of her new jewelry collection baby2baby in Los Angeles on Thursday night."



Number  812
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Though there are currently more than 200 former Real World cast members, as opposed to only 90 Road Rules cast members, Road Rules experience is a better predictor of Challenge success.”
“But it was a necessary experiment given that the Road Rules cast pipeline was drying up after MTV placed Road Rules on hiatus due to its flagging ratings.”
“All Stars had no eliminations, duels, or cash prizes, and the primary draw was watching Real World’s spoiled homebodies in more taxing, goal-focused scenarios.”
“All Stars followed Road Rules’ standard format except that instead of a group of collegiate unknowns, an assorted quintet of former Real World housemates teamed up for an action-packed road trip with the promise of a “handsome reward” awaiting them at the final destination.”
“Road Rules: All Stars was Bunim-Murray’s first formal cross-pollination of its successful reality brands, and it grew out of a playful franchise rivalry in which each season’s Road Rules gang would try to prank the Real World cast currently in production.”
“The debut season didn’t even have the word “challenge” in its title.”
“The Challenge technically premiered in June 1998, but its earliest incarnation couldn’t be more different than what the show is now.”
“It has gone from being an average, competent reality-adventure show to a heavily serialized, reality-based workplace drama.”
“Meanwhile, The Challenge has changed its format, its host, and even its genre.”
“Shows like Big Brother and Top Chef remain more or less identical to how they began.”


"While there are currently more than 200 former real-world actors, rather than just 90 road rules actors, road rules experience is a better predictor of challenge success."
"But it's a necessary experiment, because after MTV suspended" the rules of the road "due to declining ratings, the cast of" the rules of the road "is drying up."
"All stars don't have knockout, duels or cash prizes. The main way to draw is to watch spoiled family members in the real world in more onerous, goal oriented scenes."
"All the stars follow the standard format of the road rules. Except for a group of unknown people in the University, a group of five former real-world roommates join hands on a road trip full of action and promise to wait for them at the final destination with a" visible reward. "
"Rules of the road: All Star is bunim Murray's first formal cross pollination of its successful reality show brand. It stems from an interesting franchise competition in which every season's rules of the Road Gang tries to trick the real world actors currently being produced."
"There's not even the word 'Challenge' in the title of the first season."
"Challenge" was officially released in June 1998, but its earliest version is completely different from the current TV series
"It has changed from an ordinary, capable reality Adventure Show to a highly serialized, reality based workplace drama."
At the same time, the challenge has changed its form, its host, and even its type
As like as two peas and brother, the programs are more or less the same as those they broadcast.



Number  813
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Today, I will focus on ‘The Original Sin’ (Keri Claussen), the claim that created this insane pile on of my #MeToo,” Simmons wrote.”
“I will prove without any doubt that I am innocent of all rape charges.”
“Also Read: Russell Simmons Accused of Rape by 3 Women“Today, I begin to properly defend myself.”
“Simmons has denied the allegations, and on Thursday vowed to clear his name.”
“Also Read: Russell Simmons Says He'll Prove 'Without Any Doubt' That He's Not a RapistWednesday’s report followed previous accusations made by actress and “Rachel Getting Married” screenwriter Jenny Lumet, as well as former model Keri Claussen Khalighi, who Simmons allegedly sexually assaulted when she was 17.”
“The three women said that Simmons raped them in separate incidents that spanned from 1988 to 2014.”
“The review comes a day after the New York Times reported that three women had accused Simmons of rape — former Def Jam Records employee Drew Dixon, former music journalist Toni Sallie and performer Tina Baker.”
“A spokesman for the NYPD told TheWrap on Thursday that the department has received information regarding allegations against the music mogul in the New York City area, and that detectives are in the process of reviewing the information.”
“Russell Simmons has proclaimed his innocence following numerous rape allegations leveled against him — but the NYPD apparently isn’t so eager to take his word for it.”


"Today, I'm going to focus on Keri Claussen," Simmons wrote, "which has caused this crazy pile on my" metoo. "
"I will prove beyond doubt that I am innocent of all rape charges."
Read another: Russell Simmons is charged with raping three women. "Today, I begin to defend myself properly."
"Simmons denied the charges and vowed to be cleared on Thursday."
"Read also: Russell Simmons said he would prove" no doubt "that he was not a rapist. Before Wednesday's report, actress and Rachel married screenwriter Jennie lumit and former model Keri Claussen khalighi were accused of sexual assault when Simmons was 17."
"The three women said Simmons raped them in different incidents between 1988 and 2014."
The New York Times reported that three women accused Simmons of rape, including drew Dixon, a former Duff jam record employee, Tony Sally, a former music journalist and Tina Baker, the day before the comment
A spokesman for the New York Police Department told the wrap Thursday that the Department has received information about the New York area charges against the music tycoon and detectives are reviewing the information
"Russell Simmons acquitted himself after numerous rape charges against him - but the NYPD is obviously in no hurry to believe him."



Number  814
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She said the public should use energy to “lift those that you admire.””
“Not to judge others, but drugs are not my thing, stop putting me in that box just because u dont understand the way my body has matured.”Hadid concluded by asking social media users to empathize with people before criticizing them.”
“She added, “I will not further explain the way my body looks, just as anyone, with a body type that doesnt suit ur ‘beauty’ expectation, shouldnt have to.”
“Hadid also said she prefers not to use drugs, but underwent a holistic medical trial to help balance her thyroid levels.”
“...water retention due to that Hadid tweeted Sunday night...”
“For those of you so determined to come up w why my body has changed over the years you may not know that when I started 17 I was not yet diagnosed w Hashimoto s disease those of u who called me too big for the industry were seeing inflammation...”
“In a series of tweets on Sunday, Hadid said she would “not further explain” her weight after several people commented about her skinny frame at fashion week.”
“...which affects the thyroid gland...”
“Hadid added that she s speaking about her battle with the autoimmune disease because a lot of people can connect with it GIGI HADID HITS BACK AT CRITICS CALLING HER TOO SKINNY AT NEW YORK FASHION WEEK The supermodel revealed in December 2016 she was diagnosed with Hashimoto s disease...”
““It's just about everyone accepting their body as it matures and knowing that it's not always going to look the same and you can love yourself in all different sizes."”


She said the public should use their energy to "lift up those you worship."
Hadid finally said, "I don't want to judge people, but drugs are not my business. Don't lock me in that box just because you don't understand the way my body matures."
She added: "I'm not going to go any further in explaining my figure, just as anyone whose figure doesn't fit your 'beautiful' expectations should not."
Hadid also said she doesn't like to use drugs, but she has received a comprehensive medical trial to help balance her thyroid levels
“… Because of what Hadid tweeted on Sunday night... "
"For those of you who are so determined, why has my body changed over the years? You may not know that when I started working at the age of 17, I had not been diagnosed with Hashimoto's disease, and those of you who call me too big for this industry saw the inflammation..."
"In a series of tweets on Sunday, Hadid said that after several people commented on her thin figure at fashion week, she would" not further explain "her weight."
“… Affect the thyroid
"Hadid added that the reason why she talked about her fight against autoimmune diseases was that many people could be associated with it. Gigi Hadid hit back at critics' claim that she was too thin at New York Fashion week. The supermodel revealed in December 2016 that she was diagnosed with Hashimoto's disease..."
"It's just that everyone accepts their body as it matures, knowing that it doesn't always look the same and that you can love yourself at all different sizes."



Number  815
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I know I’m going to miss my belly so much once she’s here, I had to capture the beautiful process that is pregnancy so I can always look back at this time.””
“Even though 9 months feels like a lifetime while I’m awaiting the arrival of my baby girl, it’s really a blink in the grand scheme of life,” she wrote.”
“According to Khloé, she commissioned the scantily-clad shoot because she wanted to commemorate “the beautiful process that is pregnancy.” “Being pregnant has always been a dream of mine.”
“Sitting on an unmade bed, the Revenge Body host caresses a shirtless Tristan’s arm as the 27-year-old Cleveland Cavaliers player touches her thigh.”
“Intimate Moments In one intimate shot shared on Khloé’s app, the 33-year-old can be seen showing off her massive baby bump in lacy lingerie and a see-through kimono.”
“As seen in her latest maternity shoot, the couple — who is expecting their first child together — couldn’t keep their hands off each other as they pose for photos.”
“Though her due date is just around the corner, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star and her boyfriend, Tristan Thompson, are still heating things up in the bedroom.”
“Clearly, Khloé Kardashian is doing both.”
“Parents-to-Be Who says you can’t feel sexy when you’re pregnant?”
“This is definitely a side of Khloé we’ve never seen before!”


"I know that once she comes, I will miss my stomach very much, and I have to capture the beautiful process of pregnancy so that I can look back on it at any time."
"Even though nine months feels like a lifetime, and I'm waiting for my baby girl to arrive, it's really a moment in my life plan," she wrote
According to khlo é, she commissioned the film because she wanted to commemorate "the beautiful process of pregnancy" and "pregnancy has always been my dream."
"Sitting on an unfinished bed, the Avenger's body owner stroked the arm of a shirtless Tristan, and the 27 year old Cleveland Cavaliers player stroked her thigh."
"Intimate moments in an intimate scene shared on khlo é's app, the 33 year old can be seen wearing lace underwear and transparent kimono to show her huge baby lump."
In her latest photo of a pregnant woman, the couple are pregnant with their first child and can't take pictures without their hands
"Although her due date is just around the corner, the" Kardashian "heroine and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson are still warming up in the bedroom."
"Obviously, heloe Kardashian has both."
"Who says you don't feel sexy when you're pregnant?"
"This is definitely the khlo é side we've never seen before!"



**Something goes wrong**
“ET and PT.”
““It will be my first time performing 'Stay Together' on TV and I'm looking forward to having a great time!”The MTV Movie & TV Awards, hosted by Adam Devine, will air live from Los Angeles' Shrine Auditorium on Sunday, May 7 at 8 p.m.”
““I'm so excited to be performing at the MTV Movie & TV Awards,” Cyrus said in a statement.”
“It was previously announced that J Balvin, Pitbull and Camila Cabello will perform their Fate of the Furious soundtrack single "Hey Ma," for the first time on TV, as part of the celebration of the Fast and Furious franchise that includes the movie series winning the annual Generation Award.”
“The Detroit rapper will perform his new song "Jump Out the Window," while Miley Cyrus' younger sister, Noah, will perform her single "Stay Together," both for the first time on TV.”
“Big Sean and Noah Cyrus will perform at the MTV Movie & TV Awards, it was announced today.”
“MTV Movie & TV Awards: Big Sean, Noah Cyrus Set to PerformThe acts join the previously announced J Balvin, Pitbull and Camila Cabello, who will perform their 'Fate of the Furious' soundtrack single, "Hey Ma," for the first time on TV.”


"ET and Pt."
"This will be my first time to perform" together "on TV. I'm looking forward to a good time! "The MTV film and Television Awards, hosted by Adam Devin, will be broadcast live in the temple auditorium of Los Angeles at 8 p.m. on Sunday, May 7."
"I am very happy to perform at the MTV film and Television Awards," Cyrus said in a statement
"It has been reported that J balvin, pitball and Camila Cabello will perform the fate of their passionate soundtrack" Hey Ma "for the first time on TV as part of the celebration of the" speed and passion "series, including the film series that won the annual generation award."
The Detroit rapper will sing his new song "jump out of the window," while Miley Cyrus's sister Noah will sing her single "together" for the first time on TV
It is announced today that Sean and Noah Cyrus will perform at the MTV film and Television Awards
MTV film and TV Awards: big Sean, Noah Cyrus will perform the act before joining the previously announced J. Baldwin, Pete bull and Camilla Cabello, who will perform their 'anger of fate' soundtrack single, "Hey, mom," for the first time on TV



Number  817
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“Thanks to its natural humectants and anti-aging properties, manuka honey can be used in beauty for many things.”
“If you watch Keeping Up With The Kardashians or read Kourtney’s blog, you might have noticed just how passionate the reality star is about natural beauty.”
“Ahead, we take a look at some of Kourtney Kardashian’s beauty secrets for natural skin care, including what natural deodorant she uses and how she keeps her skin hydrated with manuka honey.”
“Coconut oilSuperfood ingredients such as coconut oil have made their mark on natural skin care and beauty products.”
“And, like many natural beauty devotees, Kourtney is no stranger to its beauty benefits.”
“On top of using the natural oil in her hair, the reality star likes to moisturize her body with it, too.”
“According to her app, Kourtney applies coconut oil to her body skin “right out of the shower” and let it sit for 10 minutes.”
“In addition, the reality star uses coconut oil in some homemade beauty recipes, too.”
“One of Kourtney’s go-to’s?”


"Check out the memo on Facebook!"
Because of its natural moisturizer and anti-aging properties, Manuka honey can be used in many aspects of beauty
"If you watch follow Kardashian or read Courtney's blog, you may notice the reality star's passion for natural beauty."
"Next, let's take a look at some of Courtney Kardashian's natural skin care and beauty recipes, including what natural deodorant she uses and how she uses Manuka honey to keep her skin hydrated."
"Super food ingredients such as coconut oil have emerged in natural skin care products and beauty products."
"And, like many natural beauty lovers, coultney is no stranger to its beauty benefits."
"In addition to using the natural oil in hair, reality TV stars also like to use it to moisturize their bodies."
According to her app, Courtney applied coconut oil to her skin "just after a shower" and let it stand for 10 minutes
"In addition, reality TV stars also use coconut oil in some homemade beauty recipes."
"One of Courtney's goals?"



Number  818
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared in the New York Post.”
“She’s asking anyone with information to please contact the Los Angeles Police Department or KlaasKIDS.”
“Arielle also posted a missing person’s description to her Instagram account with photos of Julia, her tattoos and the dog.”
“She also has tattoos on both forearms.”
“5 3 and weighs 105 pounds...”
“We are hopeful that she is safe and will not stop looking until she is back home with us Julia who was last seen walking her chocolate Labrador Retriever Cindy Crawford around 11 p m on January 31 in the Silver Lake area of Los Angeles is 36 years old...”
““We are so grateful and touched by the incredible support we have received from everyone.”
““My family and I are asking for any and all information that may help in our search for my sister Julia,” the “Fifty Shades Freed” star, 32, said in a statement.”
“Arielle Kebbel is searching for her sister, who has been missing for several days.”


"This article was originally published in the New York Post."
"She asked anyone who had information to contact the LAPD or klaskide."
"Ariel also posted a description of a missing person to her instagram account along with photos of Julia, her tattoo and her dog."
"She has tattoos on her forearm, too."
"53 pounds, 105 pounds..."
"We hope she's safe and won't stop looking until she and we get home to Julia, who was last seen walking her chocolate labrador hound Cindy Crawford around 11 p.m. in the Silver Lake area of Los Angeles and is 36 years old..."
"We are very grateful and moved by the incredible support you have given us."
"My family and I ask for any and all information that may help us find my sister Julia," the 32 year old 50 shadow freedom star said in a statement
"Ariel Cabell is looking for her sister who has been missing for several days."



Number  819
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Also On Majic 102.1:”
“You fall in love with people when you see them in their light, when you see them doing what they do, and they illuminate a certain aura.”
“She’s intelligent, strong, assertive.”
“She’s a beautiful person.”
“To try and fabricate chemistry is another… it’s a lot of energy.” Boseman added that while they’re not dating in real life, “It’s not hard to fall in love with Lupita.”
“It’s so much easier to just have it and work on other things– your intention, your action, and all that.”
“Nyong’o credits director Ryan Coogler with that visible chemistry, saying Boseman himself is a “magnetic person.” She adds, “Chemistry is something that you pray for as an actor, because it’s so hard to fabricate.”
“Boseman plays King T’Challa and Lupita plays his off-and-on girlfriend Nakia, and they have chemistry on screen.”
“Chadwick Boseman and Lupita Nyong’o star in Marvel’s Black Panther (in theaters now.)”


"Also on Majic 102.1":
"When you see them in the light of people, when you see them doing what they do, they light up a certain aura, and you fall in love with them."
"She's smart, strong and confident."
"She's a beautiful person."
Bosman also said that although they did not date in real life, it was not difficult to fall in love with Lupita
"It's much easier to have it and work on other things - your intentions, your actions, all of them."
Nyong'o thinks that director Ryan Coogler has this kind of visible chemical reaction, and she says boseman is a "magnetic person" herself. She added, "as an actor, chemistry is what you pray for, because it's hard to make up."
"Bosman plays king t'challa and Lupita plays his off and on girlfriend Nakia. They have chemical reactions on the screen."
"Chadwick Bosman and Lupita nion o starred in Marvel's panther."



Number  820
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to Mr. LaVergne, Nevada needs to make a request to the receiving state, which has 45 days to reply.”
“Simpson is going to wind up in Florida.”As of Sunday afternoon, neither Florida nor California had received the requisite paperwork for Mr. Simpson to return to those states.”
“It was unclear where Mr. Simpson was staying, but his lawyer, Malcolm P. LaVergne, said in an interview on Sunday that “Mr.”
“It provided images of Mr. Simpson leaving the prison in a baseball cap, white tennis shoes, jeans and a denim jacket.”
“Mr. Simpson, 70, was released at 12:08 a.m. local time from Lovelock Correctional Center in northern Nevada, the Nevada Department of Corrections announced.”
“O. J. Simpson was released on parole in Nevada on Sunday after serving nine years in a state prison on charges stemming from an armed robbery in a Las Vegas hotel room in 2007.”


"According to Mr. lavini, Nevada needs to make a request to the receiving state, which has 45 days to respond."
"Simpson's going to Florida." As of Sunday afternoon, neither Florida nor California had received the documents Mr. Simpson needed to return to those States
It's not clear where Mr. Simpson lives, but his lawyer Malcolm P. lavergne said in an interview Sunday, "Mr. Simpson"
It provided pictures of Mr. Simpson leaving prison wearing a baseball cap, white tennis shoes, jeans and a denim jacket
The Nevada Department of Justice announced that Mr. Simpson, 70, was released from the Lovelock Correctional Center in northern Nevada at 12:08 a.m. local time
"Simpson was released on parole in Nevada on Sunday after serving nine years in a state prison on charges of armed robbery in a Las Vegas hotel room in 2007."



Number  821
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here is the photo Hemsworth posted today from the set of the untitled movie:”
“Liam Neeson, Emma Thompson, Rafe Spall and Kumail Nanjani also star in the sci-fi comedy, which Sony will release the on June 14.”
“Hemsworth took to Instagram to post an image of himself alongside his Thor: Ragnarok co-star Thompson in costume — but not in character — as Agents H and M, respectively.”
“Check it out below (not above).”
“Fast-forward to 2018, and the Men in Black franchise is spinning off with Chris Hemsworth and Tessa Thompson leading the way — and now we have our first look at the pair on the set of F. Gary Gray’s film.”
“It’s been more than 20 years since veteran fed Tommy Lee Jones recruited outsider Will Smith to join his secret governmental agency that keeps an eye on aliens living as humans in New York City.”


"This is a picture that Hemsworth uploaded from the untitled movie crew today:
"Liam Nissen, Emma Thompson, Rafe spall and Kumar nanjani also starred in the sci-fi comedy, which will be released by Sony on June 14."
"On instagram, Hemsworth posted a picture of himself fighting side by side with Raytheon: Ragnarok's co star, Thompson, was dressed but did not play a role, playing agent h and agent m respectively."
"Look down (not up)."
"Fast forward to 2018, the man in black series is starting to stand out under Chris Hemsworth and Tessa Thompson - and now we see them for the first time on F. Gary Gray's set."
"It has been more than 20 years since veteran Federal Reserve member Tommy Lee Jones recruited an outsider, Will Smith, to join his secret government agency, which has been focusing on aliens living as humans in New York."



Number  822
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All Star Wars, all the time.”
“StarWars.com.”
“No release dates have been set for the new films, and no porgs were available for comment.”
“We can’t wait to continue with this new series of films.”Johnson’s upcoming Star Wars: The Last Jedi arrives in U.S. theaters on Dec. 15, 2017.”
““Star Wars is the greatest modern mythology and we feel very lucky to have contributed to it.”
“Rian will do amazing things with the blank canvas of this new trilogy.”“We had the time of our lives collaborating with Lucasfilm and Disney on The Last Jedi,” Johnson and Bergman said in a joint statement.”
““He’s a creative force, and watching him craft The Last Jedi from start to finish was one of the great joys of my career.”
““We all loved working with Rian on The Last Jedi,” said Kathleen Kennedy, president of Lucasfilm.”
“In shepherding this new trilogy, which is separate from the episodic Skywalker saga, Johnson will introduce new characters from a corner of the galaxy that Star Wars lore has never before explored.”
“As writer-director of The Last Jedi, Johnson conceived and realized a powerful film of which Lucasfilm and Disney are immensely proud.”


"All Star Wars, all the time."
"Star Wars."
"The release date of the new film has not been set, and there are no porgs to comment on."
"We can't wait to continue this new series of films." Johnson's upcoming Star Wars: the last Jedi will be released in American cinemas on December 15, 2017
"Star Wars is the greatest modern myth, and we feel very lucky to be able to contribute to it."
"Lyon will do amazing things on the blank canvas of this new trilogy." "Our lives work with Lucas and Disney on the last Jedi," Johnson and Bergman said in a joint statement
"He's a creative force, and watching him build the last Jedi from beginning to end is one of the greatest pleasures of my career."
"We all love working with Ryan on the last Jedi," said Kathleen Kennedy, President of Lucas pictures
"In directing this new trilogy, Johnson will introduce new characters from a corner of the galaxy that has never been explored in the Star Wars saga. This trilogy is separate from the plot of the Skywalker saga."
As the screenwriter and director of the last Jedi, Johnson conceived and realized a powerful film, which Lucas pictures and Disney are very proud of



**Something goes wrong**
“She was born and raised in Iran.”
“Hence, she is currently 42 years old.”
“Possibly, the right moment for their marriage hasn’t arrived yet.”
“However, they have not married yet nor have engaged too.”
“The couple is in a live-in relation since 2010.”
“Asa knew her boyfriend when she was just fifteen years old.”
“They are in a relationship for more than six years.”
“Asa Soltan Rahmati Boyfriend; Glimpse of Her Dating AffairThe beautiful Asa Soltan Rahmati is currently dating her longtime boyfriend, Jermaine Jackson Jr.”
“So, let’s know Asa Soltan Rahmati boyfriend, dating affair, children, marriage, net worth, career, age, and wiki.”
“Well, you have rightly landed on our page to explore all about her.”


"She was born and raised in Iran."
"So she's 42 now."
"Maybe, the right time for them to get married has not come yet."
But they're not married, they're not engaged
"The couple have been living together since 2010."
"ASA met her boyfriend when she was 15 years old."
"They've been in love for more than six years."
Beautiful asasoltan rahmati is currently dating her old boyfriend, Jamie Jackson
"So let's learn about SA Soltan rahmati's boyfriend, dating romance, children, marriage, net worth, occupation, age and wiki."
"Well, you're right to go to our website and explore everything about her."



**Something goes wrong**
“And then you just gotta trust and believe and just go for it."”
“The research is the main thing.”
“For anyone else considering in vitro fertilization and/or surrogacy, Burruss advised, "I would definitely say go forward.”
“"Once I got comfortable, then I started really appreciating the fact that [Shadina] was doing the heavy lifting," she said.”
“...about the process...”
“The mother of three who also shares son Ace Wells with Tucker and is mom to daughter Riley said that her surrogate Shadina had carried for another family before and so she was really teaching them a lot of things...”
“It was the best decision that we could have made," she added.”
“"But now that it's all said and done, I wouldn't change a thing.”
“Burruss said in an episode of Parents magazine's We Are Family podcast.”
“How can you trust somebody with your most precious possession, your most precious gift ... somebody that you barely know?"”


"Then you have to believe, believe, and fight for it."
"Research is the main thing."
"For others who are considering IVF and / or surrogacy, Burruss suggests," I'm sure I'll go ahead. "
"Once I feel comfortable, I start to really feel [sadina] doing heavy work," she said
“… About process... "
"The mother of three also shared with Tucker her son, ACE wells, who is the mother of daughter Riley. She said that her surrogate mother, sandina, had brought up children for another family before, so she was really teaching them a lot of things..."
"It's the best decision we can make," she added
"But now that I've said it and done it, I won't change anything."
"Burroughs said in the podcast" we are the family "in Parent magazine
"How can you trust someone who has your most precious property, your most precious gift... Someone you hardly know? "



Number  825
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Get The LookRimmel London Brow This Way, $4”
“This new development will bring us one step closer to the actress-model’s enviable arches.”
“Another plus is that the brush applicator is really easy to use, and it costs only $4.”
“It’s available in clear, blonde, medium brown and dark brown—so there’s a perfect shade for all of us.”
“She told Refinery29 that she relies on Rimmel London’s Brow This Way lightweight gel.”
“Well, we’re in luck: Cara has finally shared the one brow product she swears by, and luckily we can all find it at the drugstore.”
“She’s inspired many to grow out a thicker, fuller set, and we’ve always wondered what she uses to maintain her own.”
“Categories Celebrity BeautyWhenever Cara Delevingne’s name is mentioned, the first thing that comes to mind are her bold, iconic brows.”


"Get London eyebrows here, four dollars"
"This new development will bring us one step closer to the enviable arch of actress models."
"Another benefit is that the brush applicator is very easy to use and costs only $4."
"It's available in clear, gold, medium brown and dark brown, so it's the perfect tone for all of us."
"She told refinery29 that she relied on Rimmel London's eyebrows."
"Well, we're very lucky: Carla finally shared an eyebrow product she promised. Fortunately, we can all find it in the drugstore."
"She inspired a lot of people to grow thicker and fuller. We always wanted to know what she used to support her life."
"When a celebrity beauty mentions the name of Carla delaviny, her bold and iconic eyebrows come to mind first."



Number  826
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
““To give our family the best opportunity to adjust, we wanted to keep this a private matter before sharing it with the public.”
“The actor turned 46 on Wednesday and received a special birthday message from his and Fergie's 5-year-old son, Axl.”
“The singer posted a video on her Instagram, dedicated to her ex-husband, where their little boy dances and sings along to the song "(You Gotta) Fight For Your Right (to Party)" by the Beastie Boys.”
“"Happy Birthday Dad!!!!”
“Love #AxlJack ???”
“@joshduhamel," the former Black Eyed Peas singer wrote alongside a video slideshow.”
“In the second clip, Axl sends a silly message to his pops, saying, "Hi dad, you have stinky feet and rats are on your feet, and I love you."”
“The video ends with the message, "Happy birthday, dad!”
“Don't forget to Paaaarrrtay!”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"In order to give our family the best chance to adjust, we want to keep this secret before sharing it with the public."
The actor turned 46 on Wednesday and received birthday messages from him and Fergie's 5-year-old son, Akers
The singer posted a video on her instagram dedicated to her ex husband, whose little boy fights for your rights (party) with Beatie boys' song (you total), dancing and singing
"Happy birthday, Dad!"
"Love Jack?"
"@ joshduhamel," the former Black Eyed Pea singer wrote next to the video slide
In the second clip, Akers sends a stupid message to his father, saying, "Hi, Dad, your feet stink. The mouse is on your feet. I love you."
Happy birthday, Dad
"Don't forget to say hello!"



Number  827
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sarah Ferguson: She attended Prince Harry's wedding to Meghan Markle earlier this year...”
“He thinks she’s hilarious, and they have a mutual adoration society.”
“Although technically no longer a member of the royal family, Sarah – who is also known as Fergie – is still aunt to Prince William and Prince Harry.”
“It is also known Sarah still lives with Prince Andrew at the Royal Lodge in Windsor.”
“Surprisingly, Sarah was not among the 1,900 guests at the wedding of Prince William to Kate Middleton, 36, in 2011.”
“Yet she made the cut for Prince Harry’s wedding to Meghan Markle, 36, earlier this year, which was attended by a far fewer 600 guests.”
“Sarah Ferguson was invited to Prince Harry's wedding this year but not Prince William's 2011 weddingWhy was Sarah at Prince Harry’s nuptials but not Prince William’s?”
“It is known Prince Harry is close to his aunt Sarah, whom he “gets on with really well”, according to a source.”
“A source who holidays at Verbier – a favourite Swiss ski resort among the royals – spoke to the publication about Harry and Sarah’s “adoration” for each other in 2016.”
“The source said: “Harry gets on with Fergie really well.”


"Sarah Ferguson: she attended the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel earlier this year..."
"He thinks she's funny. They have a society of mutual worship."
"Although Sarah is no longer a member of the royal family in the strict sense, she is still the aunt of Prince William and Prince Harry."
"As we all know, Sarah and Prince Andrew still live in Windsor's Royal Villa."
"It's amazing that Sarah wasn't among the 1900 guests at Prince William's wedding to Kate Middleton, 36, in 2011."
"However, earlier this year, she attended Prince Harry's wedding to 36 year old Meghan Markle with far fewer than 600 guests."
"Sarah Ferguson was invited to Harry's wedding this year, but not William's wedding in 2011. Why is Sarah at Harry's wedding, not William's? "
According to a source, Prince Harry has a close relationship with his aunt Sarah, who "gets on well with each other."
"A source on holiday in vibil, the royal family's favorite Swiss ski resort, told the magazine in 2016 about Harry and Sarah's' worship 'of each other."
"Harry and Ferguson get on well," the source said



**Something goes wrong**
“Scully s lives...”
“The first was when Mulder and Skinner were at each other s throats on nothing more than a macho whim and the second was when Skinner once again decided to do CSM s bidding in order to save Mulder and...”
“If the plot turns of "My Struggle III" didn't make the fruitlessness of my obsession clear enough, another pair of clumsily written scenes did.”
“...both of them having been exposed to the black oil why Krycek did just about anything in his ratboy life...”
“And as I watched I tried to piece together Carter s mythology Why some green blooded aliens could be killed by gunshots but the Alien Bounty Hunter couldn t why the alien artifact made Mulder telepathic but not Scully despite...”
“Growing up with "The X-Files," I spent way too much of my free time watching the show, staying up late to record it on VHS and scouring Rochester-area video stores for the full set of official tapes.”
“If I'm mad, it's because of my investment.”
“Off.”
“Fuck.”
“Then, CSM tells Skinner that William, Mulder and Scully's missing half-alien son, was actually fathered by the chain-smoking, Buffalo Bills-hating, JFK-assassinating ghoul himself.”


"Scully's life..."
"The first time is that Mulder and Skinner quarrel over a male chauvinist whim. The second time is that Skinner decides to execute CSM's order to save Mulder, and...."
"If the plot turn of my struggle III doesn't make my obsession fruitless and clear enough, then another pair of poor text scenes can do it."
“… They've all been exposed to black oil. Why did kreisek do anything in his rat life? "
"When I watch, I try to piece together the myth of Carter, why some green blood aliens will be shot, but the alien bounty hunter can't, why the alien artifact makes Mulder telepathic instead of Scully, although..."
"Growing up with X-Files, I spent too much of my free time watching TV, staying up late to record on VHS, and searching for a full set of official tapes in the Rochester Area video store."
"If I'm crazy, it's because of my investment."
"Off."
"Damn it."
"Then, CSM tells Skinner, William, Mulder and Scully that the missing half alien son is actually his father who was assassinated by chain smoking, buffalo, Bill hate and Kennedy ghoul."



Number  829
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Luis Fonsi, Daddy Yankee Bring On More "Despacito"Over the course of 2017, the infectious "Despacito" hasn't left our brains.”
“Alessia Cara: 2018 GRAMMYs Backstage Interview6.”
“Lady Gaga's Tearjerker Performance with Mark Ronson"This is for love and compassion …even when you can't understand," Lady Gaga uttered before a white piano wrapped in lace as she opened her performance with "Joanne."”
“2.”
“It was history in the making, much like everything he touches.”
“A war simulation followed before Dave Chappelle hit the stage to punctuate segues in between heated musical vignettes performed by Lamar.”
“Opening with "XXX" before an American flag backdrop and U.S. soldiers marching, the rapper was joined by U2's Bono and The Edge.”
“...with Rihanna).”
“Kendrick Lamar, U2, Dave Chappelle Open With An ArmyKendrick Lamar has a steady track record of impactful performances on the GRAMMYs, and this time he opened the ceremony with a groundbreaking performance before winning the first award of the evening for Best Rap/Sung Performance ("LOYALTY."”
“1.”


"Louis fonsey, the Yankees Dad brought more 'despair' in 2017, and the infectious' despair 'didn't leave our brains."
“Alessia  Cara:2018 Grammy backstage interview 6. "
"Lady Gaga and mark Ronson's tearful performance" this is for love and compassion Even if you don't understand, "said Lady Gaga, opening with" Joanne, "in front of a white piano wrapped in lace
“2.”
"It's a history in the making, much like everything he touches."
"Before Dave Chappelle came to power, a war simulation interspersed some segments between Lamar's intense musical interludes."
Opening with "XXX" in the background of the American flag and before the march of American soldiers, Bono and edge of U2 band joined the ranks of rappers
"With Rihanna."
"Kendrick Lamar, U2, Dave chapel and amji Kendrick Lamar have a stable and influential performance record at the Grammy Awards. This time, he opened the ceremony with a pioneering performance, and then won the first best rap / singing performance award of the night (" loyalty ")
“1.”



Number  830
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...that there is more to feeling confident beauty and happy on the inside than just a price tag...”
“I want to be in like a superstar gown … So the designer got a lot of press.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The star faults her stylist for putting her in an affordable dress, saying 'I want to be in a superstar gown'Taryn Manning made headlines Sunday for donning a SAG Awards dress that was only $200 – and available at your favorite department store.”
“But while many were thrilled to see an affordable dress at a major Hollywood awards show, one person wasn’t as happy about it: the Orange Is the New Black star herself.”
“Asked by TMZ about the choice to wear the Adrianna Papell gown, Manning criticized her stylist Chaunielle Brown for the choice.”
““It’s wack that my stylist didn’t tell me that,” she said.”
““Now everyone else can afford it, that’s what’s cool about it, but it still sucks for me.”
“She should pay me a lot of money.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“...caught off guard when all of the press about my dress was about the cost which I knew nothing about and I felt used for someone else s gain She added that she loved the dress and is friends with Brown and concluded I am happy to be the proof...”


“…… Inner confidence, beauty and happiness are not just price tags... "
"I want to dress like a superstar dress So designers get a lot of media attention. "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The star accused her stylist of making her wear an affordable dress, saying 'I want to wear a superstar dress'," said Taryn Manning, who made headlines on Sunday for wearing a $200 sag awards dress, which is on sale at your favorite department store
"But when a lot of people see a cheap dress at a big Hollywood Awards ceremony, one person is not so happy: Orange itself is the new black star."
When asked by TMZ about her choice to wear Adrianna papell dress, Manning criticized her stylist chaunielle Brown's choice
"It's strange that my hairdresser didn't tell me," she said
"Now that everyone else can afford it, it's cool, but it's still bad for me."
"She should have paid me a lot of money." Get news, feature, etc
“…… When all the media about my skirt were talking about the cost that I knew nothing about, and I felt used by others, she suddenly added that she liked the skirt and was Brown's friend, and concluded that I was happy to be the evidence... "



**Something goes wrong**
“As previously scheduled, Kevin Spacey is not working on set at this time.”For more on the Spacey scandal, watch the video below.”
““In response to last night’s revelations, executives from both of our companies arrived in Baltimore this afternoon to meet with our cast and crew to ensure that they continue to feel safe and supported.”
““Media Rights Capital and Netflix are deeply troubled by last night’s news concerning Kevin Spacey,” reads the statement.”
“Netflix and Media Rights Capital released a statement regarding Spacey on Monday.”
“MORE: 'House Of Cards' Production Suspended Indefinitely Following Kevin Spacey Sexual Misconduct AllegationA source close to production previously told ET that the decision to end the show happened “months ago.”Filming on the show's final season has since been suspended indefinitely.”
“Earlier this week it was confirmed that season 6 of Spacey’s Netflix series House of Cardswould be the show’s last.”
“No other information is available at this time.”After actor Anthony Rapp told BuzzFeed News that Spacey had made sexual advances on him when he was 14-years-old, multiple accusers have come forward, specifically naming Spacey.”
“Spacey’s rep released a statement to ET on Wednesday, saying, "Kevin Spacey is taking the time necessary to seek evaluation and treatment.”
“In light of the recent allegations made against actor Kevin Spacey, the 58-year-old has confirmed that he is seeking treatment.”


"As mentioned earlier, Kevin Spacey is not working on the set at the moment." For more information about the spacey scandal, watch the video below
"In response to last night's revelations, executives from our two companies arrived in Baltimore this afternoon to meet with our actors and crew to make sure they continue to feel safe and supportive."
"Media rights capital and Netflix are deeply disturbed by the news about Kevin Spacey last night," the statement said
"Netflix and media rights capital released a statement about spacey on Monday."
"More: House of cards is off air indefinitely because of Kevin Spacey's sexual misconduct charges. A source close to the producers told et earlier that the decision to end the show took place "a few months ago.". The filming of the last season of the play has been suspended indefinitely since then. "
"Earlier this week, season 6 of Spacey's Netflix series cardhouse of cardsworld will be the final season of the show."
"There's no other news yet." Actor Anthony Rapp told buzzfeed news that spacey sexually assaulted him when he was 14 years old, and then several plaintiffs came forward, specifically named Spacey
"Kevin Spacey is taking the necessary time to seek evaluation and treatment," Spacey's representative said in a statement to ET on Wednesday
"In view of the recent charges against actor Kevin Spacey, the 58 year old actor has confirmed that he is seeking treatment."



Number  832
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Katy Perry appears to confirm Orlando Bloom romance is back on as she wears onesie covered with his face...”
“MORE : Orlando Bloom throws his hat into the ring for a Marvel movie role – but is there room in the MCU for Captain Britain?”
“Later on in the day she shared a video of her pal Tove Styrke.”
“However, Katy was only making a whirlwind stop in the UK to support her boyfriend, though as she will be performing herself in Amsterdam this weekend with two shows as part of her ongoing Witness Tour.”
“She also helped herself to some local delights during the trip (Picture: Instagram/Katy Perry)Sharing a snap of some baked beans on toast it’s clear that Katy has developed a fondness for all things British.”
“It seems that Orlando treated her to some home comforts during her trip, as she also shared a picture of her lunch.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementThe play – directed by Simon Evans – opened for previews on May 18, and will run for the public from June 4 to August 18.”
“Trafalgar Studio 1”
“Theatre goers may have been a little shocked to see the Roar singer sitting down to enjoy a performance of Killer Joe Picture Instagram Katy Perry Sharing a snap of the programme for the production complete with heart emojis around Orlando s face as she sat in the audience at...”
“Rather than staying under the radar, the proud smitten singer revealed she’d stopped over in the capital to visit her beau on social media.”


"More: Katy Perry seems to confirm that Orlando Bloom's romance is back, because she's wearing a dress that covers his face..."
"More: Orlando Bloom throws his hat into the ring of a miracle movie character - but is there room in MCU for the British captain?"
"Later in the day, she shared a video of her friend TOF stark."
"However, Katie just made a whirlwind stop in the UK to support her boyfriend, but as part of her ongoing witness tour, she will give two performances in Amsterdam this weekend."
"During the trip, she also helped herself taste some local food (photo source: instagram / Katy Perry) and shared a snapshot of baked beans on toast. It's obvious that Katy has a love for everything in Britain."
"Orlando seems to have given her some family comfort during the trip, because she also shared a picture of lunch."
Directed by Simon Evans, the play will be previewed on May 18 and released from June 4 to August 18
"Trafalgar Studio 1"
"When the roaring singer sits in the audience to enjoy the performance of instagram, a still photo of" Joe the killer ", the audience may be a little shocked because she is sitting..."
"The high-profile singer did not stay away, but revealed on social media that she had stayed in the capital to visit her boyfriend."



**Something goes wrong**
“I was friends with her, and that’s a great compliment because I choose friends carefully.”
“… I think that she has such great fortitude and empathy and brilliance, and she’s just, I think, for all of the folly of youth that she has, she’s such a wonderful person.”
“I genuinely don’t know the answer to that question.”
“Have we seen the last of Edwards full time, or could we see her come back in a guest role?”
“Every private conversation I’ve had with her has left with me feeling just heard and seen and respected as a human being and as an artist, and I really appreciate that.”
“She was immensely supportive of my wishes, and she’s really lovely, Shonda.”
“Shonda and I met almost a year ago now, and we had a very lengthy and gratifying and really splendid conversation about work and creative process.”
“...to see Edwards back in Seattle any time soon When did you decide to leave the show...”
“While I m sad to see Stephanie leave Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital I am excited to see what s next for Jerrika Here Hinton fights back tears as she speaks to Variety about her decision to leave Grey s Anatomy her new HBO series and why you shouldn t expect...”
“Jerrika has shared so much of herself with Stephanie and I am incredibly proud of the journey we’ve taken together.”


"She and I are friends, which is a good compliment, because I choose friends very carefully."
“…… I think she has so much willpower, compassion and intelligence, and I think she is such a wonderful person, even though she was stupid when she was young. "
"I really don't know the answer to that question."
"Have we seen Edwards' last full-time performance, or can we see her back in a guest role?"
"Every personal conversation I have with her makes me feel that I am listened to, seen and respected as a person and an artist, and I am really grateful."
"She's very supportive of my wishes. She's really cute, shoda."
"Xiao DA and I met almost a year ago. We had a very long, satisfying and wonderful talk about our work and creative process."
“… When did you decide to leave the show to see Edwards in Seattle? "
"Although I'm sad to see Stephanie leave the grey Sloan Memorial Hospital, I'm glad to see what the next step for Jessica here is. Sington held back her tears and told variety that she decided to leave Grey's new HBO series. Why shouldn't you expect..."
"Jerrika and Stephanie shared a lot, and I'm very proud of the journey we've had together."



Number  834
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(ABC)Match Game (ABC)Penn & Teller: Fool Us (CW)Prison Break (Fox)Shots Fired (FOX)Timeless (NBC)The Toy Box (ABC)World’s Funniest (Fox)”
“...in summer A P”
“Renewals and cancellations season can bring sad losses and consternation — like Fox cancelling Lucifer and canceling Brooklyn Nine-Nine, and then announcing a revival of the canceled ABC comedy Last Man Standing.”
“But it can also bring unexpected delights, like ABC renewing Black-ish and NBC swooping in a few days after Brooklyn Nine-Nine’s cancellation to pick it up for a sixth season on that network.”
“This year, the networks — ABC, CBS, NBC, Fox, and The CW — have been quick to announce their decisions, so we already have a good idea of which shows will thrive, barely survive, or die.”
“But there are plenty of fates still in the balance, so check back here for the comprehensive list of what’s leaving the air and what’s returning.”
“Which broadcast TV shows were recently canceled or have already aired their planned series finales?”
“9JKL CBS Alex Inc ABC The Brave NBC Brooklyn Nine Nine Fox picked up by NBC for a sixth season The Crossing ABC Deception ABC Designated Survivor ABC The Exorcist Fox Great News NBC Kevin Can Wait CBS Kevin Probably Saves the World ABC Last Man on Earth Fox Law...”
“Order True Crime NBC Life Sentence CW Living Biblically CBS Lucifer Fox Marvel s Inhumans ABC The Mayor ABC Me Myself I CBS The Mick Fox The Middle ABC New Girl Fox The Night Shift NBC Once Upon a Time ABC The Originals CW Rise NBC Quantico ABC Scandal ABC”
“Scorpion CBS Shades of Blue NBC Superior Donuts CBS Taken NBC Ten Days in the Valley ABC Valor CW Wayward Pines Fox Wisdom of the Crowd CBS The X Files Fox As always with The X Files another revival series a few years down the road isn t out of...”


(ABC) competition game (ABC) Penn & Taylor: fool us (CW) prison break (Fox) shooting (Fox) eternity (NBC) toy box (ABC) the funniest (Fox) in the world
“… In the summer
"Contract renewals and cancellations will bring heavy losses and consternation - for example, fox canceled Lucifer and Brooklyn 99, and then announced the resumption of the canceled ABC comedy last man standing
"But it can also bring unexpected surprises, such as ABC's sequel" black "and NBC's rapid release within a few days of the cancellation of nine nine nine in Brooklyn, which will surprise the sixth season of the network."
"This year, ABC, CBS, NBC, Fox and CW quickly announced their decisions, so we have a clear idea of which programs will flourish, survive or die."
"But there's still a lot of fate up in the air, so check out the comprehensive list here to see what's out of the air and what's back."
"Which radio and television programs have been canceled recently, or have shown the ending of their planned series?"
"9jkl CBS Alex ABC brave NBC Brooklyn 99 fox selected by NBC Season 6 through ABC cheating ABC designated survivor ABC Exorcist fox great news NBC Kevin can wait for CBS Kevin may have saved the last person on ABC earth fox law..."
"Order real crime NBC life imprisonment CW Life Bible CBS Lucifer fox miracles inhumane ABC mayor ABC myself CBS Mick fox middle ABC new girl fox night shift NBC former ABC original CW rise NBC Quantico ABC scandal ABC"
"Scorpion CBS blue shadow NBC advanced doughnut CBS with NBC ten days Valley ABC valor CW wayward pine fox crowd wisdom CBS X-Files fox as always with X-Files another revival series, a few years later the road is not out of..."



Number  835
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““That is a brilliant new direction for movie musicals.””
““You look at something like ‘Lemonade‘: that is brilliant,” he says.”
“Though Beyoncé’s resume has grown since “Dreamgirls,” Condon believes the mother of three has an eye for the future of filmmaking.”
“The role of Plumette, the feather duster of Lumiere’s (Ewan McGregor) eye, went to British actress Gugu Mbatha-Raw.”
““She would have been a good feather duster.”Condon, who worked with Beyoncé, 36, in 2006’s “Dreamgirls,” helmed the live action version of the Disney classic, which has grossed a total of $504 million domestically.”
““I even tried to get her into ‘Beauty and the Beast,’ but it wasn’t a big enough part,” the 61-year-old director said.”
“Entertainment, he lobbied for the Grammy-winning superstar to appear in Disney’s musical blockbuster.”
“...the chorus to Be Our Guest As the Beauty and the Beast director recently revealed to Yahoo...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window If Bill Condon had it his way Beyoncé would have sung...”


"This is a brilliant new direction for movies and musicals."
"What you see is like lemonade," he said. "It's great."
"Although Beyonce's resume has grown since" the girl of dreams, "Condon believes the mother of three has a vision for the future of film making."
"Lumier (Ivan McGregor) in the eyes of the feather duster, the role of plumette is played by the British actress Gugu mbatta."
"She would be a good feather duster." Condon worked with Beyonce, 36, to direct the Disney Classic live action version of "the girl of dreams" in 2006, which grossed $504 million at the domestic box office
"I even want her to play beauty and the beast, but it's not big enough," said the 61 year old director
"In terms of entertainment, he lobbied the Grammy award-winning star to play in Disney's blockbusters."
“… The chorus will be our guest as a director of beauty and beast, recently revealed to Yahoo... "
"Click send this email to a friend open in a new window click Share on twitter open in a new window click Share on Facebook open in a new window if Bill Condon had his way Beyonce would sing..."



Number  836
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image: Saeed Adyani/Netflix...”
“We can’t wait to see the family new musical adventures on Fuller House, with Stephanie Tanner at the helm!”
“Full House is returning as Netflix's Fuller House on Friday, Feb. 26, and the Tanner clan is all grown up!”
“Much like Joey and Jesse came to Danny’s aid after his wife died, Stephanie and Kimmy are stepping up to help D.J.”
“...in her time of need to help her raise her kids.”
“The reboot promises to bring back everything we loved about the original series — the characters, the catchphrases, and the music.”
“No, I don’t mean a Jesse and the Rippers reunion (but that would be cool!).”
“Stephanie Tanner is a musician in her own right in the spinoff.”
“But, can Jodie Sweetin sing in real life?”
“On the show, Stephanie seems to pick up where Jesse did on the original show, as an aspiring musician and performer.”


"Picture: Saeed adyani / Netflix..."
"We can't wait to see the family's new music adventure at Fuller's home, led by Stephanie Tanner!"
"On Friday, February 26th, Fuller's home for Netflix, the whole house is back, and the tanners have grown up!"
"Just as Joey and Jesse helped Denny after his wife died, Stephanie and Kimmie helped D.J."
"When she needs help raising her children"
"After the restart, we will bring back all our favorite original dramas - characters, catchwords and music."
"No, I'm not talking about Jesse's reunion with the Ripper (but that would be cool!)"
"Stephanie tanner is a musician in this movie."
"But can Judy swift sing in real life?"
"In the show, Stephanie seems to have regained her style as an aspiring musician and performer, just like Jesse did in the original show."



Number  837
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Since last season of MDLLA, he has shared a lot of personal news with fans, including his breakup with boyfriend Cody Keltz, the passing of his grandmother, and his younger brother's open heart surgery.”
“As the president and founder of The Malibu Life, Inc., Madison continues to dominate the Malibu real estate market.”
“After appearing on MDLLA more briefly in Seasons 7 and 8, Madison returned full time in Seasons 9 and 10.”
“Madison has been with MDLLA since the very first season, joining the series as one of the original agents, alongside Josh Flagg and Chad Rogers.”
“From the bottom of my heart, I sincerely thank you all and hope you will continue to follow my journey as I begin a new chapter of my life."”
“Thank you to Bravo, World of Wonder and the crew who became family for all your hard work and dedication to making this show the success that it is today.”
“I couldn’t have done it without the love and support from the fans who inspired me to share my life on camera.”
“"For the past 10 years, the show has documented my life and real estate career from the very beginning.”
“As an original cast member, I feel so lucky to be a part of the show that sparked the 'Million Dollar Listing' franchise," he said.”
“I am so grateful to have had this opportunity but the time has come for me to re-energize, rejuvenate, and refocus my attention and light onto new endeavours.”


"Since last season of mdlla, he has shared a lot of personal news with fans, including his breakup with his boyfriend Cody Keltz, the death of his grandmother and his brother's open heart surgery."
"As president and founder of Malibu life, Inc., Madison continues to dominate the Malibu real estate market."
"Madison appeared more briefly after mdlla in the seventh and eighth quarters and returned full-time in the ninth and tenth quarters."
"Madison has been in mdlla since the first season and joined the series as one of the original agents, along with Josh flage and Chad Rogers."
"From the bottom of my heart, I sincerely thank you and hope that you will continue to follow my journey and open a new chapter in my life."
"Thank you Bravo, miracle world and the crew for your hard work and dedication to make this show a success today."
"I couldn't have done that without the love and support of my fans, who inspired me to share my life under the camera."
"For the past 10 years, this show has recorded my life and real estate career from the beginning."
"As an original actor, I feel very lucky to be part of the series that triggered the million to go public," he said
"I really appreciate this opportunity, but now it's time for me to be rejuvenated, rejuvenated, and refocused on my new career."



**Something goes wrong**
“Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin, however, thinks there are other culprits, namely a rule that has been in place since 2013 and a form of trading that started gaining popularity more than a decade ago:”
“It’s never just one thing, but recently, a number of the major swings have been tied to the president’s ongoing trade war and his decision to try to get away with bald-faced lies.”
“Not because he s too busy to give it the attention it deserves or because he wanted to change its name to The Very Legal and Very Cool Donald J Trump Foundation and doing so required dissolving the organization and forming an entirely new 501 c 3 but because like...”
“...most things associated with the 45th president of the United States the charity is very likely a total a scam...”
“When Attorney General Barbara Underwood sued the foundation plus Trump Don Jr Ivanka and Eric in June she accused the organization of persistently illegal conduct and of functioning as little more than a checkbook to serve Mr Trump s business and political interests A sampling of the allegations regarding how...”
“...the family charity misappropriated its funds included 10 000 that was spent on a portrait of the president later found on display at the the sports bar at Trump s Doral golf resort 100 000 that was allegedly used to settle a legal dispute with the city of Palm Beach...”
“...which Trump resolved by contributing the amount to the Fisher House Foundation 258 000 that was allegedly used to settle lawsuits against Trump and his businesses including 158 000 paid to the Martin Greenberg Foundation...”
“Greenberg sued the Trump National Golf Club after it failed to pay him a promised $1 million for scoring a hole-in-one at a charity golf tournament; and$5,000 that was used to advertise Trump Hotels.”
“In addition, per Underwood, the board, which is composed of the president’s eldest kids, never once held a meeting, and Trump Organization C.F.O.”
“Allen Weisselberg apparently had no idea he was an officer until investigators told him as much.”


"However, finance minister Steven munuchin believes that there are other culprits, namely a rule implemented since 2013 and a form of transaction that became popular more than a decade ago:
"It's never been the same thing, but recently, some of the big swings have been related to the president's ongoing trade war and his decision to try to escape from plain lies."
"It's not that he's too busy to give it the attention it deserves, or that he wants to change its name to a very legal and cool Donald J. trump foundation, which requires dissolving the organization and forming a brand new 501 C3, but because of something like this..."
“…… Most of the things related to the 45th president of the United States, charities are likely to be a complete hoax... "
"In June, when attorney general Barbara Underwood sued the foundation, trump don Ivanka and Eric, she accused the organization of its consistent illegal conduct, which was nothing more than a checkbook serving Mr. Trump's commercial and political interests.
“…… The family charity misappropriated its funds, including 10000 pounds for the production of a portrait of the president, which was later displayed at a sports bar at trump Dolar Golf Resort and is said to have been used to resolve a legal dispute with palm beach... "
“…… Trump solved the problem by donating $258000 to the Fisher house foundation, which is said to be used to settle lawsuits against trump and his business, of which $158000 was paid to the Martin Greenberg foundation.... "
"Greenberg sued trump National Golf Club for failing to pay the $1 million he promised for a hole in a charity golf tournament and $5000 for advertising trump hotel."
"In addition, per Underwood said that the board of directors, made up of the president's eldest son, never met and trump organized the c.f.o."
"Before the investigators told Alan Weissberg, he obviously didn't know he was a police officer."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
““I kinda just lightly brush the hairs up for a nice full brow that I don't have naturally."”
“I mean, aside from being phenomenal as Cheryl Blossom in Riverdale, Petsch is also a makeup and skin addict, talking quite candidly about her beauty routine in interviews.”
“The most recent product favorite of Petsch’s?”
“A $14 eyebrow gel.”
“Yes, that's finally something you can afford.”
“The Details In a video posted to her YouTube channel Petsch broke down her summer beauty look with a makeup tutorial showing fans exactly how she conceals her skin with Tarte Shape Tape of course contours her eyes with Wander Beauty Catch the Light Highlighter and of course fills in...”
“...her signature thick brows...”
“Her favorite product?”
“Pacifica Stunning Brows Eyebrow Gloss in Golden Brown.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"I just brush my hair gently to make my eyebrows full, which I'm not born with."
"I mean, in addition to being very good at Riverdale as Cheryl bloom, page is also a makeup and skin addict, talking very frankly about her beauty habits in interviews."
"What's page's favorite product lately?"
"14 dollar eyebrow gel."
"Yes, you can afford it at last."
"The details in a video uploaded to her YouTube channel petsch broke her summer make-up style. A make-up tutorial showed fans how she hid her skin with talt shaped tape, outlined her eyes with vagrant beauty, captured light with a fluorescent pen, and filled them with..."
“… Her trademark bushy eyebrows... "
"Her favorite product?"
"Pacifica Meimei is golden."



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow Facebook.com/CosmoBeauty.”
“Get non-boring fashion and beauty news directly in your feed.”
“Everybody is beautiful."”
“Fans have been posting comments like, "This is so inspiring to women around the world!”
“The response has been overwhelmingly positive.”
“"So many women are relating to those photos, and that’s the message I want to convey."”
“"I’ve been wanting to recreate a few VS looks for a while now, primarily to showcase a different body type in their lingerie," Majors says of her inspiration to shoot the images.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“The side-by-side pictures show her in the same poses as Victoria's Secret models.”


"Follow Facebook.com/CosmoBeauty Website. "
"Get non boring fashion and beauty news directly from the feed."
"Everyone is beautiful."
Fans commented: "it's so inspiring for women all over the world!"
"The overwhelming majority of the responses were in the affirmative."
"So many women are in contact with those photos, that's the message I want to convey."
"For a while, I've wanted to recreate some of the vs shapes, mainly to show a different body shape in their underwear," major said of her inspiration for taking these photos
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"The side-by-side photos show her in the same position as Victoria's Secret model."



Number  841
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She gave them advice about their marriage,' she wrote, prompting Nick to write back: '#inaccurate #alternativefacts God Bless You #mafs.'”
“What a JOKE!!!”
“'It was our last day.”
“'On the five-day journey, we fell in love,' he said.”
“He even asked his new love to join him on his cross-country trip over Memorial Day weekend.”
“...when he wrote Had to leave my mark Nick who lived in Miami Florida at the time told the outlet that he made the decision to move to California to be with Heather because he couldn t stop thinking about her...”
“...was with Heather while trying to work things out with her Airing her grievances Sonia added that she had a right to be irate for many reasons On May 3 he shared an Instagram photo of himself at the Museum of Broken Relationships in Los Angeles presumable referencing his divorce...”
“Heather 32 is a co host on AfterBuzz TV an online broadcast network that recaps episodes of a variety of television shows including Married at First Sight He said she said Many Married at First Sight fans insisted their relationship timeline just didn t add up and Sonia said he...”
“Biased?”
“According to People, Nick had been communicating with Heather for three months before they met for the first time in California in early May.”


"She gave them advice on marriage," she wrote, prompting Nick to write back, "inaccurate facts, God bless you."
"What a joke!"
"It was our last day."
"During the five-day journey, we fell in love," he said
"He even invited his new sweetheart to take a cross-country trip with him on Memorial Day weekend."
“…… When he wrote, I had to leave my mark Nick, who was living in Miami, Florida, and he told the media that he decided to move to California to stay with Heather because he couldn't stop thinking about her.... "
“… When she was with Heather, she was trying to solve the problem, and Sonya said she had the right to be angry for many reasons. On May 3, he shared a photo of himself in the Los Angeles Museum of broken relations on instagram, which may be the reason for his divorce... "
"Heather 32 is co host of afterbuzz, an online broadcast network that retells the plots of various TV shows, including love at first sight marriage. He said that she said that many married fans of love at first sight insist that their love time lines don't match. Sonia said that he... "
"Biased?"
"Nick and Heather have been dating for three months, according to people familiar with the matter, and they met for the first time in California in early May."



**Something goes wrong**
“The property has six bedrooms, as well as a dining hall, drawing room, two kitchens and a sitting room.”
“It’s located in Lavenham, England, a medieval village north of London.”
“The home is known as the De Vere House, and was once owned by the second-wealthiest family in England.”
“The house was located in Godric’s Hollow, which also happens to be the childhood hometown of Albus Dumbledore.”
“It’s also where both of Harry’s parents died, and Lily’s love for Harry saved his life and landed him the infamous nickname of the Boy Who Lived.”
“Voldemort...”
“Also Read Samantha Bee Compares US Puerto Rico Relationship to Harry Potter s With the Dursleys Video The house used in Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows Part One depicted the house of Lily and James Potter who were part of the Order of the Phoenix to take down Lord...”
“It’s being sold for about $1.3 million, but goblins are still working on converting that into Galleons.”
“The house in Godric’s Hollow where Harry Potter defeated He Who Must Not Be Named as a baby — and earned that famous lightning scar — is up for sale.”


"It has six bedrooms, a dining room, a living room, two kitchens and a living room."
It is located in ravenham, a medieval village north of London
The house, known as the Deville house, was owned by the second richest family in Britain
"This house is located in Godric Valley, which happens to be Albus Dumbledore's childhood hometown."
"Harry's parents also died here. Lily's love for Harry saved his life and made him get the boy's infamous nickname."
"Voldemort..."
"Also read Samantha bee's comparison of American Puerto Rican relations to Harry Potter and Dursley's video using the house in Harry Potter and Deathly Hallows. The first part depicts Lily and James Potter who are part of the order of the Phoenix to overthrow the main Potter's house..."
"It costs about $1.3 million, but goblins are still trying to turn it into garland."
"In Godric Valley, Harry Potter beat a man who couldn't be named after a baby and won the famous lightning scar. The house is for sale."



Number  843
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Knew she wasn't all along...'.”
“Another fan passionately wrote: 'Doesn't look like Kylie's pregnant to me!”
“However a representative for Caitlyn confirmed this story as untrue, when approached by MailOnline.”
“The insider added: 'The fact is, Kylie was just worried about Caitlyn's reaction and then the news leaked out much quicker than she expected - before she had the chance to speak to her.'”
“...first but her reps confirmed this as untrue Yet the source added that Kylie had delayed telling Caitlyn as she was concerned about how she would take the news...”
“Close Only adding to the fraught situation it was then reported that Caitlyn was not told of the news personally and instead read about it online which she immediately denied Upsetting A source had reported She was heartbroken that her own daughter wouldn t confide something so serious to her...”
“'She was heartbroken that her own daughter wouldn't confide something so serious to her first.'”
“A source revealed to The Sun Online: 'Caitlyn had to find out that Kylie was pregnant just like everyone else — from the internet.”
“Only adding to the fraught situation, it was then reported that Caitlyn was not told of the news personally, and instead read about it online - which she immediately denied.”
“...and that a baby will put a big strain on their relationship but Kylie believes the opposite that she and Travis will be together forever MailOnline has contacted her representatives for comment...”


"I know she doesn't always..."
Another fan enthusiastically wrote, "it doesn't look like Kelly is pregnant to me!"
"However, when Caitlin was contacted via mailonline, a representative of Caitlin confirmed that this statement was untrue."
"The fact is that Kelly is just worried about Caitlin's reaction, and then the news leaks much faster than she expected - before she has a chance to talk to Caitlin," the person added
“… First of all, but her representative confirmed that it was untrue. The source added that Kelly delayed telling Caitlin because she was worried about how she would accept the news... "
"What's more worrying is that it was later reported that Caitlin was not told the news in person, but saw the news on the Internet. She immediately denied that the news upset a source because her own daughter didn't want to disclose such a serious matter to her..."
"She was very sad because her own daughter refused to disclose such a serious thing to her first."
"Caitlin has to find out from the Internet that Kelly is pregnant like everyone else," a source told the Sun online
"What's more worrying is that it was later reported that Caitlin was not personally informed of the news, but saw it on the Internet - she immediately denied it."
“… A child can put a lot of pressure on their relationship, but Kelly thinks on the contrary, she and Travis will always be together. Mailonline has contacted her representative for advice... "



Number  844
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But he also admits that he probably can’t forget the toxicity of Varner’s words.”
“And Zeke has acknowledged that he can forgive Varner’s mistake.”
“Survivor contestants usually try to pull a few Hail Marys once they realize they’re circling the drain.”
“And Varner knew it, especially once Zeke — a new friend — told him frankly that his chances weren’t looking good.”
“The obvious pick was Jeff Varner, since Varner’s only ally was voted off the show last week.”
“When Zeke’s tribe failed to spell “metamorphosis” in a word jumble during the final challenge, they were put in the unfortunate position of having to vote someone out during Tribal Council.”
“One tribe won pizza; the other had a tearful conversation around a campfire.”
“Zeke was outed when a fellow player got desperate and made a reprehensible decisionFor a while, “What Happened on Exile Stays on Exile” was about as typical an episode of Survivor as any other episode that’s aired this season.”
“But by the end of the hour, there was, incredibly, more reason to be hopeful about the way trans people are seen and represented than before.”
“The way Zeke was outed furthered a pernicious misconception, the kind that puts transgender people in real danger every day.”


"But he also admits that he may not forget the toxicity of Varna."
"Zeke has admitted that he can forgive Varna for his mistakes."
"Once survivors realize they're going around the drain, they usually try to pull a few hailstones."
"Warner knows that, especially when his new friend zeketan told him bluntly that his chances didn't look good."
"The most obvious candidate is Jeff Varna, because Varna's only ally was eliminated last week."
"When Zeke's tribe misspelled the word" transfiguration "in the final challenge, they got into an unfortunate situation and had to vote someone out at the tribal council."
"One tribe won the pizza, the other talked tearfully around the campfire."
"Zeke was exposed when a teammate was desperate and made a reprehensible decision." There was a time when "what happened in exile," like any other episode on air this season, was a typical episode of survivor
"But at the end of the day, it's incredible that there are more reasons to hope for the way people across cultures look and behave."
"The way Zeke was exposed further deepens a pernicious misunderstanding that puts transgender people in real danger every day."



Number  845
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“Sundays at 9 p.m.”
“Kendall Jenner worries that her clothing line might get negative reviews in this Sunday’s episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“In the clip, the 21-year-old supermodel finds out that Vogue wants to review her and her sister Kylie Jenner’s fashion line, Kendall + Kylie.”
“Kylie, 19, enters the room to find Kendall nervously flipping through the rack and asks what’s going on.”
““I just wanted to go over it.”
“Make sure we like every little thing.”
“If there’s something we want to take out,” Kendall said of the collection.”
““F–k!”
“I don’t know why I’m so nervous.”The former Vogue cover girl explains in a confessional that she doesn’t want a bad review to ruin her credibility.”


"Wait a minute."
"Nine o'clock Sunday evening."
"Kendall Jenner is concerned that her line of clothes may be negatively rated in this Sunday's" keep up with Kardashian. "
"In this video, the 21-year-old supermodel discovers that vogue wants to review her and her sister Kylie Jenner's collection, Kendall + Kylie."
"Kelly, 19, walks into the room and finds Kendall nervously rummaging through the shelves and asking what happened."
"I just want to have a look."
"Make sure we like every little thing."
"If there's anything we want to take out," Kendall said
“F–k！”
"I don't know why I'm so nervous." The former vogue cover girl explained in a confession that she didn't want bad reviews to ruin her credibility



Number  846
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I was checking my diary and that week I had two other birthdays, a Bar Mitzvah, and a supermarket opening!””
“But sadly, Hamill was a no-show.”
“Scott made an appearance on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...on Thursday where he discussed his love of Star Wars with guest host Kristen Bell in honor of May the Fourth — national Star Wars Day.”
“The Parks and Rec alum revealed that he once invited Mark Hamill to his childhood birthday party.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“I remember everything around that whole season around when Empire Strikes Back came out Scott reminisced and so I wrote him a letter inviting him to my birthday party When asked if he thought Hamill would really show up Scott replied with a confident I did I thought if he...”
“...got it and he was able to if his schedule was clear he was probably going to come he said...”
““He didn’t show up and I remember not being crushed or anything,” said Scott.”
““I’m sorry I missed your birthday,” Hamill said.”


"I'm looking up my diary. That week I had two birthdays, a bar mitzvah and a supermarket open!"
"But unfortunately, hamir is one that doesn't show up."
"Scott is at the scene of Jimmy Kimmel!"
“…… On Thursday, he discussed his love of star wars with guest presenter Christine bell to commemorate National Star Wars day on May 4
"The alumni of parks and rec revealed that he had invited Mark Hamill to his childhood birthday party."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I remember all that Scott recalled when Empire Strikes Back was on all season, so I wrote him a letter inviting him to my birthday party. When asked if he thought Hamil would really show up, Scott confidently replied," I think if he doesn't show up, he'll come back
“… I see. If his schedule is clear, he may come. He said
"He didn't show up, I remember not being crushed or anything," Scott said
"I'm sorry I missed your birthday," Hamil said



Number  847
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“), we’re hoping she cracked them open for a celebratory post-workout drink afterward.”
“And though Hudson kept her bottles of rosé closed during her workout (don’t drink and exercise, everyone!”
“The actress has broken a sweat doing everything from pole dancing to using booty belts.”
“This isn’t the first time the Fabletics founder has experimented with unconventional workouts either.”
““Just because you’re working out doesn’t mean you can’t have a glass of rosé—#moderation is the key,” she wrote in the caption of a regram of Hudson’s video.”
“...cut wine out of their diet either...”
“And though Stuart isn t suggesting that gyms across America replace their dumbbells with wine bottles a bottle of rosé weighs about two pounds so it s not exactly the most intense workout she isn t saying fitness fans should...”
“” Hudson captioned the video.”
““Sometimes you gotta to work for it!”
“In the video, Stuart can be seen tweaking Hudson’s form as the actress laughs at their wine-inspired sweat session.”


"), we hope she can open them after exercise and have a drink to celebrate."
"Even though Hudson keeps her bottle closed while exercising (don't drink and exercise, everyone!"
"Everything the actress did, from pole dancing to booty belts, was sweaty."
"It's not the first time the founders of fabletics have tried unconventional training."
"Just because you're exercising doesn't mean you can't have a drink." moderation is the key, "she wrote in the title of a regram in Hudson's video
“… And don't drink wine... "
"Although Stewart didn't suggest that American gyms use wine bottles instead of dumbbells, a bottle of ROS é weighs about two pounds, so it's not the most strenuous exercise. She didn't say that fitness lovers should..."
"Hudson added a title to the video."
"Sometimes you have to work for it!"
"In the video, you can see Stewart adjusting Hudson's form, the actresses laughing at their wine inspired sweaty meeting."



Number  848
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See more things The Duchess of Sussex has worn in the gallery below:25 Gallery 25 ImagesSign up for our daily newsletter and get the latest industry news in your inbox every day.”
“Very good clothing aside, the real excitement here revolves around the passionate feminism she'll be bringing into Buckingham Palace.”
“Markle has long been a vocal and dedicated advocate for gender equality and women's rights, maintaining a role as an "Advocate for Political Participation and Leadership" with UN Women since 2014.”
“Photo: Chris Jackson/Getty ImagesShe paired it with above-the-ankle Alexander Wang cigarette trousers, a plush AllSaints sweater, Altuzarra's "Ghianda" saddle bag and her go-to Manolo Blahnik pointy-toed pumps.”
“Sorry!”
“Unsurprisingly, the piece is already sold-out on JCrew.com.”
“— complete with tipped white hems and a belt (which, as we all know, obviously, she loves).”
“The look was headlined by a navy wool J.Crew topcoat — very Michelle Obama of her, no?”
“For the occasion, Markle followed up on her recent Jason Wu wrap dress with a slew of additional American brands and designers.”
“On Thursday, the couple hit the road to the English city of Birmingham to visit an event hosted by the Stemmettes, a local social enterprise organization which encourages young women to pursue careers in STEM fields, science, technology, engineering and math (or "maths," as they call it over there).”


"Take a look at more of the clothes the Duchess of Sussex wears in the gallery below: 25 galleries 25 pictures sign up for our daily press releases and get the latest industry news in our inboxes every day."
"Apart from the very good clothes, what's really exciting here is the passionate feminism she's going to bring into Buckingham Palace."
"Markel has been an active advocate of gender equality and women's rights for a long time, and an" advocate of political participation and leadership "of UN women since 2014
"Photo: Chris Jackson / Getty Images she paired it with Alexander Wang cigarette pants above the ankle, a plush all saints sweater, altuzara's' ghianda 'saddle bag and her go to Manolo Blahnik pointed heels."
"I'm sorry!"
"As expected, this piece is sold out JCrew.com Website. "
"- with white flanging and a belt (we all know that, obviously, she loves it)."
"The headline of this look is the Navy wool J. crew top - it's like Michelle Obama, isn't it?"
"On this occasion, after her recent Jason Wu wrap dress, markel has added a number of American brands and designers."
On Thursday, the couple traveled to Birmingham to see an event sponsored by the local social enterprise organization stemmettes, which encourages young women to pursue stem, science, technology, engineering and Mathematics (or "Mathematics" as they call it there)



Number  849
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Leslie Jones and Kate McKinnon Talk Cat Hair, Naked Binge-Watching and ‘Fashion Sweats’Her interest in keeping up the health kick started to wane, but Jones’ SNL and Ghostbusters costar Kate McKinnon pushed her to lose the other 20 lbs.”
“...right there.”RELATED VIDEO: Funniest Confessions Ever!”
“That literally was 20 lbs.”
““I got rid of soda and juice, that was the first thing I did.”
““The first thing is for your doctor to tell you that you need to lose 40 lbs.,” she said on Live with Kelly.”
“...in a year thanks to her hard workouts and a lighter diet — plus a little nudge from two people.”
“Jones revealed in July that she dropped 40 lbs.”
“!” she wrote, along with a video of her doing seated arm rows.”
“Jones shared photos and videos on Instagram from her sweaty time in the gym, which focused on “arms arms arms!”“Getting them arm yo!!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Leslie Jones and Kate McKinnon talk about cat hair, nude revelry and the 'fashion movement.'. Her interest in keeping fit began to wane, but Jones' SNL and "the devil" partner Kate McKinnon forced her to lose another 20 pounds
“… There it is. " Related video: the funniest confession ever
"20 pounds, actually."
"I quit soda and juice, and that's the first thing I do."
"The first thing is that your doctor tells you you need to lose 40 pounds," she said live with Kelly
“…… Within a year, thanks to her hard work and light diet, plus two people's push
"Jones revealed in July that she had lost 40 pounds."
"!" there's also a video of her sitting and swinging her arms, "she wrote
Jones shared photos and videos of her sweating at the gym on instagram, focusing on "arms! "Grab their arms!"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



**Something goes wrong**
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“The Grease star is currently back on tour and back in the recording studio and will be celebrating her 69th birthday on September 26.”
“Olivia Newton-John is on her road to recovery after fighting breast cancer for the second time.”
“The actress spoke to the Today show in Melbourne, Australia in an interview shared on Thursday, September 21 — and said being diagnosed with the disease has taught her just how strong she really is.”
“After 25 years in remission, Newton-John’s cancer came back four months ago, causing her to postpone her tour.”
““I thought I had sciatica.”
“It was painful to walk,” the singer revealed.”
““I thought it was that.”
“I was still performing.”
“I would kind of grit my teeth, take a couple aspirin and go on.”“Having it happen again, I thought to myself, ‘I’ve done it before, I got through this before and I can do it again,’” the “I Honestly Love You” songstress said.”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
"The fat star is currently on tour, returning to the studio to celebrate her 69th birthday on September 26."
"Olivia Newton John is on the road to recovery after his second fight against breast cancer."
"The actress told today show in Melbourne, Australia, on September 21 (Thursday) that being diagnosed with the disease let her know how strong she really is."
After 25 years of remission, Newton John's cancer recurred four months ago, causing her to postpone her tour
"I thought I had sciatica."
"It's painful to walk," the singer revealed
"I thought so."
"I'm still performing."
"I'll clench my teeth, take some aspirin, and then go on." "When it happens again, I say to myself, 'I've done it before, I've experienced it before, I can do it again,'" says the "I really love you" singer



**Something goes wrong**
“Scroll through the gallery to see what the cast looks like today!”
“Not going to lie, we totally feel old knowing that this movie came out 30 YEARS AGO.”
“This year marks the 30-year anniversary of the film, where “A young boy’s grandfather reads him a story called The Princess Bride while sick in bed,” according to IMDB.”
“The Princess Bride also starred the likes of Cary Elwes, Mandy Patinkin, and Billy Crystal.”
“It was just us down in the restaurant at night after shooting and it was a big, happy family just having a hoot of a time and playing music at night and cooking dinner and shooting a really great, iconic film.”The Princess Bride cast in 2012.”
“She told the outlet, “We were shooting in the middle of nowhere up in the north.”
“However, that doesn’t mean she didn’t love working on the movie the first time around!”
“News.”
“Please don’t ruin it,'” she told E!”
“We thought, ‘Don’t ruin it.”


"Scroll through the gallery and see what the actors look like today!"
"I don't want to lie. Knowing that the film was released 30 years ago, we feel completely old."
According to IMDB, this year marks the 30th anniversary of the film, "a little boy's grandfather read him a story when he was sick, called Princess Bride."
Princess Bride also stars Cary Elvis, Mandy pattingin and Billy Cristo
"After the shooting, only we spent the night in the restaurant. It was a happy family. We had a good time together. We played music and cooked dinner in the evening, and made a great iconic film." "Princess Bride" appeared in 2012
"We were shooting in a remote place in the north," she told the media
"However, that doesn't mean she doesn't like working for movies the first time!"
"News."
"Please don't destroy it," she told e! "
"We thought, don't ruin it."



**Something goes wrong**
“Anthony was previously married to Jennifer Lopez - they wed in 2004 and divorced in 2012.”
“Adding thoughtfully: 'I think it served me well.”
“The 45-year-old claims in a new interview that his dad urged him as a youngster to 'work on your personality' because he deemed himself and his son as unattractive.”
“And now the hitmaking pop star credits his father for his own success, explaining that it taught him to not ' rely on my looks to stand out'.”
“Scroll down for videoSecret to his success: Marc Anthony reveals in new interview how he gained his confidenceSpeaking to Men's Fitness, Anthony recounted: 'My dad would tell me, "Son, I’m ugly and you’re ugly - work on your personality."'”
“'I swear to God.”
“I told him a couple of months ago, I said, "Dad, you remember telling me that when I was little?"'”
“The actor and singer said.”
“'He’s like, "I’ll tell you that shit today, too!"'”
“I think confidence is a powerful thing.'”


"Anthony was previously married to Jennifer Lopez - they got married in 2004 and divorced in 2012."
"Added thoughtfully: 'I think it's good for me.'"
"The 45 year old said in a new interview that his father urged him to" develop his personality "when he was young because he thought he and his son were not likable."
"Now the outstanding pop star owes his success to his father, explaining that it has taught him not to" stand out on his own appearance. "
"Scroll down to see the secret of his success: Mark Antony revealed in a new interview how he gained confidence. When it comes to men's fitness, Anthony recalls, "my dad would tell me," son, I'm ugly, you're ugly - try to shape your personality. "
"I swear to God."
I told him a few months ago, and I said, "Dad, do you remember what I told me when I was a kid?"
"Said the actor singer
He said, "I'll tell you today, too!"
"I think confidence is a powerful force."



**Something goes wrong**
“You go girl!”
“However Lili's move to creating a support group where acne and breakouts are totally normal are steps in the right direction to removing the stigma around acne.”
“...her it stems from years struggling with cystic acne...”
“That might shock some Riverdale fans since she's always looking flawless on screen and in photo shoots but the star revealed that she's been battling cystic acne since she was 12 years old and it's taken a toll on her self confidence.”
“@lilireinhartembedded viaLili has in the past posted tongue and cheek photos of her with acne cream on and looking confident despite the spots on her face.”
“However late last night she got vulnerable and real about how acne affects her daily life.”
“...viaWhile her character Betty Cooper is always confident and commanding, Lili revealed that she was feeling far from that during an 11 hour photo shoot she had to do yesterday and it all stemmed from her breakouts.”
“Via lilireinhartVia lilireinhartVia lilireinhartVia liliheinhartVia liliheinhartVia liliheinhartVia liliheinhartVia liliheinhartVia lilireinhartVia lilireinhartVia liliheinhartThe full text reads:Adult acne story time.”
“I have a cystic breakout on my forehead currently.”
“And I had to do a photoshoot all day long.”


"You go, girl!"
"However, Lili has created a support group where acne and breakthrough are completely normal, which is the right step to eliminate the stigma surrounding acne."
“… Her illness stems from years of struggle with cystic acne
"It may shock some Riverdale fans because she always looks perfect on screen and in photos, but the star revealed that she has been fighting cystic acne since she was 12, which has taken a blow to her self-confidence."
"@ Lili has posted pictures of her tongue and cheek with acne cream in the past. Although there are spots on her face, she looks confident."
"No matter how late she was last night, she became vulnerable and was very real about how acne affected her daily life."
“…… Although her character, Betty Cooper, is always confident and dignified, Lily revealed that she had to take 11 hours of photos yesterday, and all this was due to her breakthrough
"Via lilireinhartvia lilireinhartvia liliheinhartvia liliheinhartvia liliheinhartvia liliheinhartvia liliheinhartvia liliheinhartvia lilireinhartvia lilireinhartvia lilireinhartvia lilireinhartvia full text content: adult acne story time."
"I have a cyst on my forehead."
"I take pictures all day."



Number  854
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The procession in the nave, the central part of the church, included the Dean of Windsor and Markle’s bridesmaids and page boys.”
“Markle's new father-in-law, Prince Charles, walked Markle from the quire, the area of St. George’s Chapel where the clergy and choir sit, to Harry.”
“Markle wore a white wedding dress designed by Clare Waight Keller, the first female artistic director at French fashion house Givenchy, according to Kensington Palace.”
“Markle became a member of the Church of England after being baptized and confirmed in March by the Archbishop of Canterbury Justin Welby.”
“Markle’s new sister-in-law, Duchess Kate, also followed in Diana’s footsteps by omitting "obey" from her vows to Prince William during their 2011 wedding ceremony.”
“Harry’s mother, the late Princess Diana, omitted "obey" when she said her vows to Harry’s father, Prince Charles, in 1981.”
“...us do part according to God s holy law in the presence of God I make this vow...”
“Meghan said I Meghan take you Harry to be my husband to have and to hold from this day forward for better for worse for richer for poorer in sickness and in health to love and to cherish till death...”
“...part according to Gods holy law in the presence of God I make this vow Harry said...”
“I Harry take you Meghan to be my wife to have and to hold from this day forward for better for worse for richer for poorer in sickness and in health to love and to cherish till death us do...”


The nave is the central part of the church, and the procession includes Windsor Dean, Marcel's bridesmaid and page boy
Mark's new father-in-law, Prince Charles, came up to Harry from quell, where the clergy and choir were in St. George's chapel
According to Kensington Palace, markel wore a white wedding dress designed by Claire white Keller, the first female artistic director of Givenchy fashion house in France
"After being baptized and confirmed by the Archbishop of Canterbury, Justin Welby, Marcel became a member of the Church of England in March."
Marcel's new sister-in-law, the Duchess of Kate, followed in Diana's footsteps, omitting "obey" from her vows to Prince William at her wedding in 2011
Harry's mother, the late Princess Diana, omitted "obey" when she took the oath to Harry's father Prince Charles in 1981
“… We are separated in the presence of God according to the holy law of God. I make this oath... "
"Megan said, I'll take you Harry to be my husband. From today on, no matter good or bad, rich or poor, sick or healthy, I will love you and cherish you until I die..."
"According to the law of God, I made this oath before God, Harry said
"I want you Megan to be my wife. From today on, no matter good or bad, rich or poor, sick or healthy, I will love you and cherish you until we die..."



**Something goes wrong**
“I'm serious about deadlines, thorough with my assignments and ready to work with you.”
“You can also visit my website at www.cleonalert.com to get a view of more of my writing services and samples of my work.”
“From resume writing/updates to creating bios to proofreading/copywriting to music reviews to interviews to web content and MORE, feel free to contact me at sage1924@aol.com for your professional writing needs.”
“About MeBesides being a huge "Real Housewives" fan and blogger, I've also been a professional freelance writer for over 20 years.”
“Thanks!”
“...com...”
“If you have a tip heard a rumor can offer a interview with any of the Real Housewives or their friends associates both past and present or would like to promote anything Housewives related on this blog please feel free to let me know by contacting me at sage1924 aol...”


"I'm serious about deadlines, I'm serious about my tasks, and I'm ready to work with you."
"You can also visit my website www.cleonalert.com To learn more about my writing services and samples. "
"From resume writing / updating to BIOS creation, to proofreading / copywriting, to music reviews, to online content interviews, please feel free to contact me." sage1924@aol.com To meet your professional writing needs. "
"As for me, in addition to being a super fan and blogger of Real Housewives, I have been a professional freelance writer for more than 20 years."
"Thank you
“… Communication... "
"If you have a message, hear a rumor, provide an interview with any real housewife or their friends, no matter past or present colleagues, or want to promote any housewife related content on this blog, please feel free to contact me at Sage 1924 AOL..."



Number  856
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“"I'm not this horrible, evil person!”
“'Dance Moms' Star Abby Lee Miller Completes Classes in Prison; 'Extremely Proud of Myself!'”
“Email Print Img No-img Menu Whatsapp Google Reddit Digg Stumbleupon Linkedin CommentAbby Lee Miller makes her prison time productive.”
“The "Dance Moms" star share that she completed several classes while serving time for bankruptcy fraud.”
“Miller earned certificates in personal finance and real estate.”
“She posted the photos on Instagram and stated that she's "feeling extremely proud" of her accomplishments.”
“Miller received both certificates on Dec. 15.”
“The "Dance Moms" teacher entered the Victorville Federal Correctional Institution in July where she's expected to serve her sentence for 366 days.”
“A California judge found her guilty of hiding money in secret bank accounts after filing for bankruptcy in 2016.”


Submit
"I'm not so terrible, evil man!"
"Abby Lee Miller, the star of dance mom, completed the course in prison;" I'm very proud of myself! "
"Email print img no img menu WhatsApp Google reddit digg stumpon LinkedIn commentable Lee Miller makes her prison life productive."
The "dancer" star shares that she completed several classes while serving her sentence for bankruptcy fraud
"Miller was certified in personal finance and real estate."
"She posted the photos on instagram and said she was very proud of her achievements."
"Miller received both certificates on December 15."
The "dance Mom" teacher entered the federal penitentiary in Victorville in July, where she is expected to serve 366 days in prison
"After filing for bankruptcy in 2016, a California judge found her guilty of hiding money in a secret bank account."



Number  857
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Everyone just kept answering phones and answering phones and answering phones.”
“(Kevin Mazur/Hand in Hand/Getty Images)"No one left," he said.”
“Miranda Lambert and George Strait perform as part of the satellite benefit from San Antonio.”
“(Kevin Mazur/Hand in Hand/Getty Images)Multiple locationsStages in Los Angeles, New York and Nashville were filled simultaneously, although the night's final performance — a tribute to Texans by George Strait, Robert Earl Keen, Chris Stapleton, Miranda Lambert and Lyle Lovett — originated from San Antonio.”
“Actress Sofia Vergara and actor-filmmaker Tyler Perry are seen at the benefit.”
“Several organizations will benefit, including the United Way and Save the Children.”
“Celebrities requested donations, told heartwarming survival stories involving people caught in the storm and sang songs.”
“(Theo Wargo/Hand in Hand/Getty Images)The quick-moving show took a form familiar to viewers since a sad template was set in the wake of the 2001 terrorist attacks.”
“Celebrities including, from left, Al Pacino, Leonardo DiCaprio and Robert De Niro were among those answering phones to speak to those making donations.”
“We're unstoppable."”


"People just keep answering the phone, answering the phone, answering the phone."
"(Kevin mazul / hand in hand / Getty pictures)" no one left, "he said
"Miranda Lambert and George strett's performance is part of the San Antonio satellite project."
(Kevin mazul / handle / Getty pictures) multiple locations in Los Angeles, New York and Nashville appeared at the same time, but the last show of the night - George Streeter, Robert Earl Keane, Chris Stapleton, Miranda Lambert and Lyle Lovett saluting Texans - came from San Antonio. "
"Actress Sophia fugala and actor and filmmaker Tyler Perry were present at the benefit show."
"Several organizations will benefit from this, including United Way and save the children."
"Celebrities asked for donations, told warm stories of people living in the storm, and sang songs."
"(Theo Wargo / hand in hand / Getty Images) this fast-moving TV series takes a familiar form, because after the terrorist attacks in 2001, it set a template for sadness."
Celebrities including alpacino, Leonardo DiCaprio and Robert De Niro are on the phone, talking to donors
"We are unstoppable."



Number  858
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“!”
“A post shared by John Cena (@johncena) on Apr 15, 2018 at 8:20pm PDTNikki has yet to comment on the breakup herself, although she did post the couple’s statement to Instagram with the caption, “We love you all.” Is love officially dead?”
“Their destination wedding was reportedly set for May 5, according to People.”
“After years of insisting that he would never get married again (John’s first marriage to Elizabeth Huberdeau ended in divorce in 2012), John got down on one knee at the WWE’s biggest event of the year and presented Nikki with a gigantic diamond ring.”
“The shocking split comes just over a year after John famously proposed to Nikki at WrestleMania on April 2, 2017.”
“However, there were some suspicions back in March, when Nikki didn’t show up to the Kids’ Choice Awards, which John was hosting for the second year in a row.”
“She also supported him at the premiere of his movie, Blockers, earlier this month.”
““We ask that you respect our privacy during this time in our lives.”The split announcement came as quite a shock, as Nikki and John just attended the WWE Hall of Fame Induction together on April 6, and were photographed kissing on the red carpet.”
““While this decision was a difficult one, we continue to have a great deal of love and respect for each other,” they said.”
“The WWE star shared a meme from The Simpsons that read “Worst Day Ever” in capital letters, and it went up on his page shortly after he and his fiancee, Nikki Bella, confirmed to Us Weekly that they’d be ending their relationship after six years together.”


“!”
"John Senna (@ johncena) did not comment on the breakup in a post she shared with pdtniki at 8:20 p.m. on April 15, 2018, but she did post the couple's statement on instagram, titled" we love you all. " Is love officially dead? "
"According to reports, their destination wedding is set for May 5."
"For years, John insisted that he would never get married again (his first marriage to Elizabeth Hubbard ended in divorce in 2012). At WWE's biggest event of the year, John knelt down on one knee and gave Nicky a huge diamond ring."
"The shocking breakup happened more than a year before John proposed to Nicky at the wrestling Festival on April 2, 2017."
"However, as early as March, people began to suspect that Nicky did not attend John's children's Choice Award for the second consecutive year."
Earlier this month, she also supported him at the premiere of his movie blocker
"We ask you to respect our privacy at this time of our lives." The news of the breakup came as a shock, because Nicky and John had just attended the WWE Hall of fame awards ceremony together on April 6 and were photographed kissing on the red carpet
"Although it was a difficult decision, we still have love and respect for each other," they said
"The WWE star shared a meme from the Simpsons, written in capital letters" the worst day in history, "which was posted on his website shortly after he and his fiancee Nicky Bella confirmed to us weekly that they were going to end their relationship after six years together."



Number  859
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I’m in a better place to make a sane decision.””
“I’m in a better place.”
“I’m okay with it being totally gray,” the mother of one said of her boyfriend, who told her costars that they met in 1988.”
““We love each other but the two of us have schedules that are off the charts insane.”
“Everyone wants us to define what it is, it’s not definable,” Frankel said during the fourth episode of the current RHONY season, in which Shields made a cameo.”
“Image zoom Credit: Alessio Botticelli/GC“Dennis and I have a very independent relationship.”
“On camera, Frankel always seemed hesitant to define the nature of her relationship with Shields.”
“Please respect our family’s privacy at this time.”)In 2013, Frankel filed for divorce from ex-husband Jason Hoppy, with whom she shares 8-year-old daughter Bryn.”
“His spirit lives on in our children.”
“Dennis was, and will always be, the love of my life.”


"I make rational decisions in a better place."
"I'm in a better place."
One child's mother said of her boyfriend, "I can accept the feeling of total darkness." Her boyfriend told her partner that they met in 1988
"We love each other, but the schedule for both of us is out of line."
"Everyone wants us to define what it is, it's undefined," Frankel said in Episode 4 of the current Ronaldo season, where shield guest stars
"Image scaling credit: Alessio Botticelli / GC" Dennis and I have a very independent relationship
"Under the camera, Frankel always seems to be hesitant to determine the nature of her relationship with the shield."
"Please respect our privacy at this time.") In 2013, Frankel filed for divorce from her ex husband, Jason hoppy, who has 8-year-old daughter Bryn
"His spirit lives on in our children."
"Dennis was and will always be the love of my life."



Number  860
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Promises to Buy Young Contestant a Dog After He Nails Audition Related Articles...”
“RELATED CONTENT America s Got Talent Goth Comedian Brought to Tears When All the Judges Love His Set Inspiring Young America s Got Talent Singer Dishes on Getting Golden Buzzer From Mel B Exclusive America s Got Talent Simon Cowell...”
“On Tuesday's AGT, during the first night of the season's Judge Cuts round, acrobatic couple Mary and Tyce of Duo Transcend came out determined to wow the judges once again after their astounding performance in the audition round.”
“Tyce, who is nearly blind due to a progressive eye disease, and Mary have been married for six years, and share a 2-year-old son who was actually in the audience, with his grandma, to cheer them on.”
“While America s Got Talentalways tries to amp up the tension drama and suspense when trapeze artists or daredevils are risking life and limb in their acts Mary and Tyce provided more real life drama than you could ever need...”
“...when their performance came to a terrifying and abrupt conclusion...”
“After completing a great deal of their gravity defying trapeze act made all the more dangerous by Tyce s eye condition and the inherent danger of two people climbing all over each other while hanging from a bar gravity refused...”
“...to be defied any longer and after a slip up Mary plummeted to the floor...”
“Which is exactly when AGT went to commercial leaving fans in mortal suspense until the show returned to the look of horror on Mary s mother s face in the crowd as she held the couple s baby in her...”
“...arms...”


"Promise to buy a dog for the young contestant after he has nailed the relevant articles of the audition..."
"Related content American got talent Gothic comedian brings tears when all judges like his setting inspiring young American got talent singer dishes get gold buzzer from Mel B exclusive American got talent Simon Cowell..."
"At AGT on Tuesday, on the first night of this season's judges' trials, the amazing performance of acrobatic group Mary and duo ascend's Tyce in the audition surprised the judges again."
"TEK, who has been married to Mary for six years because of the deterioration of his eye disease, almost lost his sight. He and his grandmother shared a 2-year-old son who was actually in the audience to cheer them on."
"When American geniuses are always trying to magnify the tension of drama and suspense, when Skywalker artists or bold people risk their lives and limbs in their actions, Mary and teke provide more real-life drama than you need..."
“…… When their performance came to a terrible and sudden conclusion... "
"After completing a lot of swing movements challenging gravity, the condition of teke's eyes and the inherent danger of two people climbing each other on the boom make the swing movements more dangerous, and gravity refuses..."
“… I can't resist any more. After a slip, Mary fell into a precipitous decline... "
"This is the time when AGT appeared in the advertisement, which made the fans in a fatal suspense, until the program resumed to the horror expression on Mary's mother's face in the crowd when she held the couple's children...."
“… Arm... "



**Something goes wrong**
“We wanted to be a part of that luxury comfort, technical space."”
“Look, we’re not trying to be a fashion brand, we’re just trying to be a part of culture.”
“"When you’re moving around the world like we are, it was like, why not?”
“"I think we just wanted to represent our lifestyle of where we’re at right now," said Jones in a GQ interview when it first launched.”
“The two launched the brand back in 2015.”
“The plane logo was created by Jay's business partner and childhood friend Emory Jones.”
“According to TMZ, the paperwork states he's looking to use the brand in a larger capacity, including department stores, an online shopping site, and for musical recordings.”
“Although his company already owned the trademark for it in regards to clothing, it seems Jay wants to expand it into a full brand with athletic gym bags, tour books, jewelry, and possibly a cosmetic line.”
“TMZ also reported Jay is making moves with his Roc Nation clothing brand Paper Planes.”
“But Jay Z isn't stopping there.”


"We want to be part of the luxury comfort technology space."
"Listen, we don't want to be a fashion brand, we just want to be part of the culture."
"When you travel around the world like us, it's like, why not?"
"I think we just want to show the way we live now," Jones said in an interview when GQ was first released
"The two companies launched the brand as early as 2015."
"The aircraft logo was created by Jay Chou's business partner and childhood friend Emory Jones."
"According to TMZ, the document shows that he wants to use the brand more widely, including department stores, online shopping sites and music records."
"Although his company already owns its brand name in clothing, it seems Jay wants to expand it into a complete brand, including sports and fitness bags, travel books, jewelry and possibly cosmetics."
"TMZ also reported that Jay Chou is taking action with his R.O.C. clothing brand paper aircraft."
"But jay z won't stop there."



Number  862
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The actor said it’s a “true true honour”.”
“AdvertisementElsewhere, Johnson has been awarded a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame.”
“The sequel to the 1995 fantasy adventure film also stars Jack Black, Karen Gillan (Doctor Who), Nick Jonas, Alex Wolff and Morgan Turner.”
“I would sabotage it in a heartbeat.”Jumanji: Welcome To The Jungle – starring Johnson and Hart – hits cinemas December 20.”
“I don’t want it to happen because it will make you that much better than me, and I just don’t want it.”
““I will take you down.”
““He’ll literally sabotage it from the inside.”“100 percent,” Hart quickly fired back.”
““The problem is that [Hart] will completely sabotage the campaign in 2020, 2024,” he said.”
“...a reality...”
“Advertisement Appearing on last night s episode of The Graham Norton Show the Jumanji Welcome to the Jungle star said There s been this really interesting uptick in public opinion wanting that to happen He then joked that Jumanji co star Kevin Hart wouldn t let a Johnson Presidency become...”


The actor said it was "a real honor"
Elsewhere, Johnson was awarded a star on the Hollywood Walk of fame
The sequel to the 1995 fantasy adventure film also stars Jack Black, Karen gilland, Nick Jonas, Alex wolf and Morgan Turner
Jumanji: welcome to the jungle, starring Johnson and Hart, opens on December 20
"I don't want this to happen because it will make you much better than me, I just don't want to."
"I'll take you down."
"He's really going to destroy it from the inside." "One hundred percent," Hart hit back quickly
"The problem is that [Hart] will completely destroy the campaign in 2020 and 2024," he said
“… Reality... "
"The ad on Graham Norton's show welcome to the jungle star last night said that there was a very interesting upward trend, and public opinion wanted this to happen. Then he joked that Kevin Hart, Jumanji's co star, would not let Johnson be President..."



Number  863
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...women...”
“Thank Me Later was also at times a celebration of independent women appreciating women s book smarts and street smarts on Shut it Down and Fancy but set the foundation for 2011 s Take Care which was at that point the peak of Drake s overt misogyny and objectification of...”
“Those songs pale in comparison to “Shot For Me,” “Marvin’s Room” and “Practice.” They are Drake at his worst.”
“His entire catalog is steeped in respectability politics, accepting women so far as their body count goes.”
“But Drake is as much a feminist as Rachel Dolezal is a black woman.”
“He’s even been referred to as a feminist.”
“Drake’s corniness, outward kindness and lack of sexual aggression has been misinterpreted as an overarching respect for women.”
“Ealy in The Perfect Guy...”
“But as is often the case with these so called nice guys Drake plays the charmer he ll call you beautiful open doors for you and send you smiley face emojis but the minute he has sex with you or you move on to someone else he turns into Michael...”
“This appeals to the sensitivities of the women in his fan base.”


“… Women... "
"Thanks to me, and later also an independent woman, celebrating the wisdom of women's book and street wisdom, closing it off and fantasizing, but laying the foundation for 2011 second care, at this point, Drake's public disgust and objectification peak..."
"Those songs look pale compared to shoot for me, Marvin's room and practice. They are Drake's worst works. "
"His entire catalog is immersed in decent politics, accepting the number of women's bodies."
"But Drake is a feminist, just as Rachel dolezar is black."
"He was even called a feminist."
"Drake's banality, good looks and lack of sexual assault are misunderstood as a supreme respect for women."
"A perfect man..."
"But like these so-called good people, Drake plays a magician. He will tell you to open the door beautifully and give you a smile. But when he has sex with you or you associate with others, he becomes Michael..."
"It attracted the sensitivity of the women in his fan base."



Number  864
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Nikki Bella Officially Cancels Wedding to John Cena Again: ‘I’ve Ruined Everyone’s Fairy Tale’Nikki, meanwhile, recently told PEOPLE she’s not quite ready to start dating again after her public split this summer.”
“He was eventually sent home when he told Lindsay he wasn’t ready to get down on one knee and propose.”
“Kraus appeared on Rachel Lindsay‘s season of The Bachelorette, making it to the final two.”
“After riding gondolas, Kraus leaned in for a kiss.”
““I don’t know if I’m ready for this.”Image zoom Nikki Bella and John Cena | Credit: Gary Miller/FilmMagicReady or not, Nikki headed out for a romantic night with Kraus.”
““I feel like I’m 15,” she said on the show to Brie as Peter tried to FaceTime her.”
“...work so hard all year long and do it all away from their families love you all A source tells PEOPLE that despite the post the former couple is not back together in any way the photo was simply part of a look back over the past year...”
“So thankful for my family and best friends always there when I need them the women I share the WWE ring with such an amazing group of hard working passionate women that together started an Evolution my Total Bellas and Total Divas production team crew and glam squad they all...”
““I’m so thankful for so many wonderful things in my life as well as so many incredible people in my life,” she began her post.”
“...in a hot tub with a bottle of wine while overlooking the sunset...”


"Related video: Nicky Bella officially cancelled her wedding with John Senna again:" I ruined everyone's fairy tale. "Meanwhile, Nicky recently told people that she was not ready to start dating again after the public breakup this summer."
"When he told Lindsay he wasn't ready to propose on one knee, he was finally sent home."
"Klaus appeared in Rachel Lindsay's Bachelor and entered the last two seasons."
After riding gondola, Klaus bent over and gave a kiss
"I don't know if I'm ready." Image zooming Nicky Bella and John seiner | image source: Gary Miller / movie magician or not, Nicky goes to a romantic night with Klaus
"I think I'm 15 years old," she told Bree on the show, as Peter was trying to make fun of her
“… Working so hard all year long, far away from family and loving you, a source told people that despite this post, the former couple didn't get back together in any way. This photo is just a part of looking back on the past year... "
"Thank you very much to my family and best friends who are always by my side when I need them. I shared the WWE ring with a group of hard-working, passionate women who created an evolution together. My total Bella and total queen production team and glam team, they are.... "
"I'm very grateful for so many wonderful things in my life and so many incredible people in my life," she started her post
“… In a hot tub, while drinking a bottle of wine, overlooking the sunset



Number  865
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“… I made the right decision.””
“Pathology tests showed she also had extensive ductal carcinoma in situ, a less invasive form of the disease.”
“"She’s my best friend, and I really don’t know what I would do without her.”Five years ago, Harry Connick Jr.‘s world changed forever.”
“In October 2012, the multiplatinum recording artist, host of the daytime talk show Harry and actor’s wife, Jill Goodacre, had a routine annual mammogram that came back clear.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““They said, ‘Okay, looks good.”
“Since you have dense breasts, just go across the hall for your sonogram,’ ” Goodacre, 53, tells PEOPLE in this week’s issue.”
“But during the sonogram, something was detected.”
“After undergoing a biopsy, Goodacre received the harrowing news — during breast cancer awareness month — that she had Stage 1 invasive ductal carcinoma and would need to immediately undergo a lumpectomy, followed by radiation.”
“For more from Harry Connick Jr. and Jill Goodacre, pick up this week’s issue of PEOPLE on newsstands Friday“I was scared I was going to lose her, absolutely,” says Connick Jr., 50, whose mother died of ovarian cancer when he was 13.”


“… I made the right decision. "
Pathology showed that she also had extensive ductal carcinoma in situ, a less invasive disease
"She's my best friend. I really don't know what to do without her." Five years ago, the world of Harry Connick Jr. changed forever
"In October 2012, the multi chip recording artist, daytime talk show host Harry and the actor's wife Jill goodacre had a routine annual mammogram, and the results were clear."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They said, well, it looks good."
"Since you have a very dense chest, go through the hall and have an ultrasound," goodock, 53, said in this week's People magazine
"But in the ultrasound, we found something."
After a biopsy, goodock received a heartbreaking message during breast cancer publicity month that she had stage 1 invasive ductal carcinoma and needed immediate lumpectomy followed by radiotherapy
"To learn more about Harry Connor Jr. and Jill goodock, in this week's People magazine Friday's" I'm afraid I'll lose her, "50 year old Xiaokang said his mother died of ovarian cancer when he was 13



Number  866
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click through our gallery for more stars who identify as pansexual!”
“I use it because I respect it.”We love that way of thinking!”
“Miley Cyrus, Brendan Urie & Jazz Jennings are just a few of the several pansexual celebs!”
“Pansexuality comes in all different forms, but the Dictionary defines it as, someone who is “not limited in sexual choice with regard to biological sex, gender, or gender identity.” Several celebrities have come in the last few years as pansexual, with the most recent being The Challenge’s Natalie Negrotti.”
“After Natalie, 28, was cruelly outed by her castmate, Kaleigh Morris, last year on social media, she set the record straight on Tuesday night’s episode of The Challenge: Final Reckoning.”
““I am pansexual and I’m okay with that now,” she said, also revealing she was currently in a relationship with a woman.”
“She then took to Twitter to continue the conversation, writing, “I came out with my story to share my truth with those who are battling the same thing I did.”
“Do not throw hate at anyone for their actions.”
“I wanted to use my platform to educate people who are not informed.”
“Let’s spread love and education not hate.”Natalie joins many out and proud celebrities in her fight for education and love, including Miley Cyrus, who came out as pansexual in October 2015.”


"Click our gallery to find more pan sex stars!"
"I use it because I respect it." We like this way of thinking! "
"Miley Cyrus, Brendan URI and jazz Jennings are just one of several pan sexual celebrities!"
There are various forms of Pan sexuality, but the dictionary defines it as a person who is not limited to the sexual choice of physical gender, gender or gender identity. Over the past few years, several celebrities have appeared as pan sexuality, most recently Natalie negrotti of challenge magazine
"Natalie, 28, broke the record in challenge: the final reckoning on Tuesday night after being brutally exposed on social media by her partner Carly Morris last year
"I'm a pansexual and I've accepted it now," she said, revealing that she's currently having a relationship with a woman
She continued the conversation on twitter, writing: "I come out with my story and share my truth with those who struggle with what I've done."
"Don't hate anyone for their actions."
"I want to use my platform to educate people who don't know."
"Let's spread love and education, not hatred." Natalie has joined many celebrities who are proud to fight for education and love, including pansexual Millie Cyrus, who made her debut in October 2015



Number  867
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Alex Rodriguez Opens Up for the First Time About Dating Jennifer Lopez...”
“Relationship goals, couple goals, staring goals, etc.”
“They're also one of the hottest, but that goes without saying.”
“Looking at them together is like staring into the sun.”
“The two haven't been shy about expressing their feelings for each other on social media, either.”
“Parts of Rodriguez's Instagram page straight-up look like a Lopez fan account.”
“He posted this photo of her standing and being opulent just because he could—a true sign of his devotion.”
“Lopez's page is full of A-Rod love too: She meticulously documented the joint birthday party they threw together over the weekend—their cake was bigger than both of them combined—and here's a photo from Lopez's feed of them just cuddling (so serene, so blessed).”
“It's beyond obvious these two are smitten:But Lopez's latest message about Rodriguez blows all these other love notes out of the water.”
“The "On the Floor" singer posted a photo of Rodriguez to Instagram last night in honor of his forty-second birthday, and the caption will make you weep.”


"Related report: Alex Rodriguez's first public date with Jennifer Lopez..."
Relationship goal, couple goal, gaze goal, etc
"They are also the hottest, but it goes without saying."
"Looking at them together is like looking at the sun."
"They are not shy about expressing their feelings for each other on social media."
"Part of the Rodriguez instagram page looks like Lopez's fan account."
"He posted this picture of her standing there because he could - it's a true expression of his loyalty."
"Lopez's website is also full of A-Rod's love: she carefully recorded their birthday party over the weekend. Their cake is bigger than the two of them combined. Here is a picture of Lopez, in which they just hugged (so peaceful, so blessed)."
"Obviously these two guys, but Lopez's latest message about Rodriguez blew out all the other love letters
"The singer on the floor last night posted a photo of Rodriguez on instagram to commemorate his 42nd birthday. The title will make you cry."



Number  868
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For this reason we went via the Greatest Great thing about this yr’s award season to seek out the lipsticks for the romantic vacation.”
“Whereas celebs like Jessica Biel have glam squads to make sure their pouts are good, discovering the perfect shade and product is the precedence.”
“These necessities are additionally important for the pink carpet.”
“There are some things we’re making an attempt to keep away from right here: Getting lipstick throughout your self (tooth, face, and so on) and getting lipstick throughout your date.”
“Then, you will want a components that may keep put with minimal maintenance.”
“First, it’s a must to choose the shade that pairs nicely together with your pores and skin-tone and ensemble—a hue that makes you are feeling assured and delightful.”


"For this reason, we are looking for lipstick for romantic holidays this year through the best events of this year's awards season."
"Celebrities like Jessica bell have beautiful teams to make sure their pouts are good, and finding the perfect tone and product is the first thing."
"These necessities are more important for the pink carpet."
"There are some things we're trying to avoid here: get lipstick in your self (teeth, face, etc.) and get lipstick for the whole date."
Then you will need a component that you can continue to use with minimal maintenance
"First of all, be sure to choose the tone that matches perfectly with pores, skin color and the whole. This tone can make you feel at ease and happy."



Number  869
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Next: Some accuse Perry of profiting off of the drama.”
“But for her part, Perry definitely hasn’t done much to quiet speculation about their falling out.”
“But in 2017, she released her new album, Witness.”
“(Not so) purposeful popFor a while, it seemed like Perry was incapable of writing a song that wasn’t a hit.”
“6.”
“Next: Perry’s attempt at getting deep felt pretty shallow for some fans.”
“But some fans were turned off by Perry’s aggressive behavior toward him and the other contestants she’s flirted with — especially given the current national conversation about sexual harassment.”
“But he also made it clear, in an interview with the Washington Post, that he didn’t feel as though Perry harassed him.”
“Glaze told The New York Times he wasn’t exactly thrilled that Perry kissed him.”
“But after she kissed 19-year-old contestant Benjamin Glaze, she faced considerable backlash for her behavior.”


"Next: Perry has been accused of profiting from the play."
"But as far as Perry is concerned, she certainly hasn't done much to quell speculation about their breakup."
"But in 2017, she released her new album witness."
"(not so) for a while, Perry didn't seem to be able to write an unpopular song."
“6.”
"Next step: for some fans, Perry's attempt to go deep seems rather superficial."
"But Perry's attack on the other players he and she flirted with made some fans sick - especially given the current national sexual harassment issue."
"But he also made it clear in an interview with the Washington Post that he didn't feel Perry harassing him."
"Glass told the New York Times that Perry kissed him and he wasn't very excited."
"But after kissing 19-year-old contestant Benjamin glass, her behavior got quite a bounce."



Number  870
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gomez eventually took to her Snapchat to apologize for her initial comment.”
“The back-and-forth didn't last long, however.”
“Bieber responded: "It's funny to see people that used me for attention and still try to point the finger this way."”
“They love you and supported you before any one ever did."”
“"Don't be mad at your fans.”
“"If you can't handle the hate, then stop posting pictures of your girlfriend lol – It should be special between you two only," Gomez commented on his post.”
“Gomez quickly weighed in with her own bit of advice.”
“"This is getting out of hand, if you guys are really fans you wouldn’t be so mean to people that I like."”
“"I'm gonna make my Instagram private if you guys don't stop the hate," Bieber captioned a black-and-white photo with the model.”
“In August 2016, Bieber threatened to leave Instagram after his rumored relationship with Sofia Richie was met with criticism from fans.”


"Gomez finally apologized for his initial comments on snapchat."
"But it's not a long time to go back and forth."
"It's interesting to see people use me to get people's attention and try to point fingers like that," Bieber replied
"They love you and support you more than anyone else."
"Don't be angry with your fans."
"If you can't stand hatred, stop posting photos of your girlfriend, ha ha - it's just a special relationship between you," Gomez said in his post
"Gomez was quick to come up with his own proposal."
"It's out of control. If you were really fans, you wouldn't be so mean to the people I like."
"If you don't stop hating me, I'll make my instagram personal," Bieber wrote in a black-and-white photo of a model
"In August 2016, Bieber threatened to leave instagram after being criticized by fans for his affair with Sophia Ritchie."



Number  871
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Leland kills himself in jail, which then frees Bob to find another host.”
“Laura's murderer is finally revealed as her father Leland Palmer (Ray Wise) who has been possessed by Bob ever since he was a kid.”
“Keep in mind this is only a tiny sample of what happens to the characters.”
“Because it's easy to get lost for weeks, if not years, obsessing over "Twin Peaks," here's a handy guide to highlights from the original TV series, the prequel movie (with deleted scenes) and books that might be important to the upcoming series on Showtime.”
“And most recently, in 2016, "Twin Peaks" co-creator Mark Frost penned "The Secret History of Twin Peaks," which would set the scene for the new series.”
“"Twin Peaks: An Access Guide to the Town" by David Lynch included everything from Norma Jenning's cherry pie recipe to the type of tree the Log Lady's log came from.”
“"The Secret Diary of Laura Palmer" was a 1990 spinoff novel written by Lynch's daughter Jennifer Lynch.”
“A few books added to the lore.”
“The original "Twin Peaks" lasted two seasons, a total of 30 episodes, on ABC from 1990 to 1991 and was followed by the 1992 prequel film "Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me."”
“(Disclosure: Showtime is owned by CNET parent company CBS.)”


"Lilan committed suicide in prison, which allowed Bob to find another owner."
"The murderer of Laura is finally revealed as her father Lilan Palmer (ray wise), who has been fascinated by Bob since he was a child."
"Remember, this is just a small example of what happened to a character."
"Because it's easy to get lost for weeks, even years, indulging in bimodal, here's a handy guide to the original TV series, prequels (with deleted scenes) and books that may be important to the upcoming Showtime series."
"Recently, in 2016, mark frost, co-author of bimodal, wrote the secret history of twin peaks, which will lay the foundation for a new series."
David Lynch's bimodal: a guide to the town's entrance covers everything from Norma Jenning's cherry pie recipe to the woodcutter's log from which tree
Laura Palmer's Secret Diary is a derivative novel of Lynch's daughter, Jennifer Lynch, in 1990
"Some books add legends."
"The first two seasons of bimodal, 30 episodes, were broadcast on ABC from 1990 to 1991, followed by 1992's prequel film bimodal: let's go with me."
"(Disclosure: Showtime is owned by CBS, the parent company of CNET)"



Number  872
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From classic cuts, modest designs, and simple features to contemporary styles with daring designs, this array of affordable dresses ensures that you’ll feel like the best dressed for less.”
“When you need to expand your wardrobe without breaking your budget, shop this assortment of designer dresses for cheap evening dresses, affordable party dresses, inexpensive semi-formal dresses, and cheap formal dresses under $100.”
“Whether it’s a sophisticated style or a romantic vibe you seek, these cheap prom dresses under $100 will have you looking like you spent way more than you actually did.”
“For prom, a black-tie event, a pageant, or another formal occasion, slip into one of these beautiful cheap evening dresses.”
“Chic and Cheap: Formal Dresses and Prom Dresses Under $100In this assortment of dresses for less than $100, you’re sure to find cheap prom dresses and formal gowns that are perfect for you.”


"From classic tailoring, simple design, simple features to bold design of modern style, this series of affordable dresses ensure that you wear best at less price."
"When you need to expand your wardrobe within budget, you can buy this range of designer dresses, such as cheap evening dresses, affordable party dresses, cheap semi formal dresses and cheap formal dresses under $100."
"Whether it's the complex style or the romantic atmosphere you're looking for, these cheap Prom Dresses under $100 will make you look much more expensive than you actually spend."
Wear these beautiful and cheap evening dresses for parties, black tie events, beauty pageants or other formal occasions
"Chic and cheap: dresses under $100 and prom dresses in this line of less than $100 dresses, you'll find cheap prom dresses and dresses perfect for you."



Number  873
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““But i’m glad I could share them with everyone who helped make this happen!””
“...much love xoxo — damaris ◟̽◞̽ (@postydamaris) January 13, 2018“I feel strange to have my photos be the talk of the town,” she told HuffPost.”
“In October, California student Damaris Fregoso cheekily asked actor David Harbour ― aka police chief Jim Hopper in Netflix’s sci-fi horror ― how many retweets she’d require for him to take part in the shoot:.”
“@DavidKHarbour how many retweets for you take my senior photos with me — damaris ◟̽◞̽ (@postydamaris) October 29, 2017Harbour spotted the 17-year-old’s tweet and replied, but with some cheeky conditions of his own attached:25k.”
“And I get to wear the school sweatshirt and hold a trombone.”
“...https t co xPNEE681J4 David Harbour DavidKHarbour October 29 2017 The idea of me in a small size sweatshirt of some high school holding a trombone with this poor girl trying to take her high school photos seriously I just thought that was so funny Harbour later told ThisIsInsider com...”
“...about why he replied...”
“The post soon garnered thousands of likes with Noah Schnapp who plays Will Byers in the show giving Fregoso s cause a helping hand Come on guys go retweet I need to this picture pic twitter com 1tS2T6gxAw Noah Schnapp noah_schnapp October 29 2017 Fregoso who attends Orestimba High School...”
“...in Newman soon hit her hoped for tally and Harbour vowed to fulfill his promise Holy hell internet...”
“How can you be in favor of this?”


"But I'm glad I can share them with all the people who have helped to achieve that goal!" "
“… I love XOXO Damaris ◟̽◞̽ (@ postydamaris) January 13, 2018. "She told the huff post:" I think it's strange that my photos become the topic of the whole city. "
In October, California Student Damaris fregoso brazenly asked actor David Harper how many times she needed to forward him to take part in the movie
"@ davidkharbour how many people have forwarded the advanced photos you took for me - Damaris ◟◞̽ (@ postydamaris) on October 29, 2017, harbour found the 17-year-old's microblog and replied, but his own conditions are a bit shameless. Attachment: 25K."
"I'm wearing my school sweatshirt and I'm holding a trombone."
“… HTTPS t Co xpnee681j4 David harbor David kharbor on October 29, 2017, about my idea of wearing a small size sports shirt and holding a trombone in a high school, this poor girl tried to take her high school photo seriously, I just thought it was too interesting. Harbor later told thisisinter com... "
“… About why he answered... "
"This post soon attracted thousands of people to like Noah Schnapp. He played will Byers in the show and gave fregoso a helping hand. Come on, guys, forward this picture I need. Twitter com 1ts2t6gxaw Noah schnapnoah Schnapp on October 29, 2017 fregoso studied in Austin bar high school..."
“… Newman soon hit the count she wanted and the port vowed to keep his promise to hell Internet... "
"How can you agree with that?"



Number  874
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Come on now hurry up!”The comeback sparked banter between the two, which ultimately fizzled after Gates blocked Martinez on social media.”
“!” she wrote in a since-deleted tweet.”
“And Becca!”
“Make sure you follow @Whats_Ur_Sign_ so she can get those followers so she can stop talking s—t about her friends…like Tia!!!!”
““Hey everybody!!”
“Gates came to the defense of her pal Booth by directing a mean tweet at Martinez.”
“The former couple — who briefly dated before Underwood joined Kufrin’s season —came face-to-face on an episode of the reality dating show June 11 and claimed their relationship was over.”
“...aim at Tia Booth and Colton Underwood for allegedly filming Bachelor in Paradise with each other after the two assured current Bachelorette Becca Kufrin that there were no feelings between them...”
“To clarify I could have still kept it real and spoken my truth in a less abrasive less shit stirring way she later tweeted adding that the issue is the way I handled it not the content The argument between the two began on Friday June 15 after Martinez took...”
“It’s really not my place to be the justice police, as much as I wish it was.”However, Martinez isn’t ready to let the situation go completely.”


"Come on, come on! "The comeback caused two people's ridicule, after gates blocked Martinez on social media, finally ended in failure."
"!" she wrote in the deleted microblog. "
"And Becca!"
"Be sure to pay attention to @ What, so that she can get those followers, so that she can stop talking about her friends For example, TIA!! "
"Hello everyone!"
"Gates is defending her friend booth, who tweeted bitterly on Martinez."
"The couple, who dated briefly before Underwood joined kuflynn, said face to face on the reality show on June 11 that their relationship was over."
“…… For TIA booth and Colton Underwood, because they assured current bachelor Becca kuflynn that there was no relationship between them.... "
"To clarify that, I could have been truthful and told my truth in a less gruff, less creepy way, she later tweeted, adding that the problem is how I deal with it, not what the argument between the two started on Friday, June 15, after Martinez took over..."
"It's really not my place as a judicial police officer, as I hope." However, Martinez is not ready to let things go completely



Number  875
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thank you every one that donated."”
“"It was meant to be ironic and funny and extreme," she told GMA.”
“...of her family s new celebrity status...”
“.medium .leadMediaRegion.city_module iframe {height:421px;}Over the weekend, Jones shared a video of her son Keaton Jones tearfully describing the bullying he experiences at school.”
“The video went viral and attracted the attention of several celebrities, including Selena Gomez, Millie Bobbie Brown and Demi Lovato.”
“It also led a person named Joseph Lam to create a GoFundMe campaign and help fund the 11-year-old child's future.”
“The campaign has raised nearly $57,000 dollars, but has been put on pause amid controversy.”
“Jones has been criticized for the donations and received backlash for social media posts that include pictures of the Jones family with a Confederate flag.”
“"I mean, you know, yesterday he was a hero.”
“Yesterday, the world loved us.”


"Thank you to everyone who donated."
"The purpose of this book is satire, fun and extreme," she told GMA
“… The new celebrity in her family... "
“。 Medium. leadMediaRegion.city \Last weekend, Jones shared a video in which her son, Keaton Jones, tearfully described his bullying at school
"The video became popular and attracted the attention of several celebrities, including Selena Gomez, Millie Bobbie brown and Demi Lovato."
"It also led to a go fund me campaign launched by a man named Joseph Lam to help fund the 11 year old's future."
"The campaign raised nearly $57000, but it was suspended in the dispute."
"Jones has been criticized for donating money, and social media posts include photos of the Jones family with the Confederate flag, causing a strong response."
"I mean, you know, yesterday he was a hero."
"Yesterday, the world loved us."



Number  876
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So, is there pressure to be perfect friends with the entire world watching every single thing they do on social media?”
“So we went back and forth and had our jokes and had our fun."”
“While he was here, we had to get the deets on his brotherly beef with Josh and see if the former co-stars are still on good terms.”
“Drake stopped by Seventeen.com HQ to talk about his latest television gig — competing as a celebrity on one of MTV's longest-running game shows, The Challenge: Champs vs. Stars.”
“...together and scheduling and invitations and then I just let my wife handle it all he said...”
“We talked about it and I was like Dude I m just a little bummed and he was like Honestly first of all I didn t think you d wanna come secondly it was such a nightmare putting it all...”
“But Drake said they're all good now.”
“And I'm like, 'Bro, this is a brotherly thing.'"”
“"But I did feel bad for Josh because people really did attack him.”
“"I thought it was going to be some funny 'well, guess you won't get invited to the wedding, blah, blah, blah,'" Drake said.”


"So, when the world is watching everything they do on social media, is there any pressure to be the perfect friend?"
"So we went back and forth, joking and having a good time."
"When he's here, we have to get evidence of his fraternal feud with Josh and see if our former partners are still getting along well."
"Drake passed by 17.com headquarters to talk about his latest TV Concert - as one of MTV's longest game shows, challenge celebrity competition: Champion vs. star
“… Arrange time and invitation together, and then I'll let my wife deal with everything he says... "
"We talked about it. I'm just like a friend. I'm just a little unhappy. To be honest with him, first of all, I didn't expect you to come. Second, it's a nightmare
"But Drake said they're all right now."
"I said," brother, this is a brotherly thing. "
"But I do feel sorry for Josh because people did attack him."
"I thought it would be fun," Drake said. "Well, I guess you won't be invited to a wedding, or anything like that."



Number  877
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Keep scrolling to see all the sparkly dresses, cute crop tops, gorgeous gowns and more!”
“From Amber Rose’s Old Hollywood glam velvet number to Janelle Monae showing her pride in a rainbow-colored ball gown, there was no shortage of fierce fashion.”
“But, let’s be honest, we were just as excited to see what everyone in attendance was wearing.”
“Nicki Minaj, Janelle Monae and Miguel all performed during the action-packed show, while powerhouses like Tiffany Haddish, SZA, Cardi B. and Beyonce took home some of the night’s top honors.”
“...the annual event that celebrates the best of music, sports, television and movies, and you can bet the stars brought their fashion A-game on the red carpet.”
“Nearly a decade after his first hosting gig, Jamie Foxx was back to M.C.”
“Hollywood heavyweights were out in force on at the Microsoft Theater in Los Angeles on Sunday, June 24, for the 2018 BET Awards.”


"Continue to scroll through all the shiny dresses, cute jackets, gorgeous dresses, etc.!"
"From amber rose's classic Hollywood velvet number to Janelle monae's proud rainbow prom dress, there is no lack of intense fashion."
"But, to be honest, we were just as excited to see what everyone was wearing."
"Nicky Minagi, Janel Monet and Miguel all performed in the action packed show, while Tiffany hadish, Sasha, Katie B. and Beyonce won some of the night's top honors."
“…… It's an annual event to celebrate the best performance of music, sports, TV and movies, and you can bet that stars bring their fashion games on the red carpet. "
"Nearly ten years after his first concert, Jamie fox is back at M.C."
"Hollywood heavyweights attend the 2018 best awards ceremony at the Microsoft theater in Los Angeles on Sunday, June 24."



Number  878
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Morty...”
“The show has already released a sly teaser trailer with a commercial for a new Hawkins mall Stranger Things joins several fan favorite shows that are skipping 2018 such as HBO s Game of Thrones Veep and True Detective along with FX s Fargo and Adult Swim s Rick and...”
““It’s a really exciting season, just takes a little more time,” she said.”
“It will be worth the wait.”After Holland’s panel, she noted that the show will have more special effects work than previous seasons as well.”
“I think it’s going to be a fantastic season.”
“They want to deliver something bigger and better than last year.”
““The Duffer Brothers and Shawn Levy, they understand the stakes are high.”
““It’s a handcrafted show,” Holland said.”
“But she assures the result will be better than the show’s second season, which fans had some mixed feelings about.”
“Talking to critics at the Television Critics Association’s press tour in Beverly Hills on Sunday, programming executive Cindy Holland confirmed the sci-fi sensation won’t be back until summer 2019.”


"Morty..."
"The show has released a cunning Trailer with a new Hawkins shopping mall commercial," things about strangers, "adding some fans' favorite shows that are skipping 2018, such as HBO's game of Thrones veep and real detective, FX's Fargo and adult swimming's Rick and 》
"It's a very exciting season, it just takes a little more time," she said
"It's worth the wait." After Holland's group discussion, she pointed out that the show will also have more special effects than in previous seasons
"I think it's going to be a wonderful season
"They want to launch bigger and better products than last year."
"The duffers and Sean levy, they know the risk is great."
"It's a handmade show," Holland said
"But she promised that the result would be better than the second season, and the fans had a mixed feeling about the second season."
Cindy Holland, executive director of the show, confirmed in a talk with commentators at the TV criticism Association press conference in Beverly Hills on Sunday that the sci-fi masterpiece won't return until the summer of 2019



Number  879
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Georgina, who met Cristiano in June 2016 at the Gucci store in central Madrid she worked at when he was shopping for summer clothes, sparked engagement rumours at the World Cup by showing off a stunning £615,000 diamond ring.”
“Little Alana was impossibly cute, wrapped up in a snug hooded jacket and grey trousers.”
“And Cristiano Ronaldo's fiancée Georgina Rodriguez was spotted enjoying a walk with the tiny tot and the sports star's twins Eva and Mateo in Turin on Monday.”
“The 24-year-old beauty showered the baby with kisses and affection, looking every inch the doting mother.”
“Devoted mother Cristiano Ronaldo s fiancée Georgina Rodriguez was spotted enjoying a walk with her daughter Alana Martina and the sports star s twins Eva and Mateo during a visit to Turin on Monday Georgina was bundled up against the cold in a padded jacket and leggings as she joined...”
“...the couple s nanny on her walk...”
“Also accompanying them were several burly security guards, who helped the ladies load the prams into their vehicle.”
“The brunette beauty wore her hair pulled back in a ponytail and completed her laid back look with simple white trainers.”
“Sweet moment: The 24-year-old beauty showered the baby with kisses and affection, looking every inch the doting motherAdorable: Little Alana was impossibly cute, wrapped up in a snug hooded jacket and grey trousers.”
“Ronaldo is also a father to to Cristiano Ronaldo Jr, eight, and twins, Mateo and Ava, who were born via surrogate.”


"In June 2016, Georgina met Cristiano at the Gucci store in downtown Madrid where she works. Cristiano was shopping for summer clothes at that time. She displayed a surprising diamond ring worth 615000 pounds at the world cup, which triggered the engagement rumors."
"Little Alana is lovely in a comfortable hooded jacket and grey trousers."
"Cristiano Ronaldo's fiancee Georgina Rodriguez was photographed in Turin on Monday walking with little Tott and the sports star's twins EVA and Matteo
"The 24-year-old beauty poured kisses and love on her baby, making a clean eye of her doting mother."
"During a visit to Turin on Monday, Georgina Rodriguez, fiancee of enthusiastic mother Cristiano Ronaldo, and her daughter Alana Martina, as well as sports star twins EVA and Matteo, were seen walking. Georgina joined in wearing cotton padded jacket and tights to keep out the cold..."
“… The couple's nanny is walking... "
They were accompanied by several burly security guards who helped the women load their prams
"The brunette has her hair in a ponytail, and she has finished her leisurely look with simple white sneakers."
"The sweet moment: the 24-year-old girl pours her kisses and love on her baby, showing that every inch of her baby is doting on her mother: Little Alana is incredibly cute, wrapped in a comfortable hooded jacket and grey trousers."
"Ronaldo is also the father of 8-year-old Cristiano Ronaldo Jr. and has twins, Matteo and EVA, who were born through surrogacy



Number  880
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...hold the wedding off until at least 2020”
“Mako 26 also added that they had rushed various things and that she wished to think about marriage more deeply and concretely and give sufficient time to prepare our marriage and for after the marriage They re now planning to...”
““It is because of our immaturity and we just regret it,” they explained in a statement to CNN.”
“The pair had planned to get formally engaged in March and marry this November but now, like many a college couple before them, they’re pumping the brakes on this whole thing so they can figure some stuff out first.”
“Photo: SHIZUO KAMBAYASHI/AFP/Getty ImagesLast year, Japanese princess Mako of Akishino announced that she was giving up her royal title to marry a commoner, her college boyfriend Kei Komuro.”
“Kei Komuro and Princess Mako.”


"Postpone the wedding to 2020"
"Mako 26 added that they have dealt with all kinds of things in a hurry. She hopes to have more in-depth and specific thinking about marriage, give us enough time to prepare for our marriage, and prepare for the marriage they are planning now..."
"It's because we're immature, and we're just sorry," they explained in a statement to CNN
"They had planned to be officially engaged in March and get married in November this year, but now, like many college couples before them, they are stepping on the brake for the whole thing so that they can figure out something first."
"Photo: shizuo kambayashi / AFP / Getty Images last year, Mako, Princess Akihito of Japan, renounced her royal title and married a civilian, her college boyfriend Kei Komuro."
"Kei Komuro and Princess Mako"



Number  881
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“*sees new Lion King cast*me: AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH SEVENYAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA https://t.co/GMtBjPjo1n — Mamaloo Akbar (@MamoudouNDiaye) November 1, 2017Chiwetel Ejiofor singing Be Prepared is already the highlight of my 2019. https://t.co/BrTUPPG7K1 — Kayleigh Donaldson (@Ceilidhann) November 1, 2017”
“#LionKing https://t.co/9uEXeZtgKs — Aᴅᴀᴍ Sʜᴀᴘɪʀᴏ (@adamshapiro) November 1, 2017me: stop remaking Disney movies!”
“It’s like TOO GOOD to be true  — Laura Tombson ☠️ (@wawawomp) November 1, 2017my favorite movies ever, ranked:2) animated lion king1) beyonce as freaking nala lion king — Whitney Medworth (@its_whitney) November 1, 2017This is as close to perfect as things get.”
“The BLACKEST Disney movie ever premiers in 2019: Donald Glover, Beyonce and James Earl Jones star in The Lion King https://t.co/Q2WTg7RsO4 pic.twitter.com/AUBifIFLKn — The Root (@TheRoot) November 1, 2017Is the lion king movie real???”
“Fans were notably overjoyed with the annoucement of the full cast, with many saying Glover’s and Beyoncé’s inclusion, and the casting of Chiwetel Ejiofor as the villainous Scar, would add some musical star power to an already talented roster.”
“The film, directed by Jon Favreau, will be released in the summer of 2019.”
“Many of the original songs are expected to return, according to reports, and the film will be a live-action remake similar to what Disney has done with “The Jungle Book,” which was released last year and went on to become a box office smash grossing nearly $1 billion worldwide.”
“A trio of comedians, John Oliver, Seth Rogan and Billy Eichner, will play Zazu, Pumbaa and Timon, respectively.”
“James Earl Jones, who was in the original 1994 film, will return to lend his voice as Simba’s father, Mufasa, once more.”
“Donald Glover will voice the character of Simba and Beyoncé will voice Nala.”


"* see the new lion king actor * I: ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah ah https://t.co/GMtBjPjo1n-Mamaloo  Akbar (@ mamoudoundiaye) on November 1, 2017, Chiwetel e Jo for singing be prepare has been my highlight in 2019. https://t.co/BrTUPPG7K1-Kayleigh  Donaldson (@ ceilidhan) November 1, 2017 "
"The lion king https://t.co/9uEXeZtgKs-A November 1, 2017 I: stop remaking Disney movies
"It's too good to be true - Laura Thomson ☠️  (@ wawomp) November 1, 2017 my favorite movie, ranking: 2) cartoon "the lion king" 1) Beyonce plays the maddening Nora "the lion king" - Whitney medworth November 1, 2017 this movie is almost perfect
"In 2019, Disney's darkest movie premiere ever: Donald Glover, Beyonce and James Earl Jones starred in the Lion King https://t.co/Q2WTg7RsO4pic.twitter.com/aubififkn- Root (@ theroot) is the Lion King movie on November 1, 2017 true? "
"Fans are particularly thrilled with the announcement of the entire cast, and many say that the addition of Glover and Beyonce, as well as the villain like scar of chivette egioff, will add some musical star power to the already talented cast."
"The film, directed by Jon Favro, will be released in the summer of 2019."
"It's reported that many original songs are expected to return. The film will be a live action remake, similar to Disney's remake of the jungle book released last year, and will become a hit with a global box office of nearly $1 billion."
Three comedians, John Oliver, Seth Logan and Billy Eisner, will play Zazu, pempen and Timon respectively
"James Earl Jones, who played in the 1994 original, will play Simba's father Mufasa again."
"Donald Glover will voice Simba and Beyonce will voice Nora."



Number  882
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It is simply something that was going to happen inevitably.””
“It has nothing to do with me or today.”
“On the same day, actress Mila Kunis was honored as the group's 68th Woman of the Year.”
“(CNN) —Harvard’s famed Hasty Pudding Theatricals student theater troupe will allow women to be cast in productions for the first time since it began staging student-written theater 174 years ago.”
“The famously irreverent troupe, which claims to be the oldest theater troupe in the United States and the third-oldest in the world, made the announcement Thursday during its annual Woman of the Year celebration, which honored the actress Mila Kunis.”
“While women have been allowed to participate in the group behind the scenes, only men have performed on stage until now.”
“The announcement, made by Hasty Pudding Theatricals President Amira T. Weeks, was met with loud applause and cheers from the crowd gathered.”
““With no further fanfare, the graduate board of the Hasty Pudding Institute has determined that, commencing with the 2019 Hasty Pudding Show, that Hasty Pudding welcomes women to audition for roles in the show,” Weeks read in a letter from the graduate board.”
“The Hasty Pudding Institute was founded in 1795 as a social club and boasts five US Presidents among its members, according to the group’s website.”
“The Theatricals began performing in 1844, often lampooning politics and current affairs through burlesque-influenced skits.”


"It's just inevitable."
"It's nothing to do with me or today."
On the same day, actress Mira Kunis was named the 68th woman of the year
(CNN) - for the first time since Harvard's famous student theater company began performing student drama 174 years ago, it will allow women to participate in the performance
The disrespectful company, which claims to be the oldest in the United States and the third oldest in the world, announced the news at the annual women of the year celebration on Thursday, honoring actress Mira Kunis
"Although women were allowed to work behind the scenes, until now, only men have performed on the stage."
"This announcement was announced by Amira T. Vicks, the chairman of the hasty pudding theater, and received warm applause and cheers from the assembled crowd."
"In the absence of further publicity, the board of directors of the graduate school has decided to welcome women to the draft in the rush pudding show starting in 2019," Vicks wrote in a letter from the graduate school
Founded in 1795, the group is a social club with five US presidents, according to its website
Dramatists began to perform in 1844, often satirizing politics and current affairs through comic sketches



Number  883
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“BONUS: See some of Kate's best moments from SI Swimsuit!”
“Kate, we applaud you AND your amazing moves!”
“I mean, how's a girl supposed to compete with a life-size plush panda?”
“Leave it to Hashtag the Panda to steal the show though...”
“In the hilarious segment, the two A-listers totally nailed their moves, somehow making "Walking Into a Spider Web" and "The Elliptical" look like dances we might actually want to pull out this weekend.”
“In the contest, Kate and Jimmy were each given unique prompts by a dance-move generator and were tasked with creating new signature moves on the spot.”
“...dance battle...”
“While in Orlando to celebrate the opening of his new ride at Universal Studios Orlando Tonight Show host Jimmy Fallon welcomed our 2017 SI Swimsuit cover model onto his show and in turn challeneged her to a friendly read competitive...”
“Kate Upton's got more than good looks, y'all...she's also got some pretty stellar dance moves!”
“You won't soon forget this unique dance battle between SI Swimsuit model Kate Upton and Tonight Show host Jimmy Fallon.”


"Reward: see Kate's best moment in Si swimsuit!"
"Kate, we applaud you and your amazing action!"
"I mean, how can a girl compete with a life size Plush panda?"
"But let it label the panda and steal the show..."
"In the funny part, the two A-listers completely managed their movements, somehow making" into the cobweb "and" the ellipse "look like dances we might really want to quit this weekend."
"In the competition, Kate and Jimmy are each given unique tips by a dance step generator, and are required to create new signature dance steps on the spot."
“… The battle of dance
"At the opening ceremony of Orlando's celebration of his new performance tonight at Universal Studios Orlando, host Jimmy Fallon welcomed our 2017 SI Swimsuit Cover Model to attend his performance and invited her to a friendly reading competition."
"Kate Upton is not only good-looking, you She also has some beautiful steps
"You won't soon forget the unique dance fight between Si swimsuit model Kate Upton and tonight's host Jimmy Fallon."



Number  884
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Judge Juhas also ordered Mel to give a three-hour deposition to Belafonte’s lawyers on April 23.”
“Pictured left: Mel with Angel.”
“...violence made headlines...”
“Judge Mark Juhas ordered Mel to pay 10 000 to match the 10 000 Belafonte has already shelled out toward the house repairs Belafonte and Mel divorced last December after a bitter seven month battle in which lurid tales of kinky sex drug and alcohol abuse and allegations of domestic...”
“Belafonte - who also showed up Wednesday, wearing a dark suit - has complained to the court that his ex-wife has been dragging her feet in paying her share of the $20,000 needed to repair the home and get it in shape to sell.”
“Murphy is avoiding service.’As part of their divorce settlement, Mel - real name Melanie Brown - and Belafonte were to split the proceeds of their former marital home in LA, worth an estimated $6-7 million.”
“Jamra added that she had tried to serve Murphy with legal papers, but ‘Mr.”
“Right: Angel in LAJamra said she was told by his lawyers that Murphy is simply ‘not interested.’‘Mr Murphy has had no contact with the child,’ she told the court.”
“...in LA worth an estimated 6 7 million...”
“...room When the judge told her that the settlement conference would be in a large courtroom she looked relieved and said That s OK”


"Judge Zhu also ordered Mel to give three hours' testimony to Belafonte's lawyer on April 23."
"Left: Mel and the angels."
“… Violence makes headlines... "
"Judge mark jufuor ordered Mel to pay 10000 pounds to make up for the 10000 pounds that Belafonte had already paid for the maintenance of the house. Belafonte and Mel divorced in December last year after seven months of fierce struggle, in which there were shocking stories about abnormal drugs and alcohol and charges of domestic violence..."
Belafonte, who also appeared in court Wednesday in a dark suit, complained to the court that his ex-wife had been delaying paying her $20000 share of the cost of renovating and molding the house for sale
"Murphy is evading service." As part of the divorce agreement, Mel (real name Melanie Brown) and bellafonte will share the proceeds of their ex-wife's home in Los Angeles, estimated to be worth $6 million to $7 million
Jamla added that she had tried to provide Murphy with legal documents, but "Mr. jamla"
"Right: angel said in La jamla that her lawyer told her that Murphy was just" not interested. ". "Mr. Murphy has no contact with the children," she told the court
“… It's worth about 6.7 million in Los Angeles... "
"When the judge told her that the settlement meeting would be held in a big court, she looked relieved and said it was OK."



Number  885
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The sixth and final season of “House of Cards” is now available on Netflix.”
“It turned out that Frank was murdered by Doug, who mixed up the medication.”
“The short story is: He’s dead, which we’ve known for a while without knowing any other meaningful details.”
“When the season begins, its mentioned that he died in his sleep and we see photos of Robin Wright’s Claire Underwood, now president, looking at her dead husband’s casket.”
“But here s what happened as far as we know After Claire declined Frank s phone call in the Oval Office when Season 5 ended she was supposed to pardon him for well all that stuff he did over the course of the series she mentions to the camera it...”
“...was the last time they spoke...”
“Two months later, Frank storms into the White House, furious at Claire for not giving him the pardon she promises she would.”
“Scared, Claire locked herself in her room and found Frank dead in his bed the next morning.”
“She told the public they were both in that bed.”
“And, privately, she believes he was murdered.”


"The sixth and final season of house of cards is now available on Netflix."
"It turns out that Frank was murdered by Doug. He mixed the drugs together."
"The short story is: he's dead, we've known for some time, but we don't know any other meaningful details."
"When the season started, people mentioned that he died in his sleep, and we saw a picture of Claire Underwood of Robin Wright, who is now the president, looking at the coffin of her dead husband."
"But as far as we know, at the end of the fifth season, Claire turned down Frank's call from the Oval Office. She should forgive Frank for what he did in the series. She mentioned in front of the camera..."
“… It's the last time they talk... "
"Two months later, Frank rushed into the White House, angry that Claire didn't give him the amnesty she promised him."
Claire was so scared that she locked herself in her room and found Frank dead in bed the next morning
"She told the public they were all in that bed."
"And, in private, she thinks he was murdered."



Number  886
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  887
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pre-order my new sci-fi novel Herokiller, and read my first series, The Earthborn Trilogy, which is also on audiobook.”
“Brian Yorkey, Joy Gorman, Mandy Teefey, Kristel Laiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Golin and Selena Gomez are returning as EPs.”
“The original run of the Netflix original was one of the most talked-about series of the year, often by fans who loved it, sometimes by critics who lamented how it handled its tough issues like suicide and rape.”
“But season 2 has come and gone with…almost no buzz at all.”
“It was a very, very strange phenomenon.”
“I don’t think I’d ever seen a show go from all anyone could talk about to a complete void of coverage for its sophomore season, yet that’s exactly what happened with 13 Reasons Why.”
“The theory was that, perhaps, after a relatively conclusive ending to season 1 (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), that simply no one was watching the second season.”
“But that appears not to be the case as Netflix has announced today that yes, 13 Reasons Why is returning for season 3.”
“They also gave these details alongside the announcement:Production on the new season will resume later this year.”
“The new season will premiere in 2019.”


Pre order my new science fiction "hero killer", read my first series, also in the audio book "the birth of the Earth Trilogy"
"Bryan joki, Joey Gorman, Mandy Tiffany, crystal leiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Goering and Serena Gomez will return as earnings per share."
"The original version of Netflix is one of the most watched series this year. It's often sought after by fans who love it, and sometimes by critics who lament how it deals with thorny issues such as suicide and rape."
"But the second season has come and gone There is hardly any excitement. "
"It's a very, very strange phenomenon."
"I don't think I've ever seen a show change from a topic that anyone can talk about to a completely unreported sophomore, but that's the truth. There are 13 reasons."
"The theory is that maybe after the end of the first season (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), no one will watch the second season."
"But that doesn't seem to be the case, because Netflix announced today that, yes, there are 13 reasons for the third quarter return."
"They also provided these details with Ann cement: production of the new season will resume later this year."
"The new season will premiere in 2019."



Number  888
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“4.”
“When Judy finally admits, “all I want for Christmas… is you!” it lacks the flash of some of the other romantic climaxes, but is no less filled with feeling.”
“To me, this is not perfect.”
“How do we all stand for it every Christmas?”
“All the love that exists between this trio is built on secrets and lies.”
“How did Mark even fall in love with Juliet if he never deigned to have a conversation with her… because he was already in love with her?!”
“The whole thing leaves a worse taste in my mouth than Juliet’s “terrible taste in pie.” How can Juliet and Mark never tell Peter about their weird little moment?”
“Every single thing about their storyline, especially those unforgivably creepy cue cards.”
“You know what’s not cool?”
“Juliet, Peter, and MarkIt’s cool that Keira Knightley, Andrew Lincoln, and Chiwetel Ejiofor all went on to be insanely famous and beloved.”


“4.”
Judy finally admitted, "I just want you for Christmas! "It lacks the flash of some other romantic climax, but it's also full of emotion."
"It's not perfect for me."
"What do we do every Christmas?"
"All the love between the three is based on secrets and lies."
"If Mark had never condescended to talk to Juliet Because he has fallen in love with her, how can he fall in love with her? "
"The whole thing left a worse taste in my mouth than Juliet's" terrible taste of pie. " How could Juliet and mark never tell Peter their strange little moments? "
"Everything about their storyline, especially those unforgivable and creepy cue cards."
"You know what's not cool?"
"Juliet, Peter and mark Keira Knightley, Andrew Lincoln and chivette egio all became very famous and loved, which was cool."



Number  889
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Receiving that many gifts wouldn’t have a good effect on the kids.”For more on how the little royals are spending Christmas, check out the latest issue of Us Weekly on stands now.”
“...many of the presents sent in from fans around the world are quietly donated to toy banks and other children s organizations...”
“They will get some toys a dollhouse is a strong contender for Charlotte George is obsessed with anything on wheels BMX bikes skateboards and toy cars a Middleton family friend said in the new issue of Us Weekly adding that...”
“George, 4, and Charlotte are spending the holiday with their parents; their uncle Prince Harry and his bride-to-be, Meghan Markle; and their grandma Queen Elizabeth II.”
“The couple, both 35, stood behind their children for the portrait.”
“The royal family of four also released their Christmas card on Monday.”
“According to Willcocks’ website, tuition at the nursery school is £3,050 per term, which is equivalent to roughly $4,080 a semester.”
““We look forward to welcoming Charlotte to our nursery in January.”Willcocks, which the school’s website says “strives to maintain its ethos for high standards, excellence and good manners,” is not too expensive despite its awards for excellence.”
““We are delighted that The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge have chosen the Willcocks Nursery School for Princess Charlotte,” the school said in a statement that day.”
““Not something a child would want!”The insider adds that William and Kate loved Willcocks “because it’s a traditional nursery with high standards.”The news that Charlotte is starting nursery school next year was announced on Monday, December 18.”


"Receiving so many gifts won't have a good effect on children." To learn more about how the little royal family spent Christmas, check out the latest issue of American weekly
“…… Many gifts from fans all over the world are quietly donated to toy banks and other children's organizations... "
"They're going to get some Dollhouse that's Charlotte's strong contender for George's obsession with any wheel BMX bike skateboard and toy car," said friends of the Middleton family, adding in the new issue of American weekly
Four year old George and Charlotte are on holiday with their parents, uncle Prince Harry and bride to be Megan marcel, and grandmother Queen Elizabeth II
"The couple are both 35 years old, standing behind their children to prepare for a portrait."
"The royal family also issued Christmas cards on Monday."
"According to Wilcox's website, kindergarten tuition is 3050 pounds per semester, equivalent to about 4080 dollars per semester."
"We look forward to welcoming Charlotte to our nursery in January." "Strive to maintain high standards, excellence and good manners," Wilcox said on the school's website. Although Wilcox won the Excellence Award, the cost was not too high
"We are very happy that the Duchess of Cambridge chose Wilcox kindergarten for Princess Charlotte," the school said in a statement on the same day
"It's not what children want! William and Kate like Wilcox "because it's a traditional high standard nursery," people familiar with the matter added The news that Charlotte will start nursery next year was announced on Monday, December 18



Number  890
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““What started out as a small gesture to put a smile on Anthony’s face and bring some awareness to this terrible disease has turned into a national phenomenon,” Kennedy told TIME in 2014, “and it is something we never could have dreamed of.””
“It took off from there.”
“But when Kennedy passed along the challenge to others, he chose the ALS Association as a beneficiary because of Anthony Senerchia’s battle with the disease.”
“When Jeanette Senerchia’s cousin, golfer Chris Kennedy, was nominated early on to participate in the challenge, it was not yet specifically connected to ALS.”
“And Anthony Senerchia played a significant role in getting it started.”
“He made our life better.”The ALS Ice Bucket Challenge went viral and raised $115 million during two months in 2014 — money that went largely to fund research.”
“But he was a fighter… He was our light.”
““Your body is failing you.”
““It’s a difficult disease and tough when you’re losing,” his wife, Jeanette, told the Journal News Media Group.”
“Senerchia was diagnosed with ALS, commonly known as Lou Gehrig’s disease, in 2003.”


In an interview with Time magazine in 2014, Kennedy said: "at the beginning, it was just a small action to make Anthony smile and let people know something about this terrible disease, but now it has become a national phenomenon, which we never dreamed of."
"It took off from there."
"But when Kennedy passed the challenge on to others, he chose the amyotrophic lateral sclerosis society as a beneficiary because Anthony senecia fought against the disease."
"When Janet senecia's cousin, golfer Chris Kennedy, was nominated for the challenge very early, it wasn't specifically related to amyotrophic lateral sclerosis."
"Anthony senecia played an important role in launching the program."
"He makes our lives better." The ALS ice bucket challenge spread rapidly in the two months of 2014, raising $115 million - mainly to fund research
"But he's a fighter He is our light
"Your body disappoints you."
"It's a very difficult disease to cure and it's hard when you lose," his wife Janet told news media group magazine
Senecia was diagnosed with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis in 2003, also known as Lou Grieg disease



Number  891
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us!”
“She admits, “I’m excited for Kourtney [Kardashian] to enjoy the single life.”
“The chemistry between Khloe Kardashian and Tristan Thompson is off the charts, in the brand new ‘KUWTK’ preview of the season 13 finale.”
“Kissing and cuddling, the cute couple was packing on the PDA, looking more blissful than ever!”
“Relationship goals!”
“Khloe Kardashian, 32, and Tristan Thompson, 26, are head over heels about each other and they are clearly ready to show the world they’re the real deal.”
“In the brand new 30-second teaser for the finale of the 13th season of Keeping Up With The Kardashians, the reality star talks about their blossoming romance.”
““I am really excited about my future,” she gushes with a glowing smile on her face.”
“Ah, to be in love!”
“While looking up to kiss the 6’9″ tall Cleveland Cavaliers power forward, Khloe looks happier than ever as they pack on the PDA.”


"Tell us!"
"I'm happy that coultney (Kardashian) can enjoy being single," she admits
"The chemistry between Carol Kardashian and Tristan Thompson in the season 13 finale's new kutke preview was unexpected."
"Kissing and hugging, this lovely couple is packing on the PDA, looking happier than ever!"
"Relationship goals!"
"Khloe Kardashian, 32, and Tristan Thompson, 26, are well matched, and they are clearly ready to show the world what they are capable of."
"In the new 30 second tease at the end of" keep up with Kardashian "in season 13, reality TV stars talked about their blooming romance."
"I'm really excited about my future," she said with a smile
"Ah, love!"
"When he raised his head to kiss the 6-9 Cleveland Cavaliers power forward and they sat on the PDA, Khloe looked happier than ever."



Number  892
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Good thing Todd Chrisley approves.”
“Previously, she preferred to hide her suitors from Todd Chrisley because he is strict and likely wouldn’t have liked her choice in boyfriends.”
“The Chrisley Knows Best star runs a tight ship and he tries to always know what’s going on with his famous offspring.”
“Recently, Savannah Chrisley opened up about her relationship with Detroit Pistons rookie Luke Kennard and it turns out that Todd has been involved in their relationship, as expected.”
“Chrisley Knows Best wrapped Season 5 on the USA network in April and there are rumors that the Chrisleys might be moving to another network.”
“That’s probably why Savannah and Todd Chrisley appeared as guests on E’s Daily Pop.”
“While they were there, co-hosts Catt Sadler, Justin Sylvester, and Carissa Culiner wanted the scoop on Savannah’s relationship with rising NBA star Luke Kennard.”
“Savannah and Luke have been getting pretty serious lately and many fans of Chrisley Knows Best have wondered what Todd thinks of it all.”
“Dinner with the fam ❤️ @marycarlisle @rickyyoungmusic @lukekennard5 #nashvillenights A post shared by Savannah Faith Chrisley (@savannahchrisley) on Jul 8, 2017 at 8:54pm PDTIt turns out that Savannah’s famous father approves of her man.”
“That doesn’t mean he’s letting Savannah run all over the place, though.”


"Fortunately Todd christley agreed."
"In the past, she preferred to hide her suitor from Todd crisley because he was very strict and probably didn't like her choice among boyfriends."
"Crisley knows that the best star runs a nervous boat, and he always tries to know what happened to his famous offspring."
"Recently, Savannah crisley disclosed her relationship with rookie Luke Kennard of the Detroit Pistons, and it turned out that Todd's relationship with them was as expected."
"Crisley knows the content of the fifth season of American TV network in April best. There are rumors that the crisley family may move to another TV network."
"That's probably why Savannah and Todd crisley are on e's daily pop as guests."
"While they're there, CO hosts Kat Sadler, Justin Sylvester and KARISSA Kulina want an exclusive report on Savannah's relationship with NBA star Luke Kennard."
"Savannah and Luke have become quite serious recently, and many of the fans that crisley knows best want to know what Todd thinks of it all."
"Dinner with my family ❤️  @ marycarlisle@rickyyoungmusic@lukekennard5#nashvillenights  At 8:54 p.m. on July 8, 2017, Savannah faith Chris ley (@ savannahchrisley) shared an article and found that Savannah's famous father agreed with her man. "
"But that doesn't mean he let Savannah run around."



Number  893
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cannon is also dad of 22-month-old son Golden “Sagon” with model Brittany Bell.”
“...in June and revealed that he ordered a dog online without her knowing.”
““All of my emails say it’s coming from Moroccan and Monroe.”Carey described Moroccan as a “technological genius” when she appeared on Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
““I know none of the passwords,” he said at the time.”
““They’re hams!” But Moroccan might have a future career in tech: the comedian quipped that little boy tapped into his email and changed all the settings.”
““They’re definitely entertainers,” Cannon told Us in July.”
““You put them first and you step back and become selfless in making decisions and it’s pretty easy.”Cannon added that as far as he is concerned, Carey can “do no wrong.”Just like their famous parents, Moroccan and Monroe were born to perform.”
““The common denominator is we both want what’s best for our children,” the Drumline actor told Us Weekly in February.”
“(They always celebrate birthdays together!)”
“Cannon and the five-time Grammy winner ended their six-year marriage in 2014, but remain close friends and coparents.”


"Cannon is also the father of his 22 month old son, Kim sagun, and model Brittany bell."
“… In June, he revealed that he had ordered a dog online without her knowledge
"All my emails are from Moroccans and Monroe." "The Moroccans are" technological geniuses, "Kelly said on Jimmy Kimmel's live show
"I don't know a password," he said at the time
"They are ham! "But Moroccans may have a career in technology in the future: Comedians joke that the little boy eavesdropped on his email and changed all the settings."
"They're definitely artists," cannon told us in July
"You put them first, you step back and become selfless in making decisions, it's easy." Cannon added that as far as he was concerned, Kelly "would not do anything wrong." Like their famous parents, Moroccans and Monroe were born to perform
"What we all have in common is that we all want the best for our children," the drumlin actor told us in February
"They always celebrate birthdays together!"
"Cannon and the five time Grammy winner ended their six-year marriage in 2014, but they are still close friends and co parents."



Number  894
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Here’s the List of Nominees for the 2018 Grammy Awards...”
“Image zoom Credit: C Flanigan/Getty ImagesBoth Khalid and Cara are nominated for best new artist at the show.”
“After the group took the stage with the powerful performance, the Lifeline said call volume to their hotline increased 50 percent, according to a statement from MTV.”
“The Lifeline’s hotline number is actually the inspiration for Cara, Khalid and Logic’s suicide prevention anthem“1-800-273-8255.” Cara, Khalid and Logic previously performed the song at the MTV VMAs alongside suicide survivors last summer.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The trio will also be joined by a group of suicide attempt and loss survivors selected by the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline.”
“The artists will perform together at the upcoming 2018 Grammy Awards, PEOPLE can confirm.”
“...to make a positive statement once again...”
“The artists will be joined onstage by suicide attempt and loss survivors chosen by the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline at the Grammys on January 28 Logic Alessia Cara and Khalid Will Perform with Suicide Attempt and Loss Survivors at Grammys Logic Alessia Cara and Khalid are using the world stage...”


"Related videos: the following is the list of nominees for the 2018 Grammy Awards..."
"Credit for image zooming: C Flanagan / Getty Images Khalid and Kara are nominated for best newcomer."
According to a MTV statement, after the band's strong performance, lifeline said the call volume of its hotline increased by 50%
"Lifeline's hotline number is actually the inspiration of Kara, Khalid and logic's suicide prevention hymn" 1-800-273-8255. "Kara, Khalid and logic performed this song with suicide survivors at MTV Vmas last summer."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A group of attempted suicide and loss survivors selected by the national suicide prevention lifeline will also join the three."
"One can confirm that the artists will perform together at the upcoming 2018 Grammy Awards."
“… Make a positive statement again... "
"On January 28, at the Grammy Awards ceremony, the attempted suicide and loss survivors selected by the national suicide prevention lifeline will perform with artists. Logically, Alecia Kara and Khalid will perform with attempted suicide and loss survivors at the Grammy Awards. Logically, Alecia Kara and Khalid are using the world stage... "



Number  895
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With approximately 24 star ceremonies annually broadcast around the world, the constant reinforcement provided to the public has made the Walk of Fame a top visitor attraction.”
“★★★ABOUT THE HOLLYWOOD WALK OF FAME www.WalkOfFame.comThe Hollywood Walk of Fame is an internationally-recognized Hollywood icon.”
“While alive, Selena was regarded by the media and adoring fans as the “Tejano Madonna” for her cutting-edge look, style and dance moves.”
“She was named Billboard Magazine’s "Top Latin artist of the '90s", the "Best selling Latin artist of the decade" and in 2016 charted as the 2016 “Top Latin Album of the Year, Female Artist” – her legacy lives in her music and family.”
“Her music, style and influence is as current today as when she was alive – a true institution for the ages.”
“Her contributions to music made her one of the most celebrated Mexican-American entertainers of the late 20th century.”
“Selena Quintanilla was a singer/songwriter.”
“The Hollywood Chamber of Commerce which administers the popular star ceremonies encourages people who are unable to attend and fans around the world to watch the event live exclusively on www.walkoffame.com.”
“The crowd in attendance was at an astonishing 4,500 fans, surpassing the 4,000 fans that came to the star ceremony of mariachi singer, Vicente Fernandez.”
“A record was broken the night of Selena’s star ceremony.”


"Every year, about 24 star award ceremonies are broadcast all over the world, constantly reinforcing the public, making the avenue of fame the most attractive place for tourists."
About Hollywood avenue of stars www.WalkOfFame.com The Hollywood Walk of fame is an internationally recognized Hollywood icon. "
"When Selena was alive, she was regarded as" Triano Madonna "by the media and fans for her avant-garde style, style and dance steps."
"She was named" best Latin artist of the 1990s "and" best selling Latin artist of the decade "by Billboard magazine, and" best Latin Album of the year, female artist "in 2016 - her legacy lives in her music and family."
"Her music, style and influence are as popular today as they were before her death, and it's a real time institution."
"Her contribution to music made her one of the most famous Mexican American artists at the end of the 20th century."
"Selena quintana is a singer / songwriter."
The Hollywood chamber of Commerce administers the popular star ceremony, encouraging those who can't attend and fans around the world to watch it on TV www.walkoffame.com 。”
"The audience reached a staggering 4500 fans, more than 4000 who came to the Mariachi singer Vicente Fernandez star ceremony."
"Serena's star ceremony broke a record that night."



Number  896
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And if the people of Santa Margarita have taught me anything it’s that, once the smoke has cleared, literally and figuratively, it’s a time to reach out and rebuild,” he continued.”
““It’s never the structures that create a community — it’s the people.”
“...statement to TMZ which first reported the news...”
“My heart goes out to all in the area who are also experiencing loss from this vicious fire the threat of which we live with constantly which may seem crazy to some but we do so because living in our beautiful rural area makes it worthwhile he said in a...”
“All roads leading to the area of the fire were closed.”
“Nearly 250 people were evacuated from their homes on Monday night, KSBY reported.”
“Two fires were initially reported in the area, but later merged into one as the state’s fire season ramps up.”
“The Hill Fire, as it has been named in California, is estimated to be around 1,500 acres in size, according to KSBY.”
“Another member of Cal Fire also stands close by.”
““It is far from lost on us here.#muchlove #movingforwardstronger.”In the touching image shared to the social media app, the actor stands in the rubble of where his home used to be as he hugs a firefighter.”


"If there's anything the people of St. Margarita have taught me, it's that once the smoke is gone, it's time, literally and figuratively, to lend a helping hand and rebuild," he continued
"It's never the structure that creates the community - it's the people."
“… In response to TMZ's statement, the company first reported the news... "
"My heart goes out to all the people in this area who are also experiencing the loss caused by this vicious fire. We have been living under the threat of this fire, which may be crazy for some people, but we do it because it is worth living in our beautiful rural areas," he said in a statement
"All roads leading to the fire area are blocked."
Nearly 250 people were evacuated from their homes on Monday night, kesby reported
"Two fires were initially reported in the area, but later merged as the state's fire season accelerated."
The wildfire, named wildfire in California, is estimated to cover about 1500 acres, according to kirsby
"Another member of the California fire department was also standing nearby."
The actor stands in the ruins of his home, embracing a fireman in a touching picture shared by the social media app



Number  897
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(The movie mogul has denied any allegations of nonconsensual sex.)”
“Weinstein has been accused of sexual misconduct in the past couple weeks by more than 50 women, including multiple allegations of assault.”
“I refused to meet Harvey Weinstein in his hotel room," Margulies saidJulianna Margulies is adding her own experience to the ongoing conversation about sexual assault and harassment in Hollywood—and claims she had a frightening encounter with actor Steven Seagal.”
“The Emmy-winning actress and Seagal costarred in the 1991 film Out for Justice.”
“A representative for Seagal did not respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment on Friday,Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““When I was 23, a casting director, a woman, said, ‘Steven Seagal wants to go over the scene with you in his hotel room at 10 o’clock at night,'” Margulies told Jenny Hutt for SiriusXM’s Just Jenny on Friday.”
““I lived in Brooklyn, and I said, ‘Oh, I don’t do that.”
“I don’t travel.”
“I don’t have money for a cab.’ And I didn’t.”
“And I said, ‘And I don’t take subways late at night.’ And she says, ‘Don’t worry we’ll reimburse you.”


"(the film tycoon denies any charges of non eroticism.)
"Weinstein has been accused of sexual misconduct by more than 50 women in the past few weeks, including multiple sexual assault charges."
"I refuse to see Harvey Weinstein in his hotel room," said Margulis. "Anna Margulis has added her own experience to Hollywood's talk about sexual assault and harassment and claimed that she had a terrible experience with actor Steven Segal."
"The Emmy winner and Segal performed together in the 1991 film justice."
"A representative of Seagal didn't respond to requests for comment on Friday, and didn't receive news, features and other push notifications."
"When I was 23 years old, a casting director, a woman, said," Steven Segal wants to go with you to his hotel room at 10 p.m. to see that scene, "Margolis told Jennie Hutt on Friday
"I live in Brooklyn and I say, 'Oh, I don't do that.'
"I don't travel."
"I don't have the money to take a taxi." I didn't have either.
"I said, 'I don't take the subway at night either.' She said, "don't worry, we'll make it up to you."



Number  898
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I believe strongly in the value of remorse and forgiveness, but I take the allegations very seriously, and we at Condé Nast have decided to put our working relationship with both photographers on hold for the foreseeable future.”
“Both are personal friends of mine who have made extraordinary contributions to Vogue and many other titles at Condé Nast over the years, and both have issued objections or denials to what has emerged.”
“Both have been contributors to Vogue and Condé Nast for many years.”
“Below is a personal response from Vogue’s Editor in Chief and Condé Nast Artistic Director Anna Wintour.”
“The past several months have been an extraordinary time of reckoning and change, and I, like so many others, have been astonished by the courage of those who have come forward to tell stories of sexual misconduct.”
“Abuse of power has gone on for too long in so many places including in Washington in Hollywood in broadcasting journalism Silicon Valley and last but not least in fashion where many young women and men have spoken up about manipulation and coercion on go sees on shoots and in...”
“...other working environments...”
“I m proud to say that Condé Nast is responding here and internationally with a new Code of Conduct a set of guidelines for outside contributors which has emerged after bracingly honest discussions with model advocates and agents stylists photographers hair and makeup artists set designers and many of our...”
“...own editors...”
“The goal of these conversations has been to understand how we can create safe and positive environments for everyone we work with.”


"I firmly believe in the value of remorse and forgiveness, but I take these accusations very seriously. We decided to shelve our working relationship with the two photographers for the foreseeable future."
"These two are my personal friends who have made extraordinary contributions to vogue and many other works in cond é Nast over the years. They both oppose or deny what happened."
"For many years, they were contributors to vogue and cond é Nast."
"The following is a personal response from Anna Wintour, editor in chief of vogue and artistic director of cond é Nast."
"The past few months have been a remarkable period of reckoning and change, and I am, like many others, surprised by the courage of those who have come forward to tell stories of sexual misconduct."
"Abuse of power has been going on for too long in many places, including Washington, Hollywood, radio journalism and Silicon Valley. Last but not least, in the fashion world, many young men and women have openly talked about manipulation and coercion in the shooting process..."
“… Other working environments... "
"I'm proud to say that cond é Nast has responded here and internationally by launching a new code of conduct, a set of guidelines for external contributors, which are working with model spokesmen and agents, stylists, photographers, hairdressers and makeup artists, fashion designers and many of our..."
“… My own editor... "
"The purpose of these conversations is to understand how we can create a safe and positive environment for our colleagues."



Number  899
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(“The Emoji Movie” swept the honors for worst picture, screen combo, director and screenplay.)”
“It beat out “The Emoji Movie,” “Fifty Shades Darker,” “The Mummy” and “Transformers: The Last Knight” to take home the special Razzie.”
“Inspired by the popular TV series, the film with Johnson and Zac Efron proved to be all wet at the box office, pleasing neither moviegoers or critics.”
““At the end of the day ‘A Movie So Rotten You Eventually Fell in Love With It,’ that’s just the way love goes,” he said.”
““It didn’t work out like that, but I humbly and graciously accept my Razzie.”The actor thanked his fans and critics.”
“...that you eventually started to like it Look we made Baywatch with the best of intentions he said...”
“Baywatch even inspired a new category The Razzie Nominee So Bad You Loved It Razzie winners announced Johnson called the special honor a cool thing and said it means the s t sandwich you have been eating is so bad...”
“I’m also excited because I was just informed that I too am bringing home the gold tonight.”“No, not an Oscar, maybe one day, but a Razzie,” Johnson added.”
““I’m super pumped and very proud for my buddies who’ve been nominated tonight, pulling for you guys to bring home the gold.”
“Win some, lose some, but hey… that’s the way love goes.”“Happy Oscars Sunday!” he said in the video.”


(emoticon includes the honors of the worst film, screen combination, director and script.)
It beat "emoticon," "the 50th of darkness," "mummy," and "Transformers: The Last Knight" to bring this special Razzie home
Inspired by the popular TV series, the film starring Johnson and Zach Efron failed at the box office, neither pleasing the audience nor the critics
"A rotten movie will eventually make you fall in love with it," he said. "Love is like that."
"It didn't turn out that way, but I humbly and kindly accepted my mockery." The actor thanks his fans and critics
“…… You finally began to like it. It seems that we did it out of kindness. He said
"Baywatch has even inspired a new category, the Razzie nomination is so bad you love it, the Razzie winner announced that Johnson called this special honor a cool thing and said that it means that the S-T sandwich you've been eating is so bad..."
"I'm excited, too, because I just learned that I'm going to take the gold medal home tonight." "No, not the Oscars, maybe one day, but a razor," Johnson added
"I'm very excited and proud of the nominees tonight who brought you the gold medal."
"Win some, lose some, but hey Love is like that. " "Happy Sunday, Oscar! "He said in the video."



Number  900
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'You know I do love Terri Irwin, I love her kids and I love how she's kept the memory of Steve alive, and respected the work that the two of them had begun and she's an absolute champion.'”
“'Terri is one of the greatest women I've ever met in my life, without there being implication of intimacy or whatever,' he said.”
“And now, Terri Irwin, 54, the widow of the late Crocodile Hunter Steve, has finally set the record straight on rumours that the pair are an item.”
“Appearing on The Sunday Project, the mother-of-two gushed over the Gladiator star and joked that she was besotted with him.”
“I am in love with him Terri Irwin right has set the record straight on romance rumours with Oscar winning actor Russell Crowe left after speculation they were an item I am in love with him I have to admit it Terri told the show s co host Lisa Wilkinson...”
“...when questioned about the pair...”
“Terri continued: 'I am desperately and totally in love.'”
“As a smile came across Terri's face, it was clear the renowned celebrity conservationist was only kidding about being an item with Russell.”
“'I am desperately and totally in love': Terri was clearly joking when she appeared to confirm herself and the Oscar winner were in a relationship on The Sunday ProjectClad in her Australia Zoo uniform, Terri continued to make jokes about the speculation on a romance between the two.”
“Lisa asked, 'Does he know about that?'”


"You know I love Terri Owen, I love her children, I love how she keeps her memory of Steve and respects the work they both started. She's an absolute champion."
"Terri is one of the greatest women I've ever met in my life, without any intimacy," he said
"Now, Terry Owen, 54, the widow of the late Crocodile Hunter Steve, has finally cleared up the rumor that the pair were an object."
The mother of two appeared on Sunday to talk about the Gladiator star, joking that she was fascinated by him
"I fell in love with him. Terry Owen's right wing broke the record of romantic rumors with Oscar winning actor Russell Crowe's left wing. Some people speculated that this was a project I fell in love with him. I have to admit that Terry told Lisa Wilkinson, the co host of the show..."
“…… When asked about the couple... "
"Terry went on: 'I'm in love desperately and completely.'"
"When Terry smiles, it's clear that the famous environmentalist is only joking that he's a member of Russell."
"I'm hopelessly in love: Terri is obviously joking. When she shows up to confirm her relationship with the Oscar winner on Sunday, Terri, in her Australian zoo uniform, continues to joke about the romantic speculation between the two."
Lisa asked, "does he know?"



Number  901
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Nothing EVER went beyond that.””
“Here’s the truth: I NEVER asked them to do anything more than send a twerking video.”
“The 24-year-old was arrested on two counts of production of child pornography.”
“If convicted, he could land in prison for a minimum of 15 years.”
“According to the Chicago Sun Times Jones will remain in federal custody until his court hearing Wednesday because prosecutors say he is a risk to the community and there s a danger he ll flee Court documents state that Jones was allegedly in communication with two underage female victims via...”
“Facebook in August 2016 and May 2017 and in both interactions had asked the 14 and 15 year old victims to prove to him that they were his biggest fans by sending him sexually explicit videos...”
“In the criminal complaint one girl admitted that she made 15 videos for Jones as recently as May 4th in what she called an audition She alleged that the YouTube star pressured her to work really hard even though she told him she might pass out and was tired from...”
“...what he was asking her to do...”
“At one point during the Facebook interactions the victim allegedly acknowledged that Jones was 24 and he requested that she repeatedly acknowledge that she was only 14 Jones other alleged victim whom he chatted with in August 2016 alleged that the singer told her she would get to perform a...”
“...sex act on him if she were lucky In the chat Jones allegedly acknowledged that he was 23 at the time and the victim was 14”


"Nothing is more important than that."
"The truth is this: I never asked them to do anything but send a tweeting video."
"The 24-year-old man was arrested on two counts of child pornography."
"If convicted, he can go to jail for at least 15 years."
"According to the Chicago Sun Times, Jones will remain in federal custody until Wednesday's trial because prosecutors say he is in danger to the community and he is in danger of escaping. Jones is said to have passed Correspondence with two minor female victims. "
"In both interactions in August 2016 and may 2017, Facebook asked 14-year-old and 15-year-old victims to prove to him that they were his biggest fans and send him pornographic videos..."
"In a criminal complaint, a girl admitted that she had made 15 videos for Jones on May 4. She said it was an audition and claimed that the YouTube star had put pressure on her to work hard, even though she told Jones she might faint and because And I feel tired. "
“… What he wants her to do... "
"During the Facebook interaction, the alleged victim admitted Jones was 24 years old and asked her to repeatedly admit that she was only 14 years old. In August 2016, he spoke to another alleged victim, claiming that the singer told her she was going to perform a... "
“…… If she was lucky in the conversation, she had sex with him, Jones said, admitting that he was 23 and the victim was 14



Number  902
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Earlier this month she said: 'I've been obsessed with sloths for as long as I can remember.”
“It is not the first time the Heroes star has talked about her love of the cute mammals, which are relatives of armadillos and anteaters.”
“She said: 'I immediately was overcome and I thought, "There's a sloth near, it's close, it's gonna happen."”
“And once she was there it immediately came to the wildlife lover's mind she would soon be introduced to her favourite animal.”
“Why don't you grab the dogs and go in the back room?"'”
“'He says, "Your present is here.”
“I hear a knock at the door...”
“Hanging with her chum Kristen could not hide her joy as she spent time with the adorable shaggy creature When the day came last summer she said The day of my birthday we re sitting in the living room and...”
“The extraordinary home video was shown on the Ellen DeGeneres Show, where the Veronica Mars star explained it all started when he told her he was getting a present for turning 31 'no one has ever had before.'”
“I'm so excited.'”


"Earlier this month, she said: 'I've been fascinated by sloths since I can remember.'
"This is not the first time that the hero star has talked about her love for lovely mammals, because they are relatives of armadillo and anteater."
"She said: 'I was conquered immediately, and I thought,' there's a sloth nearby, it's nearby, it's going to happen. '"
"Once she got there, wildlife lovers immediately thought that she would soon be introduced to her favorite animal."
"Why don't you grab the dog and go to the back room?"
He said, "here's your present."
"I heard someone knocking at the door..."
"With her friends, Christine can't hide her joy because she spends time with this lovely, furry little guy. One day of last summer came, and she said, "we were sitting in the living room on my birthday..."
"This extraordinary home video was broadcast on Ellen DeGeneres' show, where Veronica Mars explained that it all started when he told her that he was going to get a gift at 31 and that" no one ever received it. "
"I'm so excited."



Number  903
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The proposal happened live on TV after the wrestling couple defeated the Miz and his wife Maryse during a tag-team match.”
“The two got engaged in April 2017 during Wrestlemania 33.”
“RELATED VIDEO: John Cena Gets Engaged to Nikki Bella Live on WrestleMania 33Cena is gearing up for his own wedding to Total Divas star Nikki Bella this year.”
“The couple will start their trip in Rome before heading to the Amalfi coast.”
“The wrestler came out in a small vespa scooter to reveal that the two are going to the European country.”
“Cena also surprised the couple with a honeymoon trip to Italy.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Trainwreck star stepped in for a special wedding on the program surrounded by the couple’s family and guests of the show.”
“The wrestler turned actor married a couple on the Kathie Lee Gifford and Hoda Kotb hour of the Today show on Friday morning.”
“Add wedding officiant to John Cena‘s long list of skills.”


"The proposal was broadcast live on television after the wrestling couple beat Miz and his wife, Maris, in a tag team match."
"The two were engaged in wrestling storm 33 in April 2017."
"Related video: John seiner and Nicky Bella are engaged live on" wrestling madman "33 seiner is preparing for his wedding to total divas star Nicky Bella this year."
"The couple will start their journey in Rome and then head to the coast of Amalfi."
"The wrestler came out in a small Vespa scooter and revealed that they were going to European countries."
"The seines' honeymoon in Italy also surprised them."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The star of the train crash attended a special wedding in the program, and the family members and guests of the new couple all gathered around."
"The wrestler turned actor married a couple on Friday morning's" Today Show "Cathy Lee Gifford and Hoda Kotb
"Add the wedding master to John Senna's long list of skills."



Number  904
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I married my best friend, and we do everything we can to spend as much time together as possible.””
“You’re the most thoughtful, loving, caring, and strong woman I’ve ever met!”
“Supermodel and Justin Verlander Are Expecting Their First Child TogetherKate Upton is modeling something new these days: a baby bump!”
“The 26-year-old supermodel is expecting her first child with husband Justin Verlander, who she married in an ultra-posh wedding in Italy on Nov. 4 — just days after the baseball pitcher helped the Houston Astros score their first-ever World Series victory.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Upton announced her pregnancy on Saturday, in the hashtag of an Instagram post.”
“Her photo — snapped as she posted in a red suit and white top on a balcony in Miami — showed the slightest peek of a baby bump.”
““#PregnantinMiami.” she wrote, tagging Verlander and adding a sunburst and heart emoji.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"I'm married to my best friend and we're together as much as we can."
"You are the most considerate, loving, considerate and strong woman I have ever seen
"Supermodel and Justin veland are looking forward to their first child together. Kate Upton is working on a new model recently: a small lump
"The 26 year old supermodel is looking forward to her first child with her husband Justin Verlander, who held a super luxurious wedding in Italy on November 4, just a few days after the baseball pitcher helped the Houston Astros win their first World Series in history."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Upton announced pregnancy on a label on instagram on Saturday
"Her picture - taken when she was wearing a red suit and a white jacket posted on a balcony in Miami - shows the slightest glimpse of a baby lump."
"Pregnant in Miami." She wrote, tagging frand and adding an emoticon of sunshine and heart
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  905
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was released on $1,000 bond, and her father-in-law reportedly picked her up from jail.”
“The "Glee" star appeared before the judge early Sunday morning to be arraigned.”
“According to the Kanawha County Sheriff's Dept ... Ryan gave the responding deputies a video of the attack, and Naya was taken into custody around 9:30 PM ET.”
“According to Dorsey, Rivera hit him in the head and the face -- his bottom lip, to be exact -- while they were on a walk with their 2-year-old son.”
“Rivera was arrested Saturday night in Chesapeake, WV after Dorsey called cops to report her for hitting him.”
“Naya Rivera is facing a domestic battery charge after allegedly attacking her husband, Ryan Dorsey, in West Virginia.”
“He Has It On Video1:08 PM PST -- The Kanawha County Sheriff's Office tells TMZ the couple had been arguing over their child, and that the victim, Naya's husband, Ryan, did not require any medical attention.”
“...”


"She was released on a $1000 bond and her father-in-law was reported to have taken her out of prison."
The glee star appeared before the judge for arraignment early Sunday morning
"According to Kanawha County Police... Ryan gave the deputy sheriff a video of the attack, and Naya was detained around 9:30 p.m. EDT. "
"According to Dorsey, Rivera hit him in the head and face - to be exact, in the lower lip - while they were walking with their 2-year-old son."
"Rivera was arrested Saturday night in Chesapeake, West Virginia, and Dorsey called the police and said she hit him."
Naya Rivera, who attacked her husband, Ryan Dorsey, in West Virginia, is facing domestic battery charging
"He saw this in a video at 1:08 p.m. PST - the Kanawa sheriff's office told TMZ that the couple had been arguing about their children and that the victim, Naya's husband, Ryan, did not need any medical care."
“...”



Number  906
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Courtesy Ralph LaurenThe official outfit features a white quilted water-repellant puffer coat, vintage ski-inspired red, white and navy blue crewneck sweaters, matching pants with a red racing stripe and an array of Americana-themed wool accessories, including gloves, hat and bandanna.”
“...snowboarding...”
“Image zoom Credit Courtesy Ralph Lauren Image zoom Ralph Lauren Credit Courtesy Ralph Lauren The official closing ceremony uniforms were unveiled Wednesday morning on the Today Show by Olympic silver medalist Gus Kenworthy freestyle skiing Olympians Alex and Maia Shibutani figure skating ice dance and Olympic gold medalist Jamie Anderson...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“It’s designed uniforms for every Olympics since the 2008 Beijing Games, and it’s continuing it’s tradition of creating authentic all-American looks with a modern sensibility in all its upcoming designs.”
“The iconic American brand is the official outfitter of the 2018 U.S. Olympic and Paralympic teams for the sixth time in a row.”
“With exactly 100 days until the opening ceremony, the Olympic torch has started its journey to Pyeongchang, South Korea and the USA team just got their first look at the official apparel of the games, all created by designer Ralph Lauren.”
“Get a first look at the uniforms the U.S. team will wear at the closing ceremony of the 2018 Olympic Winter GamesThe countdown to the 2018 Olympic Winter Games is on!”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Products in this story are independently selected and featured editorially.”


"Image zooming credit: provided by Ralph Lawrence, the official clothing includes white quilted waterproof down jacket, retro ski inspired red, white and Navy T-shirts, red racing striped pants and a series of American themed wool accessories, including gloves, hats and handkerchiefs."
“… Skis... "
"Picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming picture zooming Put pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures zoom pictures Put picture zoom picture zoom picture
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Since the 2008 Beijing Olympic Games, it has been designing uniforms for each Olympic Games, and is continuing the tradition. In all the upcoming designs, it has created a genuine all American style with a modern sense."
"The iconic U.S. brand is the official equipment provider of the 2018 U.S. Olympic and Paralympic teams, and this is the sixth time in a row that the brand has been selected."
"With 100 days to go before the opening ceremony, the Olympic torch has begun its journey to Pyeongchang, South Korea. The US delegation has just seen the official costumes of the Olympic Games for the first time, which were designed by the designer Ralph Lauren."
"Take a look at the uniforms that the U.S. team will wear at the closing ceremony of the 2018 Winter Olympics. The countdown to the 2018 Winter Olympics begins!"
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The products in this report are independently selected and published as editors."



Number  907
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What brings these people together is the promise of inspiring change for years to come.”
“Some are young and at the start of their takeover; others are already commanding the world's attention.”
“Each day during the month of June, we'll spotlight the future of LGBTQ history by showcasing the world's most talented, creative and influential people on the rise.”
“We're celebrating Future LGBTQ History.”
“While the history is certainly a part of the celebration, here at Fuse we're using the next 30 days to look forward.”
“In 2000, President Bill Clinton declared June as "Gay & Lesbian Pride Month" and the month has gone unrecognized except for President Barack Obama later declaring the month as Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual and Transgender Pride Month every year of his presidency.”
“Originally called Christopher Street Liberation Day, the demonstration took place on June 28, 1970, with similar demonstrations spreading annually around the country and world.”
“In response to the police raid at Greenwich Village's Stonewall Inn, now known as the Stonewall Riots, the queer community and its supporters decided they would meet in June in New York City to march and remember the incident.”
“Early demonstrations were done by the Mattachine Society, which focused on civil and political rights of gay men, and the Daughters of Bilitis, a lesbian rights group, with both carrying out Philadelphia's "Annual Reminders" which saw picketers reminding Americans that LGBTQ people did not receive basic civil rights.”
“While the Stonewall Riots are mostly considered the pivotal moment in creating LGBTQ pride, major actions for visibility and equal rights were taking place beforehand in the 1950s and 1960s.”


"What brings these people together is the commitment to inspire change in the next few years."
"Some are young and just starting to take over; some have caught the world's attention."
"Every day in June, we will focus on the future of LGBTQ's history by showing the world's most talented, creative and influential rising people."
"We are celebrating the history of LGBTQ in the future."
"While history is certainly part of the celebration, at fuse we use the next 30 days to look to the future."
In 2000, President Clinton declared June as "Gay Pride Month", but this month has not been recognized. Only President Obama later declared June as "gay, bisexual and Transgender Pride Month"
The demonstration, originally known as Christopher Street liberation day, was held on June 28, 1970. Similar demonstrations spread throughout the country and around the world every year
"In response to the police raid on the Stonewall hotel in Greenwich Village (now known as the Stonewall riot), the queer community and its supporters decided that they would hold a march in New York City in June to commemorate the incident."
"The early demonstrations were conducted by the daughters of the Mattachine society and the lesbian rights group Bilitis, who all carried out Philadelphia's" annual reminder "and pickets reminded Americans that LGBTQ people did not obtain basic civil rights."
"While the Stonewall riots are mostly seen as a critical moment to create LGBTQ pride, significant actions to raise awareness and fight for equal rights have taken place before the 1950s and 1960s."



Number  908
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Leading up to the wedding, Nilsson teased the kind of nuptials she was planning on having.”
““Really big news!”
“Nilsson, who appeared on Chris Soules‘ season of The Bachelor in 2015 and later faced-off against Kaitlyn Bristowe for the lead of season 11 of The Bachelorette, married Jeremy Byrne on Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The bride wore a strapless gown and long veil for their outdoor ceremony in southern California, according to photos shared on social media by friends and family with the hashtag #HeartByrne.”
“She also got creative with her footwear, enlisting a pal to bedazzle a pair of white Converse sneakers rather than donning heels.”
““I have the best roomie everrr!” Nilsson captioned a photo of the one-of-a-kind accessory.”
““Look at the shoes she made for me to wear today!!!”
“@juliasobo you are a wizard!!!”
“I mean, come on!!!!”


"Before the wedding, Nelson made fun of the kind of wedding she was going to have."
"Big news!"
"Nelson, who starred in Chris sules's Bachelor season in 2015, later competed with Caitlin Bristol for the lead role in singles Season 11 and married Jeremy Bourne on Saturday."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to photos shared by friends and family on social media, the bride wore a strapless robe and a long veil to an outdoor wedding in Southern California, labeled" heart Byrne. "
"Her shoes are also very creative. She found a friend to add color to a pair of white converse sneakers instead of wearing high heels."
"I have the best roommate ever! "Nelson made the title on a unique accessory photo."
"Look at the shoes she made for me today!"
"@ juliasobo, you are a wizard!!"
"I mean, come on!!"



Number  909
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““That’s something all of our family wants and hopes for at some point.””
“There’s no scenario in which I wouldn’t want my entire family at a wedding,” Jordan said in 2016.”
“Over the holidays, the older and younger brothers of the Packers quarterback, Luke and Jordan Rodgers, shared a series of festive snaps on social media, from which Aaron, 34, was noticeably absent.”
““It begins… #christmas #gatlinburg #family,” Luke wrote on Instagram alongside a photo of Jordan, 29, with “Bachelorette” fiancée JoJo Fletcher, and parents Ed and Darla.”
“SEC analyst Jordan later posted a comical shot on Christmas Day, in which the Rodgers men wore beer-belly fanny packs.”
““You know you’re family when you all have the same idea for Christmas presents (and same face for the photo @thelukerodgers ) Bellies Out!”
“Merry Christmas Jordan wrote Monday.”
“Aaron’s relationship with the close-knit Rodgers clan has been essentially nonexistent in recent years.”
“Jordan discussed friction with his NFL sibling during his stint on Season 12 of ABC’s long-running dating competition, and chatter surrounding the Rodgers family feud appeared to intensify after Ed spoke with the New York Times in January.”
““Aaron has never wanted to air this out in a public forum.”


"This is what our family wants and hopes for at some point."
"Under no circumstances do I want the whole family to attend the wedding," Jordan said in 2016
"During the holiday, parks quarterback Luke and Jordan Rogers' brother and brother shared a series of holiday snapshots on social media, and the 34 year old Allen was obviously absent."
"At the beginning of Christmas, the Gatlinburg family," Luke wrote on instagram Next to the photo is Jordan, 29, with his fiancee, Joe Fletcher, and his parents, ED and Dara
Jordan, an analyst with the securities and Exchange Commission, later released a funny picture of the Rogers family in a beer belly dress on Christmas day
"When you all have the same idea about Christmas presents, you know you're a family (the faces of the Brits in the photo are the same), big bellied!"
"Merry Christmas, Jordan wrote on Monday."
"In recent years, Allen's relationship with the closely related Rogers family has been basically non-existent."
"Jordan discussed friction with his NFL brothers during the 12th season of ABC's long-term dating competition. After ED's interview with the New York Times in January this year, the discussion about the Rogers family feud seems to have intensified."
"It never occurred to Aaron to make this public in a public forum."



Number  910
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Kylie Jenner Opens up About the First Time She Saw Her Dad in Women’s ClothingMeanwhile, ex-boyfriend Tyga was spotted with a Jenner look-a-like in Los Angeles earlier this week.”
“She had also announced her arrival to Sin City prior to the appearance, dressed in sweats and a crop top.”
“Image zoomShe shared a solo shot of her fur-free look on Instagram, captioning with two black heart emojis.”
“There, she toured the restaurant-confectionery and took selfies with fans but clearly felt shaken by the ordeal.”
“After quickly moving inside, Jenner was surrounded by friends.”
“Moments after she was there, four protesters, dressed in casual clothes, stood up and began shouting, “She’s got blood on her hands,” referencing the times Jenner’s worn fur.”
“Fans screamed from the ground floor and from an overhanging balcony when the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star showed up to the red carpet, where she wore a figure-flattering striped bodycon dress.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Jenner arrived several hours late to her advertised appearance at Sugar Factory’s Las Vegas grand opening on Saturday, waving to the hundreds of fans who waited for about three hours to simply get a glimpse of the 19-year-old makeup mogul.”
“Kylie Jenner‘s appearance in Las Vegas on Saturday night was overshadowed by protesters.”


"Related video: Kelly Jenner made public her first meeting with her father in women's clothes. Meanwhile, ex boyfriend as like as two peas in Losangeles earlier this week, he was found to be the same as Jenna.
"Before she appeared, she had announced that she was in the city of sin, wearing a T-shirt and a jacket."
"Image zooming she shared a fur free photo of herself on instagram with two black heart captions on it."
"There, she visited the restaurant's candy store and took pictures with her fans, but she was obviously shocked by the ordeal."
"After moving in quickly, Jenna was surrounded by friends."
"The moment she got there, four protestors in civilian clothes stood up, pointed to Jenner's old fur in the times and yelled," she has blood on her hands. "
"When the Kardashian star appeared on the red carpet, fans screamed from the first floor and balcony. She was wearing a slim striped tight skirt."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Jenna appeared hours late in an ad for the grand opening ceremony of the sugar factory in Las Vegas, waving to hundreds of fans who waited about three hours to see the 19-year-old make-up tycoon
"Kelly Jenner's appearance in Las Vegas on Saturday night was overshadowed by the protestors."



Number  911
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Then again, maybe we’re just thinking about this mystery wrong.”
“As has been the case in previous seasons of the anthology series, sometimes the links between ancillary things and the main story are a bit tenuous — the scares are more important than everything making sense together.”
“Not just about who’s in the cult, but what the cult is trying to do, and how seemingly unrelated elements factor in as well.”
“But what’s interesting, and ultimately confusing, is just how much information the show is throwing at people, and how many questions it’s raising.”
“There were plenty of clues popping up about Harrison and Meadow, and fans have been suspicious of Ivy from the start.”
“The first three episodes did a solid job of portraying Kai first as a bigot, then as a manipulator, before finally putting the pieces together to show him as a charismatic murder-leader.”
“Also Read: 'American Horror Story: Cult' Fans Are Finally Putting It All TogetherIt’s not that the hints that “American Horror Story: Cult” is dropping aren’t landing.”
“And what about Ivy (Alison Pill), who apparently didn’t just know Winter before she and Ally hired her to be their nanny, but kidnapped a guy with her?”
“Nothing about Winter (Billie Lourd), Kai’s Hillary-supporting, liberal stereotype sister, seems to make sense at all.”
“There’s the weird chemical spray truck and Harrison’s crazy plastic barrels (which are of the variety Walter White used to dissolve bodies on “Breaking Bad,” if you remember).”


"Again, maybe we just got the puzzle wrong."
"Like the anthologies of previous seasons, sometimes the connection between the auxiliary things and the main story is a little fragile - fear is more important than all the things that make sense together."
"It's not just who is in the cult, but what the cult wants to do, and how seemingly unrelated factors affect it."
"But what's interesting, and ultimately puzzling, is how much information the show sends to people and how many questions it raises."
"There are endless clues about Harrison and maddo, and fans have doubts about Ivy from the beginning."
"In the first three episodes, Kay is portrayed as a paranoid, then a manipulator, and finally pieced together to show that he is an attractive murder leader."
"You can also read:" fans of the 'American horror story: cult' have finally put it together. This is not to imply that 'American horror story: cult' has fallen without landing. "
"And ivy? Obviously, before she and Ellie hired her as a nanny, she not only knew winter, but also kidnapped a man with her? "
"About winter (Billie Lauder), Kay's Hillary support, liberal stereotype sister, it seems to have no meaning."
"There are also strange chemical spray cars and Harrison's crazy plastic barrels (if you remember, Walter White used to dissolve bodies in the destroyer).



Number  912
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““F—k just caught up on some news had no idea why the 101 was shut down…get home to your family safe,” Thorne tweeted.”
“The former Disney star took to Twitter later the same day to wish everyone affected by the mudslide well.”
““My baby out there killing it right now on stage I love you so much @MODSUN,” Thorne tweeted at nearly 1:30 a.m. on Thursday.”
“Embrace that.”It appears Thorne eventually made it to her boyfriend’s show.”
““Pray for Montecito and know: EVERY day could be your last.”
“Friends missing, some gone forever,” Lowe wrote.”
““More terrible stories of loss today.”
“The Parks and Rec alum, 53, shared a photo of some of the damage from the mudslides on Wednesday.”
“An additional eight people are missing and more than two dozen are injured, the publication adds.”
“We will try to move out our dead quicker.”ABC News reports that at least 17 people have died due to the California mudslides.”


Thorne tweeted: "F-K just got some news. I don't know why 101 was shut down Go home to where your family is safe. "
"The former Disney star tweeted later in the day to wish everyone affected by the debris flow all the best."
"My child killed it on stage and I love you very much @ modsun," Thorne tweeted at 1:30 a.m. on Thursday
"Take it." It seems that Thorne ended up on her boyfriend's show
"Pray for Montecito and know that every day can be your last."
"Friends are missing, and some are gone forever," Roy wrote
"Today's more terrible loss story."
"Parks and rec's 53 year old alum shared a picture on Wednesday of some of the damage caused by the debris flow."
"Another eight are missing and more than 20 injured," the publication added
"We will move the dead as soon as possible." ABC News reports that at least 17 people have been killed in mudslides in California



Number  913
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News he was “not proud of my actions these past weeks.””
“You’re still here.”“I’ve been slowly draining since the lies started and my ex cheated on me,” she continued.”
“Though she didn’t identify the Big Brother and Ex on the Beach star, the post comes months after Calafiore allegedly cheated on her with The Challenge star Cara Maria Sorbello, whom he’s now dating.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I am really struggling today,” she admitted.”
““I don’t want to get out of bed even though I have tons of s— to get done before the holidays.”
“Control the controllable they say.”
“Well, I’ve tried that.”
“I don’t like to show all my vulnerability, because it gets taken advantage of along with my love and kindness.”“Most days I feel myself hardening since my relationship ended,” she continued.”
““I honestly believed I had found my person.”


"He's not proud of what I've done in the past few weeks."
"You're still here." "Since the lie started, my ex cheated me, and I've been slowly draining the water," she continued
"Although she didn't reveal the identity of the" big brother "and the former beach star, the post came a few months after Calafiore was accused of cheating on challenge star Cara Maria Sorbello, with whom he is now dating."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I'm really struggling today," she admits
"I don't want to get out of bed, even though I have a lot of work to do before the holidays."
"Control what they call controllability."
"Well, I tried."
"I don't like to show all my fragility because it's used with my love and kindness." "Most days, I feel like I've hardened myself after my relationship is over," she continued
"I really believe I found my man."



Number  914
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When awards show host Kelly Clarkson returned to reclaim the stage, she was quick to congratulate Legend on the baby boy, named Miles Theodore Stephens, as a photo of the newborn flashed on the stage projectors.”
“Notably absent from the scene was Teigen herself, though for good reason: the 32-year-old model and cookbook connoisseur gave birth to her and Legend's second child just days earlier.”
“By the song's end, the entire crowd was on their feet.”
“As he launched into the song's starry-eyed chorus, crooning "I think I just met my wife," Tyra Banks, Ciara and others could be spotted singing along in their seats.”
“Legend began his performance by strutting onstage solo in an all-white ensemble and bedazzled moto jacket, but was quickly flanked by a squad of dancers including what looked like a few elementary-schoolers.”
“John Legend brought the romance to the Billboard Music Awards stage Sunday night (May 20), performing a soulful rendition of his charming new song "A Good Night" -- which presumably describes the night he met wife Chrissy Teigen.”


"When the award ceremony host Kelly Clarkson returned to the stage, she quickly congratulated the baby boy, miles Theodore Stephens, because there was a picture of a newborn on the stage projector."
"The obvious absentee is tygan himself, though for good reason: the 32 year old model and recipe connoisseur gave birth to her second child with legend a few days ago."
"At the end of the song, all the audience stood up."
When he started singing the song, he whispered, "I think I just met my wife," and Tara banks, Sheila and the others sang together in their seats
At the beginning of the "legend" performance, he swaggered on the stage alone in an all white ensemble and dazzling motorcycle jacket, but was soon surrounded by a group of dancers, including some who looked like schoolchildren. "
"John Legend brought the romance to the Billboard Music Awards on Sunday (May 20) night, where he affectionately performed his charming new song goodnight, which roughly describes the night he met his wife Chris tegan."



Number  915
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““[I] didn’t want to live that way anymore.”Author: BANG Showbiz...”
“Something.”
“...been working hard on himself and is now doing much better...”
“A source told People magazine: “Brad seems to be in a better place.”
““The separation was very dark for him, but lately he looks healthier and happier.”
“He seems excited about life It was recently claimed that Brad has quit drinking alcohol and is doing his best to be a better man and a good father to Maddox 16 Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11 and nine year old twins Knox and Vivienne A source said He...”
“...goes to therapy every week and is mostly interested in learning and bettering himself as a man and father Subscribe to our Free Daily All4Women Newsletter to enter Sign Up Now The World War Z star prefers to keep things private and safe when he has visitation time with his...”
“...children but he would love to spend more time with them...”
“The insider said: “Brad doesn’t go out much with the kids or leave the house.”
“But Brad would definitely like to spend more time with them than he does.”


"(I) don't want to live like that anymore." By Bang showbiz “
"There's something."
“… I've been working hard and now I'm doing better... "
"Brad seems to be in a better place," a source told people
"Separation is dark for him, but recently he looks healthier and happier."
"He seems to be very excited about life - it's been said recently that Brad has given up drinking and he's trying his best to be a better man, a good father, 16 Maddox, 14 Zahara, 13 Shiloh, 11 and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian. A source said that he..."
“… Every week to go to treatment, mainly to learn and improve their interests, as a man and father subscribe to our free daily all4women newsletters to enter the registration now World War Z star likes to keep things private and safe when he has visiting time with his... "
“… Kids, but he's willing to spend more time with them... "
"Brad doesn't go out with the kids very often, and he doesn't go out very often," a person familiar with the matter said
"But Brad will definitely be willing to spend more time with them."



Number  916
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the video below:See Now: Famous Actors Who Turned Down Iconic Movie Roles...”
“"At the same time, it becomes daunting," he said.”
“News.”
“He is all set to take Hollywood by storm.”
“In 2014 the Welsh actor starred in Kingsman: The Secret Service, which was essentially a spy movie.”
“The actor became extremely popular due to his portrayal of Eggsy.”
“After the success of the movie, the studio decided on making a sequel and it will be called Kingsman: The Golden Circle.”
“Egerton will be reuniting with his original co-stars like Colin Firth for the second installment.”
“But along with them, an array of Hollywood A-listers like Halle Berry, Jeff Bridges, and Channing Tatum will play Egerton's American counterparts who are recruited to help get to the bottom of the opening massacre.”
“About returning to the project the young handsome actor said that he would always have returned as it was his dream to be a part of such projects which people like to watch again and again .”


"Take a look at the video below: please see: famous actors who refuse idol movie roles..."
"At the same time, it became daunting," he said
"News."
"He's going to make a big push into Hollywood."
"In 2014, the Welsh actor starred in Kingsman: secret service, which is essentially a spy movie."
"The actor was very popular because he played Agassi."
After the success of the film, the studio decided to make a sequel, named "Jin Ping Mei"
"Eagleton will be reunited with Colin Firth and other original partners in the second film."
"But along with them, Hollywood stars Halle Berry, Jeff Bridges and Channing Tatum will play egton's American counterparts, who are recruited to help clarify the truth of the first massacre."
"On returning to the project, the handsome young actor said he would always come back because he dreams of being part of the project that people like to watch over and over again."



Number  917
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There’s nothing wrong with that, but what made it difficult for me as a black girl was that it felt outside of myself, like something over there … something that was so cool but could never happen to me.”
“All of my heroes were white and blond.”
““It’s a huge honor because young people and future generations will remember Iris West as black,” said Patton, 29.”
“Her television credits include appearances on Entourage, Castle, Grey’s Anatomy, The Game, CSI: Miami and Heroes, to name a few.”
“Once Patton graduated from Southern Methodist University in Dallas, she moved to Los Angeles to continue her acting career.”
“The Plano, Texas, native began her career in Hollywood with a stint on The Young and the Restless after being chosen in a national college casting search for a guest role.”
“ET on The CW.”
“The series airs on Tuesdays at 8 p.m.”
“Labs, the team behind The Flash in stopping crazy meta-human activity in Central City.”
“They’re married now and she leads S.T.A.R.”


"It's not bad, but what makes me difficult as a black girl is that it feels something outside of myself, like something over there Something cool that will never happen to me. "
"All my heroes are white and blonde."
"It's a great honor for young people and future generations to remember that iris West is black," said Barton, 29
Her TV works include entourage, Castle, Gray's anatomy, games, CSI: Miami and hero
After graduating from Southern Methodist University in Dallas, Barton moved to Los Angeles to continue her acting career
The plano native of Texas started her career in Hollywood, where she was selected as an actress at a National University, looking for guest roles
"Et on CW."
"The series is on at 8 p.m. on Tuesday."
"The lab, the team behind the flash stopped the crazy superhuman activities in the central city."
"They're married now, and she leads s.t.a.r."



Number  918
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do not reproduce without permission.”
“Advertisement“You are about to see this album completely come to life in a magical setting like the Apollo Theater,” Bruno Mars announced.”
“The singer-songwriter’s charm and talent dominate as he grabs a primetime spot on CBS and conquered seven victories at the recent 2017 AMAs.”
“After the 30-second dramatic and pounding intro for the newest teaser of Bruno Mar’s “24K Magic Live at the Apollo”, the familiar 24K-beat took over and announced the details of the event.”
“The teaser played short classic clips of Bruno Mars and his band, the Hooligans.”
“According to E!”
“News' exclusive exchange with Bruno Mars, the 32-year old singer wants to make the viewers feel like they are watching live inside the theater.”
“He also explained that the show will be more intimate compared to a concert setting.”
“He also said that Apollo Theater has been on his bucket list and he was inspired to play at the Apollo Theater from a young age.”
“Take a peek at the primetime special’s teaser below:Advertisement AdvertisementLike us and Follow usFollow @Koreaportal and© 2021 Korea Portal, All rights reserved.”


"Do not copy without permission."
"Ad" you'll see this album completely come to live in a magical setting like Apollo Theater, "Bruno Mars announced."
"The glamour and talent of the singer songwriter dominated CBS's prime time and won seven wins at the recent 2017 AMAS."
The familiar 24K beat took over and announced the details of the event after the 30 second dramatic and shocking opening of Bruno Mar's latest comedy Apollo 24K magic live
"The teaser showed a classic short film of Bruno Mars and his band" hooligans. "
"According to e!"
Exclusive exchange between news and Bruno Mars, the 32 year old singer, wants audiences to feel like they're watching live in the theater
"He also explained that the show will be more intimate than the background of the concert."
"He also said that the Apollo Theater has always been on his list and that he was inspired to perform at the Apollo Theater since he was a child."
"Take a look at the tease of the prime time special. Below: we and follow us, follow @ Korea portal and ﹣ 2021 Korea portal. All rights reserved."



Number  919
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments!”
“What do you think about Dax's "sexy serenade"?”
“Watch the full hilarious serenade above!”
“As he belted out the ballad, funny moments from the Ellen show flashed on the screen.”
“"I know that Portia de Rossi's your girl," Dax continued, "but if you were single and straight, I'd rock your world."”
“All the while, Ellen appeared in the background smiling as he sang, loving every minute!”
“Ellen introduced "another gift" before Dax appeared onscreen sitting at a piano, wearing an all-white tuxedo.”
“"I can't believe you're turning 60, but I have to say 60 has never looked so sexy."”
“"Happy Birthday, Ellen," he said.”
“"You've got the prettiest eyes I ever did see," he sang, "and a smile that could light the world."”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
What do you think of Dukes's "sexy Serenade"
"Look at all the funny serenades above!"
"When he started singing, the funny moments of the Allen Show flashed on the screen."
"I know that Portia de Rossi is your girlfriend," Das continued, "but if you are single and honest, I will shock your world."
"All along, Alan has been in the background, singing and smiling, loving every minute!"
Before Ellen introduced "another gift," Dukes appeared on the screen, sat in front of the piano and wore an all white dress
"I can't believe you're nearly 60, but I have to say 60 has never looked so sexy."
"Happy birthday, Alan," he said
"You have the most beautiful eyes I've ever seen," he sang, "and a smile that lights up the world."



Number  920
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"She will continue to support him because it benefits the kids.”Advertisement...”
“As long as Ben keeps working on himself, Jen is happy.”
“However, Jennifer and Ben have remained close friends since their split, with a source close to the couple told People:“The kids love when they all spend time together.”
““We are all so fortunate beyond measure.”AdvertisementA post shared by Ben Affleck (@benaffleck) on Jun 17, 2018 at 12:38pm PDTThe pair announced they were separating back in 2015 and despite reports that they were getting back together, filed for divorce last year.”
“Happy Father’s Day to all the dads and father figures out there, and to the women that empower them to be the best they can be.”
“You are my superhero.”Sharing a picture of the card on Instagram, Ben said:“I can think of three incredible reasons why today is so special.”
“...post shared by Jennifer Garner jennifer garner on Jun 17 2018 at 10 26am PDT Ben also marked the day on his social media with a picture of a handmade card he received from his kids that read Love you Dad...”
“Advertisement The mum of three shared a filtered picture of the 45 year old on her Instagram with a touching caption that read Our kids are lucky to have a dad who looks at them the way you look at them and loves them the way you love them A”
“Jennifer Garner took to Instagram yesterday to wish her ex-husband Ben Affleck a happy Father’s Day with a very sweet post.”
“Jennifer Garner's touching tribute to ex Ben Affleck for Father's DayThe pair remain good friends.”


"She will continue to support him because it's good for the children."
"As long as Ben keeps working hard, Jane will be happy."
However, Jennifer and Ben have been close friends since they broke up, and a person familiar with the matter told people: "kids love to be together."
"We are all so lucky that we can't measure it." In an advertisement published at 12:38 p.m. on June 17, 2018, Ben Affleck (@ benaffleck) said that the two announced that they had separated as early as 2015. Despite reports that they were reuniting, they filed for divorce last year
"Happy father's day to all fathers and to all the women who make them the best."
"You're my superhero." Ben, who shared a picture of the card on instagram, said: "I can think of three incredible reasons why today is so special."
“… Jennifer Garner posted a post at 10:26 a.m. on June 17, 2018. On his social media, Jennifer Garner also posted a photo of a handwritten card he received from his child, which said "love your dad..."
"The mother of three shared a filtered photo of a 45 year old girl on instagram with a touching title that said our children are lucky to have a father who looks at them like you and loves them like you."
"Jennifer Garner posted a very sweet post on instagram yesterday to wish her ex husband Ben Affleck a happy father's day."
"Jennifer Garner pays a touching tribute to former Ben Affleck on father's day. They are still good friends."



Number  921
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...also edit...”
“Hencha Voigt...”
“...of seasons 2 No.”
“...of episodes 17 Production Executive producers Amber MazzolaLori Gordon Production locations Miami, Florida Camera setup Multi-camera Running time 43 minutes Production company Machete Productions Release Original network E!”
“Picture format 1080i HDTV Original release October 2, 2016 ( ) –October 8, 2017 ( 2017-10-08 ) Chronology Related shows WAGSWAGS Atlanta External links WebsiteWAGS Miami is an American reality documentary television series that premiered on October 2, 2016, on E!”
“...television network, making it the first spin-off of WAGS.”
“The reality show chronicles both the professional and personal lives of several WAGs (an acronym for wives and girlfriends of sportspersons).”
“Amber Mazzola and Lori Gordon serve as executive producers for the series.”
“Overview and casting [ edit ]On May 5, 2016, the network ordered WAGS Miami, to serve as the first spin-off to WAGS.”
“[1][2] It was also revealed the executive producers of WAGS, Amber Mazzola and Lori Gordon, would serve as the series' executive producers for WAGS Miami, and the series is produced and distributed by Machete Productions.”


“… Edit at the same time
"Hencha Vogt..."
“… Season 2
“… Episode 17 production executive producer amber Mazzola Lori Gordon production location Miami, Florida camera set multi camera run time 43 minutes production company machete production release original network e! "
"Picture format 1080i HDTV original version October 2, 2016 () – October 8, 2017 (October 8, 2017) chronology related programs wagswags Atlanta external links website wags Miami was launched on October 2, 2016 in E!"
“… Television network, making it the first derivative of wags. "
"Reality shows record the professional and personal lives of several celebrities (short for athletes' wives and girlfriends),"
"Amber Mazzola and Lori Gordon are executive producers of the series."
"Overview and casting [editor] on May 5, 2016, the TV station ordered wags Miami as the first branch of wags."
"[1] [2] it is revealed that wags executive producers amber Mazzola and Lori Gordon will act as executive producers of wags Miami series, which is produced and distributed by scimitar productions."



Number  922
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They act like they are when they’re in front of others, but it’s all a show at this point.””
““We call them the triplets it’s just the cutest!!”
“The new mom opened up to her Twitter followers about why she longed for her first child to be a boy.”
“I wanted a boy so badly Because Mason and I are so close.”
“I love our bond.”
“I felt confident in having a boy but God blessed me with my precious True and now I wouldn’t know what to do with a boy.”
“True has made me sweeter and more gentle.”
“God gives you what you need.”
“My BFF 4Life — Khloé (@khloekardashian) July 28, 2018“I wanted a boy so badly Because Mason and I are so close.”
“I love our bond,” the Keeping Up With the Kardashians star tweeted on Saturday, July 28, referring to sister Kourtney Kardashian‘s eldest child.”


"They are very similar in front of others, but now they are all showing off."
"We call them triplets. This is the most lovely one!"
"The new mother revealed to her twitter fans why she longed for her first child to be a boy."
"I really want a boy because I'm close to Mason."
"I like our relationship."
"I have great confidence in having a boy, but God has given me precious love. Now I don't know how to treat a boy."
"It really makes me sweeter and softer."
"God has given you what you need."
"My bff4life khlo é (@ KhloeKardashian) July 28, 2018" I really want a boy because I'm so close to Mason
"I love our relationship," the follow Kardashian star tweeted on Saturday, July 28, referring to sister Courtney Kardashian's eldest son



Number  923
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Carrey s breakout year was 1994 which saw the release of three movies of his that turned out to be huge and cemented his career Ace Ventura Pet Detective The Mask and Dumb Dumber The sum of the digits in...”
“Of course not.”
“Add nine and six and you get 15.”
“He was born in Newmarket, Canada, which is nine letters and then six letters.”
“Methinks not.”
“Coincidence?”
“666.”
“Three sixes.”
“Let’s start simply: Take the number of letters in Carrey’s first and last name and you get three and six.”
“And I don’t mean “devil” in the sense of “lowbrow actor who talks out of his ass.” I mean the actual, literal, capital-D Devil.”


"Kerry's breakthrough year was 1994. His three films were released, and the result was huge, consolidating the number sum of his professional Ace Ventura Pet Detective mask and dumb..."
"Of course not."
"Add 9 and 6 and you get 15."
He was born in new market, Canada, with nine letters, then six
"I don't think so."
"Coincidence?"
“666.”
"Three sixes."
"Let's start simply: take Kerry's first and last names for example, you get 3 and 6."
I'm not talking about "devil" in the sense of "asshole vulgar actor". I mean the real, literal, capital D devil



**Something goes wrong**
“[Featured Image by Frederick M. Brown/Getty Images]”
“2.”
“The Second Wives Club began filming in 2015, and since that time has undergone a title change and then gone back to the Second Wives Club title.”
“As reported by the Daily Mail, it has taken some time for the Second Wives Club to come to fruition.”
“...trailer for the Second Wives Club released recently.”
“...in the below E”
“Although some of the women featured in the Second Wives Club reality TV show might have plenty of material items or at least pretend they do the mansions haute couture wardrobes champagne fridges inside of luxury cars and more don t mean they are all leading happy lives as seen...”
“With the brand new Second Wives Club series set to air on Thursday, May 4, at 9 p.m. ET/8 p.m. CT, the following preview videos have been released, giving a snippet of what to expect.”
“5, not wife No.”
“The stars of the Second Wives Club are Tania Mehra, Morisa Surrey, Shawna Craig, Shiva Safai, Katie Cazorla and Veronika Obeng.”


"[Frederick M. Brown / Getty pictures]
“2.”
"The second wife club started shooting in 2015, and since then has experienced a title change, and then returned to the title of the second wife club."
"According to the daily mail, it took some time for the club to blossom."
“… A trailer for the second lady club was recently released
“… "E" below
"Although some women appearing in the reality show of the second wife club may have a lot of material goods, or at least pretend that they have a luxury house, high-end fashion wardrobe, champagne, refrigerator, luxury car and more, it doesn't mean that they all live a happy life, as you can see..."
"The new second wife Club series will be broadcast at 9pm ET / 8PM ET on Thursday, May 4. The following preview video has been released, providing a piece to look forward to."
"5, not wife no"
"The stars of the mistress club are Tania Mehra, Morissa Surrey, Shawna Craig, Shiva safay, Katie kazola and Veronica Auburn."



Number  925
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[31]Keeping Up With the Kardashians debuted in 2007, and the drama of the couple's relationship became a popular subplot.”
“Kardashian family friend and Girls Gone Wild creator Joe Francis has said he introduced them at a party at his home.”
“According to one source, the family lost its fortune.”
“[9]ParentsThere are conflicting stories about Disick's parents and their wealth.”
“[8] As a teen, Disick modeled and appeared on the cover of young adult books.”
“His nickname at the time was STD.”
“There were plenty of rumors about Disick in high school, and he was supposedly a hard partier.”
“[Source: Kristen Hyland, Director of Public Relations].”
“[7] He did not, however, graduate from Ross.”
“[6]Disick attended The Ross School, a private school in East Hampton.”


"[31] following the kardashians' debut in 2007, the couple's relationship became a hot subtitle."
"Joe Francis, a friend of the Kardashian family and creator of crazy girls, said he introduced them at a party at home."
"According to one source, the family has lost wealth."
"There are many contradictory stories about Disick's parents and their wealth."
[8] When he was a teenager, he was a model and appeared on the cover of teenagers' books
"His nickname at the time was venereal."
"There are a lot of rumors about Disick in high school. It is said that he is a stubborn party."
"[source: Christine Herland, director of public relations]."
However, he did not graduate from Ross University
Desik attended rose school, a private school in East Hampton



Number  926
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I am so sorry to my family for any grief and embarrassment I have caused.”There’s currently no word on whether or not this development will affect production on “The Steve Wilkos Show" or what penalties he is or isn't facing.”
“Opening up my personal life to this level has been extremely difficult for my family and me, and I ask for your support in respecting our privacy so that we can all heal and move forward.”
“"I have built a career on a commitment to help others with their personal struggles and now I am faced with my own.”
“This experience reinforces my commitment to get the professional help that I need and I have recently completed an intensive medically supervised program," Wilkos told Fox News in an email statement.”
“I am lucky and so grateful that no one else was involved in the accident and truly humbled by the outpouring of love and support.”
“"Over the course of my life, I have been struggling with bouts of depression and on the day of my accident, I had a complete lapse in judgment which resulted in me drinking and getting behind the wheel of my car.”
“He went as far as to claim that he was reaching for his spectacles when his car hit several roadside objects before flipping on its passenger side.”
“As previously reported, Wilkos initially told the press that he usually wears glasses when he drives, but wasn’t wearing them at the time of the accident.”
“Wilkos has been charged with operating a vehicle under the influence and failure to correctly drive.”
“The talk show star turned himself in on Wednesday evening in Connecticut following a warrant that was issued for his arrest, but he was released after posting a $1,500 bond.”


"I am very sorry to my family for any sadness and embarrassment I have caused." There is no word yet on whether this progress will affect the production of the Steve Wilkes show, or what punishment he will or will not face
"It's extremely difficult for me and my family to open up my personal life to this level. I ask you to support and respect our privacy so that we can all recover and move forward."
"My career has been built on a commitment to help others solve their personal problems, and now I have to face my own."
"This experience reinforces my determination to get the professional help I need, and I recently completed an enhanced medical surveillance program," Wilkes told Fox News in an email
"I'm lucky and grateful that no one else was involved in this accident, and I feel truly humble for the love and support I've given."
"I've been fighting depression all my life, and on the day of my accident, I completely lost my judgment, causing me to drink and drive."
"He even claimed that when he reached for his glasses, his car hit several objects on the side of the road and overturned on the passenger's side."
"As previously reported, Wilkes initially told the media that he usually wore glasses when driving, but he didn't wear glasses when the accident happened."
"Wilkes was charged with drunk driving and failing to drive correctly."
The talk show star turned himself in on Wednesday night in Connecticut. An arrest warrant was issued against him, but he was released on deposit of $1500



Number  927
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Cambridge’s depart and another wave from Princess Charlotte pic.twitter.com/lLNH5NcmEL — Rebecca English (@RE_DailyMail) July 9, 2018The Royal Family of Five leave the Chapel Royal following Prince Louis’s christening pic.twitter.com/BZXVeG6SKN — Simon Perry (@SPerryPeoplemag) July 9, 2018Sorry, Prince Louis!”
“It was nice to see the sweet Prince Louis and, erm, we wish him all the best in his religious pursuits, but Princess Charlotte and Prince George were simply too cute to ignore.”
“Photo REX Shutterstock While we were all certainly thrilled that Prince Louis a baby finally decided to grace us with his presence at his christening on Monday we have to admit that the 2 month old infant s royal siblings Prince George and Princess Charlotte naturally once again stole the...”
“...show...”
“As you’ll recall, on the day Prince Louis was born (which, again, was only a little over two months ago), you’d think everyone would have been obsessed with the newborn baby.”
“But instead, we were all so taken with the adorable antics of his older brother and sister — to the degree that the photographers at the hospital let out an audible and collective “awwww,” and videos of Princess Charlotte adorably waving to the crowd were quickly shared all over social media.”
“Too cute.”
“Photo: Dominic Lipinski/APSo understandably, the same thing happened again at Chapel Royal at St. James’s Palace in London for the royal christening.”
“When the new family of five (hi, Kate Middleton and Prince William!)”
“...pic.twitter.com/k3Ra4bEZr8 — Rebecca English (@RE_DailyMail) July 9, 2018After the baptism, the cute family emerged from the chapel — and Princess Charlotte gave one of her trademark waves again.”


"The departure of Cambridge and another wave of Princess Charlotte pic.twitter.com/lLNH5NcmEL Company - Rebecca English on July 9, 2018 after the baptism of Prince Louis, the family of five left the Royal Chapel pic.twitter.com/BZXVeG6SKN -Simon Perry (@ sprrypeoplemag) July 9, 2018 sorry, Prince Louis
"Nice to meet the lovely Prince Louis. Well, we wish him all the best in his religious activities, but Princess Charlotte and Prince George are too lovely to ignore."
"Photo Rex stuttstock when we were all excited, Prince Louis finally decided to glorify us at the baptism ceremony on Monday. We have to admit that the two month old baby's royal brothers and sisters, Prince George and Princess Charlotte, naturally stole it again..."
“… Show
"You remember the day Prince Louis was born (and more than two months ago), you thought everyone would be fascinated by the new baby."
"But on the contrary, we were all attracted by his brother's and sister's cute antics - so much so that the hospital photographers let out a collective" awwww ", and the video of Princess Charlotte lovingly waving to the crowd was soon shared on social media."
"That's lovely."
"Photo: Dominic Lipinski / APSO understandably, the same thing happened again at the Royal baptism at the Royal Chapel at St James's palace in London."
"Be the new family of five (HI, Kate Middleton and Prince William!)"
“... pic.twitter.com/k3Ra4bEZr8 -Rebecca English after the baptism on July 9, 2018, the lovely family came out of the church, and Princess Charlotte waved again



Number  928
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Ariana Grande (@ArianaGrande) July 23, 2018It didn't take long for the pop star to break her Instagram and Twitter cleanse.”
“♡ issa forever situation.”
“"Yeh!”
“ — Ariana Grande (@ArianaGrande) July 23, 2018Another fan noticed that Grande was posting on Snapchat, which prompted the superstar to announce that she plans to only use that social media platform for the time being.”
“...thank u guys for totally getting it and being so wonderfully celebratory of how incredibly things are going because that is real.”
“"Thank u guys for totally getting it and being so wonderfully celebratory of how incredibly things are going because that is real," she wrote.”
“— Ariana Grande (@ArianaGrande) July 23, 2018In another tweet, the "God Is a Woman" singer thanked her fans for understanding.”
“LITERALLY.”
“...stop coming for me and my team when i’ve never been better literally in any department.”
“...career wise and health wise.”


"Ariana Grande (@ Ariana Grande) on July 23, 2018, the pop star soon broke her instagram and twitter."
"It's a permanent situation."
"Yes
"- Ariana Grande (@ Ariana Grande) on July 23, 2018, another fan noticed that Grande posted a post on snapchat, which prompted the superstar to announce that she plans to use only this social media platform for the time being."
“… Thank you for fully understanding this, and it's great to celebrate how incredible things are going because it's true. "
"Thank you for fully understanding this and for celebrating so beautifully as it is true," she wrote
——Ariana Grande (@ Ariana Grande) on another micro blog on July 23, 2018, the singer of "God is a woman" thanks her fans for their understanding
"Really."
"Stop talking to me and my team. I'm not good at any department."
"Occupational and health aspects"



Number  929
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Emanuel Maiberg Vice com This Week Has Happened Before Written by Julia Craven Slate com The Store That Called the Cops on George Floyd Written by Aymann Ismail Slate com Why Did the Government Separate This Family Written by Jeremy Stahl Slate com...”
“Kristen Bartlett Samantha Bee Pat Cassels Sean Crespo Mike Drucker Mathan Erhardt Joe Grossman Miles Kahn Sahar Rizvi Chris Thompson Holly Walker Alison Zeidman TBS Last Week Tonight with John Oliver Writers Johnathan Appel Ali Barthwell Tim Carvell Liz Hynes Greg Iwinski Mark Kramer Daniel O Brien John Oliver Owen...”
“Great The Great Written by Tony McNamara Hulu It s Not You It s Me Dead to Me Written by Liz Feldman Kelly Hutchinson Netflix Pilot Ted Lasso Teleplay by Jason Sudeikis Bill Lawrence Story by Jason Sudeikis Bill Lawrence Brendan Hunt Joe Kelly Apple TV The Tank Grace Frankie...”
“...by Wolves Raised by Wolves Written by Aaron Guzikowski HBO Max Something Unforgivable Better Call Saul Written by Peter Gould Ariel Levine AMC Trouble Don t Last Always Euphoria Written by Sam Levinson HBO EPISODIC COMEDY Grandma Chill Awkwafina Is Nora from Queens Written by Kyle Lau Comedy Central The...”
“Denied The Simpsons Written by Danielle Weisberg Fox Xerox of a Xerox BoJack Horseman Written by Nick Adams Netflix EPISODIC DRAMA Bad Choice Road Better Call Saul Written by Thomas Schnauz AMC Fire Pink Ozark Written by Miki Johnson Netflix JMM Better Call Saul Written by Alison Tatlock AMC Raised...”
“ANIMATION A Springfield Summer Christmas For Christmas The Simpsons Written by Jessica Conrad Fox Bart The Bad Guy The Simpsons Written by Dan Vebber Fox I Carumbus The Simpsons Written by Cesar Mazariegos Fox Prank You for Being A Friend Bob s Burgers Written by Katie Crown Fox Three Dreams...”
“Nick Santora Josh Harmon Scott Elder Quibi Per Writers Guild Awards submission rules if there are insufficient entries in any category those entries may be placed in another category...”
“Gambit Written by Scott Frank Allan Scott Based on the novel by Walter Tevis Netflix ORIGINAL ADAPTED SHORT FORM NEW MEDIA FREERAYSHAWN Written by Marc Maurino Quibi Better Call Saul Employee Training Legal Ethics with Kim Wexler Written by Ariel Levine AMC Digital on YouTube Most Dangerous Game Written by...”
“Hawke Erika L Johnson Mark Richard Kristen SaBerre Lauren Signorino Based on the Novel by James McBride Showtime Little Fires Everywhere Written by Harris Danow Rosa Handelman Shannon Houston Attica Locke Raamla Mohamed Amy Talkington Liz Tigelaar Nancy Won Based on the book by Celeste Ng Hulu The Queen s...”
“...on the New York Magazine article The Bad Superintendent by Robert Kolker HBO Clouds Screenplay by Kara Holden Story by Casey La Scala Patrick Kopka and Kara Holden Based on the book entitled Fly A Little Higher by Laura Sobiech Disney The Good Lord Bird Written by Jeff Augustin Ethan...”


"This week, Emmanuel mayberg's vice president, Julia Craven Slater, the shop that called the police on George Freud, EMMAN Ismail Slater, why the government should separate the family that Jeremy Starr Slater wrote..."
"Christine Bartlett Samantha bipat Cassels Sean Crespo Mike Drucker Masson ehad Joe Grossman miles Kahn Sahar rizvey Chris Thompson Holly Walker Alison Zeeman and John Oliver writer John Nathan Appel Ali bartwell Tim Carville last night· Liz Haines, Greg ewensky, mark Kramer, Daniel O'Brien, John Oliver Owen
"Great, great, Tony McNamara huru wrote, not you, I'm dead, I wrote, Liz Feldman Kelly Hutchinson, Netflix pilot Ted Lasso, TV series, Jason sudaikis bill Lawrence, story, Jason sudaikis bill Lawrence, Brendan hunt, Joe Kelly, Apple TV, tank, gray Frankie... "
“… Wolf raised by Wolf some unforgivable things written by Alan guzkovsky HBO Max better called sol HBO melodrama by Peter Gould Ariel Levin AMC trouble not always happy Sam Levinson grandma Leng aquifina is written by Nora from Queens by Kyle Liuxi Drama Center... "
"Denied Danielle Weissberg's the Simpsons, fox, Xerox, Nick Adams's the Knights of bojack, Netflix, the melodrama the road of bad choice, Thomas schnatz's better sol, AMC, Mickey Johnson's hot ozak, Netflix, JMM, Alison tarlock's better sol, a MC, raven... "
"Animation a spring summer Christmas Simpsons write Jessica Conrad fox bad guy Simpsons write danweber fox I Karen buss Simpsons write Cesar Mazari fox prank you're a friend Bob hamburger write Katie crown fox three dreams..."
"Nick Santora Josh Harmon Scott elder quibi per Writers Guide Awards submission rules if entries in any category are insufficient, they may be placed in another category..."
"Scott Frank Allan Scott's original game based on Walter Tevis Netflix's novel is adapted from freerayshaw better call Saul employee training law ethics with Kim Wexler Ariel Levine AMC digital's most dangerous game on YouTube written by Marc maurino quibi's simplified new media..."
"Hawk Erica Johnson, mark Richard Christine Sabre Lauren sinorino, based on James McBride's novel, Harris Dano Rosa henderman Shannon Houston's novel small fires everywhere, Attica rock ramura Muhammad Amy tallington, Liz tigrah Nancy, based on Celeste ·Adapted from Wu Hulu's book, Queen s... "
“… Based on New York Magazine's bad supervision of Robert Kirk's HBO cloud script, the story of Carla Holden, cassilas, Carla Patrick, copca and Carla Holden, the book is titled "flying higher by Laura sobidge, Disney's good master bird, written by Jeff Augustine Ethan..."



Number  930
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Right after the scandal broke, he was booed by his own fans in Cleveland.”
“This isn't the first time Thompson has been trolled on the court.”
“Kim also unfollowed Tristan on Instagram.”
“It's a really sad situation all over."”
“"We really were rooting for Khloé, and we still are...you know, she's so strong and she's doing the best that she can.”
“"Like I don't even know how to describe it besides it's just so fucked up," she told Ellen DeGeneres last week.”
“The reality TV star recently gave birth to their first baby girl, True Thompson, and is reportedly attempting to make things work, but Kim is definitely not here for it.”
“More video later surfaced, revealing that Thompson is a serial cheater, and probably fooled around with at least five women not named Khloé.”
“Last month, reports surfaced from multiple outlets that Thompson was cheating on his nine-months pregnant baby mama Khloé Kardashian.”
“Thompson still made the shot as people poked fun at his recently aired out dirty laundry.”


After the scandal, he was booed by his fans in Cleveland
"It's not the first time Thompson has been bullied on the court."
"Kim also solved Tristan's secret on instagram."
"It's really a sad situation."
"We really support Heroe, we are still You know, she's strong. She's done her best
"It's like I don't know how to describe it, and it's a mess," she told Ellen DeGeneres last week
"The reality star recently gave birth to their first baby girl, real Thompson, who is reported to be trying to make things go smoothly, but Kim is definitely not here."
"Later, more videos came to the surface, showing that Thompson was a serial liar, probably with at least five women not named helo."
"Last month, a number of media reports said Thompson cheated nine month pregnant baby mother heloe Kardashian."
"Thompson took this picture when people made fun of his dirty clothes that had been drying recently."



Number  931
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As previously announced, the spinoff will debut with a two-hour premiere at 9 PM Thursday, March 22 and moves to its regular time slot on Thursday, March 29 as part of the TGIT lineup at 9|8 CT.”
“It comes four years after the end of Private Practice, a previous Grey’s Anatomy spinoff.”
“The spinoff received a straight-to-series order last May, with an eye for premiere in midseason 2018.”
“McKee executive produces with Shondaland’s Rhimes and Betsy Beers for ABC Studios where Shondaland is based.”
“Jaina Lee Ortiz and Jason George star along with Jay Hayden, Alberto Frezza, Grey Damon, Okieriete Onaodowan, Danielle Savre and Miguel Sandoval.”
“From the captain to the newest recruit, the show revolves around the men and women as they risk their lives and hearts both in the line of duty and off the clock.”
“Set in a Seattle firehouse, Station 19, from Grey’s Anatomy creator Shonda Rhimes’ Shondaland and written by Grey’s executive producer/co-showrunner Stacy McKee, follows a group of heroic firefighters.”
“The show, which revolves around firefighters, will be called Station 19.”
“We finally have a title for the upcoming Grey’s Anatomy spinoff.”


"As previously announced, the film will premiere for two hours on Thursday, March 22, at 9 p.m., and will be officially released on Thursday, March 29, as part of the TGIT lineup at 9 | 8ct."
"Four years ago, one of Grey's branches, the private clinic, ended."
"In May last year, the spin off won a direct series order and is expected to premiere in mid-2018."
"McKee executives work with Schindler Rand's Rhimes and Betsy beers to produce beer for Schindler Rand's ABC studio."
"Jenna Lee Ortiz stars with Jason George, as well as Jay Hayden, Alberto Fraser, gray Damon, ogirit onawan, Danielle Safir and Miguel Sandoval."
"From the captain to the recruits, the show revolves around men and women, who risk their lives and hearts at work and after work."
"The story takes place in a fire station in Seattle, station 19. It is adapted from" shoda Rand "by Gray's anatomy creator shoda rimes, and written by Gray's executive producer / CO star Stacy McKee, following a group of brave firefighters."
"This performance around firefighters will be called station 19."
"We finally have the title of the upcoming anatomy of gray."



Number  932
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here's some yummy footage of bacon from her Snapchat:P.S.”
“Kylie often showcases her cooking adventures on social media.”
“But She Also Tries to Eat Organic MealsWhen she's not indulging her In-N-Out cravings, Kylie tends to eat organic foods.”
“3.”
“The fast food was her biggest pregnancy craving, because—as she explained to her doctor in her birth announcement video—"It’s just In-N-Out these days literally tastes like...nothing I’ve ever had."”
“She Eats Fast Food When She Craves ItAnyone who follows Kylie on Snapchat knows she loves In-N-Out Burger (saaaaame).”
“2.”
“Strong is sexy, and clearly Kylie knows it.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Thanks to Instagram, we know she takes walks with Baby Stormi, and goes paddle boarding (which both happen to double as photo opps, ahem):This content is imported from Instagram.”


"This is her delicious shot of bacon Snapchat:P.S 。”
"Kelly often shows her cooking adventures on social media."
"But she also tries to eat organic rice noodles. When she doesn't indulge in her inner and outer desires, Kelly tends to eat organic food."
“3.”
"Fast food is her biggest desire during pregnancy, because as she explained to the doctor in the video announcing her birth -" these days are just in and out, it's like I've never eaten anything. "
"When she wants to eat fast food, she eats fast food. Anyone who follows Kelly on snapchat knows that she likes saaaame in and out. "
“2.”
"Being strong is sexy, and obviously Kelly knows that."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Thanks to instagram, we know she's walking with baby stormi and skateboarding (both games happen to be photo Opps, ahem): this content was imported from instagram."



Number  933
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We decided together that that we’re probably better as friends.””
“He was just my rock, my everything.”The Grammy nominee also noted in her movie that the breakup “had nothing to do with falling out of love.”
“We connected on a level that I’ve never connected with anybody before.”
“I don’t really believe in that, but I believe it happened.”
“...songstress After I turned 18 we began dating and I think it was love at first sight...”
“When I met him and I laid eyes on him for the first time I was in hair and makeup and I was like I love his man and I have to have him But I was only 17 so he was like Get away from me Added the Confident...”
“And I still love Wilmer,” she revealed.”
““I’ve never loved anybody like I’ve loved Wilmer.”
“The Sonny With a Chance actress opened up about the duo’s heart-wrenching split in her October 2017 documentary Simply Complicated.”
“Lovato also shared photos of the twosome with their arms wrapped around one another in June 2017 during a barbecue she hosted at her L.A. estate.”


"We decided together that we might be better as friends."
"He's just my rock, my everything." The Grammy nominee also mentioned in her film that breaking up "has nothing to do with being lovelorn."
"Our level of contact is something I've never contacted anyone before."
"I really don't believe it, but I believe it's true."
“… Female singer we started dating after I was 18, I think it was love at first sight... "
"When I saw him for the first time, when I saw him for the first time, I did my hair and make-up. I felt that I loved his man and I had to have him, but I was only 17 years old, so he added confidently as if he was far away from me..."
"I still love Wilmer," she revealed
"I've never loved anyone like Wilmer."
"In her October 2017 documentary accidental son, an actress tells about the painful breakup between the two."
"In June 2017, at a barbecue held at Los Angeles manor, Lovato also shared photos of the two people's arms intertwined."



Number  934
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...down in the display case...”
“It happened to me in St Maarten on vacation after shooting a film when I went to a Dior counter to look at lip gloss and the saleswoman literally took a gloss out of my hand and put it back...”
“"We don't have any," she answered.”
“I asked.”
“"Can I take a look at your eyeglasses?"”
“She greeted me, but the look on her face told me that she thought I was lost.”
“I said "Hello" before she did.”
“A saleswoman and I locked eyes immediately.”
“The glasses display was near the door, so I walked right over.”
“Just how I like to look!”


“… In the showcase... "
"When I went to a Dior counter to see the lip gloss, I happened to meet me while I was on holiday in St. Martin. The salesgirl took a luster from my hand and put it back..."
"We didn't," she replied
"I asked
"May I see your glasses?"
"She said hello to me, but the look on her face told me that she thought I was lost."
"Before her, I said" hello. "
"A salesgirl and I immediately looked at each other."
"The glasses rack is near the door, so I went straight to it."
"That's what I like!"



**Something goes wrong**
“On Thursday, the New York Police Department opened an investigation of Simmons following the over dozen accusations — seven of which allegedly occurred in New York City.”
“In recent weeks, some former business, creative and romantic partners have aired grievances as claims I categorically reject.”
“...his apartment...”
“The alleged attack occurred when she was 26-years-old and he was 34.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““He pushed me into his apartment and then he threw me down on the floor and literally tried to grab… take my clothes off of me,” she told Page Six.”
““And I started kicking him really, really hard, screaming, telling him to get the f— off of me.”
“And that I would have him killed if he ever f—ing laid a hand on me,” she recalled, adding that the idea of going to the police felt “overwhelming” at the time.”
“Image zoom Kelly Cutrone; Russell Simmons | Credit: Jim Spellman/WireImage; Vivien Killilea/GettyCutrone later posted a picture of herself and the music mogul on social media and captioned the image “#MeToo #YesYou.”Representatives for the publicist and Simmons did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Cutrone’s allegations come one day after reports in The Hollywood Reporter, New York Times and Los Angeles Times revealed new claims of sexual assault against the father of three.”


On Thursday, the New York Police Department opened an investigation into Simmons. Simmons had been charged with more than a dozen charges, seven of which were alleged to have occurred in New York City
"In recent weeks, some former business, creative and romantic partners have expressed dissatisfaction, and I flatly reject these claims."
“… His apartment... "
"The so-called attack happened when she was 26 and he was 34."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"He pushed me into his apartment and threw me on the floor, really trying to catch Take off my clothes, "she told page six
"I started kicking him hard, screaming and telling him to go away."
"If he dares to touch me, I'll kill him," she recalls, adding that the idea of going to the police station was "unbearable."
"Image zooming: Kelly cataloni; Russell Simmons | credit: Jim Spellman / WireImage; Vivian kirileya / Getty Cutrone later posted photos of herself and the music tycoon on social media, with the title of # metoo # yes you.". Representatives from PR and Simmons did not immediately respond to requests for comment. "
A day earlier, reports by Hollywood journalists, the New York Times and the Los Angeles Times revealed new charges of sexual assault against the father of three



Number  936
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think Mellie remains quite awake, on guard, and ready whenever she’s with Cyrus.”
“You cannot trust him even as you’re looking him straight in the face.”
“I think this last chapter with Peus and Mystery Woman has really burned away any frivolity and really sealed her resolve.”
“What’s her mindset as she’s going to start her presidency?”
“Mellie has always vacillated between being really confident in her abilities and doubting everything.”
“I think it’s all good storytelling.”
“And definitely in terms of people who will be wonderful presidents, people who have earned it, I think Mellie is in line regardless of her gender.”
“We’re way behind the rest of the world in that regard.”
“Well, I cannot speak for Shonda or the writers’ minds, but I do think it’s important for us, as a country, to be able to have in our living room, get you through the idea of female leadership.”
“Do you think it’s a little bit of wish fulfillment to have a female president on “Scandal”?”


"I think Melly's sober and ready to be with Cyrus."
"Even if you look him in the face, you can't believe him."
"I think this last chapter with pace and mystery woman really burns off any frivolity and really seals her resolve."
"What's her mindset when she's about to start the presidency?"
"Melly always wavers between being very confident in her abilities and being suspicious of everything."
"I think it's all good stories."
"There's no doubt that for those who are going to be great presidents, those who have won presidential titles, I think Melly meets the requirements regardless of gender."
"In this respect, we are far behind the rest of the world."
"Well, I can't represent the ideas of shoda or the writers, but I do think it's important for us as a country to be able to let you understand the concept of female leadership in our living room."
"Do you think it's a small wish to have a woman president on scandal come true?"



Number  937
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We need you in this fight.””
““We are in the courts, streets, and in Congress to hold the Trump administration accountable for the irreparable damage it has done to these young lives.”
“More than 2,300 children have been forcibly taken from their parents,” the ACLU writes on that webpage.”
““For months, the administration has been systematically separating asylum-seekers from their children as they arrived at the southern border.”
“The Instagram video directs viewers to visit the ACLU webpage for Trump’s Family Separation Crisis and to raise awareness of the situation with the hashtag #MyNameIsMirian.”
“Waithe and Jake and Maggie Gyllenhaal...”
“I cry even now when I think about that moment when the border officers took my son away Other stars who took part in the emotional project include Oscar Isaac Jeff Bridges Jamie Lee Curtis Kumail Nanjiani Emma Thompson Amy Schumer Riz Ahmed Ilana Glazer Tim Robbins Mira Sorvino Lena...”
“I was crying, too.”
“I did not have a chance to try and comfort my son because the officer slammed the door shut as soon as he was in his seat.”
“They did not provide any reason.”The account continues: “My son was crying as I put him in the seat.”


"We need you in this fight."
"We hold the trump administration responsible in courts, streets and Congress for irreparable damage to the lives of these young people."
"More than 2300 children have been forcibly taken away from their parents," ACLU wrote on the website
"For months, the government has been systematically separating asylum seekers arriving at the southern border from their children."
"The instagram Video Guides viewers to visit the ACLU website to learn about Trump's family separation crisis, and uses the tag" myname is Mirian "to raise awareness of the situation."
"Wait, Jack and Maggie Gyllenhaal..."
"When I think of the moment when the frontier officials took my son, I even cried. Other stars involved in the emotional project include Oscar Isaac Jeff Bridges Jamie Lee Curtis Kumar nangarni, Emma Thompson, Amy Schumer, Liz Ahmed Ilana Glazer, Tim Robbins, Mira sovino Lina... "
"I cried, too."
"I had no chance to comfort my son because the officer slammed the door as soon as he got to his seat."
"They didn't give any reason," the account continued, "my son cried because I put him in his seat."



Number  938
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...emotion to come writing Bring Kleenex cause your gonna need it...”
“There could have been some genetic factors when it comes to mental illness within family on your mom s side that maybe we didn t want everyone to fully know about While Stanger seems to understand the explanation in the clip she teased on Twitter Tuesday that there s more...”
““The feeling is basically not wanting to expose you to this individual,” he continues.”
“REALATED VIDEO: Patti Stanger Advises Bachelor in Paradise‘s Ashley IaconettiThe 21-year-old psychic goes on to explain that because of that, her adopted mother likely wanted to protect Stanger growing up.”
““There is an acknowledgement when I’m going to the brain and mental, of what indicates what maybe is an undiagnosed mental disorder,” Henry begins.”
“...mom never allowed her to get to know her biological family...”
“What s the secret she was holding on to The reality star explains that she s hired a private investigator in the past in an attempt to uncover the truth a journey she explored on her Bravo show but still hasn t learned about the circumstances around why her adopted...”
““And she died not wanting me ever to know about my biological mother.”
““Rhoda would never tell me the truth about my adoption,” Stanger tells Henry.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


“… Take a tissue, because you need it... "
"When it comes to mental illness in your mother's family, there may be some genetic factors. Maybe we don't want everyone to know all about it, and stanger seems to understand the explanation in the clip she teased on twitter on Tuesday, that is, there are more..."
"The feeling is basically that you don't want to be exposed to this person," he continued
"Real video: Patty stanger suggests that Ashley ekonetti, a 21-year-old psychic in paradise, goes on to explain that because of this, her foster mother may want to protect stanger's growth."
"When I enter the brain and mind, there's a confirmation that it shows what might be an undiagnosed mental disorder," Henry began
“… Mother never let her know her own family... "
"What's her secret to the reality star? She explained that she had hired a private detective in the past to try to uncover the truth. She explored a journey in her own wonderful program, but still didn't understand the reason for adopting her.... "
"She didn't want me to know my biological mother when she died."
"Rhoda will never tell me the truth about adopting me," stanger told Henry
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  939
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And this girl is going to be so completely lucky to have John as her papa — it’s crazy!””
“...after she was born she shares adding that they re looking to her husband s career for some inspiration...”
“We Did the Harvesting Again Chrissy Teigen and John Legend s family is expanding and while the couple has shared their baby joy with the world they re keeping some details private for now...”
“The 32 year old model told PEOPLE Wednesday of her second child s sex while at a junket for Lip Sync Battle LIVE A Michael Jackson Celebration We re not ready to say what it is yet Get push notifications...”
“...with news features and more...”
“Teigen has previously been open about choosing to have a baby girl — now-21-month-old Luna Simone — through in vitro fertilization the first time around.”
“She had previously said a little boy is next She did confirm that the couple conceived through IVF again though explaining We did the harvesting as they call it again where they make the embryos Want all the latest pregnancy...”
“...and birth announcements plus celebrity mom blogs...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoom Credit Steve Granitz WireImage Chrissy Teigen and John Legend RELATED VIDEO Pregnant Chrissy Teigen Shows Off Baby Bump in Matching Onesies with John Legend and Family And with IVF the star says there was no long wait before...”


"This girl is so lucky and crazy to have John as her father!"
“… After she was born, she also said that they were looking for some inspiration for her husband's career... "
"We've got Chris tegan and John once again. The legendary family is expanding. Although the couple have shared their baby's joy with the world, they now keep some personal details..."
"The 32 year old model told people about the sex life of her second child on Wednesday, and at a dinner for the mouth fight, we weren't ready to say anything about Michael Jackson's celebration, we didn't get a push notice yet..."
“… There are news features and more... "
"Tegan had previously publicly said that for the first time, she would choose to have a baby girl through in vitro fertilization - Luna Simona, now 21 months old."
"She said before that the next one was a little boy, and she did confirm that the couple was again conceived through IVF, but she explained that we did what they called" harvest "again, where they made embryos and wanted all the latest pregnancy dates..."
“… And birth announcement plus celebrity mom blog... "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Image zooming thanks to Steve granitz, Chris tegan and John Legend Related videos pregnant Chris tegan showed baby lumps while pairing John Legend with her family and IVF. The star said that she didn't wait long before..."



Number  940
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even on your honeymoon (just trying to keep my husband attracted to me ) #planking A post shared by Bobby Boyd (@bboydla) on Sep 15, 2017 at 2:23pm PDTSee Josh gush more about his hubby, below.”
“To the new Mr and Mr Flagg!”
“Sign Up for Free to ViewCreate a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!”
“Josh Flagg and Bobby Boyd may have just tied the knot, but the Million Dollar Listing Los Angeles agent knew long before he proposed that these two would one day be married.”
“Josh shared an epic video that captured every magical moment from his big day, including a glimpse into his wedding vows.”
“"Bobby, in April of 2016, about four months after we had started seeing each other, I shared with you my vows because I knew already then that you were the one," Josh gushed at the altar.”
“Now that's a spectacular wedding!”
“A post shared by Josh Flagg (@joshflagg1) on Sep 13, 2017 at 8:28pm PDTBobby also recited the sweetest vows to a teary-eyed Josh.”
“"There will never be two people that love greater than you and I, and I'm so excited to spend the rest of our lives together," he shared.”
“The video, as well as other photos posted by Josh on Instagram, also shows other highlights from Josh and Bobby's wedding on September 9, from the grooms getting ready in their sharp tuxes to dancing the night away in the Beverly Hills Hotel ballroom.”


"Even when you're on your honeymoon (just trying to attract my husband to me) # post a blog post shared by Bobbie Boyd (@ bboydla) at 2:23 p.m. on September 15, 2017. See below for more information about his husband by Josh gush."
"To Mr. shin and Mr. flage!"
"Sign up for free watch, create a free profile to get unlimited exclusive videos, sweepstakes, etc!"
"Josh flage and Bobbie Boyd may have just married, but the million dollar broker listed in Los Angeles knew that long before he proposed that they would get married one day."
"Josh shared an epic video recording every magical moment of his big day, including a glimpse of his wedding vows."
"Bobbie, in April 2016, four months after we first met, I shared my vows with you, because by that time I knew you were the one," Josh gushed at the altar
"Now it's a spectacular wedding!"
"A post shared by Josh flag1 at 8:28 pm on September 13, 2017 at pdtbobby also recited the sweetest oath to the tearful Josh."
"There will never be two people who love more than you and me, and I'm happy to spend the rest of my life together," he said
"This video, along with other photos released by Josh on instagram, also shows other highlights of Josh's and Bob's wedding on September 9, from the groom's preparation in a neat tuxedo to the night of dancing in the Beverly Hills Hotel Ballroom."



Number  941
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I don't really know anyone where I go, so that is lonely.'”
“'But before I was with him, it is lonely when you're alone traveling the world over 250 days a year.'I am never in one country at once.”
“And Paris Hilton has hinted she will televise her wedding to her fiancé Chris Zylka, 33, after being inundated with offers from networks.”
“The hotel heiress, 37, who starred in The Simple Life with Nicole Richie 10 years ago, could make her return to reality TV and let fans into her big day.”
“The big day: Paris Hilton has hinted she will televise her wedding to her fiancé Chris Zylka, 33, after being inundated with offers from networksShe told E!”
“News: 'We've been getting a lot of calls and a lot of offers from different networks, pitching that show so maybe', before the reality star coyly said 'yes' when asked if she would ever take up one of their offers.”
“The socialite then gushed about her husband-to-be, as she said: 'It's the best feeling in the world just to find the one person who is your best friend, I trust him so much.”
“'He's so supportive and loving and like an angel, I feel like he saved me and I can't imagine my life with anyone else.'”
“Comeback The hotel heiress 37 who starred in The Simple Life with Nicole Richie 10 years ago could make her return to reality TV by letting fans into her big day The star also revealed the couple s next step in life was to have babies so her children could...”
“...play with her sister Nicky s two daughters...”


"I really don't know anyone, so I'm lonely."
"But before I was with him, it was lonely for you to travel around the world more than 250 days a year alone. I've never been in a country at a time
Paris Hilton has hinted that she will broadcast her wedding to her 33 year old fiance, Chris zelka, live on television after receiving a large number of Internet offers
"The 37 year old hotel heiress, who starred in" simple life "with Nicole Ritchie 10 years ago, can return to reality TV and bring fans into her big day."
"An important day: Paris Hilton hinted that she would broadcast her wedding on TV, and her fiance Chris zylka, 33, was flooded after being offered from the Internet to tell e!"
"News: we've received a lot of phone calls and offers from different TV stations. It's very possible to promote that TV play." when asked if she would accept their offer, the reality TV star shyly said "yes."
"Finding your best friend is the best feeling in the world, and I trust him very much," the socialite continued on about her future husband
"He is so supportive and loving, just like an angel. I think he saved me. I can't imagine my life with other people."
"Comeback the 37 year old hotel heiress starred in" simple life "with Nicole Ritchie 10 years ago, allowing fans to enter their own big day and return to reality TV. The star also revealed that the next step in the couple's life is to have children, so that her children can... "
“… Playing with her sister Nicky's two daughters... "



Number  942
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s a Pup-Friendly AffairHough’s love for her two pups — Cavalier King Charles Spaniels, Lexi and Harley — is evident — and her wedding day will be no exception!”
“He can’t possibly go, but it’d be amazing if he just sort of rose from the ground and was like ‘Hello!” and started singing!” Derek told PEOPLE Now in June.”
““He’s always wanted to dance before he ever met me, so he’s always asking me to teach him and I’m like, ‘Ask Derek!’ I’m just pawning my brother off to him.”
““Oh my goodness, he wants more than anything to dance,” Hough told PEOPLE in September 2015 about her fiancé’s desire to show off his moves at the wedding.”
“!”There Will Be Lots of DancingOne key element that will definitely be incorporated into the couple’s big day is dancing.”
““Couldn’t get our other girl Harley out from the shade of the tree for the photo…..I’m a lucky man to be surrounded by love like this!”
“#wcw on these two angels!” he captioned a photo of her cuddling up to one of the couple’s beloved pups — Lexi — on a hike overlooking Los Angeles.”
“...recently.”
“She followed it up with an image of the engaged couple sharing a smooch: “#tbt Birthday kisses .”The NHL player also expressed his love for Hough (and their two pups!)”
“@brookslaich  That flame will never go out… ” Hough captioned a video that was captured at the celebratory affair.”


"It's the love of a friendly puppy, affair Hough, and her two puppies - Knight, King Charles, hound, Lexy and Harley - are obvious - and her wedding day is no exception!"
"He can't go, but if he just gets up from the ground like 'Hello! "Then start singing! "Derek told people in June."
"He wanted to dance before he met me, so he always asked me to teach him, and I said," ask Derek! "I just pawned my brother to him."
"Oh, my God, he wants to dance the most," Hoff told people in September 2015, and her fiance wanted to show off her dancing at the wedding
"!" there's going to be a lot of dancing, and one of the key elements that's sure to fit into this couple's big day is dancing. "
"We can't let our other girl, Harley, come out from the shade to take pictures I'm a lucky person to be surrounded by such love! "
"In these two angels! "He wrote in the title of a photo that she was hiking with Lexy, one of the couple's beloved puppies, overlooking Los Angeles."
“… Recently. "
Then she took another picture of the engaged couple: "TBT's birthday kiss.". The NHL player also expressed his love for Hoff (and their two puppies)
"@ brookslack, the flame will never go out..." Hoff wrote in a video taken during the celebration



Number  943
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Long stretches of sobriety were interrupted by drunk driving arrests, in 2009 and 2015.”
“He had his own struggles, too.”
“He appeared in dozens of films many of them Westerns including Terrence Malick s Days of Heaven Steel Magnolias The Assassination of Jesse James by the Coward Robert Ford and 2012 s Mud He was nominated for an Oscar for his performance as pilot Chuck Yeager in 1983 s The...”
“I started to understand there was this possibility of conversation between actors and that’s how it all started.”Shepard’s Western drawl and laconic presence made him a reluctant movie star, too.”
““And actors immediately seemed to have a handle on it, on the rhythm of it, the sound of it, the characters.”
““I was writing basically for actors,” Shepard told The Associated Press in a 2011 interview.”
“But in soul-searching plays, his portrait of the West was a disillusioned one, peopled by broken characters whose realities fell far short of the American Dream.”
“They want a saint but with a cowboy mouth” — a role the tall and handsome Shepard fulfilled for many.”
“ADVERTISEMENTIn his 1971 one-act “Cowboy Mouth, which he wrote with his then-girlfriend, musician and poet Patti Smith, one character says, “People want a street angel.”
“He was one of the most influential playwrights of his generation: a plain-spoken poet of the modern frontier, both lyrical and rugged.”


"In 2009 and 2015, long periods of sobriety were interrupted by drunk driving arrests."
"He has his own struggles, too."
"He has starred in dozens of films, many of which are westerns, including Terrence Malik's" days in heaven "," steel Magnolia "," Coward Robert Ford's assassination of Jesse James "and" mud "in 2012. He won an Oscar nomination for playing pilot chuck Yeager in 1983..."
"I began to understand the possibility of this kind of dialogue between actors, and that's the beginning of everything." Shepard's slow and concise appearance in the West made him a reluctant movie star
"The actors seem to have mastered it immediately, mastered its rhythm, mastered its voice, mastered its characters."
"I basically write for actors," Sheppard told the associated press in 2011
But in the drama of introspection, his depiction of the west is a disillusioned painting, full of broken characters, whose reality is far from the American dream
"They want a saint with a cowboy mouth" - the role played by the tall and handsome Sheppard has satisfied many people
"People want a street angel," says a character in "cowboy mouth," which he co wrote with his then girlfriend, musician and poet Patty Smith in 1971
He is one of the most influential playwrights of his generation: a concise modern frontier poet, both lyrical and rough



Number  944
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And speaking of albums, SZA told MTV News in December that she made it her 2018 resolution to start working on her next album and “not drag it out.” We'll just have to see about that.”
“All that is now water under the bridge and Punch was one of the first people to congratulate SZA on her latest achievement.”
“Before the album was released, SZA grew incredibly frustrated with her situation with her label Top Dawg Entertainment that she briefly quit, telling TDE co-president Terrence "Punch" Henderson to release the project “if he ever feels like it” in a tweet that has since deleted.”
“Ctrl was nominated at this year’s Grammys for Best Urban Contemporary Album, and the 27-year-old singer received a Best New Artist nom of her own.”
“I was choosing from 150, 200 songs, so I’m just like, who knows what’s good any more?” SZA says the final product only came about when the record company took her hard drive.”
“I just kept moving shit around.”
“I just kept fucking everything up.”
“And if something’s too shitty and I can’t put my finger on it, and I think, wow this sucks to me, then I get way frustrated, and usually scrap the song.”
““And I listen back and think, what’s shitty?”
““I freestyle everything, all the way down,” she told The Guardian.”


Speaking of albums, SZA told MTV News in December last year that she was determined to start writing her next album in 2018, and "don't delay", we can only wait and see
"Everything is water under the bridge now, and panchi was one of the first to congratulate szar on his latest achievements."
"Before the release of the album, SZA was extremely frustrated by the situation of her label top dawg entertainment. She resigned briefly and told TDE co president Terrence" punch "Henderson in a tweet that was later deleted to release the project," if he has feelings. "
"Ctrl was nominated for this year's Grammy best urban contemporary album, and the 27 year old singer was nominated for best new artist of his own."
"I picked out 150 or 200 songs, so I thought, who knows what else? "Sasha said the record company took away her hard drive before the final product came out."
"I just keep moving."
"I just screwed everything up."
"If something is too bad and I can't put my finger on it, I think, wow, it's too bad for me, then I'll be very upset and usually delete the song."
"I look back and think, what the hell is this?"
"I can freestyle anything, all the way down," she told the guardian



Number  945
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Peppermint is in theaters September 7.”
““I want justice.” I think if I shoo away all the weird political implications of a movie like this, at the end of the day, that’s all I want for Jennifer Garner, too.”
“Advertisement“What do I want?” Riley says in the trailer.”
“Do we really need a revenge thriller that overly exaggerates Latino gangs shooting down innocent white people right now?”
“The trailer is littered with lines like “well at least somebody’s doing something,” which feels like catnip dialogue for people who go crazy over their right to bear arms.”
“While I love the idea of Garner starring as a crazed mom out for blood, I’d have to say that something about this movie feels uncomfortably Trumpian (ugh I’m sorry, I’m sorry!!!)”
“And when the five-year anniversary of her family’s murder comes along, she comes back for revenge.”
“...up on a gazillion semi automatics...”
“Garner plays a mom named Riley whose daughter and husband are gunned down by members linked to the Garcia cartel Gaslighted by corrupt cops and the justice system who let the murderers off the hook she disappears and spends five years toning her muscles and training to fight read stocking...”
“Now Jennifer Garner joins the bloody, ripped mom ranks in Peppermint, a movie where she seeks gruesome revenge for the death of her child.”


"Mints will be on September 7."
"I want justice." I think if I wipe out all the strange political implications of such a movie, at the end of the day, that's all I ask of Jennifer Garner
"Advertising" what do I want? "Riley said in the trailer."
"Do we really need a revenge thriller that exaggerates that Latin American gangs are shooting innocent white people now?"
The trailer is full of lines like "at least someone's doing something," which makes it feel like a cat bite conversation with people who are crazy about the right to carry weapons
"Although I love the idea of Ghana playing a crazy mother, I have to say that there are some aspects of the film that make trump uncomfortable (ER, sorry, sorry!!)"
"When the fifth anniversary of her family's death came, she came back to take revenge."
“… On a semi-automatic system of millions
"Ghana plays a mother named Riley, whose daughter and husband are shot dead by members associated with Garcia cartel, who are released by the corrupt police and judicial system. She disappears and spends five years training her muscles and training how to fight against reed stockings..."
"Now Jennifer Garner joins the bloody torn mother in mints, where she seeks terrible revenge for her child's death."



Number  946
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More:'The Bachelor' recap: Three hours, two devastated women and one worst finale ever...”
“More:Is it time to stop watching 'The Bachelor?'”
“Less than three months after her break-up with Bachelor Arie Luyendyk Jr. aired, the new Bachelorette revealed she is engaged to People magazine.”
“Good Morning America also announced the news Tuesday.”
“"It was the happiest moment of my life.”
“And it feels so good to say it," the 28-year-old Minnesota native told People.”
“"I still pinch myself, like, did that all just happen?”
“It’s been a whirlwind.”Understandably so.”
“Luyendyk proposed to Kufrin only to break-up with her on-camera and make a play for his season's runner-up Lauren Burnham.”
“Luyendyk and Burnham are now engaged and announced on The View Wednesday they will marry in a private ceremony in Maui on Jan. 12.”


"More: 'Bachelor' review: three hours, two devastated women and one of the worst endings ever..."
"More: really? It's time to stop watching Bachelor"
"Less than three months after her break-up with the bachelor Ali luyandik Jr., the new Bachelor revealed that she was engaged to people magazine."
"Good morning, the United States announced that on Tuesday."
"It was the happiest time of my life."
"It's nice to say it," the 28 year old Minnesota native told people
"I still pinch myself, as if, has all this happened?"
"It's a whirlwind." This is understandable
"Luyendyk proposed to kufrin just to break up with her on camera and film for his runner up this season, Lauren Burnham."
"Luyendyk and Burnham are engaged now and will have a private wedding in Maui on January 12."



Number  947
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I just want to hibernate like a d**n bear,' she continued.”
“I don't want to do s**t. I don't even want to look at people.”
“But it seems Cardi B is already celebrating new life, as her dog gave birth to a litter of puppies on Friday.”
“The 25-year-old Be Careful rapper shared the joyous occasion via a comprehensive video on Instagram.”
“Scroll down for videoFun!”
“It seems Cardi B is already celebrating new life, as her dog gave birth to a litter of puppies on FridayThe clip begins with Cardi addressing the camera, her rainbow dyed hair parted in the middle.”
“'Hey everybody, somebody was so thirsty to be a mom that she couldn’t wait,' gushed the singer, who then started repeating 'she got her cubs,' as she panned around the group of new puppies.”
“She then introduced 'the parents' with a shot of her dogs Boujee and Bentley, and finally the 'grandparents' via a selfie of her and fiance Offset, 26.”
“Excited!”
“The clip begins with Cardi addressing the camera, her rainbow dyed hair parted in the middleCute!”


"I just want to hibernate like a bear," she continued
"I don't want to do s * * t, I don't even want to see people."
"But Katie B seems to be celebrating her new life because her dog gave birth to a litter of puppies on Friday."
"The 25-year-old rapper shared this happy moment through a comprehensive video on instagram."
"Scroll down for video fun!"
"It seems that Cardi B is already celebrating a new life because her dog gave birth to a litter of puppies in a week." Carter starts with the camera, her rainbow hair in the middle.
"Hey, Hello everyone, someone is eager to be a mother, she can't wait to say," the singer gushed, and then began to repeat, "she got her cub," she walked around a group of new puppies
"Then she introduced 'parents' with her dogs, boogie and Bentley, and finally introduced' grandparents' through her self portraits with her 26 year old fiance."
"Excited!"
At the beginning of the clip, Katie speaks to the camera. Her rainbow hair is split in the middle. How lovely



Number  948
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for more info and juicy news on the subject.”
“Non-televised awards were announced on the Billboard website the very same day as the main ceremony.”
“That’s what most of the pop culture fans were asking themselves on Sunday night, as the 2017 Billboard Music Awards was aired live coast to coast on ABC.”
“John Legend performed and various of his friends were there, and viewers were expecting to also see the supermodel being present in the T-Mobile Arena.”
“But unfortunately, she wasn’t there as she decided to cheer on her loved one from the comfort of the home of a family member in Las Vegas, so we shouldn’t worry.”
““My sister and niece live in Vegas.”
“I’m hanging out with them and not trying to force my back into a dress.”
“...but watching #bbmas,” she posted on her Twitter account.”
“And regarding her favorite artists in the first hour of the show, she had to give it up for both Miley Cyrus and Ed Sheeran.”
“Even if Chrissy was not inside the arena on Sunday, she managed to watch the amazing get together between John and Florida Georgia Line.”


"Please stay tuned for more information and interesting news on this topic."
"The non TV award ceremony will be announced on the bulletin board website on the day of the main award ceremony."
"That's the question most pop culture fans ask themselves on Sunday night, because the 2017 Billboard Music Awards were broadcast live on ABC TV."
"John Legend performed, many of his friends were present, and the audience was looking forward to seeing the supermodel appear in the T-Mobile arena."
"But unfortunately, she wasn't there when she decided to cheer for her loved one in a comfortable Las Vegas home, so we don't have to worry."
"My sister and niece live in Vegas."
"I'm with them and I don't want to force myself to wear skirts."
“…… But watching bbmas, "she wrote on twitter
"About her favorite artist in the first hour of the show, she had to give up for Miley Cyrus and ED Sheeran."
"Even though Chris wasn't in the arena on Sunday, she managed to watch the wonderful match between John and the Florida Georgia line."



Number  949
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“David Beckham arrives at Buckingham Palace for the #QueensYoungLeaders Awards @QueensLeaders pic.twitter.com/1XaYZHtY3H — Emily Nash (@emynash) June 26, 2018This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Getty ImagesToday's awards also marks another event hosted by the Queen and Markle, following their day of joint engagements in Chester, England earlier this month.”
“"I, together with my wife Meghan, look forward to convening young people from around The Commonwealth to hear your ideas, work with you to build platforms for you to collaborate and form partnerships, as we travel around in our work, he said, per royal commentator Omid Scobie.”
“As the Duke of Sussex addressed the crowd, he mentioned that his wife would be joining in on the work.”
“YouTubeGetty ImagesThe Duchess sat intently in the front row as her husband gave a speech and while the Queen honored the young recipients.”
“However, she does get style advice from Prince Harry, who occasionally weighs in on her looks.”
“It's the latest in impressive looks from the Duchess, who continues to impress even without a stylist, Vanity Fair reports.”
“Markle's neutral look was a hushed contrast to the Queen's bright yellow and green dress.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"David Beckham has come to Buckingham Palace to take part in the Queensland Golden Bell Award for young leaders pic.twitter.com/1XaYZHtY3H -Emily Nash (@ emynash) June 26, 2018 this content was created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address. "
"The Getty Images today award ceremony also marks another event held by the queen and Marcel following the joint event day held earlier this month in Chester, UK."
"My wife Megan and I are looking forward to bringing together young people from all over the Commonwealth to listen to your ideas and work with you to build a platform for cooperation and partnership for you as we travel around the world at work," according to Royal commentator Omid Scobie
When the Duke of Sussex spoke to the crowd, he mentioned that his wife would take part in the work
"YouTube Getty imagines the Duchess concentrating in the front row, her husband giving a speech, and the queen honoring the young recipient."
"But she did get fashion advice from Prince Harry, who occasionally weighed her looks."
"This is the Duchess' latest impressive look, and she can continue to impress even without a stylist," Vanity Fair reported
"Marcel's neutral look contrasts quietly with the Queen's bright yellow and green dress."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information



Number  950
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share it in the comments below.”
“The following year she would receive a second statuette for her role in Gia She went platinum for Girl Interrupted but limited her beauty routine to Carmex and lotion The Beyond Borders star and new mother to adopted son Maddox lightened up both her locks and makeup for a fresh...”
“Similar to any other woman, she has been through a fair share of good and bad days too.”
“However, nothing has ever shown on her face.”
“And boy, we are impressed!”
“Compiled from InStyle we dig out her changing looks through the years With her full lips and bright blue eyes the 11 year old daughter of Jon Voight and Marcheline Bertrand was clearly destined to be a spectacular beauty As a student at Beverly Hills High School Jolie was an...”
“...unknown quantity...”
“"I wore black boots with big silver bat [charms] that dragged when I walked," Jolie said earlier.”
“"I wasn't aware of how I looked, but apparently I looked really creepy.”
“"The pixie-cropped actor won her first Golden Globe for TV biopic George Wallace.”


"Please share in the comments below."
"The next year, she will get her second statuette for her role in GIA. She won the platinum prize for girl, but only CARMEX and lotin, while Maddox, the star of beyond borders and the new mother of her adopted son, brightened her hair and make-up and took on a new look. "
"Like other women, she has had a lot of good and bad times."
"However, nothing ever appeared on her face."
"Boy, we're impressed!"
"According to InStyle, we've discovered her plump lips and bright blue eyes, which have been changing over the years. Jon Voight and Marceline Bertrand's 11 year old daughter is clearly destined to be an amazing beauty because she's a student of Beverly Hills High School. Julie is a..."
“… Unknown quantity... "
Julie said earlier: "I'm wearing a pair of black boots with a big silver bat (amulet) on it. I'll drag it when I walk."
"I don't know how I look, but obviously I look really scary."
"The short actor won her first Golden Globe Award for her TV biography George Wallace."



Number  951
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“How did Alfre react to being told she'd be leaving the series?”
“Let's talk about Mariah, who's murdered by her own daughter, Tilda [Gabrielle Dennis], and departs the show.”
“I would say no, but it's interesting to play with.”
“It's the same lesson that Michael Corleone got [in The Godfather]… So, is my view for Luke Cage, or Luke Corleone, more pessimistic?”
“That was what Mariah was trying to say, that you often go in thinking that things are going to be different when it's your administration, but [once you're there] you start making the kinds of decisions that the previous administration made.”
“The tonal shift can be shocking, but once given power, people kind of show off who they really are.”
“If you immediately go from watching episode 13 of season 2 and go back to episode 1 of season 1, it's chilling how much Mike in that three-piece suit looks like Cottonmouth [played by Mahershala Ali].”
“To his credit, he refused all notes to play it differently, and he absolutely made the right choice, because it's chilling.”
“Mike didn't play it like that.”
“CHEO HODARI COKER: When we filmed the episode, the script called for Luke to be more reluctant, to reluctantly look out at all that he surveyed.”


"How did Alfred react when she was told that she was leaving the cast?"
"Let's talk about Maria, who was murdered by her daughter Gabrielle Dennis and left the show."
"I'll say no, but it's fun."
"It's the same lesson Michael Corleone learned [in the godfather] So am I more pessimistic about Luke cage or Luke Corleone? "
"That's what Maria wants to say. When your government is in power, you often think things will be different, but (once you get there) you start to make the kind of decisions that the previous government made."
"The change in tone can be shocking, but once empowered, people kind of show off their true identity."
"If you go right back from season 2, Episode 13 to season 1, Episode 1, you'll see how much Mike looks like (mahsara Ali's) muzzle in that three piece suit. It's chilling."
"To his credit, he rejected all the different notes and made the right choice because it was chilling."
"Mike doesn't play like that."
"Cheo hodari coker: when we filmed this episode, the script asked Luke to be even more reluctant to see what he was investigating."



Number  952
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m trying to take these experiences that are coming my way and make them positive,” he said.”
“In early April, Page Six reported Sorrentino was hit with a fresh round of criminal charges that accuse him and his brother, Marc, of creating schemes to get out of paying taxes and falsifying records between 2010 and 2012.”
“So you really ruin relationships with everyone in your life.”While he’s working to maintain his sobriety, he faces possible prison time for 2014 tax fraud charges.”
““Your emotions are blocked.”
““From there it was just a spiral,” he said.”
“His doctor prescribed painkillers that caused his relapse.”
““If I’m not healthy mentally and physically, I’m not going to make it.”His second round of rehab, in 2015, came after breaking ribs in a workout injury.”
““It’s my life, and I have to take care of it,” the 34-year-old “Jersey Shore” alum told People.”
“100 percent sober for the last 18 months...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window After a long battle with prescription drug abuse and two stints in rehab Mike The Situation Sorrentino claims he s been...”


"I'm trying to accept these coming experiences and make them positive," he said
"At the beginning of April, page 6 reported that Sorrentino was charged with a new round of criminal charges, accusing him and his brother Mark of manufacturing tax evasion plans and falsifying records between 2010 and 2012."
"So you really ruined your relationship with everyone in your life." As he tries to stay awake, he could face jail for tax fraud charges in 2014
"Your emotions are blocked."
"From there, it's just a spiral," he said
"His doctor prescribed painkillers, causing him to relapse."
"If I'm not mentally and physically healthy, I can't live." In 2015, his second round of rehabilitation training was conducted after a rib fracture in a training session
"This is my life and I have to take care of it," the 34 year old Jersey coast alumni told people
"100% lucidity in the last 18 months..."
"Click to send this email to a friend to open in a new window click to share on Twitter to open in a new window click to share on Facebook to open in a new window after two long struggles with prescription drug abuse and rehab, Mike Sorrentino claims that he has..."



Number  953
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““But I think it would have to be all five really.”PA Media...”
“But she added: “I just didn’t feel like it was right and so if everyone was feeling it at some point, I’m not against the idea.”
“She said performing as a four-piece would not have done “the band or fans justice” after Beckham opted against joining the comeback.”
“The singer said there were no plans for a full Spice Girls reunion “in the pipeline” after she rejected the chance to join Horner, Bunton and Mel B in a 20th anniversary celebration of Wannabe last summer.”
“...also appear in the video which Mel C said she was inspired to create after performing to an energetic crowd in Brazil...”
“...it is really special she said adding Geri s in there briefly Emma s done a really lovely one and last but not least Victoria Beckham found time to do a little one for me Natalie Imbruglia and KT Tunstall...”
“She didn t get round to doing it and obviously it does concern me I think people will pick up on that but I don t want anything to be made of it Having four of the Spice Girls in...”
“The 43-year-old said: “I don’t want it to look negative because it’s not, it’s not a big deal, I reached out to lots of other people and everyone’s busy.”
“Mel C, full name Melanie Chisholm, told the Press Association it was a “shame” her namesake could not make it a full line-up.”
“Beckham – who reportedly scuppered a full Spice Girls reunion last year – is shown making a love heart with her hands while Bunton sings along to the track.”


"But I think it has to be five truths." PA media
But she added: "I just think it's wrong, so if everyone has that feeling, I'm not against the idea."
"She said that after David chose not to come back, acting as a foursome would not be" fair to the band or fans. "
The singer said that last summer, she turned down the chance to join Horner, bunton and Mel B in wannabe's 20th anniversary celebration, so there were no plans for a full reunion of the spice girls in the "pipeline."
“… Also appearing in the video, Mel C said that she was inspired by her performance to an energetic audience in Brazil... "
“… It's really special, she said, adding to Jerry's short time there, Emma made a very lovely one, and last but not least, Victoria Beckham found time to make a little me, Natalie imbulia and KT townston... "
"She didn't have time to do it, which obviously worries me. I think people will notice that, but I don't want to because there are four hot girls..."
"I don't want it to look negative because it's not, it's not a big deal, I've met a lot of other people and everyone is busy," the 43 year old said
"Mel C, whose full name is Melanie Chisholm, told the press association that it's a 'pity' that her name doesn't make it a complete lineup."
"It's reported that David was defeated in last year's Spice Girls reunion. When bunton sang, she made a heart of love with her hands."



Number  954
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It took a person that strong to change my view on life.”Scroll through the gallery below to see more photos of Nikki's engagement ring!”
““I found a strong person I consider an inspiration, an equal, somebody who when I’m feeling down, picks me up — and somebody who, when she’s down, I can pick her up.”
““I found the absolute right person,” he gushed.”
“MORE: Nikki Bella Gushes Over Brie Bella's Growing Baby Bump on InstagramBut Nikki and John stopped by the Today show after their engagement and he explained why he changed his mind about wanting to get married again.”
“Throughout all the seasons, John seemed adamant that he never wanted to get married again after his 2012 divorce from high school sweetheart Elizabeth Huberdeau.”
“Reality TV series Total Divas and their spinoff, Total Bellas.”
“Their relationship has been placed front and center on their E!”
“The WWE power couple got engaged after nearly five years of dating — even though their engagement and upcoming nuptials seemed like it would never happen.”
“John told Nikki that four diamonds on one side of the band represents him and the other side of the band — which also features four diamonds — represents Nikki.”
“The band also features eight smaller diamonds set in a channel, In Touch previously revealed.”


"Such a strong person has changed my view of life." Scroll through the gallery below to see more pictures of Nicky's engagement ring
"I found a strong person, I think he is a kind of inspiration, an equal person, when I am down, he will help me, when she is down, I will help her."
"I found the absolutely right person," he gushed
"More: Nikki Bella talks about Bree Bella's little bumps on instagram but. Nicky and John stopped on the "Today Show" after they got engaged. He explained why he changed his mind and wanted to get married again
"In all seasons, John seems to be convinced that he doesn't want to get married again after his divorce from high school sweetheart Elizabeth huberto in 2012."
"The reality TV series total divas and its derivative total Bellas."
"Their relationship has been put in their e!"
"The WWE power couple got engaged nearly five years after their date - although their engagement and upcoming wedding never seem to happen," he said
"John told Nicky that the four diamonds on one side of the band represented him, and the other side of the band - there were also four diamonds - represented Nicky."
"The band also introduced eight smaller diamonds, which were embedded in one channel, which was previously exposed."



Number  955
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The newlyweds exited the cathedral to Elgar's "Pomp and Circumstance No.”
“Getty ImagesThere were 3,500 people in the congregation at St. Paul's Cathedral watching when Diana broke with tradition by excluding the promise to "obey" her husband in her vows, instead promising to "love him, comfort him, honor and keep him in sickness and health."”
“Fashion editor Suzy Menkes wrote in the The Times that they looked like "they could have been plucked from a Victorian child's scrapbook."”
“The girls wore scalloped dresses with yellow sashes by Emanuel, and carried baskets of yellow roses and wildflowers.”
“Getty ImagesPrincess Diana's BridesmaidsDiana's bridesmaids included the daughters of important royal friends, including Princess Margaret's daughter; Winston Churchill's great-granddaughter; Charles' goddaughter India Hicks; Charles' racehorse trainer's daughter; and the daughter of close friends of the prince.”
“The engagement ring was part of crown jewelers Garrard's regular collection.”
“The Prince of Wales proposed after six months of dating Diana, but the engagement was kept secret for several weeks while Diana selected the now-famous £30,000 sapphire-and-diamond engagement ring which was not designed specifically for her.”
“Several thousand onlookers had already gathered to await the royal couple's wedding as they emerged from the hour-long rehearsal.”
“Getty ImagesPrincess Diana and Prince Charles's Wedding RehearsalLike every couple, Charles and Diana had to attend a rehearsal at St. Paul's Cathedral before making it down the aisle.”
“Here, the best photos from Prince Charles and Princess Diana's wedding day.”


The newlyweds left the Cathedral for ELGA's feast and environment
When Diana broke the tradition and excluded the promise of "obeying" her husband in her vows, instead of "loving him, comforting him, respecting him, and keeping him sick and healthy," 3500 people in St. Paul's Cathedral were watching
Fashion editor Susie menks wrote in the times that they looked like "they might have been taken from Victorian children's scrapbooks."
The girls were wearing Emanuel's fan-shaped dresses with yellow belts and carrying baskets of yellow roses and wildflowers
Diana's bridesmaids Diana's bridesmaids include the daughters of important Royal friends, including Princess Margaret; Winston Churchill's great granddaughter; Charles's goddaughter, India Hicks; Charles's horse racing coach's daughter; and the prince's close friend's daughter
"Engagement rings are part of the crown jeweler's regular collection."
"The prince of Wales proposed to Diana after six months of dating, but the engagement was kept secret for several weeks, while Diana chose the now famous 30000 pound sapphire and diamond engagement ring, which was not specially designed for her."
"Thousands of onlookers have gathered to wait for the wedding of the royal couple, who have come out of an hour long rehearsal."
Princess Diana and Prince Charles have their wedding rehearsals. Like every couple, Charles and Princess Diana attend rehearsals at St. Paul's Cathedral before they walk down the aisle
"This is the best picture of Prince Charles and Princess Diana on their wedding day."



Number  956
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Obama is also scheduled to speak at an Indonesian Diaspora Congress in Jakarta on July 1.”
“Secret Service agents did not have special requests for the Obamas activities on the main Java island Obama moved to Indonesia in 1967 at age 6 after his divorced mother remarried an Indonesian man He said that Secret Service agents did not have special requests for the Obamas activities on...”
“Obama, his wife Michelle and daughters Malia and Sasha drove to a luxury hotel in downtown Yogyakarta after arriving on a private jet at the city's military airport, said Indonesian air force base commander Air Vice Marshal Novyan Samyoga.”
“The family then went to visit the ninth-century Borobudur Temple in Magelang on Wednesday where they were seen snapping photos.”
“Samyoga was among local officials who greeted the Obamas at the tarmac.”
“He said the family looked relaxed and was smiling in response to onlookers who greeted them with cheers.”
“Scroll down for videoFormer President Barack Obama and his family wrapped up their five-day vacation on Indonesia's resort island of Bali and headed to the historic city of Yogyakarta on Wednesday during a nostalgic trip to the country where Obama lived for several years as a child.”
“He is seen with his daughters Malia left and Sasha who is holding the camera Obama center waves as he walks with his wife Michelle left and daughter Malia rear upon arrival for a tour at Borobudur Temple in Magelang Central Java Indonesia Obama is seen above using his mobile...”
“...phone to snap a photo of the temple...”
“...drove to a luxury hotel in downtown Yogyakarta after arriving on a private jet at the city's military airport, said Indonesian air force base commander Air Vice Marshal Novyan SamyogaSamyoga was among local officials who greeted the Obamas at the tarmac.”


"Obama is also scheduled to address the Indonesian diaspora conference in Jakarta on July 1."
"The secret service has no special requirements for the Obamas' activities in Java. Obama moved to Indonesia when he was 6 years old in 1967, when his divorced mother remarried with an Indonesian man. He said the secret service's response to the Obamas was There are no special requirements for activities on the island. "
"Obama, his wife Michelle and daughters Malia and Sasha arrived at the military airport of Yogyakarta in a private plane and drove to a luxury hotel in the center of Yogyakarta," said novyan samyoga, commander of the Indonesian air force base and deputy marshal of the air force
"Then, on Wednesday, the family went to visit the ninth century Borobudur temple in magrang, where they were seen taking pictures."
"Sanyuga was one of the local officials who met the Obamas on the tarmac."
"The family looked relaxed and smiling at the cheers of the onlookers," he said
"Rolling down video former President Barack Obama and his family ended their five-day holiday in Bali, an Indonesian resort, and went to the historic city of Yogyakarta on Wednesday for a nostalgic trip to the country where Obama lived for several years as a child."
"He and his daughters Malia Zuo and Sasha, who are holding a camera to Obama's center wave, as he and his wife Michelle Zuo and daughter Malia arrive at the rear after traveling at the Indonesian Borobudur temple in magrang, Central Java, where Obama sees Obama using his mobile phone..."
“… Call and take a picture of the temple... "
Novyan samyoga samyogamyoga, commander of the Indonesian air force base and deputy marshal of the air force, said in a local official greeting the Obamas on the tarmac After arriving at the military airport of Yogyakarta by private plane, we drove to a luxury hotel in the center of Yogyakarta



Number  957
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just last week stock for GameStop soared after a group of people on Reddit were able to get the stock price for it to rise significantly and cause a hedge fund worth billions of dollars to go ban Read more Peloton s Cody Rigsby Explains Recent Absence Reveals He s...”
“The 24-year-old social star revealed on the latest episode of his podcast that he invested about $50,000 in GameStop stocks.”
““Yellowfin were chewing today #200# @hook360 @lossuenosresort,” Connor wrote along with the photo.”
“The 26-year-old son of Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman recently took to his Instagram to share a rare photo of himself holding up a huge fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica.”
“...life...”
“Someone who s a very established actor and director in this industry gave me really terrible advice that was helpful because I just Read more Tom Cruise Nicole Kidman s Son Connor Posts Rare Photo of Himself on Instagram Connor Kidman Cruise is giving a rare glimpse into his personal...”
“Now, the 36-year-old actress and director is explaining the policy and opening up about what inspired her to institute it on her movie sets.”
“...no a holes policy that he violated...”
“A few hours earlier Hailey headed Read more Olivia Wilde Explains the No A holes Policy She Instituted on Her Movie Sets You might remember that Olivia Wilde fired Shia LaBeouf from her movie Don t Worry Darling last year and at the time several reports said she has a...”
“Hailey also stayed safe in a black face mask as she arrived at the restaurant.”


"Just last week, a group of people found out on reddit that Gamestop's share price had soared, leading to the ban of a multi billion dollar hedge fund. Read more, peloton's Cody Rigsby explains that his recent absence shows him
"The 24-year-old social star revealed in the latest podcast that he has invested about $50000 in Gamestop stock."
"Today, yellowfin tuna chews 200 hooks at the losunoso resort," Connor wrote in the photo
"Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman's 26 year old son recently shared a rare picture on instagram of him holding a big fish he caught while fishing in Costa Rica."
“… Life... "
"A very famous actor and director in this industry gave me very bad advice, which helped me a lot, because I just read more about Tom Cruise's son, Connor, who posted his own rare photos on instagram. Connor Kidman cruise rarely saw him..."
"Now, the 36 year old actress and director is explaining the policy and revealing to the outside world what prompted her to adopt it in her film set."
“… There was no policy he violated... "
"A few hours ago, Haley Hyde read more and Olivia Wilde explained her ban policy on the set. As you may remember, Olivia Wilde fired Shiite rabov from the movie "don't worry, honey" last year, when there were several reports that she had a... "
"When Haley arrived at the restaurant, she was wearing a black mask and was safe."



Number  958
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There never has and never will be another Hugh M. Hefner.”READ THE FULL STATEMENT HERE”
“He was a beacon to the world, a force unlike anything else.”
“The 31-year-old spoke to People magazine exclusively calling the late 91-year-old an “American hero.”“I haven’t been able to bring myself to write most people back to thank them for their condolences.”
“I am heartbroken.”
“I am still in disbelief,” Crystal said.”
““We laid him to rest Saturday.”
“He is in the place he was always certain he wanted to spend eternity.”Hefner died of natural causes at his home surrounded by family on Wednesday night.”
“He was laid to rest at the Westwood Village Memorial Park Cemetery, right next to Marilyn Monroe's burial spot which he bought in 1992 for $75k.”
““He was an American hero.”
“A pioneer.”


"There has never been, and will never be, another Hugh M. Hefner." Please read the full statement here
"He is the Lighthouse of the world, a power different from others."
In an exclusive interview with people magazine, the 31 year old called the 91 year old an "American hero" and "I haven't had time to write back to most people to thank them for their sympathy."
"I'm sad."
"I still don't believe it," Christo said
"We'll give him a rest on Saturday."
"He's in a place and he's always sure he wants to spend eternity." Hefner died of natural causes and was surrounded by his family at his home on Wednesday night
He was buried at Westwood village Memorial Park Cemetery, next to Marilyn Monroe's cemetery, which he bought for $75000 in 1992
"He's an American hero."
"Pioneers."



Number  959
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“WATCH: Inside 'Bachelor in Paradise' Fallout After Incident Between Corinne Olympios and DeMario JacksonStanton was criticized by some for deciding to go back on Bachelor in Paradise, and the 27-year-old reality star defended her decision to join the show.”
“The Bachelor in Paradise alum penned an heated message which she shared to her Instagram story on Monday, responding to haters who accused her of being neglectful of her two daughters -- 4-year-old Kinsey and 3-year-old Charlie.”
“"I don’t normally like to address the trolls / mom shamers … but it’s so out of control!"”
“Stanton, also a popular blogger, wrote.”
“"I’d like to take a moment to clarify first of all that my kids DO have a father that is a part of their life."”
“WATCH: 'Bachelor in Paradise' Star Amanda Stanton on Josh Murray Reconciliation: 'I've Closed That Chapter'"They spend time with him too.”
“So if you see a photo of me without my kids one weekend and comment something like 'mother of the year' or 'wow shouldn't she be with her kids?'”
“Well, there’s a VERY good chance that I can’t be with them because they’re with their dad."”
“Stanton shares her daughters with ex-husband Nick Buonfiglio.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Watch: after the incident between Corinne Olympus and demario Jackson Stanton, the internal aftermath of" Bachelor in heaven "has been criticized by some people for her decision to return to" Bachelor in heaven ", and the 27 year old reality star defended her decision to join the show."
The alumnus of the "Bachelor of paradise" posted a fierce message on instagram on Monday in response to haters who accused her of neglecting her two daughters, Kinsey, 4, and Charlie, 3
"I don't usually like to talk to trolls / moms humiliating people But it's out of control! "
Stanton is also a popular blogger, he wrote
"I want to take a moment to clarify that my children do have a father, which is part of their lives."
"Look: 'Bachelor in heaven' starring Amanda Stanton and Josh Murray reconciliation: 'I've finished that chapter'" they also spent time with him
"So if you look at a picture of me having no children on a weekend and say, 'mother of the year' or 'Wow, shouldn't she be with the children?'"
"Well, I probably can't be with them because they're with their dad."
"Stanton shares her daughter with her ex husband Nick buenfio."



Number  960
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Yes, he includes the roses.”
“They were even smooching in an outtake from that Rolling Stone photoshoot held from the magazine (I wonder why!”
“This post won’t contain many spoilers for their interaction; instead, it dives into a fairly compelling theory that book readers have been working on for decades.”
“But just in case you’d prefer not to read all about it until after you’ve watched Season 7, Episode 3, “The Queen’s Justice,” now is your time to duck out.”
“First of all, it should shock no one watching Game of Thrones that at some point in the series, the two most telegenic and destiny-laden characters on the series would meet up.”
“Readers have long suspected that George R.R.”
“Martin’s series title, A Song of Ice and Fire, is a reference to the pre-destined adventures of Jon (Ice) and Daenerys (Fire).”
“But that’s not what we’re here to talk about.”
“We’re also not here to talk about the deeply held suspicion that these two characters will become romantically involved.”
“Even if the rules of dramatic storytelling didn t automatically destine two young compelling eligible people for a love match Emilia Clarke and Kit Harington have been fanning the flames in a series of promotional photo shoots from a 2012 Rolling Stone photoshoot for Season 2 to one in costume...”


"Yes, he includes roses."
"They even kiss in the takeout of the picture taken by Rolling Stone magazine (I wonder why!"
"This article won't contain too many saboteurs about their interaction; instead, it has infiltrated into a fairly convincing theory that readers have been studying for decades."
"But if you don't want to read the whole book before you read the third episode of the seventh season, the Queen's justice, it's time for you to avoid it."
"First of all, at some point in the drama, the two most TV and fateful characters will meet, which should not shock anyone who watches game of Thrones."
"Readers have long suspected George R.R."
"Martin's series songs of ice and fire is a reference to the adventures Jon (ice) and Denise (fire) are destined to experience."
"But that's not what we're talking about."
"We're not here to talk about people's deep doubts that these two characters will fall into romance."
"Even if the rules of drama story don't automatically determine two young people who are eligible to participate in the love competition, Amelia Clark and kit Harrington also stir up the flames in a series of publicity photos, from a photo of rolling stone Season 2 in 2012 to a photo in costume..."



Number  961
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“Recently, the actress told Hidden Remote that Connie, her character on the show, wasn’t supposed to be a series regular initially.”
“Throughout her career, Brown also appeared in a number of other TV shows and films, including Shameless and Empire.”
“She appeared on that show from 2005 to 2007.”
“Brown had a similar experience during her 13-episode stint on AMC’s Prison Break, where her character, initially just called “Nurse,” developed into a larger role, later named Katie Welch.”
““They’ve done this beautiful dance with Connie where you see her soft moments, you see how she cares about the kids in the firehouse,” Brown said.”
“The character then became more complex and served as sort of a mother figure, Brown said.”
“When auditioning for the role, she said, she realized the “one-liner” role could develop into something more.”
““I’m not on set every day, but people are always asking me about my kid and how my day is going and they are all so very sweet and kind,” she said.”
“Growing up, Brown attended Whitney Young Magnet High School in Chicago and graduated from the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign with a degree in psychology.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"Recently, the actress told hidden remote that her character, Connie, should not have been a regular in a series at first."
"Throughout his career, Brown has appeared in other TV series and movies, including shameless and Empire
"She was on that show from 2005 to 2007."
"Brown had a similar experience in AMC's prison break 13 episodes. Her role was initially called" nurse ", but later developed into a larger role, later called Katie Welch."
"They had a beautiful dance with Connie, you can see her gentle moments, you can see how much she cares about the children of the fire brigade," Brown said
"The character became more complicated later, a little bit like a mother," Brown said
She said that when she auditioned for the role, she realized that the role of "Yixing" could develop into more roles
"I'm not on set every day, but people always ask me about my children and how my day was, and they're very kind," she said
Brown studied at Whitney permanent magnet high school in Chicago and graduated from the University of Illinois at Urbana Champaign with a degree in psychology



Number  962
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Swift let the media do the heavy lifting here, while she sat back and watched the world eat up whatever she shared.”
“...of the largest of all time...”
“One might assume that the country-turned-pop singer would be frantically bouncing from event to event and media appearance to media appearance, as is the case with most artists ahead of a big release.”
“But Swift has taken the opposite approach, and she’s been surprisingly quiet.”
“Since first kicking off this latest era of her career in late August, Swift has been nearly silent when it comes to the media.”
“She hasn t done interviews she hasn t appeared on any late night programs she hasn t showed up on Good Morning America or its competitors and she hasn t even stolen the show at any recent award shows to showcase her latest singles though she is slated to be...”
“...the musical guest on Saturday Night Live tomorrow...”
“Almost every other musician would have their team working on overdrive to snag them every opportunity possible.”
“It’s well known that the weeks before a record is finally unleashed and the few days following are some of the most important in the entire campaign.”
“Instead of covering magazines and giving exclusive televised on-camera interviews, Swift has kept her outreach limited to her social media channels, where she is the queen, and where everything she says is the gospel truth.”


"Swift let the media do the heavy load here, and she sat behind, watching the world eat everything she shared."
“… The biggest... "
"One might think that the country singer is going to be frantically jumping from one event to another, from one media appearance to another, just like most artists were before the big release."
"But swift did the opposite. She was surprisingly silent."
"Since late August, when swift first opened the new era of her career, she has been almost silent in the face of the media."
"She has not been interviewed, nor has she appeared on any late night show, nor has she appeared on" Good Morning America "or its competitors' shows, nor has she even stolen a show to show her latest single at any recent awards ceremony, even though she has been rated as..."
“… The music guests on Saturday night will live tomorrow... "
"Almost all other musicians will let their team work on overdrive and take every opportunity they can."
"As we all know, the weeks before and the days after a record is finally released are the most important days in the whole campaign."
"Swift didn't cover magazines or give exclusive TV interviews. Instead, she limited her publicity to social media channels. She is the queen and everything she says is gospel truth."



Number  963
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““You touched so many lives, maybe even more than you realized.”If you or anyone you know is experiencing suicidal thoughts, call the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline at 1-800-273-8255 to be connected to a local crisis center for confidential emotional support.”
“The shockwaves of grief and denial are still sweeping through our family as we come to grips with what has happened,” they wrote, addressing a letter to Chester.”
““Our hearts are broken.”
““Whether you’re a fan or an artist, take a moment to appreciate what you’ve got and make Chester proud.”Following his passing, the band posted a heartfelt message on their website.”
““We want to dedicate this award to him, to his memory, to his talent, to his sense of humor, to his joy,” Shinoda, 40, said alongside Brad Delson and Rob Bourdon.”
“Bennington, who was open about his battle with depression, committed suicide on July 20.”
“He then added that members of both bands had reached out following the death of their lead singer, Chester Bennington.”
““They didn’t know we were gonna be here you guys … but we’re here,” Linkin Park cofounder Mike Shinoda said while accepting the award, thanking nominees Imagine Dragons and twenty one pilots.”
“When Mark Cuban announced that they had won the AMA for Favorite Alternative Rock Artist on Sunday, November 19, he thought that they weren’t in attendance — until they made their way to the stage.”
“Linkin Park surprised everyone at the American Music Awards.”


"You touch so many lives, maybe more than you realize." If you or anyone you know have suicidal thoughts, please call the national suicide prevention lifeline at 1-800-273-8255 to contact your local crisis center for confidential emotional support
In a letter to Chester, they wrote: "as we deal with what happened, the shock waves of sadness and denial are still sweeping through our families."
"Our hearts are broken."
"Whether you're a fan or an artist, take the time to appreciate what you have and make Chester proud." After Chester died, the band posted a heartfelt message on its website
"We want to dedicate this award to him, to his memory, to his talent, to his sense of humor, to his happiness," said the 40 year old, along with Brad derson and rob Borden
Bennington made public his fight against depression, and he committed suicide on July 20
He went on to say that after the death of Chester Bennington, the band's lead singer, members of both bands reached out to help
"They didn't know we were going to be here, you But we're here, "Lincoln Park co-founder Mike hinoda said as he received the award, thanking the nominees and the 21 pilots
"When Mark Kuban announced that they won the most popular alternative rock artist award from the American Music Association (AMA) on November 19 (Sunday), he thought they didn't show up - until they came on stage."
"Lincoln Park surprised everyone at the American Music Awards."



Number  964
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 10-part series follows the planning and events leading up to the couple's nuptials.”
“Me & my husbandddddddddddddd A post shared by Keyshia Ka'oir Davis (@keyshiakaoir) on Oct 17, 2017 at 9:48pm PDTGucci Mane and Ka'oir filmed their wedding for the BET special Gucci Mane and Keyshia Ka'oir: The Mane Event, which premiered Tuesday.”
“File Photo by Christine Chew/UPI | License PhotoGucci Mane (L) and Keyshia Ka'oir tied the knot Tuesday at the Four Seasons in Miami, Fla.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoOct. 18 (UPI) -- Gucci Mane married fiancée Keyshia Ka'oir at a lavish wedding Tuesday in Miami.”
“The 37-year-old rapper, born Radric Davis, tied the knot with Ka'oir at a $1.7 million ceremony at the Four Seasons, according to People.”
“AdvertisementSean "Diddy" Combs, Karrueche Tran, Big Sean and Kim Zolciak were among the celebrity guests.”
“Diddy offered his congratulations to Gucci Mane and Ka'oir in an Instagram post Tuesday night.”
“"Congrats to @laflare1017 @keyshiakaoir!!”
“God bless your unity, your family, your friends and your whole world!!”
“May it be positive and elevated at the highest form of positivity and elevation!!"”


"This 10 part series tells about the couple's plans and activities before their wedding."
"My husband and I shared a post with keyshia ka'oir Davis (@ keyshia kaoir) at 9:48 pm on October 17, 2017. Gucci mane and ka'oir are the special versions of gucci mane and keyshia ka'oir premiered on Tuesday oir:the Mane The event filmed their wedding. "
Gucci MANET (left) and cassia cahor married at the four seasons hotel in Miami, Florida, on Tuesday
"Information photo of Jim ruymen / UPI | license photooct. Gucci MANET married his fiancee, cassia cahor, in Miami on the 18th
The 37 year old rapper, born in radric Davis, married ka'oir at a $1.7 million wedding at four seasons, according to people familiar with the matter
Advertising Sean Dee cooms, karuche Trane, big Sean and Kim zorchak are all star guests
"Didi congratulated Gucci Manet and cahor in his instagram post on Tuesday night."
"Congratulations@ laflare1017@keyshiakaoir ！！”
"God bless your unity, your family, your friends and your whole world!"
"May it be positive, in the highest form of positive and sublime!"



Number  965
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...need a moment Also Read Steve Harvey to Flint Man Enjoy Your Nice Brown Glass of Water I thought it was cute you all didn t he added to reporters...”
“I m not really a mean spirited guy at all I m really a congenial guy He likened his sentiment to when you go home every day and all your kids is in the kitchen waiting on you you just...”
““The email was out there — it wasn’t that big a deal to me.”
“This Prison Anymore I was OK until I saw it on CNN and that s when I knew I was in a lot of trouble the Family Feud host continued...”
“It was something I wrote a year ago and somebody didn t get a job coming to L A and they got pissed Also Read Steve Harvey Not Sorry for Staff Memo I Just Didn t Want to Be in...”
““Number one, I can’t write, and I should never write.”
““That email, I learned two things from that email,” Harvey said at the press event with a laugh.”
“...his daytime talk show to stop ambushing him and that they will be removed if they open the door to his dressing room...”
“The talk show host spoke to reporters at the Television Critics Association s summer press tour on Thursday to promote his new daytime show Steve During the event he was asked about the memo in which he told employees on...”
“Steve Harvey has a lot to say about the leaked email to his staff that went viral earlier this year.”


“… It takes a little time also to read Steve Harvey about flint people enjoying your beautiful brown water. I think it's cute that you don't even have it, "he added
"I'm not stingy at all. I'm really like-minded. He compares his feelings to that when you go home every day and all your children are waiting for you in the kitchen, you just..."
"The mail is out there - it's no big deal to me."
"I've always been very good at this prison until I saw it on CNN. At that time, I knew I had a lot of trouble. The host of family discord continued to..."
"This is what I wrote a year ago. Some people came to Los Angeles and couldn't find a job. They were very angry and read that Steve Harvey didn't feel sorry for the employee memo I didn't want to attend..."
"First, I can't write. I shouldn't write."
"That email taught me two things," Harvey said with a smile at the press conference
“…… His daytime talk show called for an end to the ambush. If they open the door of his dressing room, they will be taken away... "
"The talk show host was interviewed by reporters during the TV Review Association's summer reporter tour on Thursday to promote his new Japanese show" Steve. ". During the event, he was asked about the memo, in which he told the staff
"Steve Harvey has a lot to say about the email leaked to employees that circulated earlier this year."



Number  966
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“According to ET Online, the couple married yesterday in front of family and friends at Paltrow's Hamptons home.”
“The guest list was predictably star studded, with celebs like Robert Downey Jr., Jerry Seinfeld, Cameron Diaz, and Benji Madden in attendance.”
“The wedding was dreamt up by Paltrow and made special due to new renovations in her home.”
“"They have been planning this wedding all year," a source said.”
“"Gwyneth pays attention to every details so we are all set for a fairytale wedding."”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“It's understandable that Paltrow wanted to get the details right.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
The couple married yesterday in front of family and friends at their home in Paltrow Hampton, et reported online
"Predictably, the guest list was packed with stars, including Robert Downey Jr., Jerry Seinfeld, Cameron Diaz and Benji Madden."
"The wedding was designed by Paltrow. It's special because of the new decoration of her home."
"They've been planning this wedding all year," a source said
"Gwyneth pays attention to every detail, so we are all ready for a fairy tale wedding."
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"It's understandable that Paltrow wants to get the details right."



Number  967
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share Share Tweet EmailWhy Batman Talks With a Raspy Voice - and When He Startedadvertising...”
“Stefan Kapičić as Colossus Zazie Beetz as Domino and Josh Brolin as Cable...”
“...advertising Debuting on May 18 Deadpool 2 is directed by David Letch and stars Ryan Reynolds as the titular Deadpool Morena Baccarin as Vanessa T J Miller as Weasel Leslie Uggams as Blind Al Brianna Hildebrand as Negasonic Teenage Warhead...”
“He praised Connor's Deadpool-ian sense of humor, as well as the Make-A-Wish Foundation for allowing their meeting to happen.”
“...cancer...”
“RELATED Deadpool Valentine s Day Cards Are a Crisp High Five Reynolds posted a similar tribute two years ago during the filming of the first Deadpool to a young fan named Connor who sadly didn t survive his battle with...”
“The character gains his regenerative abilities after undergoing desperate means to cure his own cancer.”
“While gleefully violent and profane, Deadpool also serves as an especially empathetic hero to those with caner.”
“...advertisingReynolds goes on to praise organizations like the Make-A-Wish Foundation for allowing the dreams of both kids affected by terminal illness and their parents to come true.”
“The photos feature Reynolds with young, heroic fans on set and in some cases with weaponry crafted by Deadpool Prop Master Dan Sissions (the "not stabby-stabby versions," Reynolds assures).”


"Share twitter email why Batman has a harsh voice - when he starts advertising..."
"Stefan kapidge as giant, Zazi Bates as dominoes, Josh Brolin as cable TV..."
“…… On May 18, the premiere of "pool of death 2" was directed by David rich, with Ryan Reynolds as the nominal pool of death, Morena bakarin, Vanessa t
He praised Connor for his sense of humor and the wish foundation for allowing them to meet
“… Cancer... "
"The Valentine's Day card related to the pool of death is a crisp high five. Reynolds posted a similar Memorial two years ago in filming the first pool of death, a young fan named Connor who unfortunately did not survive with..."
"The character gained the ability to regenerate after experiencing the desperate situation of curing his own cancer."
"The pool of death, though full of violence and blasphemy, is a particularly compassionate hero for those with cancer."
“…… "Reynolds continues to praise organizations like the wish foundation for making the dreams of terminally ill children and their parents come true."
"Reynolds is on set with young, heroic fans, and in some cases, the weapon in the picture is carefully crafted by Dan sissins, the master of the pool of death props (Reynolds believes it's a" non assassin version ")



Number  968
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Dateline special, "Bringing Down Bill Cosby: Andrea Constand Speaks,” which also includes interviews with four other Cosby accusers, will air Friday.”
“Kick.”
“Speaking publicly for the first time outside of a courtroom, Andrea Constand shared details about the night Cosby assaulted her during an exclusive interview with NBC’s Kate Snow for a special edition of "Dateline."”
“The events of that one night led a Pennsylvania jury to find Cosby, 80, guilty of three counts of aggravated indecent assault.”
“Constand was operations manager for Temple University women’s basketball program in 2004 when Cosby, a famous Temple alumni and supporter, invited her to his home.”
“Constand had been contemplating a career change and Cosby, who had been mentoring her for months, said he wanted to discuss her plans.”
“Constant said Cosby offered her something to help her relax that night.”
““Three blue pills.”
“And he put his hand out and I said, ‘What are those?’ And he said, ‘They'll help you relax,'" she recalled.”
“"And I said, ‘Are they natural?”


The daily feature of "bringing down Bill Cosby: Andrea konstand's speech," which will air on Friday, also includes interviews with four other Cosby plaintiffs
"Kick."
Andrea constand, speaking out of court for the first time, shared details of the night Cosby attacked her in an exclusive interview with NBC's Kate snow on "dateline."
"What happened that night led to a Pennsylvania jury finding 80 year old Cosby guilty of three counts of gross indecency."
In 2004, konstande was the operation manager of women's basketball program at Temple University. At that time, famous alumni and supporter Cosby of Temple University invited her home
"Konstand has been thinking about changing jobs and has been guiding her for months. Kosby said he wants to discuss her plans."
"Konstant said Cosby gave her something that night to help her relax."
"Three blue pills."
He reached out and I said, what is that? "He said, 'they'll help you relax,'" she recalled
"I said, are they natural?"



Number  969
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I would have loved to have had them there.”Because some important people weren’t able to fly to Indonesia, a source dished to Us Weekly that Jenner and Carter are planning to host a second wedding celebration when they get back to Los Angeles after their honeymoon.”
“Well, they’ll be missed.”
“The 34-year-old television personality tied the knot with his longtime fiancée Kaitlynn Carter on Saturday.”
“Jenner and Carter’s wedding took place on the exotic island of Nihi Sumba in Indonesia.”
“The oceanside ceremony was joined by 50 of the bride and groom’s family and friends, according to People.”
“The couple exchanged their wedding vows in front of Jenner’s brother Brandon and mother Linda Thompson.”
“Meanwhile, the “I Am Cait” star wasn’t able to attend her son’s big day because she chose to fly to Vienna, Austria to attend the Life Ball fundraising event.”
“Jenner and Carter’s wedding was the culmination of the four-day festivities on the island, which included horse races on the beach and a white party where the couple and their guests danced the night away.”
““We’re just excited to celebrate spending the rest of our lives together,” Jenner said days prior the ceremony.”
““I can’t wait to marry Kaitlynn.”It wasn’t clear how much Jenner spent for the four-day affair, but Page Six has learned that he is shelling out $6,000 per night on the suite where he and Carter are spending their honeymoon.”


"I really want them to go there." Because some important people can't fly to Indonesia, a source told us weekly that Jenna and Carter plan to hold a second wedding celebration when they return to Los Angeles after their honeymoon
"Well, they'll miss it."
"The 34 year old TV celebrity married his fiancee Caitlin Carter on Saturday."
"Jenna and Carter's wedding was held in Indonesia's exotic island of nishisamba."
According to people familiar with the matter, 50 family members and friends of the bride and groom attended the seaside wedding
"The couple exchanged vows in front of Jenna's brother Brandon and mother Linda Thompson."
At the same time, the "I am Cain" star failed to attend her son's big day because she chose to fly to Vienna, Austria, to participate in the "ball of life" fund-raising activities
Jenna and Carter's wedding was the culmination of a four-day celebration on the island, which included horse racing on the beach and a white party where the couple danced all night with their guests
"We are very happy to celebrate the rest of our lives together," Jenner said a few days before the wedding
"I can't wait to marry Caitlin." It's not clear how much money Jenner spent on the four-day affair, but page 6 tells us that he spent $6000 a night in his suite with Carter on his honeymoon



Number  970
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But in my mind I knew the behavior wasn’t right.”Image zoom Jennifer Lopez | Credit: Mariano VivancoAnd after thriving for decades in a difficult industry, the star says she has no plans to slow down.”
“It was one of my first movies.”
“This man is hiring me!”
“I remember my heart beating out of my chest, thinking, ‘What did I do?”
““When I did speak up, I was terrified.”
“No, I did not,” she said.”
“...off my shirt and show my boobs But did I do it...”
“And that affects every dynamic in your life from your family to your work to your relationships Image zoom Jennifer Lopez Credit Mariano Vivanco The singer also got candid about her own uncomfortable experiences in Hollywood revealing she was asked early on in her career by a director to take...”
“We both entered the public eye in our early 20s and overachieved right from the start.”
““We understand each other’s lives in a way that most other people couldn’t.”


"But in my opinion, I know it's wrong." Photo by Jennifer Lopez Mariano vivancoon, who has been in a tough business for decades, says she doesn't plan to slow down
"This is my first movie."
"This man is hiring me!"
"I remember my heart beating in my chest and thinking," what have I done? "
"When I said it, I was scared."
"No, I didn't," she said
“… Take off my shirt and show my chest, but I did it... "
"It affects every dynamic in your life, from your family to your work to your interpersonal relationship. The singer, Mariano vivanko, also tells frankly about her own uncomfortable experience in Hollywood, revealing that she was invited to shoot by a director in the early stage of her career..."
"We all came into the public eye in our early 20s and made remarkable achievements from the very beginning."
"Our understanding of each other's lives is beyond most people's understanding."



Number  971
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now, if you’ll excuse us, we’ll be heading to the drugstore ASAP.”
““It has dual purposes.”Why not use a regular hair mask?”
“The 37-year-old actrss’s locks are coveted by legions of beauty lovers, who are dying to know the secrets behind her perpetually shiny tresses.”
“Well, thanks to the “X-Men” star’s colorist, Cassondra Kaeding, we might be a little closer to achieving Olivia Munn-level hair.”
“In an interview with E!”
“News, Kaeding—who has also worked with celebrity clients like Rosie Huntington-Whitely, Lea Michele, and Kate Hudson—revealed that her best-kept secret for healthy, shiny locks isn’t a fancy-pants hair mask—it’s a $6 conditioner that can be found in most drugstores.”
“The colorist touts Dove’s coconut oil-packed Color Care Conditioner, which she uses as a D.I.Y.”
“...hair mask on Munn and other celebrities, for its dual purpose of hydrating hair and extending the life of color-treated locks.”
““The [Dove Color Care Conditioner] has coconut oil, so you can use it as a hair mask,” she said.”
“Kaeding actually warns against them.”


"Now, if you don't mind, we'll go to the drugstore right away."
"It has a dual purpose." Why not use the ordinary hair mask? "
"The 37 year old actress's hair is coveted by many beauty lovers who are eager to know the secret behind her ever shining hair."
"Well, thanks to Cassandra Cardin, the X-Men star's colorist, we may be a little closer to Olivia Munn's hair level."
"Accepting e!"
According to news reports, kaiding has also worked with celebrity clients such as Rosie Huntington Whiteley, Leah Michel and Kate Hudson. She revealed that her best secret to healthy and beautiful hair is not a fancy pants mask, but a $6 conditioner, which can be found in most pharmacies
"This colorist sells color care conditioner packaged in Dorf's coconut oil, and she uses it for d.i.y."
“…… Munn and other celebrities' hair care films have dual functions of moistening hair and prolonging the life of colorful hair. "
"It contains coconut oil, so you can use it as a conditioner," she said
"Cardin is actually warning them."



Number  972
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The first, “Man in the High Castle,” was renewed for a third season.”
“This is the second Dick property to land with a premiere on Amazon Prime.”
““Electric Dreams” will air later this year in the U.K. on Channel 4 before being available on Amazon Prime.”
“Manager and Dee Rees Mudbound...”
“Also Read Jill Soloway Says I Love Dick Is the Show for Women Filled With Rage Other writers signed on include Ronald D Moore Battlestar Galactica Michael Dinner Justified Tony Grisoni Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas Jack Thorne National Treasure Matthew Graham Life on Mars David Farr The Night...”
“Bryan Cranston, who is an executive producer on the series, also stars.”
“The series has cast a number of big-name actors for its other installments, including Steve Buscemi, Greg Kinnear, Anna Paquin, Terrence Howard, Richard Madde and Vera Farmiga.”
“Travis Beacham, co-writer of “Pacific Rim,” will write the episode and Peter Horton (“Grey’s Anatomy”) will direct.”
“Sony also announced that Jay Paulson (“Mad Men”) and David Lyons (“Revolution”) will appear in the episode, but didn’t disclose their parts.”
“Temple, who recently appeared on “Vinyl,” will play Emily, one of the rebels.”


"The first season is the man in the castle, and the third season is the sequel."
"This is the second Dick real estate to make its debut on Amazon Prime."
"E-dream" will be broadcast on Channel 4 in the UK later this year and then released on Amazon Prime.
"The manager and Derris are confused..."
"Also read Jill soloway's show that I love dick for angry women. Other contract writers, including Ronald D. Moore, Battlestar Galactica Michael Dina, proved Tony grissoni's fear and disgust in Las Vegas, Jack Thorne's national treasure Matthew Graham's life on Mars, and David Farr's night..."
"Bryan Cranston is the executive producer of the series, and he's also in the film."
"The series has a lot of big names in other films, including Steve bussemie, Greg Kinnier, Anna Paquin, Terence Howard, Richard Mulder and Vera famiga."
Travis Beecham, co-author of the Pacific Rim, will write the episode and Peter Horton (Gray's anatomy) will direct it
Sony also announced that Jay Paulson and David Lyons will play in the episode, but did not disclose their roles
"Temple recently appeared in black glue and will play Emily, one of the rebels."



Number  973
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Late Late Show Carpool Karaoke Primetime Special 2017 airs Monday, May 22, at 10 p.m. ET/PT on CBS.”
“Corden, who opened this year's Grammy Awards with a rap number, is set to kickoff the primetime event with a special musical performance and share some of his favorite moments as host of his CBS late-night show.”
“This will be Perry's first time participating in the sketch, while Lopez will be taking a "Toddlerography" dance lesson with Corden.”
“The special, which drew a 0.9 rating among adults 18-49 in live numbers, won an Emmy for outstanding variety special.”
“This marks the second time Lopez will be lending her star-power to the primetime event, as she appeared in the inaugural Carpool Karaoke Primetime Special in 2016.”
“The CBS event is the second primetime special spawned from Corden's popular Late Late Show segment.”
“Katy Perry and Jennifer Lopez are tuning up for James Corden's upcoming primetime special of "Carpool Karaoke."”


"CBS broadcast" carpooling karaoke prime time special "on Monday, may 22, 2017, at 10 p.m. est
Colden, who started this year's Grammy Awards with rap music, will kick off the event with a special musical performance and share some of his favorite moments as the host of his CBS Evening Show
"It's going to be Perry's first time to sketch, and Lopez is going to have a dance class on" baby Craftsmanship "with Corden."
The special won a live broadcast score of 0.9 among adults aged 18-49 and an Emmy Award for outstanding variety show
"This marks the second time that Lopez will lend her star power to prime time events, as she appeared on the first carpool karaoke prime time special in 2016."
"CBS's event is the second prime time special to spawn Corden's popular post show segment."
Katie Perry and Jennifer Lopez are preparing for James Corden's upcoming golden time special "carpool karaoke."



Number  974
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Moving on Sources have claimed Kourtney is determined to draw a line under her relationship with her ex after becoming sick of mothering him The insider also said that any chance of a romance between them is over and that Kourtney is determined to move on with her life on...”
“According to TMZ, sources say the 38-year-old is 'done treating Scott like a baby' and 'worrying how he'll react to her every move'.”
“At the time, rumours had been doing the rounds that he and Kourtney were rekindling their romance - they had initially split in 2015.”
“...they had taken to Costa Rica at the beginning of the year...”
“I m a f ked up horrible sex addict Scott acknowledged he has an addiction to sex in a heated exchange with ex Kourtney Kardashian during Sunday night s episode of KUWTK The group had been discussing Scott s decision to bring another woman with him on a family holiday...”
“In a candid chat with his ex, her mother Kris Jenner and sisters Khloe Kardashian and Kim Kardashian-West, Scott acknowledged his issues and admitted he is addicted to sex.”
“The reality star branded Scott 'disrespectful' as he confessed to Kourtney, 38, and her family that he is a 'horrible sex addict'.”
“...together after slamming his womanising antics...”
“Layering up the model also donned an oversized denim jacket whilst she teetered along in suede heeled boots The outing came after Sunday s episode of Keeping Up With The Kardashians where Scott s ex Kourtney Kardashian told the father of her three children that they will never get back...”
“Ella was a vision of beauty as she sashayed out of the LA hotspotBoots made for partying!”


"According to sources, kurtney has decided to draw a clear line between her and her ex girlfriend because she is tired of taking care of him. People familiar with the matter also said that any romantic opportunity between them has passed, and kurtni is determined to continue her life.... "
"According to TMZ, the 38 year old girl no longer treats Scott like a baby," worrying about how he will react to her every move. "
"At the time, there were rumors that he and kurtney were rekindling their relationship - they first broke up in 2015."
“…… They went to Costa Rica at the beginning of the year... "
"I'm a crazy, scary sex addict, and Scott admits that he's addicted to sex, and in the kuwtk series on Sunday night, he had a heated conversation with the former Kourtney Kardashian. The crew has been discussing Scott's decision to take another woman on a family holiday... "
"In a frank conversation with his ex girlfriend, her mother Chris Jenner, sisters Chloe Kardashian and Kim Kardashian West, Scott admitted his problem and admitted that he was addicted to sex."
"The reality star labeled Scott" rude "because he admitted to Courtney, 38, and her family that he was a" terrible sex addict. "
“… After criticizing his womanliness
"The model was wearing an oversized denim jacket and faltering in suede boots. This trip is after "follow Kardashian" on Sunday. Scott's former Courtney Kardashian told her father of three that they would never come back... "
"Ella stood out from the Tottenham boots for the party. She saw a beautiful scene!"



Number  975
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Shot entirely in Cambodia and in the Khmer language the film a Netflix original is the largest production the country has witnessed since the war and according to the reports of several Cambodians who ve seen it it s one of the most revelatory pieces of art about that chapter...”
“Jolie has directed a moving, large-scale adaptation of First They Killed My Father, Loung Ung’s 2000 memoir of the Khmer Rouge genocide, in which Ung’s parents and two of her siblings perished, along with an estimated two million other Cambodians, a quarter of the country’s population.”
“Shiloh, who likes to dress like a boy, is wearing a camouflage jacket, long shorts, and heavy black sneakers, despite the blazing heat.”
“We step outside and there’s Shiloh, 11, and Knox, 9, hanging out.”
“She actually said to me the other day, ‘Mom, I can taste my blanket.’ ‘That, honey, is a sign that it really, really needs to be washed.’ ”Jolie tidies up Vivienne’s things and promptly spills her entire mug of tea all over the counter.”
“She is very into her blanket, and she gets very mad if you wash her blanket.”
“Jolie picks up a small piece of a blanket, shredded to death, and explains, laughing, “She has 32 blankets.”
“She dumps her stuff on the counter and goes out to play with her friend.”
“I ask the girl if she’s called “Viv” or “Vivienne.” “Either one!” she says with a smile.”
“Jolie envelops her in her arms.”


"The film was completely shot in Cambodia and written in Khmer. It is the largest work of the country since the war. According to several Cambodians who have seen the film, it is one of the most enlightening works of art in this chapter..."
"Julie directed a moving and large-scale adaptation of first they killed my father, a memoir of Loong's Khmer Rouge massacre in 2000, in which ung's parents and two brothers and sisters, as well as other 2 million Cambodians, who are estimated to account for one fourth of Cambodia's population, were killed."
"Shiloh likes to dress like a boy. He wears a camouflage jacket, trousers and thick black sneakers in spite of the hot weather."
"We went outside and Shiloh, 11, and Knox, 9, were hanging out."
"The other day she really said to me," Mom, I can taste my blanket. " "Honey, this is a sign that it really, really needs washing." Julie arranged Vivian's things and quickly spilled her large cup of tea on the counter
"She likes her blanket very much. If you wash her blanket, she will be very angry."
Julie picked up a small torn blanket and explained with a smile, "she has 32 blankets."
"She dumped things on the counter and went out to play with her friends."
"I asked whether the girl's name was" Vivian "or" Vivian. "! "She said with a smile
"Julie held her in her arms."



Number  976
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The Puerto Rican singer and the "Gasolina" rapper took the stage at Madison Square Garden in New York City on Sunday to perform their smash hit and three-time GRAMMY-nominated single, "Despacito."”
“The duo was joined by vocalist and Miss Universe 2006 Zuleyka Rivera, who starred in the "Despacito" music video.”
“Fonsi had previously told ET during rehearsals that Justin Bieber was not going to perform with them.”
“Nonetheless, Fonsi and Daddy Yankee pulled off a showstopper of a performance that had stars like Chrissy Teigen, John Legend and Donnie Wahlberg dancing in their seats.”
“The "Despacito" remix became a worldwide phenomenon, spending 16 weeks at No.”
“1 on the Billboard Hot 100 and tying the all-time record for consecutive weeks on top.”
“"Despacito" was not only a commercial but also a critical success for the collaborators.”
“The track won four Latin GRAMMY Awards, including Record of the Year and Song of the Year, and is nominated for three GRAMMY Awards.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
The Puerto Rican singer and "Gasolina" rapper performed their hit three time Grammy nominated single "despacito" at Madison Square Garden in New York City on Sunday
The pair were joined by singer and Miss Universe 2006 zuleyka Rivera, who starred in the "despacito" music video
"Fonsey told et during rehearsal that Justin Bieber would not be performing with them."
"Even so, fancy and Yankee Dad took the lead in a performance with stars such as Chris tegan, John Legend and Donny wolberg dancing in their seats."
"Despacito" mixing has become a worldwide phenomenon, and it took 16 weeks to come first
"At the top of the list is the top 100, which tied the record for several weeks in a row."
"Despacito" is not only a commercial advertisement, but also a crucial success for partners
The song won four Latin Grammy Awards, including record of the year and song of the year, and was nominated for three Grammy Awards



Number  977
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Listen to the full remix below…”
“"I am donating my proceeds from this song to hurricane relief charities for Puerto Rico, Mexico and the other affected Caribbean islands,"she wrote on social media with a link to additional outreach efforts around the world.”
“19 Beyonce user he star power by sharing a remix to J Balvin and Willy William s smash hit Mi Gente She also announced that proceeds from the track would go towards ongoing relief efforts...”
“A post shared by Beyoncé beyonce on Sep 28 2017 at 6 09pm PDT To help benefit the relief efforts in Puerto Rico and the Caribbean Islands following Hurricane Maria as well as the areas in Mexico impacted by 7 1 earthquake that killed more than 325 people on September...”


"Listen to the full mix below..."
"I will donate the proceeds of this song to hurricane relief charities in Puerto Rico, Mexico and other affected Caribbean islands," she wrote on social media
"19 Beyonce users, his star power sharing Remix J Baldwin and Willie William's gripping megant, she also announced that the proceeds from the track will be used for ongoing relief work..."
"Beyonce shared a post at 6:09 p.m. Pacific Daylight Time on September 28, 2017 to help rescue efforts in Puerto Rico and the Caribbean islands after Hurricane Maria, as well as areas in Mexico affected by the magnitude 1 earthquake on September 7, which killed more than 325 people..."



Number  978
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The rest is still unwritten.”
“Montag never imagined that her feud with Conrad would last this long, especially after Pratt copped to stirring the pot.”
“During a recent episode of the podcast #NoFilter with Zack Peter (as per People), The Hills' star Heidi Montag discussed her relationship with Lauren Conrad in the wake of their age-old falling out.”
“Montag said she'd be down to reconcile, but fans probably shouldn't expect to see her and Conrad together any time soon.”
“When asked about her ex-best friend on the #NoFilter podcast, Montag admitted,"I’d be willing to move forward and put things behind us.”
“We would never be the way that we were again, but it would be fun to maybe catch up one day and be mature and be like, 'Hey that was crazy, I wish you the best,' type-of-thing.”
“But I don’t think she would be ever ready for that."”
“In case you need a refresher, the aforementioned friendship-ending drama occurred during Season 3 of The Hills in 2007.”
“There was a rumor floating around that Conrad and her then-boyfriend, Jason Wahler, had made a sex tape together, and Conrad accused Montag — "You know what you did!"”
“— of starting it.”


"The rest has not been written yet."
Montague never thought her feud with Conrad would last so long, especially after Pratt started mixing the pot
"In a recent podcast of nofilter with Zack Peter, hills star Heidi Montag discusses her relationship with Lauren Conrad after a long row."
"Montague said she would try to reconcile, but fans probably shouldn't expect to see her with Conrad soon."
"Asked about her former friends on the nofilter podcast, Montag admitted:" I'm willing to move forward and put things behind me. "
"We're not going to be like we used to be, but it's going to be fun if we can catch up and mature one day, things like 'Hey, that's crazy, I wish you all the best.'
"But I don't think she'll be ready."
"If you need to review, the friendship ending drama mentioned above took place in the third season of mountain in 2007."
"There's a rumor that Conrad and her then boyfriend Jason Waller made a sex video together, and Conrad accused Montague of -" you know what you did. "
"- the way to start it."



Number  979
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And knowing that I found that, I’m willing to face anything in life.””
““We went out together for about four years, and then once Jersey Shore started we decided to take a break throughout seasons 1-6,” he told PEOPLE earlier this year.”
“Mike Sorrentino married his longtime girlfriend Lauren Pesce on Thursday at The Legacy Castle in Pompton Plains, New Jersey, a source confirms to PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In attendance were the groom’s Jersey Shore castmates Deena Cortese and Angelina Pivarnick.”
“Image zoom Credit: Anthony SerrantonioThe nuptials come as the reality star prepares to begin his prison sentence on Jan. 15.”
“Sorrentino, 36, and his brother Marc were initially indicted in September 2014 for tax offenses and conspiring to defraud the United States after allegedly failing to properly pay taxes on $8.9 million in income from 2010 to 2012.”
“In April 2017, both men were indicted on additional charges including tax evasion, structuring and falsifying records.”
“In January, Sorrentino pled guilty to one count of tax evasion and was sentenced to eight months in prison on Oct. 5.”
“(His brother Marc pled guilty to one count of aiding in the preparation of a false and fraudulent tax return and was sentenced to two years in prison.)”


"Until I find out, I'm willing to face anything in my life."
"We went out together for about four years, and then once Jersey coast started, we decided to rest the whole season 1-6," he told people earlier this year
Michael Sorrentino married his girlfriend Lauren Pesce at legacy castle in pampton plains, New Jersey, on Thursday, a source confirmed to people magazine
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The groom's Jersey coast partners Dina Curtis and Angelina pivanik were also present."
"Image scaling credit: Anthony serantonio's wedding was held when the reality TV star was preparing to serve his sentence on January 15."
"Sorrentino, 36, and his brother Mark were initially charged in September 2014 with tax crimes and conspiracy to defraud the United States on suspicion of failing to pay taxes on $8.9 million of income from 2010 to 2012."
"In April 2017, both were charged with additional charges such as tax evasion and falsification of records."
In January, Sorrentino pleaded guilty to a tax evasion charge and was sentenced to eight months in prison on October 5
"His brother Mark pleaded guilty to a charge of assisting in the preparation of false and fraudulent tax returns and was sentenced to two years in prison."



Number  980
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“#venturafire pic.twitter.com/aLUJTSotqQ — Adrienne Maloof (@AdrienneMaloof) December 7, 2017For complete coverage of the wildfires, visit NBC Los Angeles.”
“My boys and I are safe and are taking ourselves and our animals to my mom’s house.”
“And the Skirball Fire, which started early Wednesday near Los Angeles' ritzy Bel Air neighborhood, has sent celebrities packing.”
“Paris Hilton decided to leave her home, she announced on Twitter, and she thanked the firefighters battling the blaze for "risking their lives to save ours."”
“"This wild fire in LA is terrifying!”
“My house is now being evacuated to get all of my pets out of there safely," Hilton wrote to her twitter followers.”
“"Thank you to all the firefighters who are risking their lives to save ours.”
“You are true heroes!"”
“She included with her post a widely shared video of flames burning early Wednesday morning just alongside the 405 freeway in Los Angeles.”
“A fire broke out in the Sepulveda Pass of the 405 freeway in Los Angeles.”


"Wen Qiu pulls fire pic.twitter.com/aLUJTSotqQ -Adrienne Maloof (@ Adrienne Maloof) December 7, 2017 for a full coverage of wildfires, visit NBC Los Angeles
"My children and I are safe, taking ourselves and our animals to my mother's house."
The skebel fire near Los Angeles's luxurious bellelle neighborhood earlier Wednesday has scared celebrities away
"Paris Hilton decided to leave home and tweeted her thanks to the firefighters for" risking their lives to save us. "
"Los Angeles wildfires are terrible!"
"My house has now been evacuated so that all my pets can leave safely," Hilton tweeted
"Thanks to all the firefighters who risked their lives to save us."
"You are real heroes!"
"She added a widely shared video to her post about the flames burning on the 405 freeway in Los Angeles early Wednesday morning."
"There's a fire on the Sepulveda aisle on the 405 freeway in Los Angeles."



Number  981
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Samantha said of her sister: “The Royal Family would be appalled by what she’s done to her own family.”However other members of Meghan Markle’s family do not agree with her sister.”
“Wheelchair-bound Samantha, 52, has branded her famous sister a “self-obsessed” social climber and claimed Meghan has not spoken to her since she was diagnosed with multiple sclerosis in 2008.”
“She will now release The Diary of Princess Pushy’s Sister, addressing her apparently fraught relationship with Meghan.”
“Prince Harry’s girlfriend’s paternal half-sister, Samantha, has made no secret of her contempt for the Suits star.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“Meghan Markle's family are furious with her sister Samantha over her plans for a tell-all bookWe will use your email address only for sending you newsletters.”


"The royal family will be shocked by what she has done to her family," Samantha said of her sister However, other members of Megan markel's family disagreed with her sister
Samantha, 52, in a wheelchair, called her famous sister a "self obsessed" social climber and said Megan had never spoken to her since she was diagnosed with multiple sclerosis in 2008
"She is now going to publish a diary of Princess pushy's sister about the apparent tension between her and Megan."
"Samantha, the half sister of Prince Harry's girlfriend, made no secret of her contempt for the star of the suit."
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"Megan markel's family is angry at her sister Samantha's plan to publish a tipper book. We will only use your email address to send you newsletters. "



Number  982
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ahead, check out 30 outfits and styling tips that will help you feel ready (or at least readier) to embrace fall.”
“The key to dressing for transitional weather is to mix your summer pieces with a few of your classic fall items, like a lightweight turtleneck, blanket scarf, booties and jacket.”
“Don’t get ahead of yourself and pack away your summer dresses and minis just yet, because we’re here to help you embrace this-so-called fifth season.”
“For the next few weeks, while we all patiently sip our basic-but-delicious PSLs and wait for true fall to arrive, dressing can be difficult.”
“So, how do you dress for that awkward transitional season, when jean shorts and white sundresses no longer cut it, but autumn hasn’t quite arrived?”
“Still—we’re also getting excited for fall trends and the end of hair-ruining heat and humidity.”
“(And with a forecast in the sunny 70s for New York Fashion Week, clearly we don’t need to yet.)”
“Labor Day may be over, and with it the endless-seeming summer days, but that doesn’t mean we’re quite ready to swaddle ourselves in 20 layers of cashmere, wool, and leather, either.”


"Next, take a look at 30 clothing and styling tips that will help you feel ready (or at least ready) for the fall."
"The key to dressing in transitional weather is to match your summer pieces with some classic autumn pieces, such as lightweight turtlenecks, blanket scarves, boots and jackets."
"Don't go too far now, pack your summer clothes and mini clothes, because we're here to help you embrace this so-called fifth season."
"In the next few weeks, as we all patiently SIP basic but delicious PSL, waiting for the real autumn to come, it can be difficult to dress."
"So, when denim shorts and white sun skirts are no longer popular, but autumn has not yet arrived, how do you face this awkward transitional season?"
"Still, we're excited about the fall trend and the end of the heat and humidity that's damaging hair."
"(and it's predicted that New York Fashion Week will be held in the sunny 1970s, obviously we don't need to do that yet.)
"Labor day may be over, followed by seemingly endless summer, but that doesn't mean we're ready to wrap ourselves in 20 layers of cashmere, wool and leather."



Number  983
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was the sixth installment of Housewives franchise the network developed, following Orange County, New York City, Atlanta, New Jersey and the now-cancelled D.C.”
““She’s a huge Housewives fan and watches all of the shows.”
“The 47-year-old actress confirmed her participation in the hit Bravo show’s upcoming ninth season exclusively to PEOPLE, saying “I am so excited to join the cast of [RHOBH] as I am a huge fan of the show.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I am looking forward to spending time with all the ladies… and hopefully meeting Boy George!”
“!” Richards added to PEOPLE, referencing Kemsley’s close friendship with the ’80s pop icon.”
“(Her husband, Paul, is Boy George’s manager.)”
“Image zoom Kyle Richards Teddi Mellencamp Arroyave Lisa Vanderpump Erika Girardi Dorit Kemsley and Lisa Rinna Credit Tommy Garcia Bravo PEOPLE first reported back in June that Richards was in talks to join the reality TV franchise a source said at the time that the deal was not final yet...”
“...but very close Everyone is really excited about the possibility of having her on board said the insider...”
“RELATED VIDEOS: The Most Shocking Moments from the Real HousewivesThe Wild Things star had been rumored to be in discussions with producers for years, but “the timing was never right,” a second source close to the show told PEOPLE.”
““Denise has been wanting to join the show for a long time,” the source explained.”


"This is the sixth phase of the development of the housewife franchise network, following Orange County, New York City, Atlanta, New Jersey and now Washington, D.C., which has been abolished."
"She's a big fan of housewives, watching all the shows."
The 47 year old actress confirmed that she will participate in the upcoming ninth season of the hit Bravo show, people, and said: "I'm very happy to join (RHOBH) because I'm a big fan of the show."
"I'm looking forward to being with all the ladies Hope to see George boy! "
"!" Richards added to the people, quoting camsley's intimate friendship with pop idols of the 1980s. "
Her husband Paul is the manager of the Boy George
"Picture zooming Kyle Richards Teddy merenkamp aroyaf Lisa van der Pol Erica Girardi dorit Kemsley and Lisa linner credit Tommy Garcia Bravo first reported in June that Richards was negotiating to join the reality show series, when a source said the deal had not yet been finalized..."
“… But everyone who was very close was very excited about the possibility of getting her on board, "the person familiar with the matter said
"Related videos: the most shocking moment in real family life," another source close to the show told people magazine. "There have been rumors for years that the star of wildlife has been discussing with the producers, but the time is always wrong."
"Dennis has long wanted to join the show," the source explained



Number  984
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She imagined an Awkwafina talk show, where she would vamp around New York City, interviewing homeless people and prostitutes.”
“She did.”
“...s raunch rap anthem My Dick She wrote My Vag early in college then kept it on ice for five years as she tried to figure out what to do with her life...”
“Today Lum seems half proud half embarrassed that the thing that ultimately changed her life was a three minute rap called My Vag advertisement Considering that her breakout movie role is in a gender flipped reboot it s fitting that her first song was a feminized reimagining of Mickey Avalon...”
“She also started making beats on her MacBook around this time, influenced by hometown heroes like A Tribe Called Quest.”
“She wouldn’t actually adopt it (or change the spelling for legal purposes) until years later.”
“Lum came up with the sobriquet Aquafina at 16, just because she liked the way it sounded.”
“Going to the school also opened up the city for her beyond Queens, exposing New York’s heavy-beating cultural heart.”
““This whole thing has been insane.” The Queens native first began to sow her creative oats at LaGuardia High School, forever known as the Fame school, where she dabbled in a little bit of everything artistic.”
““Yesterday, I had a designated security guard named Phil,” she says, shaking her head in a mild daze.”


"She imagined a clumsy talk show where she would tour New York City and interview homeless people and prostitutes."
"She did it."
“… She coarsely said to sing my dick, she wrote about my vagina early in college, and then kept it on the ice for five years as she tried to figure out how to deal with her life... "
"Today, lum seems to be half proud and half embarrassed, because what finally changed her life is a three minute rap called my vag advertisement. Considering that her breakthrough movie role is in a gender reversal restart, it's appropriate that her first song is the re imagination of Mickey Avalon's feminization..."
"Influenced by her hometown heroes, she also began to shine on MacBook, such as a tribe called quest."
"It wasn't until a few years later that she actually adopted it (or changed the spelling for legal purposes),"
"Lum came up with the nickname" aquifina "when she was 16 years old, just because she liked the sound."
"Going to school also opened up a city beyond queens for her, exposing the beating heart of New York's culture."
"This whole thing is crazy." The Queens native first began to plant her creative inspiration in LaGuardia high school, which is always known as a prestigious school, where she dabbled in a little bit of art
"Yesterday, I had a designated security guard named Phil," she said, shaking her head in a daze



Number  985
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This Is Us took home one award out of five nominations.”
“Go to People.com/peopletv, or download the app on your favorite streaming device.”
“Awards but he was able to finish his acceptance speech backstage...”
““I wouldn’t mind finishing.”
“I wanted to thank our writers.”
“You guys are our life’s blood,” the This Is Us star, 41, told reporters in the press room after his win in the outstanding lead actor in a drama series category.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““To our producers and directors, thank you for your guidance and friendship.”
“I want to thank Dan Fogelman.”
“He’s not trying to make America great again, he’s trying to make it the best that it’s ever been.”


"This is one of our five nominations."
"Go to people's net / people's TV, or download the app on your favorite streaming media device. “
"But he can finish the award speech backstage..."
"I don't mind saying that."
"I want to thank our writers."
"You are the blood of our lives," the 41 year old "this is an American star" told reporters at a news conference after winning the award for outstanding actor in drama
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"To our producers and directors, thank you for your guidance and friendship."
"I want to thank Dan fogman."
"He doesn't want to make America great again, he wants to make America the best country ever."



Number  986
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We ask that you respect our privacy during this time in our lives.”Us Weekly exclusively revealed on Thursday, May 31, that the couple have reconciledScroll through the gallery to relive some of their best quotes about each other.”
““While this decision was a difficult one, we continue to have a great deal of love and respect for one another,” the former couple said.”
“On Sunday, Us Weekly was the first to report that the pair had ended their engagement.”
“Cena, 40, and Bella, 34, were set to tie the knot on May 5 in Mexico.”
“Five years later, he proposed during the live broadcast of Wrestlemania 33 in April 2017, telling the world that he had been waiting for a very long time to ask for her hand in marriage.”
“After being friends for years, the WWE Superstars began dating in 2012.”
“Before Nikki Bella and John Cena announced on Sunday, April 15, that they had called it quits, they spent six years raving about each other.”


On Thursday, May 31, American weekly revealed exclusively that the couple had reconciled, flipped through the gallery and revisited some of their best quotes from each other
"Although it was a difficult decision, we still have love and respect for each other," the former couple said
"On Sunday, American weekly took the lead in reporting the end of their engagement."
Senna, 40, and Bella, 34, are due to marry in Mexico on May 5
"Five years later, in April 2017, he proposed in the live broadcast of wrestling madman 33, telling the world that he had been waiting for a long time to propose to her."
"After years of being friends, WWE stars started dating in 2012."
Nicky Bella and John Senna spent six years talking to each other before they announced their separation on Sunday, April 15



Number  987
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(ANI)”
“...year because of the alleged verbal and physical abuse she suffered from the hands of Johnny revealed that her main goal in life is to make sure she never gets tempted by popularity...”
“I wouldn t be able to do that if I wasn t living honestly so it was never tempting to me to live another way But the Rum Diary star who finalised her divorce from Johnny Depp 54 earlier this...”
“It’s never anywhere equal to the desire I have to live my life truthfully and with dignity and with pride.”
“All I strive for in life is never get the temptation to try to be popular, liked, accepted.”
“I always tend to do things truthfully and do the right thing.”
“When asked how she feels about being dubbed an inspiration, Heard said, “Have you ever met a woman?”
“It’s severe but you grow and move on from that, and on balance, I take into consideration all of the incredible fortune I have being in this position.”But she certainly doesn’t “mind” being called inspirational.”
“That’s a difficult realization to come to when it does hit you.”
“...a valid goal and that your actions and words whether they re done on a red carpet or in the most intimate corners of your personal life to know that those aren t fully yours anymore...”


(Anne)
“…… Over the past year, accused of being abused by Johnny, she revealed that her main goal in life is to ensure that she will never be seduced by popularity... "
"If I don't live honestly, I can't do that, so I never thought about changing my lifestyle, but the Rum Diary star divorced Johnny Depp 54 earlier this year..."
"There is no place like my desire to live truly, with dignity and pride."
"What I pursue in my life is that I will never be tempted to try to be popular, liked and accepted."
"I always tend to be honest and do the right thing."
When asked about what is called inspiration, Hurd said, "have you ever met a woman?"
"It's serious, but you'll grow out of it and move on, and overall, I've taken into account all the incredible luck I've had in this position." But she certainly doesn't mind being called "inspiring."
"When it does hit you, it's hard for you to realize that."
“…… An effective goal, your actions and words, whether on the red carpet or in the most intimate corner of your personal life, should know that these are not entirely yours any more... "



Number  988
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“After running out of the ingredients necessary to make the uber popular new Unicorn Frappuccino, the Starbucks in Downtown Disneyland decided to create its own version of the rainbow beverage: the Pink Pegasus Frappuccino.”
“As first reported by HelloGiggles, the magical white mocha and raspberry-flavored drink is near-identical to the Unicorn Frappuccino, minus all of the "blue ingredients" that make it sour — and based on social media, people are already obsessed with it.”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
After running out of ingredients for Uber's new Unicorn ice cream, Starbucks in downtown Disneyland decided to make its own rainbow drink: Pegasus ice cream
"As like as two peas of ice cream, the magic white Mocha and raspberry flavored drink almost has been almost the same as the unicorn ice cream, minus all the blue components that make it sour," HelloGiggles said for the first time.
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address



Number  989
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See what he had to say in the video below.”
“Claflin, 31, opened up earlier this year about the body shaming that he and other male actors experience in the film industry.”
“NEWS: 'Hunger Games' Star Sam Claflin Is a Dad!”
“The couple, who tied the knot in 2013, welcomed son Pip in December 2015.”
“WATCH: Sam Claflin Opens Up About Experiencing Body Shaming on Set: 'I Felt Like a Piece of Meat'Getty ImagesGetty ImagesThe 32-year-old Transformers actress was radiant in a simple ankle-length pink dress from British designer Emilia Wickstead.”
“Haddock debuted her baby bump on Monday, at the U.K. launch of Birks Jewellery, in London.”
“Congratulations are in order for Hunger Games actor Sam Claflin and his wife, Laura Haddock, who are expecting their second child together!”


"See what he says in the video below."
Kraflin, 31, made public earlier this year about the physical humiliation he and other actors suffered in the film industry
"News: hunger game star Sam kraflynn is a father!"
"The couple, who married in 2013, welcomed their son PIP in December 2015."
"Watch: Sam crawling tells of his physical humiliation on set:" I feel like a piece of meat. "Getty pictures Getty pictures the 32 year old transformer actress is radiant in a pink ankle dress by British designer Emilia wickstead."
On Monday, the UK's Burkes jewelry company unveiled Haddock in London.
"Congratulations to hunger game actor Sam crawling and his wife Laura haddock, who are pregnant with their second child!"



Number  990
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And he's accomplished what he did with some major power players.”
“Goldwyn: That's what he says: "If we go to war..." There's obviously some right-wing Republican plot to take down Fitz and support Andrew.”
“Their relationship is interesting, but obviously complicated.”
“2014(09/18/14) Tony Goldwyn - VultureWhat are the top three rides on the Olivia and Fitz emotional roller coaster?”
“When you see the rest of the first season, Fitz is just full of surprises, which makes it really exciting, as an actor."”
“I just found putting a character in a moral quandary like that really great.”
“But, with Shonda, I knew that all of her characters are always full of contrasts and surprises, and she described to me what her intentions were for Fitz, as the show went on.”
“In a different writer’s hands, it actually would have made me nervous because I would have thought, “Oh, god, I’m going to be the philandering president, and that’s the role,” which is fine, but not necessarily something you want to be doing forever, in a television series.”
“I’m always perversely attracted to characters that seem one thing, but are ultimately revealed as another, and I knew, the way Shonda writes, that that’s how it would turn out.”
“"Well, I really loved the final scene in the Oval Office between Fitz and Olivia because I knew that there was going to be so much more to this than what it appeared to be.”


"He has completed his work with some of the major players
Goldwin: he said, "if we go to war..." Obviously, there are some right-wing Republicans plotting to overthrow Fitz and support Andrew. "
"Their relationship is interesting, but obviously complex."
"2014 (09 / 18 / 14) Tony Godwin - what are the top three names of the vulture Olivia and Fitz emotional roller coaster?"
"When you see the rest of the first season, Fitz is just full of surprises, which makes Fitz very excited as an actor."
"I find it really great to put a character in such a moral dilemma."
"But with shoda, I know that all her characters are always full of contrast and surprise, and as the performance goes on, she describes to me her intention for Fitz."
"In the hands of another writer, it actually makes me nervous, because I think, 'oh my God, I'm going to be a playboy president, that's the role,'" which is good, but not necessarily what you want to do forever, in a TV series. "
"I've always been attracted by characters who seem to be one thing but end up being revealed as something else, and I know that's how shoda writes."
"Well, I really like the last scene of Fitz and Olivia in the Oval Office, because I know it's going to be better than it looks."



Number  991
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple divorced in 2010.”
“...with their children 26 year old Dylan and 24 year old Hopper...”
“Penn said it was job security for oncologists Meanwhile Penn told comedian Marc Maron in a podcast that that he and his ex wife Robin Wright don t have a lot of conversation Penn said they have very separate relationships...”
“The two-time Academy Award winner described his novel, “Bob Honey Who Just Do Stuff,” as “the conversation once a year with the drunken uncle.”Penn lit a second cigarette and Colbert asked him to consider quitting.”
“The actor told the host Monday he had taken a sedative “to get to sleep after a red-eye flight” and Penn lit a cigarette.”
“NEW YORK (AP) — Sean Penn made a smoky appearance on “The Late Show with Stephen Colbert” to promote his book.”


"The couple divorced in 2010."
“… And their children, Dylan, 26, and hopper, 24... "
"Penn says it's the job security of an oncologist. Meanwhile, Penn tells comedian mark Malone in a podcast that he doesn't have much conversation with his ex-wife Robin Wright. Penn says they have very different relationships..."
The two time Oscar winner described his novel Bob Hani, who can only do things, as "a conversation with a drunken uncle every year.". Penn lights a second cigarette and Colbert asks him to consider quitting
The actor told the host Monday that he took a sedative "to sleep after a red eye flight" and pan lit a cigarette
New York (AP) - Sean Penn smokes on "Stephen Colbert's evening show" to promote his book



Number  992
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She has William, she has three beautiful children .”
““She has everything she wants.”
“Vanity Fair and other publications noted that Kate’s first royal outing since returning from maternity leave allowed her to show a more relaxed side, as well as an interest in supporting disadvantaged children.”
“The former “Suits” actress and humanitarian certainly knows how to work the press, the cameras and the crowds.”
“To the royal press corps, she has often come off as “standoffish” or “haughty.”Meghan’s demeanor, on the other hand, is more relaxed and down-to-earth, probably reflecting her American upbringing and her experience in Hollywood.”
“Since marrying William in 2011, Kate has been seen as a bit prim and proper in what she wears and how she presents herself.”
““I think this is where Kate gets to make her mark.”In certain ways, Kate’s seemingly more confident moves since returning to royal duties show the influence of her new sister-in-law, the Duchess of Sussex.”
““It’s a huge turning point,” Susan E. Kelley, owner and editor of the blog What Kate Wore, told Vanity Fair.”
“That’s now Meghan’s position.”
“Kate is now “fully a senior royal” within the apparatus — no longer the “commoner” who’s just married into the royal family, Vanity Fair added.”


"She has William, she has three beautiful children."
"She has everything she wants."
Vanity fair and other publications point out that Kate's first royal outing after her maternity leave has made her more relaxed and interested in supporting disadvantaged children
The former "suit" actress and humanist certainly knows how to deal with the media, cameras and crowds
In the eyes of the Royal press, Megan often shows "indifference" or "arrogance". Megan's behavior is more relaxed and down-to-earth, which may reflect her growing up experience in the United States and her experience in Hollywood
"Since her marriage to William in 2011, Kate has always been considered a bit reserved in her dress and manner of expression."
"I think that's what makes Kate famous." In a sense, Kate's more confident return to the royal family shows the influence of her new sister-in-law, the Duchess of Sussex
"It's a huge turning point," Susan E. Kelly, owner and editor of the blog "what Kate wears," told Vanity Fair
"That's Megan's position."
Vanity Fair also said that Kate is now a "senior member of the royal family" in the institution - no longer a "civilian" who has just married into the royal family



Number  993
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...when Netflix releases the series on May 19”
“The trailer’s main action is led by locals who knew Sister Cathy, particularly two former students who have never stopped trying to solve the devastating murder.”
“Two months later, her body was found.”
“Her name was Sister Cathy Cesnik.”
“She was a beloved 26-year-old teacher at the local Archbishop Keough High School, and her death left the community confounded: Who would want to hurt this woman?”
“Decades later, the case is still unsolved—but the circumstances around it have grown wild and complex, with police desperate to determine if Cesnik’s death had anything to do with a major sexual abuse scandal at the school.”
“What did she know?”
“And who, ultimately, used that information against her?”
“The mysterious murder is coming to light this spring thanks to Netflix, which is releasing a seven-part docu-series about Cesnik’s death titled The Keepers.”
“A new trailer, released on People, is giving true-crime fans a first look at the series, and is already striking an ominous, conspiratorial tone.”


“… On May 19, when Netflix launched the series, the company launched a series of
"The main characters of the trailer are the local people who know sister Casey, especially the two former students who never stop trying to solve this devastating murder."
"Two months later, her body was found."
"Her name is sister Cathy sesnick."
"She was a beloved 26 year old teacher at local Archbishop Keo high school, and her death left the community confused: who would want to hurt this woman?"
"Decades later, the case is still pending, but the surrounding situation has become wild and complex, and the police are eager to determine whether sesnick's death is related to the major sexual abuse scandal in the school."
"What does she know?"
"Who in the end used the information against her?"
"This mysterious murder will come to light this spring, thanks to Netflix, which is releasing a seven episode Docu Series on the death of cesnick called guardian
"A new trailer, published in people magazine, let real crime fans see the series at first sight, and has played an ominous plot tone."



Number  994
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tonight’s part 1 of the finale airs from 8 – 9 p.m. ET/PT time delay and tomorrow night’s grand finale runs from 8:30 – 11 p.m. ET/PT time delay on the ABC network.”
“Kordei stresses that any little error can definitely impact your performance.”
“2017-05-22T01:13:07.000ZNormani Kordei is favored to win this season on Dancing With the Stars, opposite pro dancer Val Chmerkovskiy.”
“The Fifth Harmony singer has improved week after week, but the fierce schedule and routines have definitely taken their toll on her body.”
“Previously, Kordei opened up about the strain on her back, which was affecting her movements.”
“Chmerkovskiy told DWTS viewers that injuries at this point in the competition are completely normal, so it doesn’t come as a surprise.”
“Unfortunately, Kordei has suffered another injury and this time, it’s a twisted ankle.”
“In a clip from the show, Kordei talked about last week’s live episode, saying:Last week we had one of our most challenging dances.”
“The judges saw a stumble … it just shows anything can set me back.”
“Any little thing can be the reason why I don’t get the mirrorball.”


"The first part of tonight's finale will be delayed from 8:00 p.m. to 9:00 p.m. Eastern time, and tomorrow's finale will be delayed from 8:30 p.m. to 11:00 p.m. Eastern time."
"Kordei stressed that any small mistake will affect your performance."
"2017-05-22t01:13:07.000z normani kordei won this season's championship by dancing with stars against professional dancer val chmerkovskiy."
"The fifth harmonic singer is improving week by week, but the fierce schedule and routine have undoubtedly hurt her body."
"Before that, cordi disclosed her back strain, which affected her movements."
"Chimmelkovsky told the DWTS audience that it's perfectly normal to get injured at this time of the game, so it's not surprising."
"Unfortunately, Cordy is injured again, this time with a sprained ankle."
"In a segment of the show, Cody talked about last week's live broadcast and said," last week we did one of the most challenging dances. "
"The judges saw a stumbling block It just shows that anything can set me back. "
"Any little thing can be the reason why I can't get the mirror ball."



Number  995
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more photos of the collision of the two Michelangelos, below:Follow artnet News on Facebook:”
“Thursday’s appearance marks their first-known appearance at a major New York art museum.”
“The latest, the Michael Bay-produced reboot Out of the Shadows (2016), grossed some $245.6 million worldwide, according to Box Office Mojo.”
“From its origins, the comic book has grown into cartoons, video games, food tie-ins, tons of merchandise, and six feature films.”
“Trained in martial arts, the pizza-loving humanoid reptiles burst from their home in New York’s subways to fight adversaries ranging from small-time crooks to space aliens.”
“The Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles originated as a 1984 comic book by Kevin Eastman and Peter Laird, centering on crime-fighting turtles who happen to be named after artists: Leonardo, Donatello, Raphael, and, of course, Michelangelo.”
“Though “Michelangelo: Divine Draftsman and Designer” wouldn’t seem to need the extra push, the appearance of the hero is a clever ploy to draw in young fans via a little Turtle Power.”
“That puts it on track to be one of the institution’s top 10 most-visited shows ever before it closes on February 12.”
“...day according to an announcement from the museum...”
“...https t co jUPJhto7Xr MetMichelangelo pic twitter com YS7T5xZv9a The Met metmuseum January 25 2018 The once in a lifetime exhibition has been a smash success for the Met attracting half a million visitors as of this week with an average of 7 000 art lovers swarming the exhibition every...”


"Take another look at the photo of two Michelangelos colliding, below: follow the art net Facebook news:“
"Their appearance on Thursday marks their first appearance at a major art museum in New York."
"According to box office magic, Michael Bay's latest movie, restart out of the shadows (2016), grossed about $245.6 million worldwide."
Comic books developed from its origin to cartoons, video games, food matching, tons of goods and six feature films
After martial arts training, these pizza loving humanoid reptiles rush out of their homes on the New York subway to fight against a variety of opponents, from hooligans to aliens
"Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtle" originated from a 1984 comic book by Kevin Eastman and Peter Laird. It focuses on fighting crime turtles. These turtles happen to be named after artists: Leonardo, Donatello, Raphael and, of course, Michelangelo
"Although Michelangelo: the holy draftsman and designer doesn't seem to need extra push, the presence of heroes is a clever strategy to attract young fans with a little turtle power."
"It is expected to become one of the top ten exhibitions visited by the agency before its closing on February 12."
“… According to the museum's announcement... "
“… HTTPS t Co jupjhto7xr metmichelangelo pic twitter com ys7t5xzv9a the met met Museum on January 25, 2018, this once-in-a-lifetime exhibition has achieved great success. As of this week, it has attracted 500000 tourists, with an average of 7000 art lovers flocking to it every year... "



Number  996
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Awww.”
“But one thing is for sure, my world will forever be richer for having those memories stored away in my consciousness," he added.”
“"I can only sum it up by saying it felt like the world was becoming a better place today.”
“He joked that Elton John and George Clooney didn't approach him because they were "too shy" and it definitely had nothing to do with the fact they might not know who he is.”
“"Harry looking earnest and somehow vulnerable, Meghan looking strong and proud and regal and beautiful," wrote Korsh.”
“Here’s the rest... #RoyalWedding pic.twitter.com/dkzncEeNTL — Aaron Korsh (@akorsh9) May 20, 2018He also described his interpretation of the bride and groom's expressions as they walked down the aisle.”
“I was asked to write something for The New York Daily News, they were kind enough to print some of it.”
“"From the second we left our castle-esque hotel to the drive up to and through Windsor, to the walk to the Chapel, and then afterwards to the reception it was one once in a lifetime experience after another."”
“SEE ALSO: We defy you not to sob uncontrollably at these photos of Harry and Meghan getting married"I can tell you the wedding was the most extraordinary thing I've ever seen" wrote Korsh.”
“Suits creator Aaron Korsh tweeted about his experience of attending what he described as a "seemingly world-changing event."”


"Oh, dear."
"But one thing is for sure, my world will always be richer because these memories are stored in my consciousness," he added
"I can only conclude that I feel that the world today is more and more beautiful."
He joked that Elton John and George Clooney didn't approach him because they were "too shy," which had nothing to do with the fact that they might not know who he was
"Harry looks serious, but somehow fragile, Megan looks strong, proud, noble and beautiful," colsh wrote
"The rest... #Royal Wedding pic.twitter.com/dkzncEeNTL -Aaron Korsh (@ akorsh9) on May 20, 2018, he also described his interpretation of the expression of the bride and groom walking down the aisle
"I was asked to write something for the New York Daily News, and they kindly printed some."
"From the moment we left the Castle Hotel, we drove to Windsor, passed through Windsor, walked to the chapel, and then to the reception. It was a life experience again and again."
"See also: we challenge you not to sob over these photos of Harry and Megan getting married," I can tell you, this wedding is the most unusual thing I've ever seen, "colsh wrote
The creator of the suit, Aaron Korsh, tweeted about his experience in "seemingly world changing events."



Number  997
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Image: AP)”
“Saturday June 3 2017 in New Jersey...”
“Someone that had this perspective I wouldn t even want around says Kardashian Recently her sister Kendall also blasted Caitlyn s memoir and called it insane as it gives an insight into her relationship with their mother Kendall Jenner attends the Veuve Clicquot Polo Classic at Liberty State Park on...”
“I just have no respect for (Caitlyn) anymore.”
“(Image: Agencies)"It's like enough already...”
“"If you turn on my mom and you continue to bash us, I can't -- even for the sake of my sisters -- spend time with someone that doesn't even care about my mother.Kim Kardashian attends the GQ Men of the Year awards at The Royal Opera House.”
“67 year old reality star previously known as Bruce and married to Kris for making the intimate details of their marriage public...”
“LOS ANGELES Reality TV personality Kim Kardashian West has lost all respect for Caitlyn Jenner after she slammed her mother Kris Jenner in her recently released book The Secrets of My Life In Sunday s episode of Keeping Up With The Kardashians the 36 year old diva went after the...”


(photo: Associated Press)
"Saturday, June 3, 2017, New Jersey..."
Kardashian also recently attacked Caitlin's memoir as crazy because it revealed Caitlin's relationship with her mother, Kendall Jenner, at the Veuve Clicquot Polo classic in Liberty State Park
"I just don't respect it anymore."
"(image: Agency)" seems to have enough... "
"If you betray my mother and continue to attack us, I can't - even for my sisters - be with someone who doesn't care about my mother at all." Mom, Kim kardashan is at the Royal Opera House for the GQ best actor of the year award ceremony
"The 67 year old reality TV star, formerly Bruce, married Chris because he disclosed the private details of their marriage..."
"Los Angeles reality star Kim Kardashian West lost all respect for Caitlin Jenner because she attacked Kris Jenner in her recent book the secrets of my life, which was published on Sunday in keep up to the Kardashians



Number  998
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After what was described as a 'quick' meal, all three exited in succession.”
“Dressed in designer threads at Flemington Racecourse, Sofia looked upset during what appeared to be a difficult exchange with Scott and was spotted wiping away her tears.”
“The 20-year-old aspiring model and her 35-year-old boyfriend were spotted out for dinner at YU/MI Sushi in Beverly Hills.”
“The pair were both glued to their cell phones and didn't seem to talk much at all once their food arrived.”
“Dialing it in: Sofia Richie, 20, and Scott Disick, 35, were glued to their phones when they were spotted out for dinner at YU/MI Sushi in Beverly Hills on Thursday.”
“No romance on the menu The couple didn t even get off their phones when their meal arrived They re talking but not to each other They didn t switch off during their night out Earlier in the day Sofia and Scott looked stony faced as they emerged from an...”
“...office...”
“Lionel Richie's daughter failed to smile as she left the building, raising questions her recent meeting with Kourtney Kardashian, Scott's ex-girlfriend of nine-years and mother of their three children, was still on her mind.”
“Sofia was dressed down in an over-sized jumper and black Adidas joggers which she teamed with black trainers and a pair of her signature, Matrix-inspired sunglasses.”
“Wearing her long, sleek blonde hair with a center-parting, Sofia showcased her natural beauty with a minimal make-up look.”


"After being described as' fast food ', all three people left the market one after another."
At the Flemington racecourse, Sophia was dressed in designer clothes. During the difficult communication with Scott, she was very depressed. Someone saw her wiping her tears
"The aspiring 20-year-old model and her 35 year old boyfriend were found having dinner in Yu / MI sushi, Beverly Hills."
"Both of them stick to their mobile phones. When the food arrives, they don't seem to talk at all."
"Dial the phone: Sophia Ritchie, 20, and Scott Disick, 35, were found staring at their cell phones while they were having dinner at jade / Missouri's in Beverly Hills on Thursday."
"There's no romance on the menu. The couple didn't even drop their cell phones when they were eating. They were chatting, but they didn't talk to each other. Earlier that day, Sophia and Scott didn't turn off the power when they went out at night. They started from a
“… Office... "
"Lionel Ritchie's daughter didn't smile when she left the building, which makes people suspect that her recent meeting with Kourtney Kardashian, Scott's ex girlfriend of nine years and mother of three, is still in her mind."
Sophia wore a oversized Pullover and a black Adidas jogging suit, paired with black sneakers and a pair of her iconic matrix inspired sunglasses
Sophia has long smooth hair with a parting in the middle. She shows her natural beauty with the least makeup



Number  999
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Nearly all of those alleged incidents, however, occurred years ago and fall beyond the one-year statute of limitations.”
“To date, dozens of men have come forward with allegations that Spacey groped or assaulted them sexually – many when they were boys.”
“Spacey is also under investigation in Connecticut and by the Los Angeles District Attorney’s office for alleged sexual misconduct.”
“Most of the alleged incidents happened before 2009.”
“In mid-November, the Old Vic said it had received 20 allegations of inappropriate behavior by Spacey and admitted there was a “cult of personality” around the actor and that his “stardom” and “status” might have prevented people — in particular junior staff or young actors — from speaking up.”
“The claims are being investigated by Scotland Yard’s Child Abuse and Sexual Offences Command.”
“A third allegation about a 2005 incident in Westminster came to light in January.”
“Later that month, police said they were looking into another claim of sexual assault in 2005, also in Lambeth.”
“In November, Scotland Yard opened an investigation into allegations that Spacey sexually assaulted a man in London in 2008.”
“...a third in Gloucester in 2013”


"However, almost all of these alleged incidents occurred a few years ago, beyond the one-year statute of limitations."
"So far, dozens of men, many of whom are still boys, have filed charges that spacey sexually stroked or assaulted them."
"Spacey is also under investigation for alleged sexual misconduct at the district attorney's offices in Connecticut and Los Angeles."
"Most of the alleged incidents occurred before 2009."
"In mid November of last year, Vic senior said that he had received 20 accusations of Spacy's misconduct and admitted that there was" cult of personality "around the actors, and that his" star status "and" status "may have hindered people, especially junior staff or young actors, from speaking."
"The Scotland Yard child abuse and sexual crime command is investigating these charges."
"The third allegation about the Westminster incident in 2005 came to light in January this year."
"Later that month, police said they were investigating another sexual assault charge in 2005, also in Lambeth."
Last November, the London police department began an investigation into the allegation that spacey sexually assaulted a man in London in 2008
“… In 2013, there was a third of the total number in Gloucester



Number  1000
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“READ MORE:”
“Follow us on Facebook.”
“Like All the Moms?”
“Never work with Kids or Animals.."So basically, just another day in the life of a dad.”
“He captioned the post:"What started as a ground breaking music video ended in a savage attack by a cowardly K9.”
“Hemsworth falls to the ground but continues his performance as the dog starts barking and the kids totally go off and do their own dance moves.”
“But the very good pup (who was just a little hyper and jumpy) had enough.”
“Then he jumps to face forward, mouthing the pop-hit lyrics.”
“Hemsworth faces his back to the camera in his self-described "ground breaking music video," swaying side to side with his hands in the air.”
“And they did, in this gushingly cute video of Chris Hemsworth jamming out to Cyrus' "Wrecking Ball" before being tackled by his dog and kids.”


Read more:
"Follow us on Facebook."
"Like all mothers?"
"Never work with children or animals..." So basically, it's just another day in dad's life
He wrote in the title of the post: "it was a pioneering music video at first, but later it was savagely attacked by a timid K9."
"Hansworth fell to the ground, but continued his performance, as the dog started barking and the children walked away completely, doing their own dance moves."
"But this very good puppy (just a little bit excited) has had enough."
"Then he jumps to the front and says pop songs."
"In his self styled" groundbreaking music video, "Hemsworth turns his back to the camera and swings his hands in the air."
"They did it. In this endless and lovely video, Chris Hemsworth jumps at Cyrus's" destruction ball "before being caught by Cyrus's dogs and children."



Number  1001
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...time in Sin City on Thursday night April 26”
“The celebration of Despacito a song that revived global interest in Latin music was a fitting way to celebrate the 20th anniversary of the Billboard Latin Music Awards on the Telemundo network which aired the awards live from the Mandalay Bay Events Center in Las Vegas the show s first...”
“...the year...”
“The most played song of 2017 swept the 2018 Billboard Latin Music Awards winning six trophies hot Latin song of the year hot Latin song of the year vocal event airplay song of the year digital song of the year streaming song of the year and Latin pop song of...”
“It was the year of “Despacito” and the year of urban music.”


“… On the night of Thursday, April 26, in the city of sin
"This song revives global interest in Latin music and is an appropriate way to celebrate the 20th anniversary of the billboard Latin music award on the telemundo network. Telemundo network broadcast the award live at Mandalay Bay event center in Las Vegas, which is the first time of the program... "
“… This year... "
"The most popular song of 2017 swept the billboard Latin Music Awards of 2018, won six trophies, best popular Latin Song of the year, best popular Latin Song of the year, best digital song of the year, best streaming media song of the year and best Latin pop song of the year..."
"It was the year of despair and the year of city music."



Number  1002
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it's not clear how long the relationship lasted, because they have broken up."
"The two celebrities made their relationship public on instagram."
"However, it has been confirmed that the rumor of breaking up is not true."
“… One month old... "
“… Photography contributed by Steve granitz Getty in November 2011, jelina was apparently rumored that Gomez dumped a Canadian pop star and began to surface after a Bieber fan claimed that she had sex with him backstage on a show in October 2010 and that he was the father of her four children
"Oh, young love."
“… Photographer Kevin mazul / writer / Getty Mae 2011: Billboard Music Awards: Jenna looks happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards. "
"Aren't they cute?"
"Jon kopaloff photo / filmmagic February 2011: Jelena stepped on the red carpet of the vanity fair Oscar Party. They walked on the red carpet together for the first time and finally realized our dream, thus proving their young love."
"But it wasn't until January 2011 that the two pop stars confirmed their romance by taking part in a big PDA while on holiday in Saint Lucia."



Number  1003
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or as some theorists are suggesting, perhaps this means they are already engaged?”
“But those watching closely predict that Harry could be bending the knee very soon.”
“Of course this gesture is still delicate enough to be part of the Royal Courtship Plan.”
“Not only did Prince Harry reportedly leave his seat to join Markle and her mom in their box, Harry was actually spotted planting a kiss on her cheek.”
“Yet, this weekend, the lovebirds really threw it all on the table.”
“Then, this week, they turned it up a notch and not only sat together in public but also held hands.”
“Last weekend, they made their first public appearance but didn’t sit together.”
“Photo: GRHO, RYMI, NGRE/GLH / Patriot Pics / NGRE / BACKGRIDBut over the last week, the royal pair of the moment made a gradual coming out at the Invictus Games — the multi-sport event Prince Harry started for wounded veterans.”
“Prince Harry sneaks a kiss at the Invictus Games.”
“Photo: Samir Hussein/Samir Hussein/WireImageUp until now, the courtship between American actress Meghan Markle and roguish Prince Harry, has been proceeding at a perfectly private, glacial, Jane Austen–like pace.”


Or, as some theorists suggest, maybe it means they are already involved? "
"But those who are watching closely predict that Harry will soon bend his knees."
"Of course, this gesture is still subtle enough to be part of the Royal courtship plan."
"It is reported that Prince Harry not only left his seat and went to the box of markel and her mother, but also was found kissing her on the cheek."
"This weekend, however, couples are really throwing everything on the table."
"Then, this week, they took it up a notch, not only sitting together in public, but also holding hands."
"Last weekend, they made their first public appearance, but they didn't sit together."
"Photos: grho, rymi, ngre / GLH / patriot pics / ngre / backgridbut in the past week, the royal couple at that time gradually emerged at the Invictus games, which is a Multi Sport organized by Prince Harry for the injured veterans."
"Prince Harry secretly kisses at the inviolable games."
"Photo: Samir Hussein / Samir Hussein / WireImage so far, the courtship between American actress Megan Markle and the rogue Prince Harry has been conducted in a completely private, cold, Jane Austen style pace."



Number  1004
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please contact the National Blood Clot Alliance Communications Department via email at info@stoptheclot.org if you have any questions or comments about National Women’s Health Week 2018.”
“...doctor their risk for blood clots and their best birth control options...”
“In addition to the risk for blood clots connected to hormonal birth control, women are also at risk during pregnancy and childbirth, and when estrogen is used in the treatment of menopause symptoms later in life.”
“Women in particular face specific risks for blood clots that span their entire lives.”
“However, many of these deaths can be prevented simply by sharing life-saving information.”
“...clots and about 100 000 people will die because of blood clots...”
“...visiting Women Blood Clots Complete the Risk Assessment and discuss their results and birth control options with their doctor Talk to their doctor about any personal or family history of blood clots and their existing risk for blood clot Each year up to 900 000 people are affected by blood...”
“Even if you are a woman at risk for blood clots it is still possible for you to plan your family as you choose by understanding your risk for blood clots and taking these simple steps to reduce your risk Learn more about birth control and blood clot risks by...”
“Together, we are encouraging women to visit Women & Blood Clots for more information about birth control and blood clots.”
“Join the National Blood Clot Alliance NBCA during National Women s Health Week NWHW May 13 19 2018 as we work together with the Alexandra L Rowan Memorial Foundation to provide women with life saving information about birth control and blood clots and to help them determine along with their...”


"Please contact the national blood clot Alliance Communications Department by email info@stoptheclot.org If you have any questions or comments about the 2018 National Women's health week. "
“… Give them the risk of blood clots and the best birth control plan... "
"In addition to the risk of blood clots associated with hormonal birth control, women are also at risk when using estrogen to treat menopausal symptoms during pregnancy and childbirth, and later in life."
"Women, in particular, face a special risk of thrombosis throughout their lives."
"However, many of these deaths can be prevented by sharing lifesaving information."
“… Blood clots and about 100000 people will die of blood clots... "
“… Visit women to complete the risk assessment of blood clot, discuss the results and birth control plan with doctors, and talk with doctors about any personal or family history of blood clot and the existing risk of blood clot. 900000 people are affected by blood clot every year. "
"Even if you are a woman at risk of blood clot, you can still reduce your risk by understanding your blood clot risk and taking these simple steps, so as to plan your family according to your own choice and learn more about birth control and blood clot risk by..."
"Together, we encourage women to visit women and blood clots to learn more about birth control and blood clots."
"During the National Women's health week from May 13 to 19, 2018, joining NBCA, we work with Alexandra l Rowan Memorial Foundation to provide women with life-saving information about birth control and blood clots, and help them determine their own..."



Number  1005
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The Puerto Rican singer and the "Gasolina" rapper took the stage at Madison Square Garden in New York City on Sunday to perform their smash hit and three-time GRAMMY-nominated single, "Despacito."”
“The duo was joined by vocalist and Miss Universe 2006 Zuleyka Rivera, who starred in the "Despacito" music video.”
“Fonsi had previously told ET during rehearsals that Justin Bieber was not going to perform with them.”
“Nonetheless, Fonsi and Daddy Yankee pulled off a showstopper of a performance that had stars like Chrissy Teigen, John Legend and Donnie Wahlberg dancing in their seats.”
“The "Despacito" remix became a worldwide phenomenon, spending 16 weeks at No.”
“1 on the Billboard Hot 100 and tying the all-time record for consecutive weeks on top.”
“"Despacito" was not only a commercial but also a critical success for the collaborators.”
“The track won four Latin GRAMMY Awards, including Record of the Year and Song of the Year, and is nominated for three GRAMMY Awards.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
The Puerto Rican singer and "Gasolina" rapper performed their hit three time Grammy nominated single "despacito" at Madison Square Garden in New York City on Sunday
The pair were joined by singer and Miss Universe 2006 zuleyka Rivera, who starred in the "despacito" music video
"Fonsey told et during rehearsal that Justin Bieber would not be performing with them."
"Even so, fancy and Yankee Dad took the lead in a performance with stars such as Chris tegan, John Legend and Donny wolberg dancing in their seats."
"Despacito" mixing has become a worldwide phenomenon, and it took 16 weeks to come first
"At the top of the list is the top 100, which tied the record for several weeks in a row."
"Despacito" is not only a commercial advertisement, but also a crucial success for partners
The song won four Latin Grammy Awards, including record of the year and song of the year, and was nominated for three Grammy Awards



Number  1006
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I have my politics.”He added of Prince Harry potentially being a Trump supporter, “I would hope not, but at the time he might have been.””
“That was his politics.”
“He said, ‘Give Donald Trump a chance.’ I sort of disagreed with that, but I still like Harry.”
““We talked a few times about Donald Trump and Brexit and things like that … I was complaining I didn’t like Donald Trump.”
““He’s a smart guy,” Thomas said of his new son-in-law.”
“Thomas, who describes himself as fervently anti-Trump, previously revealed that Prince Harry urged him to give the POTUS a chance.”
““I’m nowhere near as bad.”Still, Thomas reportedly has “every intention” of visiting the UK soon.”
““If the Queen is willing to meet our arrogant and insensitive president she has no excuse not to meet me,” Thomas griped to TMZ early Tuesday.”
“Meanwhile, Trump is scheduled to meet with the royals in July.”
“He was reportedly hospitalized for a heart attack after the incident and hasn’t yet been across the pond to meet his daughter’s new family.”


"I have my politics," he added, adding that Prince Harry might have been a trump supporter. "I hope not, but he might have been at the time."
"That's his politics."
"He said," give Donald Trump a chance. " I don't agree, but I still like Harry
"We talked a few times about Donald Trump and brexit I'm complaining that I don't like Donald Trump. "
"He's a smart man," Thomas said of his new son-in-law
"Thomas, who claims to be strongly against trump, revealed earlier that Prince Harry urged him to give Potter a chance."
"I'm not bad at all." Nevertheless, it is reported that Thomas "fully intends" to visit the UK soon
"If the queen is willing to meet our arrogant and insensitive president, there's no reason why she won't see me," Thomas complained to TMZ earlier on Tuesday
"Meanwhile, trump is scheduled to meet the royal family in July."
"It is reported that he was hospitalized for heart disease after the incident and has not yet gone to the pond to see his daughter's new family."



Number  1007
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementSeason 11 of the Real Housewives of New York will premiere in the spring of 2019.”
“But Sonja Morgan and Dorinda Medley both revealed they would love to see her come back.”
“After agreeing to allow Bravo cameras to film her interaction with Bethenny Frankel and her husband Bobby’s funeral, Jill Zarin’s name immediately went to the top of the list.”
“Housewives head honcho, Andy Cohen, added fuel to the fire when he was asked about a possible return for Zarin at the Tribeca TV Festival’s Tribeca Talks: Ten Years with The Real Housewives of New York City.”
“After comparing being a housewife to being in the mob, Cohen stunned fans be seeming onboard with the idea.”
““And regarding Jill, I was happy to see she and Bethenny [Frankel] have that moment last season.”
“And, as I said, I was happy it happened in front of a camera, actually, just as a fan of the show and their kind of evolution,” he shared.”
““But never say never.”
“I think it would be cool.”Frankel ended her long-standing friendship with Jill Zarin following Season 3 of the Real Housewives of New York and left the show to start filming a spin-off.”
“During that time Frankel also went on the launch her billion-dollar Skinnygirl company.”


Real Housewives in New York Season 11 will premiere in the spring of 2019
"But Sonia Morgan and Doria Medley both revealed that they would love to see her back."
"Jill zarin's name immediately topped the list after agreeing to let Bravo cameras film her interaction with Bethany Frankel and her husband Boby's funeral."
"Housewife director Andy Cohen's Tribeca talk: ten years with real housewives in New York City" at Tribeca TV Festival Talks:Ten Years  When asked on "with the real housewoods of New York City," he added fuel to the fire
"After comparing being a housewife to joining a mob, Cohen shocked his fans because they seemed to have accepted the idea."
"As for Jill, I'm happy to see her and besseini (Frankel) have such moments last season."
"And, as I said, I'm glad it happened in front of the camera, in fact, just like fans of a show and their evolution," he said
"But never say no."
"I think it's going to be cool." Frankel ended his long friendship with Jill zalin in the third season of the real housewife of New York and left the show to start a spin off
"During this time, Frankel also launched her multi billion dollar skinny girl company."



Number  1008
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And if he’s happy, we’re happy.”And despite the fact that he’s been through four divorces — most recently finalizing his separation from Yolanda Hadid — the legendary producer is open to walking down the aisle again.”
“We really, really like her, and we’ve known her for a really long time.”
“On Saturday, McPhee, 33, and Foster, 68 — who were spotted locking lips in November but have yet to officially confirm their romance — shared the stage at Academy Award-winning singer-songwriter Carole Bayer Sager and her husband Bob Daly’s holiday party.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Kim Kardashian West — who documented the party on her Instagram story — shared a video of the musicians performing “White Christmas” alongside producer and singer Kenneth “Babyface” Edmonds.”
“The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star also shared a video from McPhee and Foster’s rendition of “Grown Up Christmas List,” in which the 33-year-old singer appeared to be reading the lyrics off of her cell phone.”
“The party — which Kardashian West described as “legendary” — also featured festive performances from Keith Urban, Hugh Jackman and Joe Walsh.”
“Image zoom Credit Kim Kardashian Instagram Image zoom Credit Kim Kardashian Instagram RELATED VIDEO Katharine McPhee Addresses Rumors Surrounding Her Dating Life I m Not Doing Anything Wrong Rumors about Foster and McPhee s relationship started in September after the Grammy winning producer s daughter Erin Foster shared photos of...”
“...the pair at the Grammy Museum s third annual gala at the Novo in Los Angeles writing in the caption Excited about my new step mom A source close to the situation told PEOPLE at the time that the social media posts were a joke...”
“In October, the two were also photographed walking arm-in-arm in Brentwood, California, but a source told PEOPLE at the time that the pair were merely having “some fun” at the expense of photographers.”


"If he is happy, so are we." Despite his four divorces - and recently his separation from Yolanda Hadid - the legendary producer is willing to get married again
"We really, really like her. We've known her for a long time."
On Saturday, 33 year old McPhee and 68 year old foster performed together at the Festival Party of Oscar winning singer and songwriter Carol Baer sagger and husband Bob DALY. Last November, the two were found to have locked lips, but have yet to officially confirm their relationship
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Kim kardisi hanwest, who recorded the party on instagram, shared a video of a musician performing "white Christmas" with producer and singer Kenneth "babyface" Edmonds
"The" keep up with Kardashian "star also shared a video of McPhee and foster singing" adult Christmas list, "in which the 33 year old singer seems to be reading lyrics on his mobile phone
What Kardashian West calls "legendary" parties also include festival performances by Keith Urban, Hugh Jackman and Joe Walsh
"Image zooming credit card Daisy instagram image zooming credit card Daisy instagram related video Katherine McPhee solved the problem about her dating life. I didn't do anything wrong. The rumor about Foster's relationship with McPhee began in September, when Irene foster, the daughter of Grammy award winning producer, shared photos..."
“…… At the Grammy museum's third annual event in novo, Los Angeles, the two wrote in the title, "excited about my new stepmother, a person familiar with the matter told people that the social media post was a joke..."
"In October this year, they were also photographed walking arm in arm in Brentwood, California, but a source told people that they were just" having fun "at the expense of the photographer."



Number  1009
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““You can live, you can get busy living.””
““For anyone at home going through anything, I want to be here to say you don’t have to get stuck, you don’t have to curl up in a ball on your couch,” she shared.”
“She told PEOPLE that when she was offered the chance to participate on the show she was “going through the fire again,” but pushed through in hopes of inspiring those who are also struggling with their health.”
“So, you know, I’ve done more this month, in the past month, preparing for this show than I have in an entire year.”The “Only in My Dreams” singer was diagnosed with Lyme disease back in 2013 after experiencing symptoms of extreme pain, weight loss, weakness and joint pain.”
““You can look at people and you just don’t know what they’re going through.”
“But again, you know what, I’ve learned through this journey that everyone is going through something,” she explained after her first dance in the ballroom.”
“It really tests your strength.”“Today, it just feels like I haven’t slept in four days.”
“I didn’t sleep last night.”
““My nervous system was acting out yesterday.”
“I’ve continued to perform here and there but I’ve been really scared to do something of this magnitude because I have unpredictable symptoms,” Debbie shared.”


"You can live, you can be busy living."
"For anyone who experiences anything at home, I want to say here that you don't have to get into trouble, you don't have to curl up in a ball on the sofa," she said
"She told people that when she got the chance to participate in the show, she was" experiencing pain again ", but she wanted to inspire those who were also struggling for their health."
"So, you know, in the past month, I've done more preparation for this show than I've done for the whole year." The "only singer of dreams" was diagnosed with Lyme's disease in 2013 after experiencing symptoms of extreme pain, weight loss, weakness and joint pain
"You can look at people and not know what they're going through."
"But, you know, I learned from this trip that everyone is going through something," she explained after her first dance in the ballroom
"It really tests your strength." "Today, I feel like I haven't slept for four days."
"I didn't sleep last night."
"There was something wrong with my nervous system yesterday."
"I've been performing here and there all the time, but I'm really afraid to do such a big thing because I have unpredictable symptoms," Debbie said



Number  1010
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may not be able to live here if you keep doing this.’ ””
“She was like, ‘I hate yoga!”
““That lasted for a week.”
““My mother said that she would let me live at home if I taught her yoga for an hour a day,” said Washington.”
“Instead she ended up moving back home and used her training to teach her mother yoga but that didn t go so well...”
“This was right after college so I was going to go to New York and be a starving artist and try to be an actor FROM PEN Half Their Size Christina Jordan on the Moment She Decided to Lose Weight...”
““I went to India after college and studied […] traditional Indian martial arts and cultural movement, and I was studying yoga and I thought, ‘I’ll be able to make a living when I go back,’ ” she said.”
““I love water aerobics!”The Scandal star, 40, also told DeGeneres about how she ended up becoming a certified yoga teacher.”
“And it’s harder than you think,” she said on Tuesday’s show.”
““It was so fun!”


"If you continue to do that, you may not be able to live here."
"She said," I hate yoga! "
"It lasted a week."
"My mother said that if I taught her yoga for an hour a day, she would let me live at home," Washington said
"As a result, she moved back home and used training to teach her mother yoga, but it didn't go very well..."
"It's after college, so I'm going to go to New York to be a hungry artist and try to be an actor half their size when Christina Jordan decides to lose weight..."
She said: "after I graduated from University, I went to India to study [...] ]I was studying Yoga at that time. I think I can make a living when I go back. "
"I love water aerobics! The 40 year old scandal star also told DeGeneres how she eventually became a qualified yoga teacher
"It's harder than you think," she said on Tuesday's show
"It's so much fun!"



Number  1011
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Adams, meanwhile, was previously linked to Danielle Maltby on Bachelor in Paradise, but the longtime friends have played coy about their status.”
“Back lit AF A post shared by Wells Adams (@wellsadams) on Nov 5, 2017 at 6:12pm PSTLove Story BeginningsHyland more recently split from actor Dominic Sherwood after two years of dating.”
““11 hangin’ out with a 10 #strangerthings,” he wrote at the time.”
“The actress went as Dustin from Netflix’s Stranger Things while he went as Eleven.”
“Stars Who Love The BachelorLast month, a source exclusively told Us Weekly that Hyland, 26, and Adams have been “seeing each other for months.” They first went public with their relationship when they showed off their coordinated Halloween costumes.”
““Back lit AF,” he wrote.”
“This time, the couple lovingly looked at each other as they stood in front of twinkling lights.”
“The Bachelorette alum, who appeared on JoJo Fletcher’s season 12 last year, shared a photo of his own.”
“In the snapshot, the pair appear to be out drinking on a date night.”
“Celeb Halloween Couples’ Costumes“He puts up with me,” she wrote on Instagram, alongside a heart emoji.”


"At the same time, Adams had been associated with Danielle Malby in" the Bachelor of heaven "before, but the old friends kept a secret about their status."
"A blog post" love story begins "shared by wells Adams (@ wellsadams) at 6:12 p.m. on November 5, 2017, shyland recently broke up with actor Dominic Sherwood after two years of dating."
"11 with 10 Strange guys," he wrote at the time
"The actress plays Dustin in the stranger to Netflix, and he's only 11 years old."
An exclusive source told us weekly that the 26 year old Herland and Adams had "met for months.". Last month, the two made their love affair public for the first time when they showed off their coordinated costumes for Halloween
"I don't know," he wrote
"This time, the couple stood in front of the flashing lights and looked at each other affectionately."
"The single alumni made his debut in season 12 of Joe Fletcher last year and shared a picture of himself."
"In the snapshot, they seem to be out drinking on a date night."
She wrote on instagram, "celebrity's Halloween costume." he put up with me, with a heart-shaped emoticon next to it



Number  1012
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Being gay has made my career.”In May, ABC announced that Quantico was being cancelled after three seasons.”
“(Image: Instagram/steve_the_brockman)"The gay roles are the best for me.”
“"For so long, as a young actor, I had this anxiety about making sure I could get straight roles, and now I know that’s not necessary.”
“"And it was only the other day that I realised it had been important somehow.”
“(Image: Instagram/steve_the_brockman) (Image: Instagram/steve_the_brockman)Previously talking to The Guardian about his decision, he said: “It wasn’t a conscious decision.”
“Russell, who appeared in US series Quantico alongside Priyanka Chopra, came out when he was 18 but didn't take on gay roles until much later in his career.”
“It's thought the pair started dating in 2016, with former Kings Cross Steelers rugby player Steve later moving to New York to be with Russell while he appeared in National Theatre show Angels, which also starred Andrew Garfield.”
“"Completely unexpected but very, very happy and looking forward to having a proper party to celebrate when back in London," the Essex-born star told the MailOnline.”
“Back in February, Russell confirmed their engagement, revealing it was a total surprise.”
“The last picture he posted of them together on Instagram was on March 16.”


"Homosexuality made my career." In May, ABC announced the cancellation of Quantico after three seasons
"(photo source: instagram / Steve / u the / u Brockman)" gay characters are the best for me. "
"For a long time, as a young actor, I have been worried about whether I can get a straight male role. Now I know it's unnecessary."
"I didn't realize the importance of this until a few days ago."
"It's not a conscious decision," he said when talking to the guardian about his decision
"Russell appeared in the Quantico series with Priyanka Chopra. He started at the age of 18, but didn't start to play a gay role until later in his career."
"It is believed that the two started dating in 2016, and Steve, a former king's Cross Steelers rugby player, later moved to New York to be with Russell, who appeared on the national theater's angel, also starring Andrew Garfield."
"Totally unexpected, but very, very happy, and looking forward to a proper party to celebrate when back in London," the Essex born star told email online
"As early as February this year, Russell confirmed their engagement and revealed that it was totally unexpected."
"The last picture he posted on instagram that they were together was on March 16."



Number  1013
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To see how it all went down, check out our live blog of the Season 30 finale.”
“Love you Jess and Cody!”
“Reactions from the reality TV show’s passionate fanbase range from supportive cheers to negative jeers.”
“Are YOU happy that Cody and Jessica won the $1 million prize and will now start a family?”
“Sound off down in the comments section after reading a sampling of fan reactions.”
“SEE Jessica Graf and Cody Nickson deserved to win ‘The Amazing Race,’ say 60% of fansTracie Parker: “Way to go ‘Big Brother’ lovebirds!!!!!!!!”
“I’ve been for those guys since the first day of ‘Big Brother.”
“Hk Never watching this show again I hate the Big Brother couple they should have never had the chance to even be on this show SEE The Amazing Race 30 winners Jessica Graf and Cody Nickson interview After Big Brother this was our redemption project WATCH Jasmine Porter This is...”
“...redemption for them being screwed on Big Brother...”
“Whoooooooo!”


"To see how it all works, check out our live blog for season 30 finale."
"Love you, Jesse and Cody!"
"The response of the enthusiastic fans of reality TV shows ranges from cheers of support to negative ridicule."
"Cody and Jessica won a million dollars and are you happy to be married now?"
"After reading the fan response sample, please make a sound in the comments section."
"Seeing that Jessica Graff and Cody Nixon deserved to win the" magic game ", 60% of van Stracy Parker said:" big brother love bird, good job ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
"I've been supporting those guys since big brother's first day."
"Hong Kong won't watch this show any more. I hate big brother and his wife. They shouldn't have had the chance to watch this show. Watch the interview of Jessica Graf and Cody Nixon after big brother. This is our salvation plan. Watch Molly Potter. This is..."
“… They were fooled by big brother... "
"Wow



Number  1014
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you look very closely on Paradise, you'll notice one week where my nails are all different sizes.”
“It was my moment to get away and be alone.”
“I hope that I kept it together [laughs].”
“In Paradise, we were basically camping for three weeks.”
“It was 90-degree weather, and there was no escape.”
“Everything was melting off, so the first week, when it was in the hundreds, I was such a slacker.”
“But by week two, during the day I would do foundation and a little mascara, highlighter, and obviously lips.”
“At night, I'd do eye makeup with contour.”
“How about hair?”
“I didn't touch my hair with an iron at all.”


"If you look closely at heaven, you'll find that one week my nails are all different sizes."
"It was the moment when I left alone."
"I wish I could put it together."
"In heaven, we basically camped for three weeks."
"It was 90 degrees and there was no escape."
"Everything was melting, so the first week, when it was in the hundreds, I was such a slacker."
But in the second week, I made foundation, mascara, chalk and lips during the day.
"At night, I make eye makeup with silhouettes."
"And the hair?"
"I didn't touch my hair with an iron at all."



**Something goes wrong**
“BELL Around Episode 8 of the first season, my husband [Dax Shepard] said, “I love your show, but my one critique is that Ted is just wildly underused.”
“But watching it, I would go, “You’re either doing a really good job, Ted, or that’s some of the worst acting I’ve ever seen.” And I couldn’t quite make up my mind.”
“They never saw me in a private moment, or I would have been twirling my mustache.”
“But I had no relationship to the audience in Season 1.”
“And it was easier to find the funny, because funny usually is this kind of triangular thing between you, another character and the audience.”
“Yeah, it was really fun.”
“Season 2 must have been a real kick for you, Ted, because you finally got to…TED DANSON Be who I am.”
“(Warning: spoilers ahead.)”
“Also Read: 'Good Place' Creator Mike Schur Confirms Exactly Where Eleanor and the Gang Are in Season 3On a break early in the filming of Season 3, Bell and Danson discussed the pleasures and challenges of a show that delights in blowing up its own premise over and over.”
“(Granted, words like demon may not be appropriate for an altogether nonreligious and bureaucratic afterworld; he’s middle management at best, and not very good at his job of torturing humans.)”


"In Episode 8 of season 1, my husband (DAX Shepard) said," I like your show, but one of my criticisms is that Ted is used too little. "
"But after watching it, I'll say," Ted, you're either doing well or it's the worst performance I've ever seen. "I haven't made up my mind yet."
"They've never seen me in private, or I'll have to twist my beard."
"But I have nothing to do with the audience of the first season."
"And it's easier to find funny places, because funny is usually a triangular relationship between you, another character and the audience."
"Yes, it's really interesting."
"The second season must be exciting for you, Ted, because you finally Ted Danson became me. "
"(warning: spoiler in front.)"
"Also read: 'good place' creator Mike Shure confirms the exact location of Eleanor and the gang in season 3. During the break at the beginning of season 3, bell and Danson discuss the fun and challenge of a show that likes to blow up its premise over and over again."
"(to be sure, words like devil may not be suitable for a completely secular and bureaucratic afterlife; he is at best a middle-level manager and not good at torturing human beings.)"



Number  1016
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My actions alleged in the police report do not reflect my core values and my law-abiding character.”“I am so grateful for the love and support that I am receiving from my family, friends and loyal supporters,” she continued.”
“I have the greatest respect for police officers and the job they do.”
“The 53-year-old Real Housewives of New York City star is seeking help for the second time after attending an alcohol treatment program in the winter, PEOPLE exclusively confirms.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The reality star has only authorized costar Bethenny Frankel to speak on her behalf.”
““This weekend, Luann was surrounded by her girlfriends and decided — with their support — that in light of recent circumstances, it is the healthiest choice for her not to attend Tuesday’s reunion taping so that she can continue in her healing process,” Frankel tells PEOPLE.”
““Luann is now surrounded by a core group of people who truly have her best interests at heart and who are working to make sure she gets the help she needs.”“Bravo has been very supportive of Luann during this time.”
“It’s a brave and honest decision by her, and everyone is rallying around her and wants the best for her,” Frankel explains.”
“Bravo confirmed that she is not taping the season 10 reunion.”
““Bravo supports Luann’s decision to focus on her health,” the network said in a statement to PEOPLE.”


"The conduct I described in the police report does not reflect my core values and law-abiding character." "I am very grateful to my family, friends and loyal supporters for their love and support," she continued
"I respect the police and their work the most."
People exclusively confirmed that the 53 year old New York star housewife asked for help for the second time after taking part in a winter alcohol treatment program
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The reality show star only authorized her partner, Bethany Frankel, to speak on her behalf."
"This weekend, Luan was surrounded by her girlfriends, and with their support, she decided that, given the recent situation, not attending Tuesday's party recording was her healthiest choice, so that she could continue her recovery process," Frankel told people
"Luan is now surrounded by a group of core people who really care about her best interests and are trying to make sure she gets the help she needs." "Bravo has been very supportive of Luan all this time."
"It was a brave and honest decision that she made, and everyone stood by her side and wanted the best for her," Frankel explained
"Bravo confirmed that she would not record the reunion of season 10."
"Bravo supports Luan's decision to focus on her health," the network told people in a statement



Number  1017
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow the instructions for using the brow serum as this may vary among brands.”
“Rub a cotton swab over the eyebrows to remove the excess oil.”
“While you can use an eyebrow pencil to add some faux brow hairs, you may find it doesn't look as natural as you'd like.”
“With just a bit of effort and a few beauty tricks, you can help your eyebrows grow in thicker.”
“Avoid the temptation to pluck.”
“Brush stray hairs into place with a brow brush.”
“If you just can’t stand the messy look, use a brow razor to shape your brows to look more tidy.”
“The brow razor is specifically designed to shave the eyebrow area, and this technique can actually help the hair grow in thicker.”
“Exfoliate the eyebrow area daily to help stimulate hair growth.”
“Rub a dry soft toothbrush back and forth over the eyebrows for a couple of minutes to help get rid of the dry dead skin and promote new hair growth.”


"Please follow the instructions for using eyebrow essence, because different brands of eyebrow essence may vary."
"Wipe the excess oil off your eyebrows with a cotton swab."
"Although you can add some artificial eyebrows with an eyebrow pencil, you may find that it doesn't look as natural as you want."
"Just a little bit of effort, plus some beauty techniques, can make eyebrows grow thicker."
"Avoid the temptation of picking."
"Brush the scattered hair in place with an eyebrow brush."
"If you can't stand this messy expression, shave your eyebrows with a razor to make them look more neat."
"The eyebrow shaver is specially designed for shaving eyebrows. This technology can actually help the hair get thicker."
"Exfoliating the eyebrows every day helps stimulate hair growth."
"Rubbing a dry soft toothbrush back and forth on your eyebrows for a few minutes will help remove dry dead skin and promote the growth of new hair."



Number  1018
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe the “old Taylor” isn’t so dead and gone after all.”
“She names a falling technique after a cat!”
“She jokes about being graceful!”
“Even more fun than seeing the throwback costumes and the choreographed fight scenes, though, are the moments when the Taylor we know and love shines through.”
“...era Taylor screams I HATE YOU GET OUT OF MY HOUSE at Red era Taylor...”
“That s gotta look weird Wearing her new and improved Junior Jewels shirt from the You Belong With Me video she and director Joseph Kahn decide which Taylors will fight each other which culminates in a hilarious scene where Fearless...”
“We’re all just chatting about life.”
“It’s like, ‘Oh that’s a phase I went through when I was 16, but like, a girl is wearing it who looks just like me.’ We’re having a great time.”
“It’s exciting.”
“...is the weirdest feeling but it s awesome...”


"Maybe old Taylor didn't just die."
"She named a falling technique after a cat!"
"She joked about elegance!"
"But what's more interesting than looking at those retro costumes and carefully choreographed fighting scenes is the moment when Taylor, who we know and who we love, shines."
“… Ella Taylor screams I hate you in red Ella Taylor leaves my house... "
"It must be strange to put on her new and improved junior jewels shirt, which was shot from the video of you along with me. She and director Joseph Kahn decided which Taylor would fight each other, which reached a climax in a funny scene, fearless..."
"We're all just talking about life."
"It's like," Oh, that's a stage I went through when I was 16, but it's like, a girl wearing it looks like me. " We had a good time. "
"It's exciting."
“… It's the strangest feeling, but it's terrible... "



Number  1019
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The CW averaged a 0.3 and 1 million viewers.”
“Fox was fourth in viewers with 3.4 million.”
“CBS was third in total viewers with 5.5 million.”
“CBS and Fox tied for third in the demo with a 0.8 each.”
“ABC was second with a 1.8 and 8.8 million.”
“NBC won the night with a 1.9 and 9.4 million viewers.”
“For The CW, “Legends of Tomorrow” (0.4, 1.3 million) and “iZombie” (0.2, 0.74 million) were even.”
“For Fox, “Lucifer” (0.7, 2.9 million) while “The Resident” (0.8, 3.8 million) was down slightly in the demo.”
“In addition to repeats of “The Big Bang Theory” and “Young Sheldon,” new episodes of “Man with a Plan” (1.0, 6.4 million) and “Living Biblically” (0.7, 4.7 million) were even on CBS.”
“NBC’s new drama “Good Girls” was down in both measures from last week’s series premiere, drawing a 1.1 and 4.7 million viewers compared to last week’s 1.3 and 5.4 million.”


"CW has an average audience of 300000 and 1 million."
"Fox ranks fourth with 3.4 million viewers."
"CBS is third with 5.5 million viewers."
"CBS and fox tied for third place with 0.8 each."
"ABC ranked second with 1.8 million and 8.8 million."
"NBC won the night's championship with 1.9 million and 9.4 million viewers."
"For CW, legend of tomorrow (400000, 130000) and izombe (200000, 740000) are two different things."
For fox, "Lucifer" (700000, 2.9 million) and "residents" (800000, 3.8 million) declined slightly in the demonstration
"In addition to the rebroadcasts of big bang theory and young Sheldon, new episodes of planned men (1.4 million) and biblical life (4.7 million) are even on CBS."
NBC's new show, good girl, is down in two ways from its premiere last week, attracting 1.1 million and 4.7 million viewers, compared with 1.3 million and 5.4 million last week



Number  1020
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“TELL JJJ: What does your beauty routine look like?”
“Check out the vid below!”
“I’m really big on using products that don’t have anything harmful to the environment—you know, methane and just fumes from gas and things like that.”Want to see even more?”
“Cameron is also a big advocate of using natural ingredients in his products: “If you can’t eat it, don’t put it on your face.”
“...once...”
“Then there s ice water face dunks Getting ready shouldn t really take all morning just kind of a splash of water on your face he says before you know dunking his face into freezing cold ice water more than...”
“In the vid, Cameron asks about his jade roller — which he uses across his face is an ancient Chinese skin-care tool that helps alleviate under-eye circles and depuff the face.”
“When it comes to my beauty regime, I like to keep it just simple,” he shared — but “simple” in this case is actually not simple at all.”
“I like to look great.”
““For me, I like to feel great.”


"Tell JJJ: what's your beauty habit like?"
"Look at the video below!"
"I love using products that don't do any harm to the environment, you know, methane and gas fumes and stuff like that." Want to see more? "
Cameron also strongly advocated the use of natural ingredients in products: "if you can't eat it, don't put it on your face."
“… Once... "
"Then there's the slam dunk preparation on ice water face. You shouldn't really spend the whole morning just splashing water on your face, he said, before you know to immerse his face in ice water..."
In the video, Cameron asks about his jade roller, an ancient Chinese skin care tool he uses on his face to help reduce eye circles and puffiness
"When it comes to my beauty system, I like to keep it simple," he shared - but "simple" in this case is actually not simple at all
"I like to look great."
"For me, I like it. It feels great."



Number  1021
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They had in fact worked together many years before in Alfred Hitchcock’s The Birds.”
“ADVERTISEMENTADVERTISEMENT A Birds reunion Veronica Cartwright played Jack’s mother and Suzanne Pleshette played Karen’s mom, but the two were not to meet for the first time on the show.”
“She decided to choose the role of Karen over Carrie by flipping a coin.”
“ADVERTISEMENTADVERTISEMENT Megan Mullally’s other job offer Mullally was offered both the role of Karen Walker and the role of Carrie on The King of Queens, which eventually went to Leah Remini.”
“Hot gossip don’t you think?”
“Her husband, Eddie Fisher, actually left Reynolds for Liz.”
“Did you know?”
“Of course Debbie Reynolds, who played Grace’s mother, had a Taylor connection of her own.”
“ADVERTISEMENTADVERTISEMENT Grace’s Elizabeth Taylor connection Grace’s middle name is Elizabeth after Elizabeth Taylor.”
“I was just being myself,” said Barrowman.”


"In fact, they worked together for many years in Alfred Hitchcock's birds."
It's not the first time that Veronica Cartwright plays Jack's mother and Susanna placette plays Karen's mother in bird reunion
"She decided to play Karen instead of Carrie because she tossed a coin."
Megan Mulally's other job was to play Karen Walker and Carrie in the Queen's king, eventually being played by Leah ramini
"Don't you think?"
"Her husband Eddie Fisher actually left Reynolds to Liz."
"Do you know?"
"Of course, Debbie Reynolds, who plays Grace's mother, has her own Taylor relationship."
"Grace's Elizabeth Taylor connection Grace's middle name is Elizabeth after Elizabeth Taylor."
"I'm just being myself," baroman said



Number  1022
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Disney announced last summer that it was pairing Hamilton‘s Lin-Manuel Miranda with Menken for a live-action feature adaptation of The Little Mermaid, with the two writing the songs together and Platt producing with Miranda.”
“Done + Dusted was set to produce the special, with Hamish Hamilton, Ian Stewart, David Jammy, Katy Mullan and Richard Kraft of Kraft-Engel Productions executive producing.”
“The pair won two Oscars for the film, one for Best Score and another for Best Song, “Under the Sea.” Their song “Kiss the Girl” nabbed an Academy Award nom.”
“...but the net said it planned to feature “celebrity artists” to perform Alan Menken and Howard Ashman’s songs from the 1989 film.”
“No cast was announced for The Little Mermaid Live!”
“Wonderful World of Disney brand...”
“The project is so unique that we are making best efforts to do it next year and want to give it all the attention it deserves The network said at its upfront in May that it would stage a live production of the classic underwater tale under the long dormant...”
““We love the idea of doing a live musical and want to make it wonderful.”
“...special, the network said in a statement today.”
““We are postponing the Little Mermaid Live!”


"Disney announced last summer that it will cooperate with lynmanuel Miranda of Hamilton and Mencken to make a live action movie adapted from little mermaid. The two will work together to create songs, and Pratt and Miranda will work together to produce them."
"Done + dusted has been assigned to produce this feature, with Hamish Hamilton, Ian Stewart, David Jamie, Katie Mulan and Richard Kraft of kaffengel productions in charge."
The two won two Oscars for the film, one for best score and the other for best song "the bottom of the sea.". Their song kiss the girl won an Oscar
“…… But the network said it plans to launch "celebrity artists" to perform songs from Alan Mencken and Howard Ashman's 1989 films
"The little mermaid didn't announce the cast at the scene!"
"The wonderful world of Disney brands..."
"This project is very unique, we are doing our best to finish it next year and hope to give it all the things that deserve attention. At its premiere in May, the station said it would stage the live production of the classic underwater story in a long silence... "
"We like the idea of making live musicals and hope to make it wonderful."
“…… In particular, the network said in a statement today
"We delayed the live broadcast of the little mermaid!"



Number  1023
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s Janice,” “We Were on a Break!” and “45 Grove Street — How Can We Afford This Place?” The show, per its website, will open sometime during fall 2017 at New York’s Triad Theater.”
“God.”
“My.”
“The upcoming original show will include songs like “Oh.”
“The Musical.”
“The Musical (Saved by the Bell), and 90210!”
“The Musical!, Bayside!”
“According to the Huffington Post, the musical is by Bob and Tobly McSmith, who previously created spoofs of other seminal late-20th-century TV series with Full House!”
“Also, these buddies hang out in sound stages New York in the ’90s, their names are Rachel, Ross, Monica, Joey, Phoebe, and Chandler, and the relationships don’t always stay very platonic.”
“...will center around six pals in their 20s looking for love and shenanigans.”


"It's Janice," "we're resting! 45 Grove Street - how can we afford this place? "According to its website, the show will open at the New York underworld theater in the fall of 2017."
"God."
"Mine."
The upcoming original shows will include songs like "Oh."
"Musicals."
"Musicals (saved by the bell) and 90210!"
"Musicals! The bay
According to the Huffington Post, the musical was created by Bob and tobly mcsmith, who used full house to make pranks of other groundbreaking TV series at the end of the 20th century
"What's more, these guys often appear on the New York musical stage in the 1990s. Their names are Rachel, Ross, Monica, Joey, Phoebe and Chandler. Their relationship is not always platonic."
“… It's about six friends in their 20s looking for love and pranks. "



Number  1024
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She is trying to stay healthy and enjoy her pregnancy, but the latest drama is too much.””
““It’s still ballin.’ It’s just on a budget.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“The couple celebrated the impending arrival of their baby boy — their first child together — with a jungle-themed baby shower over the weekend.”
“33-year-old Parrish used a sweet Instagram filter to reveal the name of the little one: Kenzo.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kenzos mama,” Parrish wrote on a photo posted to her Insta Story of herself cradling her baby bump.”
“On another shot, she added: “a lioness & her cub.”Hart, 38, was sure to serve a few jokes on his Snapchat at the event held at Calamigos Beach Club in Malibu, California.”
“He showcased a furry guest at the party: a dog with a plush lion mane fitted on its neck.”
“Image zoomImage zoom“When you couldn’t afford the lion so you got a dog and just put the thing around the dog,” he said.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"She's trying to stay healthy and have fun with pregnancy, but the latest story is too much."
"It's still Bahraini, it's just budgetary." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"The couple held a jungle themed baby shower over the weekend to celebrate their upcoming baby boy, their first child together."
"Parrish, 33, revealed the little guy's name with a sweet instagram filter: Kenzo."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Mother kenzos," Parrish wrote in a photo posted on insta, in which she holds her little lump
In another photo, she added: "a lioness and her cubs." Hart, 38, is sure to tell a few jokes on snapchat at an event at the calamigos Beach Club in Malibu, California
"He showed a fluffy guest at the party: a dog with a fluffy lion's mane around its neck."
"When you can't afford a lion, you have a dog and put it around the dog," he said
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  1025
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In preparation for the upcoming season of Bachelor in Paradise, don't miss Becca's season of The Bachelorette, MONDAYS 8|7c on ABC.”
“After a few appearances on the Bachelor franchise, Ashley I. and Jared finally found true love!”
“And for anyone wondering where Paradise could lead them, newly engaged Ashley I. and Jared have proven that anything is possible when it comes to true love!”
“Which romantic hopefuls will follow in the footsteps of Jade and Tanner or Carly and Evan?”
“This season will be sure to feature shocking twists, surprises, unexpected guests and some of the most unlikely relationships in Bachelor history.”
“As they have some fun in the sun, America will witness whether they fall in love or are reintroduced to heartbreak.”
“Starting on the Bachelor in Paradise 2018 premiere date, fans will follow former bachelors and bachelorettes as they explore new relationships while living together in a secluded and dreamy paradise in Mexico on the Bachelor in Paradise 2018 date.”
“While they may have been sent home broken-hearted, now they're all getting the opportunity to travel to a romantic paradise in hopes of finding true love.”
“Breakout fan favorites from The Bachelor and The Bachelorette are back and ready for a second (or third) chance at finding love.”
“Make sure to tune in to the premiere on Tuesday, August 7 (8:00-10:00pm EDT) on ABC.”


"Prepare for the upcoming Bachelor in heaven season. Don't miss Becca's Bachelor season, which is broadcast on ABC at 8:7 on Monday."
"After making several appearances in the bachelor series, Ashley I and Jared have finally found true love!"
"For anyone who wants to know where heaven can take them, newly engaged Ashley I and Jared have proved that everything is possible in terms of true love!"
"Which romantic candidate will follow in the footsteps of Jed and Tanner, Carly and Evan?"
"This season is bound to have shocking turns, surprises, unexpected guests and some of the most unlikely relationships in single history."
"When they have fun in the sun, America will see whether they fall in love or break their hearts again."
"Starting from the premiere of" Bachelor of paradise "in 2018, fans will explore new relationships with former bachelors and single women on the premiere of" Bachelor of paradise "in 2018, and live together in an isolated dream paradise in Mexico."
"Although they may be sent home heartbroken, now they have the opportunity to travel to a romantic paradise, hoping to find true love."
"The favorites of fans of single men and single women are back, and they are ready for a second (or third) chance to find love."
Be sure to watch the ABC premiere on Tuesday, August 7 (8:00-10:00 p.m. EST)



Number  1026
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drop a comment with your thoughts below.”
“...was something incredibly special...”
““Seven years ago, we set out to create a show about hope, where even in the darkest of times, a happy ending would always be possible,” Adam Horowitz and Eddy Kitsis, the creators and executive producers of Once Upon a Time, said in a statement Tuesday.”
““But we never imagined the happy ending that was actually in store for all of us — years and years of adventure, romance, magic and hope.”
“We’re so grateful to our brilliant collaborators — the cast, crew, and writers — as well as our partners at the studio and network for making this journey possible.”
“But most of all, we want to thank the fans.”
“Their fierce loyalty and devotion was the real magic behind Once Upon a Time.”
“We hope they join us for these last few hours as we journey to the Enchanted Forest for one more adventure ABC President Channing Dungey sister of Once s Ursula Merrin Dungey adds When we first heard Adam and Eddy s pitch for Once Upon a Time we knew it...”
“For seven years, they have captivated us with their creativity and passion while reimagining some of our most beloved Disney fairytales, creating an undeniable global hit.”
“Are you ready to say goodbye to Once Upon a Time?”


"Please write down your thoughts below."
“… It's something very special... "
"Seven years ago, we set out to build a show about hope that, even in the darkest of times, will always have a happy ending," Adam Horowitz and eddy kitsis, the creators and executive producers of once, said in a statement on Tuesday
"But we never thought that all of us would have a happy ending - year after year of adventure, romance, magic and hope."
"We are very grateful to our wonderful collaborators - actors, crew and writers - as well as our studio and network partners for making this journey possible."
"But most of all, we want to thank the fans
"Their strong loyalty and dedication were the real magic of the past."
"We hope they can join us in the last few hours, because we will go to the magic forest for adventure after adventure. ABC president Channing Dungey, Ursula merrin Dungey, sister of ons, added that when we first heard the pitch of Adam and Eddie, we knew it was a long time ago..."
"Over the past seven years, they have fascinated us with their creativity and passion, and at the same time, they have re conceived our favorite Disney fairy tales, creating an undeniable global hit."
"Are you ready to say goodbye to the past?"



Number  1027
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scott Garfield | Disney ABC Television Group | Getty Images...”
“Richard Cartwright | Disney ABC Television Group | Getty ImagesAfter high school, Pompeo worked as a bartender until her father encouraged her to pursue acting.”
“"'Are you out of your f------ mind?”
“"I was like, 'I'm not going to be stuck on a medical show for five years,'" she says.”
“When her agent brought her the script for "Grey's," Pompeo balked.”
“She went on to nab parts in "Old School" and "Daredevil" but, by 2004, Pompeo's career had hit a wall and she was almost broke.”
“That marked her first appearance on the big screen.”
“Her breakout moment came in 2002 when she landed a role as the love interest in "Midnight Mile."”
“Ellen Pompeo as Meredith Grey on ABC's "Grey's Anatomy."”
“However, he convinced her to audition anyway, if only to pay her rent.”


"Scott Garfield | Disney ABC TV Group | Getty pictures..."
"Richard Cartwright, Disney ABC television group, Getty Images after high school and Pompeo worked as a bartender after high school until her father encouraged her to perform."
"Are you crazy?"
"I thought, 'I won't be stuck in a medical show for five years,'" she said
"Pompeo hesitated when her agent brought her the play for" gray. "
She continued to play nab in old school and the expendables, but in 2004, Pompeo's career suffered a setback and she almost went bankrupt
"It marks her first appearance on the big screen."
Her breakthrough took place in 2002, when she played a similar role in midnight mile
Alan Pompeo plays Meredith gray in ABC's anatomy of gray
"But he talked her into auditioning, even if it was just to pay the rent."



Number  1028
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Download the app here:”
“Hear us on SBS PopAsia Digital RadioListen in 24/7 on Digital Radio, by downloading our free mobile app or by streaming live here on our website.”
“While Jonghyun didn't make it into the 2018 Grammy Awards In Memorium montage, the SHINee singer was listed on the official Grammy website's Memorium page.”
“As for which artists make it into the montage, Ehrlich explained that it is decided by a committee of about 12 or 13 people from the recording academy.”
“It has been previously explained by Grammys executive producer Ken Ehrlich that out of the hundreds of artists who have passed away each year, "only about 50" can make it into the Grammys In Memorium montage and each can only be on-screen for a few seconds.”
“As the 2018 Grammy Awards In Memorium montage was shown this year, SHINee fans noticed that Jonghyun was not included and quickly took to Twitter to express their thoughts on the singer's exclusion.”
“While the event shows recognition for the best music released in the past 12 months, the Grammys also takes time each year to pay tribute to the artists who have died over the past year.”
“Music's biggest night, the 2018 Grammy Awards, took place last night (January 29) where it was attended by some of music's biggest stars.”
“The 2018 Grammy Awards ceremony honoured about 50 of the hundreds of artists who have passed away in 2017.”


Download application here:
"Listen to us 24 hours a day on SBS popasia digital radiolisten by digital broadcasting, downloading our free mobile app, or streaming live on our website."
"Although Rong Hong did not enter the 2018 Grammy Awards in" memory montage ", the singer SHINee was listed on the" memory "page of the official Grammy website."
As for which artists will be included in montage, Ehrlich explained that it is decided by a committee of about 12 or 13 people from the Recording Academy
"Previously, Grammy executive producer Ken Ehrlich explained that of the hundreds of artists who die each year," only about 50 "can enter Grammy in memory montage, and each one can only appear on the screen for a few seconds."
"With the appearance of the 2018 Grammy Awards in memory montage, SHINee fans noticed that Jonghyun was not included and quickly expressed their thoughts on twitter about the singer's exclusion."
"While the event shows recognition for the best music released in the past 12 months, the Grammy Awards take time every year to pay homage to artists who have died in the past year."
"The biggest night in the music world, the 2018 Grammy Awards ceremony was held last night (January 29), and some music stars attended the ceremony."
"The 2018 Grammy Awards recognized about 50 of the hundreds of artists who died in 2017."



Number  1029
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m not sure we’re going to get Rosanne numbers.” It’s smart not to count on such monumental ratings, but it’s safe to say CBS is sure hoping for them.”
““We’d love to get Roseanne numbers.”
“It will also come with an unexpected twist: instead of running a newsmagazine, as she did in the original series, Candice Bergen’s title heroine will now anchor a morning news show—and her son, Avery, will be her top competitor—at a conservative network.”
“Bergen and the cast celebrated the comedy’s revival on stage Wednesday at CBS’s Upfront presentation at Carnegie Hall.”
““It’s wonderful to hear so many Americans actually cheering a bunch of journalists,” Bergen said as she took the stage with her co-stars.”
““We want to stay really topical, which is why we didn’t shoot a pilot.”
“If we had, we’d already be a dozen major headlines and several Stormies out of date.”
“.”
“The world of cable news is fast-paced and populated with all kinds of characters—from the Hannitys of the world to, well, actual journalists.”


"I'm not sure if we can get Rosen's data." It's wise not to expect such huge ratings, but it's certain that CBS is hopeful about the data
"We'd love to get rosan's number."
"It will also bring an unexpected turn: Candice Bergen's heroine will now host an early morning news show, and her son avery will become her number one rival on conservative TV, rather than running a news magazine as she did in the original series."
"Bergen and the actors celebrated the revival of the comedy at the CBS premiere at Carnegie Hall on Wednesday."
"It's great to hear that so many Americans are really cheering for a group of journalists," Bergen and her partner said on stage
"We want to be really topical, that's why we didn't shoot the pilot."
"If we have, we're already a dozen major headlines and a few storms out of date."
“.”
"The world of cable news is fast paced, full of all kinds of people, from Hanny of the world to the real reporter."



Number  1030
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To this day that haunts me!”She added, “We’re not bankrupt, we’re not struggling, we’re fine!””
““We’re not perfect, we have made a lot of choices financially with real estate that didn’t work out … and that just escalated into this story about financial struggles, bankruptcy.”
““I thought I was being relatable, talking about how celebrities go through financial struggles, too, we make mistakes, too,” she told PEOPLE.”
“The mother of four explained that the rumors started after she wrote her 2013 book, Spelling It Like It Is.”
“In March, Spelling cleared up reports of financial trouble after credit card company American Express sued her in January for failing to pay her outstanding balance of $37,981.97 since summer 2015.”
“The married couple owed a tax lien for $259,108.23 for unpaid state taxes from 2014, according to court documents obtained by PEOPLE in July.”
“The reality star and her husband are slapped with a tax lien by the state of California.”


"To this day, it's bothering me! She also said, "we're not broke, we're not struggling, we're fine!"
"We are not perfect. We have made a lot of financial choices about real estate, but none of them succeeded It escalates into a story of financial distress and bankruptcy. "
"I think I'm dealing with people, talking about how celebrities go through financial difficulties, and we make mistakes," she told people
"The mother of four explained that the rumor started when she wrote the book in 2013, and she spelled it like this."
"In March, Sperling clarified reports of financial problems after American Express, the credit card company, sued her in January for failing to pay the outstanding balance of $37981.97 since the summer of 2015."
"According to documents obtained by the people's court in July this year, the married couple owed $259108.23 in state taxes since 2014."
"The reality TV star and her husband were given a tax lien by the California government."



Number  1031
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My dad was with me that day, and he could tell by the look on my face, to use his words, that something devastating had happened, and I told him.”
“But remember, I’ve told this story from literally the moment I left that hotel room with Harvey.”
“You know, you are the only person of my friends and family who has ever come with me.”
“We traveled together on humanitarian trips to do work in brothels and other sites where sex trafficking takes place.”
“It wasn’t tied to a specific job or event; it’s been a life friendship.”
“AJ: We’ve been really consistent, and we’ve shared facets of our art and our lifestyles, but there’s always been something about our relationship that was enduring.”
“I felt differently about you from the beginning.”
“SH: Maybe I met you in another life.”
“You have to stay with me!” And here I am, 20 years later.”
“You asked me, “Where are you staying?”


"My father was with me that day, and he could see from the expression on my face that, in his words, something devastating had happened, and I told him."
"But remember, I started telling this story the moment Harvey and I left our hotel room."
"You know, you're the only one of my friends and family that's with me."
"We went on humanitarian trips together and worked in brothels and other places where sex was done."
"It has nothing to do with a particular job or event, but a lifelong friendship."
"AJ: we're really consistent. We share all aspects of our art and lifestyle, but there's always something enduring in our relationship."
"I felt different about you from the beginning."
"Maybe I met you in another life."
"You must be with me! "20 years later, I'm here."
You ask me, "where do you live?"



Number  1032
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s so important for my children to see that both their parents are working, and we talk to them about it.””
“I mean, I’m constantly out there working,” she told PEOPLE.”
“The proud parents organized a unicorn-themed 9th birthday party for their second-oldest child on Saturday, July 1.”
“Spelling, 44, and McDermott, 50, who married in 2006, welcomed their friends and family to the fun celebration, complete with unicorn-horn headbands.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Also in attendance were the couple’s four other children: Beau Dean, 5 months, Finn Davey, 5 this month, Hattie Margaret, 5½, and Liam Aaron, 10.”
“McDermott is also dad to 18-year-old son Jack.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoom Credit: Michael Simon/StartraksImage zoom Credit: Michael Simon/startraksphoto.comImage zoom Credit: Michael Simon/StartraksRELATED VIDEO: Tori Spelling Ordered to Pay $220,000 to City National Bank in Default JudgmentIn photos obtained by E!”


"It's very important for my children to see that their parents are working, and we need to talk to them."
"I mean, I work outside a lot," she told people
On Saturday, July 1, proud parents organized a unicorn themed 9th Birthday Party for their second oldest child
Sperling, 44, and McDermott, 50, married in 2006. They used Unicorn headbands to welcome friends and family to the fun celebration
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Also present are the couple's other four children: five month old Bo Dean, five-year-old Finn David, five-and-a-half-year-old Heidi Marguerite and 10-year-old Liam Allen."
"McDermott is also the father of his 18-year-old son Jack."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Image zooming credit: Michael Simon / startraksimage zoom credit: Michael Simon/ startraksphoto.com Photo zoom credit: Michael Simon / starraksrelated Video: Tori Sperling was ordered to pay city National Bank $220000 as e! "



Number  1033
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But Danny also appeals to her because he is talented, bright and cosmopolitan like she is.””
““No moves were made on this first date.”
“Kate Hudson was spotted wearing a ring on her wedding finger while out with musician boyfriend Danny Fujikawa on Sunday — but a source tells PEOPLE the couple is not engaged.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The pair were out riding dirt bikes and shopping in Los Angeles when Hudson, 38, was seen sporting the sparkler.”
“But later that day at the Screen Actors Guild Awards, the actress wasn’t seen wearing the ring.”
“Image zoom Credit: Flight Photo AgencyImage zoom Credit: Flight Photo AgencyThe couple recently celebrated their first anniversary in early December.”
“Hudson took to her Instagram to celebrate the occasion and explained that she and Fujikawa first crossed paths because of her friendship with his stepsisters.”
“However, she was “enormously pregnant” with her 13-year-old son Ryder with ex-husband Chris Robinson at their earliest encounter.”
““A year ago today Danny took me on a hike and what I thought was just a hike with a family friend turned very quickly into an unexpected first date,” she captioned the post.”


"But Denny is also very attractive to her because he is as talented, intelligent and cosmopolitan as she is."
"There was no action on the first date."
"Kate Hudson and musician boyfriend Denny Fujikawa were found wearing a wedding ring when they were out on Sunday, but it was reported that the couple were not engaged."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
When Hudson, 38, was seen playing with a spark light, they were shopping on a homemade bicycle in Los Angeles
"But the actress was not seen wearing a ring at the Screen Actors Guild Awards ceremony later in the day."
"Image zooming credit: Photo zooming credit: the couple recently celebrated their first anniversary in early December."
"Hudson celebrated the moment on her instagram and explained that she first met Fujikawa because of her friendship with his stepsisters."
However, in her first encounter with her 13-year-old son Ryder and ex husband Chris Robinson, she was "pregnant with a huge baby."
"A year ago today, Denny took me on a hike. I thought it was just a hike with a family friend, but it soon turned into an unexpected first date," she wrote in the title of the post



Number  1034
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Happiness is H•O•M•E•M•A•D•E,” she captioned the photo.”
“In July, Mackenzie shared a sweet snap in which she sat under a blanket and rested her hand on top of her bump as Ryan’s hand touched the lower part of her stomach.”
“When asked if her husband was happy, Mackenzie said, “[He] was so excited, he couldn’t contain himself.”Throughout her pregnancy, Mackenzie shared shots of her growing baby bump to Instagram.”
“In an April episode of Teen Mom OG, Mackenzie confirmed her pregnancy when she showed a positive test to producer Jeni, who quickly hugged and congratulated her.”
“PEOPLE is out to MTV for comment.”
“She also has son Hudson, 4, from a previous relationship.”
“Jagger is Mackenzie’s second child.”
“...and 1 oz., according to Radar Online.”
“He weighed 7 lbs.”
“Proud of him!”Image zoom Credit: Mackenzie Edwards/InstagramMackenzie gave birth to the couple’s first child — son Jagger Ryan Edwards — on Oct. 9, PEOPLE confirms.”


"Happiness is h.o.m.e.m.a.d.e," she wrote under the title of the photo
In July, McKenzie shared a sweet interlude as she sat under a blanket with her hand on the lump and Ryan's hand touched the lower part of her stomach
"When asked if his husband was happy, McKenzie said," he's too excited to control himself. " During her pregnancy, McKenzie shared photos of her growing baby lump on instagram
"In April's episode of young mom og, McKenzie showed producer Jennie a positive test result, and Jennie quickly hugged and congratulated her, confirming her pregnancy."
"People are asking MTV for advice."
"She also has an ex-wife's son, Hudson, who is four years old."
"Jagger is McKenzie's second child."
“… There's an ounce left, according to the radar
"He weighs seven pounds."
"Proud of him! "Credit for image zooming: it has been confirmed that McKenzie Edwards / instagram Mackenzie gave birth to the couple's first child, Jagger Ryan Edwards, on October 9."



Number  1035
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We went to dinner the other night just the two of us.” But things quickly dissolved again when Curtis alleges, she was denied time with Harper on Easter.”
““Shane has been to L.A. and the new house,” Curtis told PEOPLE.”
“She opened up about her traumatic experience and trying to support other parents in similar situations to PEOPLE.”
““The holidays are a nightmare because I would have all of us together — friends, family, enemies alike,” the star of HGTV and DIY Network’s Rehab Addict tells PEOPLE, referring to her ex, Shane Maguire, with whom she shares child custody.”
““Thanksgiving was not my parenting time; therefore, I could not be with Harper.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“She continues, “Even on the worst day, my ex is encouraged and welcomed in our home.”
“We recently all went trick-or-treating together, even thought it was ‘my parenting time.’ I always hope that the same courtesy will be extended, but it is not.”
“I am not permitted to be with Harper during his time with his dad.”Maguire’s attorney did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Curtis and Maguire recently reached a custody agreement after an ugly, years-long legal battle, but adhering to the court-mandated hand-offs and subsequently being separated from her toddler for extended periods has been a struggle for the home renovation star, especially at his time of year.”
““I’ve been asked what my Thanksgiving plans are and receive horrified looks when I say, ‘Nothing,'” she wrote on Instagram on Thursday alongside a black-and-white photo of her, Harper, and her older son, Ethan, who she shares with ex Steven Cimini.”


"We went to dinner the other night." But it soon dissipated again, Curtis said. She didn't have time with Harper on Easter day
"Shane has been to Los Angeles and a new house," Curtis told people
"She disclosed her traumatic experience and tried to support other parents in similar situations."
"Vacations are a nightmare because I'm going to keep all of us together - friends, family, enemies," HGTV and DIY's rehabilitation addict star told people, referring to her ex boyfriend, Shane Maguire, who she shares custody with
"Thanksgiving is not my parenting time; therefore, I can't be with Harper." Get news, feature, etc
"Even on the worst day, my ex was encouraged and welcomed in our family," she continued
"Recently, we all went to play trick or treat together. We even thought it was' my parenting time '. I've always wanted the same etiquette to continue, but it's not
"I'm not allowed to be with Harper while he's with his father." Mr. Maguire's lawyers didn't immediately respond to requests for comment
"Curtis and Maguire recently reached a custody agreement after an ugly, years long lawsuit, but insisted on the transfer of court rules, and then separated from their toddlers for a long time, which is a struggle for the home decoration star, especially at this time of year."
She wrote on instagram on Thursday: "when someone asked me what my Thanksgiving plan was, I was scared when I said 'nothing.' Next to the photo is a black-and-white photo of Harper and Ethan, which she shared with former Steven cimini



Number  1036
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“His again seemed thrilled with the adventure as she headed up the stairs into the aircraft.”
“'Off to Barcelona,' Arie captioned a video showing a white and bright purple plane as it sat on the tarmac, waiting for its passengers to climb aboard.”
“He showed off his svelte legs in a fitted pair of navy pants, and he clashed them elegantly against a shade of deep brown boots.”
“...of his toned forearms...”
“...his bottoms Cozy He showed off his svelte legs in a fitted pair of navy pants and he clashed them elegantly against a shade of deep brown boots The hunky race car driver turned reality star folded up the sleeves of his top to the elbow allowing for a glimpse...”
“...open When you got it The hunky race car driver turned reality star folded up the sleeves of his top to the elbow allowing for a glimpse of his toned forearms Accessorizing A gleaming watch was clasped round his left wrist and it featured a navy strap that elegantly matched...”
“Feeling free The two of them wore faces of blissful relaxation as they danced on the sidewalk to the apparent total disinterest of passersby So chic Arie who sports distinguished flecks of grey in his hair wore a navy and black checked button down shirt with its top button left...”
“Arie, who sports distinguished flecks of grey in his hair, wore a navy and black checked button-down shirt with its top button left open.”
“Taking his bride-to-be playfully by the hand, Arie spun her around in a bit of a dance as pedestrians ambled past them along the sidewalk.”
“...seemed to be drinking in their fill of the city s sights both pointing outward with looks of wonderment on their faces...”


"When she went up the stairs to the plane, he seemed excited about the adventure again."
"Fly to Barcelona," airy wrote in a video of a white and bright purple plane sitting on the tarmac waiting for passengers to board
He wore a fitting pair of Navy Pants, flaunting his slender legs and gracefully colliding with the shadow of dark brown boots
“… His strong forearm... "
“…… He is wearing a comfortable lower garment and a pair of fitting Navy trousers, showing his slim legs. He gracefully bumps his legs into the shadow of dark brown boots. This is a burly racer who later became a reality show star. He folds the sleeve of his coat to the elbow, giving people a glimpse of what it is like... "
“… When you open it, this burly Racer turns into a reality TV star. He folds the sleeve of his coat to his elbow, so that you can see his strong forearm at a glance. On his left wrist, there is a sparkling watch with a navy blue strap on it, which is a perfect match... "
"When they dance on the sidewalk, their faces are happy and relaxed. Obviously, they are not welcome by passers-by at all, so the fashionable airy has obvious gray spots on his hair. He is wearing a navy blue and Black Plaid Shirt with buttons on the left side..."
Eri's hair has obvious gray spots. He's wearing a navy blue and Black Plaid Shirt with open buttons
"Ali took the bride to be's hand to play around, walking slowly along the sidewalk with pedestrians."
“…… It seems that they are enjoying the scenery of the city. They both look surprised... "



Number  1037
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Not everyone is convinced all the fuss is necessary though.”
““I was thrilled to work with Pippa on her wedding dress,” Deacon said.”
“The younger sister of the Duchess of Cambridge had been friends with 41-year-old hedge fund manager Matthews for ten years before he proposed in July 2016 (after a year of dating) with a 3.5 carat engagement ring.”
“The wedding, taking place at St Mark's Church in the Berkshire village of Englefield, has been dubbed an “almost royal wedding” - there’s a Snapchat filter marking the occasion and #Pippaswedding is trending on both sides of the Atlantic.”
“Pippa Middleton marries James Matthews Show all 8 1 8 Pippa Middleton marries James Matthews Pippa Middleton marries James Matthews Pippa Middleton with her father Michael AFP Getty Pippa Middleton marries James Matthews She wore a bespoke Giles Deacon dress AFP Getty Images Pippa Middleton marries James Matthews The Duke...”
“...of Cambridge and Prince Harry were in attendance AFP Getty Pippa Middleton marries James Matthews As were Roger Federer and his wife Mirka AFP Getty Images Pippa Middleton marries James Matthews Brother of the groom and former Made In Chelsea star Spencer Matthews AFP Getty Images Pippa Middleton marries James...”
“Matthews The Duchess of Cambridge with the pageboys and bridesmaids AFP Getty Images Pippa Middleton marries James Matthews Prince George and Princess Charlotte AFP Getty Images Pippa Middleton marries James Matthews The newlyweds AFP Getty Images Many high profile guests are in attendance The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge Prince...”
“Harry former Made In Chelsea star brother to the groom and best man Spencer Matthews Princesses Beatrice and Eugenie and Roger Federer and his wife Mirka...”
“Prince George and Princess Charlotte have also stolen the hearts of the public with their outfits as two of the pageboys and bridesmaids.”
“The bride arrived with her father Michael at around 11.15am in an open-top classic car.”


"However, not everyone thinks it's necessary to make a fuss."
"I'm excited to be able to make a wedding dress with Pippa," Dicken said
"The Duchess of Cambridge's sister befriended Matthews, a 41 year old hedge fund manager, for 10 years until he proposed in July 2016 (after a year of dating) with a 3.5 carat engagement ring."
"The wedding was held at St. Mark's Church in engerfield village, Berkshire, and it's called" almost royal wedding "- there's a snapchat filter to mark the moment, and pippaswedding is popular on both sides of the Atlantic."
"Pippa Middleton married James Matthews to show all 8 1 Pippa Middleton married James Matthews Pippa Middleton married James Matthews Pippa Middleton and her father Michael AFP Getty Pippa Middleton married James Matthews she wore a custom Giles deacon dress Getty picture Pippa Middleton married the Duke of James Matthews... "
“… Cambridge and Prince Harry attend AFP Getty Pitty Middleton marries James Matthews Roger Federer and his wife Milka AFP Getty picture Pitty Middleton marries James Matthews groom and former Chelsea star Spencer Matthews brother AFP Getty picture Pitty Middleton marries James
"The Duchess of Matthews Cambridge and pager boy and bridesmaid AFP Getty pictures Pippa Middleton married James Matthews Prince George and Princess Charlotte
"Harry, former Chelsea star brother, bridegroom and best man Spencer Matthews, Princess Beatrice and Eugenie, Roger Federer and his wife Mirka..."
"Prince George and Princess Charlotte also stole the public's heart in the guise of two pagers and bridesmaids."
"The bride and father Michael arrived around 11:15 a.m. in a classic convertible car."



Number  1038
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Harry purchased the house for $6,870,000 in January 2016, so he's had it for two years.”
“There's a gated two-car garage and other parking spaces for cars.”
“To keep prying eyes away, the house is up a long drive to ensure complete privacy.”
“(Image: Hilton & Hyland) (Image: Hilton & Hyland) (Image: Hilton & Hyland) (Image: Hilton & Hyland) (Image: Hilton & Hyland)The modern home also comes with a laundry room, alarm system and hardwood flooring.”
“Additionally, the house has green energy technology.”
“The home features a hot tub, spa and pool.”
“(Image: Hilton & Hyland) (Image: Hilton & Hyland) (Image: Hilton & Hyland) (Image: Hilton & Hyland) (Image: Hilton & Hyland)There's also a fire place, central heating and air conditioning, keeping the pad cool and hot at all the right times.”
“The impressive house was originally built in 1963 and features a breakfast room, living room, master bedroom, large patio, home theater and two other bedrooms.”
“The house - which sits on a 25 acre lot - also has a gym with a bright yellow spin bike suggesting Harry likes to workout in the comfort of his own home.”
“(Image: Hilton & Hyland) (Image: Hilton & Hyland)And he clearly has a secret penchant for cow print as the entranceway features a cow hide rug - and matching chairs can be found in one of the three bedrooms.”


"Harry bought the house for $6.87 million in January 2016, so he has owned it for two years."
"There's a closed two car garage and other parking spaces."
"In order not to let prying eyes in, this house has to be driven a long way to ensure complete privacy."
"(picture: Hilton and Helan) (picture: Hilton and Helan) (picture: Hilton and Helan) (picture: Hilton and Helan) (picture: Hilton and Helan) modern houses also have laundry, alarm system and hardwood floors."
"In addition, the house has green energy technology."
There is a hot tub, a spa and a swimming pool
"(picture: Hilton and Hailan) (picture: Hilton and Hailan) (picture: Hilton and Hailan) (picture: Hilton and Hailan) (picture: Hilton and Hailan) there is also a fire department with central heating and air conditioning to keep the floor mats hot and cold at any suitable time."
The impressive house, originally built in 1963, has a breakfast room, living room, master bedroom, large terrace, home theater and two other bedrooms
"It's a 25 acre house with a gym and a bright yellow spinning bike, which means Harry likes to work out comfortably in his own home."
(information photo: Hilton and Helan Hotel) (information photo: Hilton and Helan Hotel) he obviously has a secret hobby of cattle print, because there is a cow leather carpet at the entrance - a matching chair can be found in one of the three bedrooms. "



Number  1039
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He's A GeniusWill showed us he can rap and act, but when he jumped on camera and conquered a Rubik’s Cube, we realized he can do anything – even master the philosophies of a colorful square puzzle.”
“He's MotivationalNo matter the subject, Will always finds new ways of encouraging people to cut the dead weight out of their lives, so that they can shine brighter.”
“Beyoncé shut it down.”
“But Will Smith brought it back to life the day he joined Instagram.”
“While the social media platform launched back in 2018, it wasn't until one fateful day in December 2017 that the Fresh Prince decided to post his first IG picture.”
“It's been on ever since.”
“The charismatic super star let fans into his childhood when he shared a baby photo that required no filters.”
“Approximately seven IG posts later, he had everyone hooked, especially when he showed just how proud he is to be a father by uploading a split image of Jaden and himself in similar poses at two different events.”
“Will then reminded his fans and binge watchers everywhere to keep watching Netflix (before the whole Mo’Nique boycott went down).”
“But it isn't just his wit and family pics that has everyone following Smith—it's his life advice.”


"He's a genius. Will showed us that he can rap and perform, but when he jumped on the camera and conquered the cube, we realized that he could do anything - and even mastered the philosophy of a color square puzzle."
"He's very motivating. No matter what the theme is, he will find new ways to encourage people to reduce the burden in their lives, so that they can be more brilliant."
"Beyonce, turn it off."
"But will smith revived instagram the day he joined it."
"Although the social media platform was launched as early as 2018, it was not until a decisive day in December 2017 that the new prince decided to release his first funny photo."
"It's been on since then."
"The glamorous superstar shared a picture of a baby that didn't need a filter, bringing fans into his childhood."
"After about seven funny posts, he attracted everyone, especially when he uploaded a split photo of Jaden and himself in similar posture in two different activities to show his pride as a father."
"Will then reminded his fans and Carnival observers everywhere to keep an eye on Netflix (before the entire Mo'Nique boycott failed)
"But it's not just his wisdom and family photos that make everyone follow Smith, it's his life advice."



Number  1040
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Proving there s no look she can t perfect Kaia donned an over sized shirt that was emblazoned with a tie dye motif in citrus shades...”
“Kaia's loud dress flashed a glimpse of her torso with a key-hole cut-out across the tummy while fringed detailing at the hem made for even more of a show-stopping look.”
“And Kaia Gerber showed no sign of slowing down as she walked in Anna Sui's Spring Summer 2019 showcase on Monday evening, just hours after commanding attention on Proenza Schouler's runway.”
“The 17 year old star who has been one of NYFW s most sought after models flaunted her versatility as she sampled an array of eccentric looks with top model sisters Gigi and Bella Hadid also strutting their stuff in...”
“...the showcase...”
“In demand New York Fashion Week fixture Kaia Gerber showed no sign of slowing down as she walked in Anna Sui s Spring Summer 2019 showcase on Monday evening just hours after commanding attention on Proenza Schouler s runway The...”
“...first look saw Kaia sport a kooky floral jumpsuit that boasted a stylish double collar and belt feature to draw attention to her svelte waist...”
“The vibrant look was paired with beaded orange costume jewellery, which complemented the design's tangerine lining, and the controversial combination of socks and sandals.”
“Her hairstyle was equally outlandish, with Kaia's trademark brunette tresses being tied into a messy top knot that sat on the hairline.”
“The 17 year old star who has been one of NYFW s most sought after models flaunted her versatility as she sampled an array of eccentric looks Kaia s first look on the Anna Sui runway saw the beauty sport...”


"Kaya put on a large shirt with orange tie dye pattern on it, proving that she didn't have a perfect appearance..."
"Kaya's high-profile skirt gives a glimpse of her torso, with a keyhole in her abdomen, and the details of tassels on her skirt make her look more like a standstill."
"On Monday night, Kaia Gerber showed no sign of slowing down at Anna Sui's spring / summer 2019 fashion show. Just a few hours ago, she won attention on Proenza Schouler's catwalk."
"The 17-year-old star has always been one of the most sought after FW models in New York. She shows off her versatility and shows off her style with her top model sisters Gigi and Bella Hadid..."
“… Show... "
"During the booming New York Fashion Week, Kaia Gerber showed no sign of slowing down when she walked on Anna Sui's spring / summer 2019 fashion show on Monday night. Just a few hours ago, she attracted people's attention on Proenza Schouler's catwalk..."
“…… At first sight, I saw Kaia wearing a strange flower jumpsuit, which attracted people's attention to her slim waist with its fashionable double collar and belt... "
"The vibrant design matches the pearly orange clothing and jewelry, complements the designed orange lining, and the matching of socks and sandals is controversial."
Her hairstyle is equally bizarre, with Kaya's signature dark hair tied in a messy top knot on the hairline
"The 17-year-old star has always been one of the most sought after models of FAW Volkswagen in New York. She showed her versatility. She appreciated a series of strange shapes of Kaya on the Anna Su T stage, and saw the beauty contest at the first sight..."



Number  1041
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More:Scott Baio: Allegations he harassed, assaulted child actors are 'media witch hunt'More:Scott Baio denies sexual misconduct charge by former co-star Nicole Eggert...”
“The pair have been married since 2007 and share a daughter, Bailey Deluca Baio, 10.”
“Baio said he and Eggert had a consensual relationship when she was 18.”
“More recently, the Baios have made headlines for the sexual misconduct charges former Charles in Charge co-star Nicole Eggert has lodged against the actor.”
“In 2015, the Happy Days actor revealed on Facebook that she had been diagnosed with a brain tumor.”
“This isn't the first health trouble for Baio's wife.”
“Microvascular brain disease, or chronic small vessel ischemic disease, is a common condition that affects the small blood vessels in the brain, according to Health Line.”
“Toughest person I know."”
“"Renee is forever my rock, my life & my soulmate!”
“"Unfortunately, this is true," he wrote.”


"More: Scott baio: his charges of harassing and beating child actors are" media political persecution "more: Scott baio denies sexual misconduct charges of former co star Nicole Eggert..."
"They have been married since 2007 and have a daughter, 10-year-old Bailey druka Bao."
"Bao said he and Eggert had a voluntary relationship when she was 18."
"Recently, the bai'ao family made headlines over the sexual misconduct charges of former Charles Eggert co star Nicole Eggert against the actor."
"In 2015, the happy time actress revealed on Facebook that she was diagnosed with a brain tumor."
"It's not the first health problem for Bao's wife."
"Microvascular encephalopathy, or chronic small vessel ischemic disease, is a common disease that affects small blood vessels in the brain, according to the health hotline."
"The strongest man I know."
"Renee will always be my rock, my life, my soul mate!"
"Unfortunately, this is true," he wrote



Number  1042
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(See CNSP stock analysis on TipRanks) aTyr Pharma (LIFE) The next stock we’re looking at, aTyr Pharma, has a focus on inflammatory disease.”
“Given the $8.33 average price target, shares could climb ~275% in the year ahead.”
“Both tickers boast a Strong Buy consensus rating and could climb over 200% higher in the year ahead.”
“Bearing this in mind, we used TipRanks’ database to find two compelling penny stocks, according to Wall Street analysts.”
“These experts bring in-depth knowledge of the industries they cover and substantial experience to the table.”
“By taking a cue from the analyst community.”
“So, how should investors approach a potential penny stock investment?”
“The risk involved with these plays scares off the faint hearted as very real problems like weak fundamentals or overwhelming headwinds could be masked by the low share prices.”
“And if you are prone to look at high-risk, small- to mid-cap stocks, you’ll find yourself drawn to penny stocks.”
““We stick to our view that 2021 will be a stockpicker’s paradise with big money-making opportunities if you are willing to go against the grain… Many macro indicators did fall in January but SMid-Caps and equities in general continued to edge higher,” Lecubarr noted.”


"(see CNSP's stock analysis of tipranks) atyr Pharma (life) our next stock focus atyr Pharma focuses on inflammatory diseases."
"Given the average target price of $8.33, the share price is likely to rise by about 275% over the next year."
"Both companies have strong buy consensus ratings and are likely to rise more than 200% in the next year."
"With that in mind, according to Wall Street analysts, we used the tipranks database to find two compelling low-priced stocks."
"These experts bring in-depth knowledge and experience in the industries they cover."
"Get clues from the analytical world."
"So, how should investors deal with potential low price stocks?"
"The risks involved in these games scare the cowards away, because low share prices can mask very real problems such as weak fundamentals or overwhelming disadvantages."
"If you tend to look at high-risk small and medium cap stocks, you will find yourself attracted by low price stocks."
"We insist on our view that 2021 will be a paradise for stock selection. If you are willing to go up against the trend, there will be a lot of opportunities to make money Many macro indicators did fall in January, but the SMID cap and stocks as a whole continued to rise slightly, "lecubarr said



Number  1043
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jenner who gave birth to daughter Stormi Webster earlier this month revealed on social media that she was feeling under the weather...”
“RELATED VIDEO Kim Khloé Rob Kardashian Enjoy Kris Jenner s Valentine s Dinner and a Kanye West Sing Along While Khloé Kardashian presumably wasn t in attendance because she s currently in the third trimester of her pregnancy and spending the weekend in L A with boyfriend Tristan Thompson Kylie...”
“Of course, not every KarJenner sister was able to make the wintery trip.”
““Time off,” she wrote alongside a video showing the model carving her way down the slopes on a snowboard.”
“Image zoom Credit: Kim Kardashian/InstagramMeanwhile, Jenner went on to document her actual ride down the mountain.”
“Kim also documented their ride up the mountain, as she shared a short video of her snow-covered skis dangling in the air on her Instagram stories.”
““Guess who” she captioned the photo, in which both her and her siblings’ faces were obscured by goggles and scarves.”
“...in which they were making their way up a mountain together on a ski lift...”
“Kourtney later hinted at the trio s location writing on Instagram stories Salt Lake Image zoom Credit Kim Kardashian Instagram Image zoom After the Keeping Up With the Kardashians stars suited up and got ready to brave the wintery climate the 38 year old shared a selfie with her sisters...”
“Both sisters looked cozy as they lounged together in sweatpants and white sneakers.”


"Jenna gave birth to her daughter, Tommy Webster, earlier this month, and she revealed on social media that she was unwell..."
"Related videos Kim khlo é rob Kardashian enjoys Kris Jenner's Valentine's Day dinner and Kanye West concert, while khlo é Kardashian probably didn't attend because she was in Los Angeles with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson Kylie at the weekend of her third trimester of pregnancy..."
"Of course, not every kajana sister can take a winter trip."
"Break time," she wrote next to a video in which a model carves down a slope on a snowboard
"Photo zooming credit: Kim Kardashian / instagram meanwhile, Jenner continues to record her real downhill journey."
"Kim also recorded their ascent to the mountain, sharing a short video of snowboarding hanging in the air on instagram."
"Guess who," she wrote in the title of the photo, her and her siblings' faces covered with goggles and scarves
“… They went up the mountain by ski cable car together... "
"Coultney later hinted that the positions of the three were written in instagram stories Salt Lake Image Zooming credit card Daisy instagram image zooming, to keep up with the dress of the star, ready to face the winter climate bravely, 38 year old she shared a self portrait with her sisters..."
"The two sisters strolled together in sweatpants and white sneakers. They both looked very comfortable."



Number  1044
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I love you mama.””
““You have no idea how much it means to me Samantha.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Snooki & JWOWW Describe Their Ideal ‘Jersey Shore’ Reunion“I’m so happy my sweetheart was able to come and celebrate with me today,” Cortese captioned a May 20 Instagram shot.”
“Giancola, 30, has been supporting Cortese throughout her journey to the altar, having attended her former housemate’s bridal shower back in May.”
“(The reality star’s bridesmaids also threw her a bachelorette weekend in New Orleans in August, which included partying in the French Quarter and a drag brunch.)”
““I love all these people so much,” Cortese, 30, wrote on Instagram Sept. 23.”
“Image zoomImage zoom Credit: Vinny Guadagnino Instagram StoryDelVecchio, Farley, Giancola, Guadagnino and Polizzi all surprised Cortese last month by kicking off her bachelorette party weekend with dinner at Martorano’s in Atlantic City.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The pair, who got engaged last year during a trip to Mexico, tied the knot Saturday at Laurita Winery in New Egypt, New Jersey.”
“Jersey Shore star Deena Cortese and her longtime boyfriend Christopher Buckner said "I do" Saturday at a New Jersey wineryJersey Shore star Deena Cortese and her longtime boyfriend Christopher Buckner are married!”


"I love you, mom."
"You don't know how much this means to me, Samantha."
"Related video: snooki & jwoww describes their ideal reunion on the west coast of Jersey," Cortese wrote in an instagram photo on May 20: "I'm glad my wife can come and celebrate with me today."
Giankola, 30, has been supporting Curtis throughout her walk to the altar, attending her former roommate's bridal shower in May
(the reality star's Bridesmaid also hosted a singles weekend in New Orleans in August, including a party in the French Quarter and a drag brunch.)
"I love these people so much," Curtis, 30, wrote on instagram on September 23
"Photo scaling photo scaling credit: Vinny guadagnino instagram story del Vecchio, Farley, giancala, guadagnino and Polizzi all surprised Cortese last month and started her bachelor party weekend with dinner at martrano's in Atlantic City."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
They were engaged while traveling in Mexico last year and married on Saturday at Laurita winery in new Egypt, New Jersey
"I do," Jersey coast star Dina Curtis and her old boyfriend Christopher Buckner said at a New Jersey winery on Saturday. Jersey coast star Dina Curtis is married to her old boyfriend Christopher Buckner



Number  1045
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: How Tabloids Dragged Ambra Gutierrez Through the Mud After She Accused Harvey Weinstein of Groping Her"Women's Rights Are Human Rights": 62 Fashion Insiders Speak Out in a Powerful Video for International Women's Day:”
“Meanwhile, Weinstein has announced his departure from Los Angeles to seek treatment in a rehabilitation center.”
“On Thursday, Beckinsale posted a photo of her teenage self on Instagram with a caption recounting an alleged encounter between her and Weinstein.”
“"I was called to meet Harvey Weinstein at the Savoy Hotel when I was 17," she writes.”
“"I assumed it would be in a conference room which was very common."”
“The actress then describes behavior almost identical to that detailed by many other women who have accused Weinstein of sexual harassment or assault, and that appeared in the exposes written by The New York Times and The New Yorker.”
“"When I arrived reception told me to go to his room," Beckinsale continued.”
“"He opened the door in his bathrobe.”
“I was incredibly naive and young and it did not cross my mind that this older, unattractive man would expect me to have any sexual interest in him.”
“After declining alcohol and announcing that I had school in the morning I left, uneasy but unscathed."”


Related reports: Ambra Gutierrez accused Harvey Weinstein of touching her "women's rights are human rights" and how tabloids dragged her into the mire: 62 Fashion Figures spoke in a powerful video on International Women's Day:
Meanwhile, Weinstein has announced to leave Los Angeles and go to the rehabilitation center for treatment
"On Thursday, Beckinsale posted a photo of her as a teenager on instagram with a description of an alleged encounter between her and Weinstein."
"When I was 17, I got a call to meet Harvey Weinstein at the Savoy Hotel," she wrote
"I thought it was in a very ordinary conference room."
The actions described by the actress are almost the same as those described by many other women who have accused Weinstein of sexual harassment or abuse, which appear in public reports written by the New York Times and the new Yorker
"When I arrived, the reception desk told me to go to his room," continued beckinsell
"He opened the door in his bathrobe."
"I was incredibly naive, incredibly young, and this old, ugly man would expect me to have any sexual interest in him."
"After giving up drinking and announcing that I was going to school in the morning, I left, uneasy but unscathed."



Number  1046
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"He is very romantic and attentive towards Her.”
“News: "She texted her close friends and said, 'I think I am in love and I never felt this way before!'”
“Sharing snaps from the weekend to Instagram, Taylor and her pals could be seen decked out in patriotic swimwear as they rode the giant wild water slide in her garden.”
“With the likes of Cara Delevingne, Karlie Kloss, Gigi Hadid, Blake Lively and Ruby Rose gathering at her lavish home it's no surprise she pulled out all the stops.”
“The Shake It Off beauty is known for her extravagant Independence Day celebrations and this year Taymerica was no different.”
“We have contacted Taylor's reps for comment.”
“And one added: "I think my goal in life is to one day be invited to one of Taylor Swift's July fourth parties."”
“She makes & keeps friends!"”
“But the claims were met with anger from some solid Taylor fans, as one wrote: "Taylor's squad is not fake.”
“Meanwhile some even hit out at her famous friends, with one writing: "I feel like Taylor's squad is fake and Only shows up on holidays like tomrrow lol."”


"He was very romantic and considerate to her."
News: "she texted a close friend and said," I think I'm in love. I've never felt that way before! "
"Taylor and her friends share photos of the weekend on instagram, wearing patriotic swimsuits and riding huge wild water slides in the garden."
"With Carla delaviny, Carly Klaus, Gigi Hadid, Blake Lively and Ruby Ross gathering in her luxurious home, it's not surprising that she's going all out."
"Getting rid of beauty is known for its extravagant Independence Day celebrations, and this year taymerica is no exception."
"We have contacted Taylor's representative for advice."
"I think my goal in life is to be invited to Taylor Swift's July 4th party one day," one of them said
"She makes and keeps friends!"
However, this statement was angered by some loyal Taylor fans, who wrote: "Taylor's team is not fake."
At the same time, some even attacked her famous friends, one of whom wrote: "I think Taylor's lineup is fake, only on holidays like tomorrow."



Number  1047
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The original photo link is in the… Posted by Erica Denae Meshke on Thursday, June 21, 2018”
“This man is the pretty face that is used as a lure to get girls into unsafe situations Also Read Bachelorette Contestant Lincoln Adim Convicted of Indecent Assault and Battery The accusation comes after current Bachelorette contestant Lincoln Adim was convicted of indecent assault and battery in May for an...”
““An allegation has been made against a contestant on next week’s episode of ‘The Proposal.’ While the accusation was not related to the contestant’s appearance on the program, we take it very seriously.”
“ABC and the producers of ‘The Proposal’ are pulling the episode while this matter is under review,” ABC and Warner Horizon said in a joint statement Friday.”
“The contestant in question was eliminated in the first round but was accused by Milwaukee resident Erica Denae Meshke on Facebook of being directly responsible for my date rape Also Read Ratings ABC s Proposal Premiere Probably Wishes It Didn t Engage With American Ninja Warrior In a Facebook post...”
“Meshke wrote that she and the contestant met on Tinder and when they met he left her alone with two older men who then spiked her drink and took her to an apartment where the things I endured for the next 5 hours were unspeakable She said that she ran...”
“...into him later and confronted him about the incident...”
““Once I reminded him of who I was, he acknowledged his part in that evening, and tried to argue with me and justify what he did, but was promptly asked to leave the bar by employees/my friends,” she wrote.”
“...incident that occurred in 2016”
“Edit: I'm removing the original photo link this was attached to for sharing purposes.”


"The original photo link is located in Released by Erica denae meshke on Thursday, June 21, 2018 "
"This man is a beautiful face, which is used to lure girls into an unsafe environment. Also read the single female athlete Linken adim was sentenced to indecency and assault charges before the current single female athlete Linken adim was sentenced to indecency and assault for may as a..."
"A charge was made against a contestant on next week's proposal. Although this accusation has nothing to do with the player's performance in the show, we take it very seriously. "
"ABC and the producers of the proposal are taking the episode down as they review the matter," ABC and Warner horizon said in a joint statement on Friday
"This contestant was eliminated in the first round, but was accused of being directly responsible for my date rape by Milwaukee resident Erica Dana meishke on Facebook, and also read the ratings ABC's proposal premiere, which may hope it didn't contact American Ninja fighters in the Facebook post..."
"Meishke wrote that she and the contestants met in tinder, and when they met, he left her alone with two older men, and then they added wine to her and took her to an apartment where I endured the next five hours, unspeakable, she said she ran away..."
“… Then I confronted him again. "
"As soon as I reminded him who I was, he admitted his role that night and tried to argue with me and justify what he had done, but was soon asked by the staff / my friends to leave the bar," she wrote
"Events in 2016"
"Edit: I'm deleting the original photo link attached for sharing."



Number  1048
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...gospel artist Tasha Cobbs Leonard Top social artist BTS Top touring artist U2 Chart achievement award Camila Cabello Icon award Janet Jackson...”
“...duo group Imagine Dragons Top R B artist Bruno Mars Top rap artist Kendrick Lamar Top country artist Chris Stapleton Top rock artist Imagine Dragons Top Latin artist Ozuna Top dance electronic artist The Chainsmokers Top Christian artist MercyMe Top...”
“...by Kendrick Lamar Top artist Ed Sheeran Top new artist Khalid Top female artist Taylor Swift Top male artist Ed Sheeran Top streaming songs artist Kendrick Lamar Top song sales artist Ed Sheeran Top radio songs artist Ed Sheeran Top...”
“Top Hot 100 song: "Despacito" by Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee featuring Justin BieberTop Billboard 200 album: "DAMN."”
“Ed Sheeran, who was not at the show, won big, in categories that included top artist and top male artist, while Janet Jackson won the icon award.”
“LAS VEGAS -- Here are the winners in the top categories at the 2018 Billboard Music Awards, held Sunday at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas.”


“… Evangelical artist Tasha cobs Leonard top social artist BTS top roving artist U2 list achievement award Camilla Cabello idol award Janet Jackson... "
“… Duet group imagine dragons top RB artist Bruno Mars top rap artist Kendrick Lamar top country artist Chris Stapleton top rock artist imagine dragons top Latin artist ozuna top dance electronics artist chainmokers top Christian artist mercyme top... "
“… By Kendrick Lamar top artist ed Sheeran top new artist Khalid top female artist Taylor Swift top male artist ed Sheeran top streaming music artist Kendrick Lamar top song sales artist ed Sheeran top radio song artist ed Sheeran top... "
Top 100 songs: "despacito" by Louis fonsey and Yankee dad on Justin biebertop's billboard 200 Album: "Damn it."
"Ed Sheeran didn't take part in the show. He won awards including top artists and top male artists, while Janet Jackson won the idol award."
"Las Vegas - here are the winners of the 2018 Billboard Music Awards at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas on Sunday."



Number  1049
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was wonderful to work so closely with her in creating this custom look.”This post has been updated throughout.”
““She is an amazingly talented actor who has incredible style and presence.”
““We are truly honored that Scarlett chose to wear Marchesa for the Met Gala,” said Marchesa in a statement.”
“Endorsing Chapman’s line appears to be Johansson’s tacit way of saying that women shouldn’t be penalized for the crimes of the men in their lives, something that many #MeToo supporters will likely be able to get on board with.”
““I wore Marchesa because their clothes make women feel confident and beautiful and it is my pleasure to support a brand created by two incredibly talented and important female designers,” she said.”
“In a quote provided to the Cut, Johansson said that she wore Marchesa because she wanted to show her support for the women behind the brand.”
“But recently Marchesa has made efforts to rehabilitate its image, with co-founder Keren Craig telling Refinery29 that the brand wants to support the #MeToo movement.”
“Photo: Neilson Barnard/Getty ImagesOnce a red-carpet staple, Marchesa saw its popularity plummet in the wake of the Weinstein scandal, especially after stories suggested that Weinstein had pressured actresses in his films to wear his wife’s dresses.”
“Scarlett Johansson and Colin Jost.”
“This marks the first time a major celebrity has worn Marchesa to a red carpet event since the Weinstein allegations broke.”


"It's great to work so closely with her to create this custom look." This blog post is constantly updated
"She's a brilliant actress with incredible style and style."
"We are really honored that Scarlett chose to wear machesha to the met Party," machesha said in a statement
"To support Chapman's view seems to be Johnson's tacit statement that women should not be punished for men's crimes in life, which many supporters of meto are likely to agree with."
"I wear Marchesa because their clothes make women feel confident and beautiful, and I'm happy to support a brand created by two talented and important women designers," she said
"In a quote to the clippings, Johnson said she wore Marchesa because she wanted to express her support for the women behind the brand."
"But recently, Marchesa has been trying to reinvent herself, and co-founder Keren Craig told refinery29 that the brand wants to support the metoo movement."
"Photos: pictures of Nelson Barnard / Getty" as the main product on the red carpet, marquesar's popularity plummeted after the Weinstein scandal, especially when it was reported that Weinstein pressed actresses to wear his wife's clothes in his films
"Scarlett Johnson and Colin Jost."
"This marks the first time since Weinstein's accusation came to light that a big star has participated in the red carpet event wearing makisa."



Number  1050
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“Dancing With the Stars airs on ABC Mondays at 8 p.m.”
“Check back each week for her latest update on the competition.”
“I knew that Joe and I had an Argentine Tango, and I was so excited because I’ve had the perfect song I’ve been trying to do for seasons.”
“I really thought “El Tango Roxanne” was perfect for Halloween night.”
“It’s creepy and intense.”
“I wanted us to be a character, not dead zombies or something.”
“So, I thought Mrs. and Mr. Frankenstein would be awesome and Joe would pull it off.He danced so great; this was by far Joe’s best dance.”
“I was so happy for him, especially since the judges were very complimentary, and he just had an epic performance.”
“I think this was great for his confidence going into the next week for Country Week.”


"Wait a minute."
"ABC broadcast" dancing with the stars "at 8 p.m. Monday."
"Come back every week to see what she's up to about the game."
"I know Joe and I have an Argentinean tango and I'm excited because I have a perfect song and I've been working hard for a season
"I really think 'El Tango Roxanne' is perfect for Halloween."
"It's creepy and intense."
"I want us to be a character, not a zombie or something."
"So I think Mrs. and Mr. Frankenstein will be great, and Joe will pull it away. He's a great dancer. It's Joe's best dance so far
"I'm really happy for him, especially the judges appreciate him very much. He just had an epic performance."
"I think it's very good for his confidence in going to country week next week."



Number  1051
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“The order allows Brendon to be near the woman, but prohibits him from threatening, harassing, injuring or assaulting her.”
“The former Buffy the Vampire Slayer star was taken into custody in Palm Springs, California, on Oct. 11, as the result of an alleged domestic dispute between the actor and an unnamed woman, who is believed to be his girlfriend.”
“Brendon -- who played Xander Harris on the popular teen dramedy vampire series from 1997 to 2003 -- was arrested on charges of domestic violence and violating a protective order.”
“Sgt.”
“William Hutchinson of the Palm Springs Police Department tells ET that the incident in question happened around 9 p.m. at the Saguaro Hotel.”
“Palm Springs Police Department via Getty ImagesPHOTOS: Busted!”
“Hollywood's Most Memorable MugshotsThe 46-year-old actor -- who has had numerous run-ins with the law in the past, including four arrests in 2015 -- allegedly pulled the woman's arm and then her hair after getting into an argument.”
“Police tell ET that the woman has two other protective orders against Brendon in both New York and Florida.”
“Brendon was released from custody on Oct. 12 on a $50,000 bail bond, according to booking records.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"The order allows brenton to approach the woman, but forbids him to threaten, harass, harm or attack her."
Bafi, a former vampire killer star, was detained in Palm Springs, California, on October 11 after a family dispute with an unnamed woman believed to be her girlfriend
"Brandon, who played sander Harris in the" young dramedy vampire "series from 1997 to 2003, was arrested for domestic violence and violation of protection orders."
"Sergeant"
"William Hutchinson of Palm Springs police told et that the incident happened at the saguro hotel around 9 p.m."
Palm Springs police station through Getty Images photos: captured
"Hollywood's most memorable robbery" the 46 year old actor has broken the law many times in the past, including four arrests in 2015, and is said to have pulled the woman's arm and then her hair after a quarrel
"Police told et that the woman had two other protective orders against brenton in New York and Florida."
"According to the register, brenton was released on bail of $50000 on October 12."



Number  1052
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We love this inspired casting choice, and we can definitely imagine Valerie meeting up with the other girls at brunch and saying, “Well, I got it!” when asked about her latest sexual conquest.”
“Vanessa Williams Wilhelmina Slater, her character on Ugly Betty, was just as ballsy as Samantha, and now she’s currently playing the lead on VH1’s hit, Daytime Divas.”
“’It’s a great part.”
“I played it past the finish line and then some and I loved it,” the actress told Piers Morgan on his ITV series, Life Stories.”
““Another actress should play it, maybe they could make it an African American Samantha Jones or a Hispanic Samantha Jones?’So if Michael Patrick King and the Sex and the City team were to recast Samantha Jones, who would be the best replacement?”
“Scroll through below to see some actors we think would fit in nicely with Carrie, Miranda and Charlotte.”
“Sia Taylor Hill/Getty Images The Australian pop songstress already threw her hat in the ring on Twitter.”
“If Sia was cast would Samantha suddenly have an obsession with face-covering masks and wigs?”
“One thing is for sure: Her Sex and the City song would be better than Fergie’s.”
“Jane Krakowski Do we really need to sell you on this?”


"We love this inspirational cast choice, and we can imagine Valerie meeting other girls at a brunch and saying," OK, I get it! "When asked about her recent sexual conquest."
Vanessa Williams Williams, the heroine of "Ugly Betty", is as bold as Samantha, and now she plays the leading role in the VH1 hit "day after tomorrow"
"It's a great part."
"I played it across the finish line, and then some, I like it," the actress told pierce Morgan in his ITV series, the life story
"It should be played by another actress, maybe they can play an African American Samantha Jones or a Hispanic Samantha Jones?"? So, if Michael Patrick King and the sex and the city team recast Samantha Jones, who would be the best replacement? "
"Scroll down to see some of the actors we think are suitable for Carrie, Miranda and Charlotte."
"The Australian pop singer has already made a splash on twitter."
"Will Samantha suddenly become obsessed with masks and wigs if SIA plays
"One thing is for sure: her sex and the city will be better than Ferguson's
"Jane Krakowski, do we really need to sell you this?"



Number  1053
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you want to see a change, there has to be a genuine shift in the morals and values of society.”
“Aniston slams the press repeatedly for conjecture and flat-out made up falsehoods.”
“According to the husband of Jennifer Aniston, the actor can’t help but be bothered by the media’s portrayal of him in the magazines.”
“One thing in particular he can’t stand is the made-up lies about him and Jennifer.”
“Jennifer and Justin are often the targets of unwanted attention, and Justin can’t help but feel turned off by his image in popular culture.”
“In a sit down with the publication, Mr. Porter, Theroux talked about the tabloids tendency to constantly represent him as an evil man week after week.”
“A post shared by justintheroux on Aug 5 2017 at 4 23pm PDT Theroux who plays a mentally ill man on The Leftovers claims There s this slightly insane person running around on the covers of tabloids who is mentally ill clearly Justin isn t the only one to have...”
“...a beef with the tabloids...”
“In fact, in 2016, she claimed the media was built on a foundation of lies during a piece for The Huffington Post.”
“Businesses give the people what they want.”


"If you want to see change, there has to be a real shift in social morality and values."
"Aniston has repeatedly attacked media speculation and fabricated lies."
"According to Jennifer Aniston's husband, the actor can't help being bothered by the media's description of him in magazines."
"There's one thing he can't stand in particular, and that's the lies he made up with Jennifer."
"Jennifer and Justin often become unwelcome objects of attention, and Justin can't help feeling disgusted with his image in popular culture."
"Mr. Porter, in an interview, seru talked about the tendency of the tabloids to portray him as an evil man week after week."
"At 4:23 p.m. on August 5, 2017, justintheroux played a psychopath in leftovers. When sharing a post, he said that there was a slightly crazy person on the cover of the tabloid who was suffering from mental illness. Obviously, Justin is not the only one with mental illness... "
“… Against the tabloids... "
"In fact, in 2016, she claimed that the media was based on lies, in an article in the Huffington Post."
"Businesses give people what they want."



Number  1054
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Marvel producer Kevin Feige has stated to Deadline that “We think she’s an amazing character.”
“Black Widow plot(Image: MARVEL ENTERTAINMENT)The film takes place following the events of Captain America: Civil War and before Avengers: Infinity War and sees Natasha's past catch up with her as a deadly experiment threatens the world.”
“He will apparently go on a big journey throughout the film as the character has a complex relationship with Natasha.”
“David Harbour as Red Guardian/Alexei Shostakov(Image: Marvel Studios)The Stranger Things star will play the role of Russian super-soldier, Alexei.”
“In the trailer the pair fight but then aid each other, having a sisterly bond.”
“She will portray Yelena Belova, a fellow Black Widow trained in the Red Room like Natasha.”
“Florence Pugh as Yelena Belova(Image: Marvel Studios)The British rising star has been cast as the second female lead, described as Natasha's "moral opposite".”
“Black Widow castScarlett Johansson as Black Widow/Natasha RomanoffScarJo is back to play the founding female Avenger, who was killed off in Avengers Endgame.”
“She is the first solo female director on a Marvel Cinematic Universe film.”
“Black Widow directorAustralian director Cate Shortland helmed the film.”


Marvel producer Kevin Figg told deadline, "we think she's a great character."
"Black widow plot (photo source: Marvel Entertainment) this film tells the stories of Captain America: Civil War and before the Avenger: Infinite War, and regards Natasha's past as a fatal experiment threatening the world."
"He's obviously going to make a big trip through the film because the character has a complex relationship with Natasha."
"David Harper plays red Guardian / Alexei shostakov (photo source: Marvel studio), and the star of strange things will play Alexei, the Russian super soldier."
"In the trailer, they fight, but later they help each other and form sisterhood."
"She will play Yelena belova, a black widow trained in the red room like Natasha."
Florence Pug plays Yelena belova (photo source: Marvel Studios), the British new star has been chosen as the second heroine, known as Natasha's "moral opposite"
"Black widow castelska Johnson as black widow / Natasha Romanov kajo returns to play the original avenger, and she is killed in the Avenger's end."
"She was the first female director of the marvel film universe."
"Black widow director and Australian director Kate shotland directed the film."



Number  1055
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Kylie (@kyliejenner) on Oct 22, 2016 at 5:29pm PDTOn Saturday, Jenner also shared a photo of herself, sister Kendall Jenner and Kourtney Kardashian‘s baby daddy, Scott Disick, sitting atop a sports car.”
“If you don’t know what I’m talking about, then simply ignore all these Snapchats.”Though Jenner’s older sister Kim Kardashian has remained silent on social media following her harrowing Paris robbery, the rest of the reality clan has slowly returned to their very public lives.”
“...those chickens Jenner took the joking in stride and told her followers Saturday But yeah I just wanted to make the public announcement that I do know the difference between a chicken and a pig so you guys don t have to worry...”
“I never asked for a pig The makeup maven s confusion led to some fans creating Vines poking fun at her mistake including clips of pigs being called chickens and one in which a little girl can be heard saying in video of pigs in a pen Look at all...”
““We had, like, over 10 conversations about it, so when I saw her downstairs, I saw something that was all wrapped up in her arms, and I was upstairs, of course I assumed that it was a f‑‑king chicken.”
“...chickens and my mom asked me what I wanted for my housewarming gift so I told her I want chickens I want a chicken coop I m dying to have a chicken she continued...”
“But here s the real story behind me thinking that it s a chicken A post shared by Kylie Jenner Snapchats kylizzlesnapchats on Oct 22 2016 at 9 05pm PDT Kylie Jenner thinking this pig is a chicken https t co q4qMFMqi6Q anouk CARL0T0 October 11 2016 So I love...”
““All right, so everyone keeps tweeting me this one Vine of my mom getting me a pig and I mistake it for a chicken,” she said in the Snapchat clip.”
“Jenner, 19, looked calm and collected as she explained to fans why she blurted out, “Is that a chicken?” when she saw her mom, Kris Jenner, holding a baby pig wrapped in a blanket in a deleted scene from Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“Kylie Jenner revealed in a Snapchat she shared with followers on Saturday, October 22, how she confused a pig for a chicken in a clip that went viral earlier this month.”


"Kylie (@ kyliejenner) also shared photos of herself, her sister Kendall Jenner and Kourtney Kardashian's little father Scott disc sitting on a sports car in a post posted by Kylie (@ kyliejenner) on October 22, 2016 at 5:29 p.m. (Saturday, ET)
"If you don't know what I'm talking about, just ignore all these snapshots." Although Jenna's sister, Kim Kardashian, remained silent on social media after the Paris robbery, the rest of the real family has slowly returned to their public life
“… Jenna, the chicken, joked calmly and told her followers Saturday, but yes, I just want to announce publicly that I know the difference between a chicken and a pig, so you don't have to worry... "
"I've never asked for a pig. The makeup artist's confusion led some fans to create some vines to make fun of her mistakes, including the segment where the pig is called a chicken, and a little girl can be heard in the video saying that the pig is watching everything in the fence..."
"We talked about it about 10 times, so when I saw her downstairs, I saw something wrapped in her arm. I was upstairs, and of course I thought it was a chicken."
“… Chicken and my mother asked me what I wanted for the housewarming gift, so I told her I wanted chicken, I wanted a chicken coop, I longed for a chicken, she continued
"But this is the true story behind me. I think this is a post shared by Kylie Jenner at 9:05 pm on October 22, 2016. Kylie Jenner thinks this pig is a chicken, so I like it..."
"OK, so people have been tweeting that my mom bought me a pig and I think of it as a chicken," she said in the snapchat video
Jenna, 19, appeared calm as she explained to fans why she blurted out, "is that a chicken? "When she sees her mother Chris Jenner holding a pig wrapped in a blanket, it's a deleted scene to keep up with the kardashians."
"On Saturday, October 22nd, Kelly Jenner revealed in a snapshot chat with her fans how she confused a pig with a chicken in a video spread earlier this month."



Number  1056
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's been an amazing experience," she said.”
“"The fact that I can open up and share this with people and hopefully bring awareness to PCOS is really all I can ask for.”
“The former "Pretty Little Liars" star, who will act in an upcoming spinoff of the Freeform show, cried on camera recalling how online haters called her fat and even wondered if she was pregnant.”
“But Pieterse, 21, was diagnosed with the hormone imbalance and has lost 15 pounds so far while performing on "DWTS."”
“"I’m feeling like me again," Pieterse said on "DWTS," adding, "Being on the show, I’ve lost over 15 pounds.”
“It’s not an easy road, but being able to focus on getting myself healthy again, and the fact that I’m seeing results, getting better is all I can ask for."”
“After dancing a samba with partner Gleb Savchenko on Tuesday's show for a strong score of 22 and judges' raves, she sobbed to co-host Erin Andrews, "I went through a hard time."”
“After the show, Pieterse told reporters of her medical condition, "It's a combination of me finding out what I have and 'Dancing with the Stars' helps me tremendously…but just the process, how hard we're working and how healthy I feel, I really feel like myself again.”
“It's great."”
“The star explained with PCOS "there's a lot of symptoms that can be many things for women."”


"It was a fantastic experience," she said
"In fact, I can open up and share this with people and hope to bring awareness to PCOS, which is really what I can ask for."
The former "pretty little liar" star will appear in the upcoming new series of the free form show. She cries in front of the camera, remembering how people who hate her on the Internet call her fat, and even doubts whether she is pregnant
But the 21-year-old was diagnosed with a hormone imbalance and has lost 15 pounds since performing on DWT
"I feel like me again," Pierce said on DWTS. "I lost more than 15 pounds on the show."
"It's not an easy way, but being able to focus on getting healthy again, in fact, I see the results, and getting better is my only requirement."
"On Tuesday's show, she danced a samba with her partner Gleb safchenko, who scored 22 points and was praised by the judges. After that, she sobbed and told co host Irene Andrews," I've had a hard time. "
"After the performance, petersay told reporters about his physical condition." this is the combination of what I found I had and "dancing with the stars", which helped me a lot But in this process, how hard we worked, how healthy I felt, I really got back to myself. "
"Great."
"There are a lot of symptoms that can be a lot of things for women," the star explained to PCOS



Number  1057
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In February, it was confirmed she had been in a treatment facility for anxiety and depression.”
“Raisa said they had her go into emergency surgery "to get a vein from her leg and build a new artery" so that the kidney would stay in place.”
“The singer underwent the three-hour surgery for her battle with lupus.”
“In an interview with W, Raisa discussed how things became near-fatal during the procedure.”
“The Grown-ish actress described the recovery as "hard."”
“She said, "I didn't want to eat, I didn't want to drink anything.”
“Selena did have a complication, too.”
“A few hours after our surgery, I woke up and had a text from her that said, ‘I'm really scared.”
“My kidney was very active, and when it turned I broke an artery.'”
“"She could have died," Raisa said.”


"In February, it was confirmed that she had been sent to a treatment facility for anxiety and depression."
They had her perform an emergency operation, "take a vein from her leg and create a new artery," so the kidney could stay in place, Raisa said
"The singer had three hours of surgery to fight lupus."
"In an interview with W, Raisa discussed how the situation became nearly fatal during the operation."
The mature actress described the economic recovery as "difficult"
"I don't want to eat or drink anything," she said
"Serena has complications, too."
"A few hours after the operation, I woke up and received a text message from her saying," I'm really scared. "
"My kidney is very active, and when it turns around, I break an artery."
"She may be dead," said Raisa



Number  1058
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Posing at the Brooklyn Cruise Terminal together, the actress and director had their arms around each other, and didn't look unhappy to see one another at all.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Jennifer Lawrence and Darren Aronofsky have sparked rumors that they're back together again after attending an event together last night.”
“To recap: Aronofsky and Lawrence started dating after making the movie Mother!”
“...together.”
“They were spotted kissing in New York in October 2016, but went on to split up in November 2017.”
“Having spent just over a year together, the actress and director remained friends, and have been spotted together on several occasions since.”
“Photographed looking very much like a couple, Lawrence and Aronofsky reunited in Brooklyn last night for the BAM Gala 2018 honoring Darren Aronofsky, Jeremy Irons, and Nora Ann Wallace.”
“Lawrence wore a flawless Olivier Theyskens dress to the event, as she posed with her ex, or maybe not ex, boyfriend:Getty ImagesAs E!”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"In the Brooklyn cruise terminal group photo, the actress and director embrace each other, see each other does not seem unhappy."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Jennifer Lawrence and Darren Aronofsky came back together after attending an event together last night, which triggered rumors."
"To recapitulate: Aronofsky and Lawrence started dating after making the movie" mother! "
“… Together. "
"In October 2016, they were found kissing in New York, but then broke up in November 2017."
"We've only been together for more than a year. The actress and the director are still friends and have been found together many times since then."
"Lawrence and Aronofsky in the photo look very much like a couple. They reunited in Brooklyn last night to attend the 2018 BAM party in memory of Darren Aronofsky, Jeremy Irons and Nora Ann Wallace."
"Lawrence was wearing a perfect Oliver tiskens dress to attend the event. She took a picture with her ex girlfriend, maybe not ex girlfriend, boyfriend: Getty Images ASE!"



Number  1059
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He really loves her for her.”Former model Grammer, 48, starred on RHOBH for two seasons and has since appeared as a guest.”
“They’re a really happy, kind couple.”
““There’s a casualness and easiness to their relationship.”
““They’re just in love,” a source close to the couple tells PEOPLE.”
“The pair have dated for more than a year and met in Malibu, where Meyer lives.”
“PEOPLE confirmed this week that Camille is engaged to lawyer David C. Meyer.”
“The actor has five other children from previous relationships.”
“Camille and Kelsey share two children together: daughter Mason Olivia, 16, and son Jude Gordon, 13.”
“Their divorce was finalized in February 2011, and the 62-year-old actor married Kayte Walsh two weeks later.”
“The reality star filed for divorce from the Frasier actor in July 2010.”


"He really loves her." Former model grammer, 48, starred in two seasons on RHOBH and has since become a guest
"They are a happy and kind couple."
"Their relationship is casual and relaxed."
"They just love each other," a source close to the couple told people
"They dated for more than a year and met in Malibu, where Meyer lives."
"This week people confirmed Camille's engagement to lawyer David C. Meyer."
"The actor has five children in his previous relationship."
Camille and Kelsey have two children: 16-year-old daughter Mason Olivia and 13-year-old son Jude Gordon
"Their divorce agreement was finalized in February 2011, and the 62 year old actor married Kate Walsh two weeks later."
"The reality star filed for divorce with Fraser in July 2010."



Number  1060
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Three Successful Winners from The Voice...”
“In 2014, they welcomed a daughter named Aria.”
“Image zoom Alisan Porter and Brian Autenrieth | Credit: Jesse Weiner PhotographyThe former Curly Sue star gave birth to their first child, a son named Mason, later that year.”
“Porter, 36, and Autenrieth, 39, wed in 2012 at a California ranch in the Santa Monica mountains in front of 100 guests after being friends for 13 years, she told PEOPLE at the time.”
“Xo A.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Thank you for the support and have a beautiful holiday.”
“We remain close friends and are committed to always doing our best for our amazing kids,” she wrote on Twitter.”
““In a sad and honest note Brian and I ended our relationship in March.”
“The former Curly Sue child star and season 10 Voice winner separated from her husband earlier this year, she announced on TwitterThe Voice‘s season 10 winner Alisan Porter revealed to fans on Monday she and husband Brian Autenrieth ended their relationship earlier this year.”


"Related videos: three successful winners from sound..."
"In 2014, they ushered in a daughter named aliya."
"Zoom in and out Alison Porter and Brian oatenrith | photo source: Jesse Weiner, the former curly haired Soviet star, gave birth to their first child, a son named Mason, later that year."
"Porter, 36, and ortenrice, 39, married in front of 100 guests at a ranch in the Santa Monica Mountains of California in 2012 after 13 years of friendship," she told people at the time
"XO A." get push notifications that contain news, features, etc
"Thank you for your support. Have a nice holiday."
"We are still close friends and committed to doing our best for our wonderful children," she wrote on twitter
"Brian and I ended our relationship in March, which is a sad and honest word."
"The former curly haired Su star and 10th season dubbing champion, who separated from her husband earlier this year, announced on twitter that 10th season dubbing champion Alison Porter revealed to fans on Monday that she and her husband Brian autenrith had ended their relationship earlier this year."



Number  1061
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““[They were] having some good family fun together [and] there was no indication there was any kind of friction or trouble brewing.””
““They both had a great time with their kids and had smiles on their faces the whole time,” Harlow told Us Weekly of the family’s appearance at the birthday bash for Jessica Hall’s daughter, Sophie, last Sunday.”
“The reality TV actress owned up to the things she’s done that caused the latter’s early retirement from the sport.”
“On Wednesday, Wilkinson took to Twitter to publicly say sorry to her soon-to-be ex-husband.”
““I want to apologize publicly to Hank.”
“I was the reason your football career ended.”
“I regret doing that to u and i hope u learn to forgive me one day.”
“I loved u and was always your number one fan (sic),” she wrote in a series of now-deleted tweets, according to ET Online.”
“Wilkinson continued her apology by saying, “I was 24 when i got married.”
“Now I’m 33.”


"(they) had a good time together and there was no sign of any friction or trouble brewing."
"They both had a good time with the kids and were smiling all the time," Harlow told weekly about the family at the birthday party of Jessica Hall's daughter Sophie on Sunday
"The reality actress admits that what she did led to her early retirement."
"On Wednesday, Wilkinson publicly apologized to her soon to be ex husband on twitter."
"I want to apologize publicly to hank."
"I'm the reason your football career ended."
"I regret doing that to you. I hope one day you can learn to forgive me."
"I love you and have always been your number one fan (SIC)," she wrote in a series of now deleted microblogs, according to et online
Wilkinson continued to apologize, saying, "I was only 24 when I got married."
"Now I'm 33."



Number  1062
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ultimately, it is RuPaul’s drag world, and we’re all just living in it.”
“In the end, the top two queens the jury chose were Trixie Mattel and Kennedy Davenport.”
“Their decision brought up a central question for viewers: What does it mean to be the winning Drag Race Queen?”
“This second return of the queens was so much more dramatic, though.”
“That is because the queen who returned, Morgan McMichaels, was sent back home the week after she’d returned.”
“However, it ended up being rather anticlimactic.”
“Then, it could have given a returning queen the boost to ride and potentially win the competition.”
“This was a much more exciting returning twist than the first time the eliminated queens came back to the competition in Episode 7.”
“Then it was between them to see who could win the crown.”
“They acted in similar roles to other iconic reality TV shows that maintain a jury pool, like Survivor or Big Brother.”


"At the end of the day, it's a world of procrastination for Rupert, and we're all just living in it."
"In the end, the first two queens chosen by the jury were Trichet Martel and Kennedy Davenport."
"Their decision raises a central question for the audience: what does it mean to be a queen who wins the draft?"
"But the Queen's second return is more dramatic."
"That's because the queen who came back, Morgan McMichael, was sent home a week after she came back."
"However, it turns out to be a bit of a snakehead."
"Well, it could have motivated a returning queen and probably won the game."
"It's more exciting than the first time the eliminated queens are back in the seventh episode."
"Then it's between them to see who can win the crown."
"Their roles are similar to those of other iconic reality shows that maintain the jury line-up, such as survivor or big brother."



Number  1063
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“), throw on Hey Ma, crank up the volume, and click through the slides to see how much the singer’s look has evolved over the years.”
“While you wait for her first solo album to drop (HAS to be any day now, right?”
“Her gorgeous, Rapunzel-length hair always looks flawless (seriously, it’s as if she’s never had a bad hair day in her life), and her smoky eye looks rival the Kardashians’.”
“The glow of the spotlight looks good on Camila — since first stepping into it, she's transformed from an adorable teen into a red carpet killer.”
“Armed with an impressive range of vocals and super smooth dance moves, she wows audiences on a regular basis.”
“When the singer made the decision to go solo last year, we can’t exactly say we were shocked — on stage, Camila simply kills it.”
“Camila Cabello was only in ninth grade when she auditioned for The X Factor — and good thing, because the show marked the start of her music career, ultimately catapulting her (and Fifth Harmony) to pop stardom.”


”）, turn on "Hi, Mom", turn up the volume, click on the slide, and see how much the singer's looks have changed over the years. "
"When you wait for her first solo album to be released (it has to be any day now, right?"
"Her beautiful long hair, Princess like hair always looks perfect (it's like she's never had a bad day in her life, to be honest), and her smoky eyes look like the kardashians."
"The spotlight looks good on Camilla - since she first stepped into the spotlight, she has changed from a lovely teenager to a red carpet killer."
"With her impressive voice and super smooth dance steps, she often wins the praise of the audience."
"When the singer decided to sing solo last year, we couldn't say for sure that we were shocked - Camilla killed it on stage."
Camilla Cabello auditioned for element X in ninth grade, which was a good thing, because the performance marked the beginning of her musical career and eventually made her (and fifth harmonic) a pop star



Number  1064
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:Queen Elizabeth Celebrates Her 92nd Birthday at Trooping the Colour ParadeMeghan Markle Breaks Royal Protocol With Bare Shoulders at Trooping the Colour Debut With Prince HarryPrince George and Princess Charlotte Make Adorable Arrival at Royal Wedding as Page Boy and BridesmaidRelated Gallery...”
“See more in the video below.”
“Prince George and Princess Charlotte made quite the impact at Meghan and Harry's royal wedding last month.”
“Prince Philip and Kate and William's third child, Prince Louis, were not in attendance.”
“Samir Hussein/WireImageDaniel LEAL-OLIVAS / AFPAlso present on the balcony was Queen Elizabeth, William and Kate, Prince Charles, Prince Harry and his new wife, Meghan Markle -- who broke royal protocol by wearing an off-the-shoulder ensemble to the event.”
“DANIEL LEAL-OLIVAS/AFP/Getty ImagesDANIEL LEAL-OLIVAS/AFP/Getty ImagesIt wasn't all sitting in silence, however, as Savannah loosed up her seemingly tight grip for a moment of celebration.”
“Another shot shows Savannah using a different tactic to get her point across, as she gives George a big shushing.”
“Fans couldn't take their eyes off the 7-year-old, who amazingly deadpanned to the camera as she silenced Prince George with her hand over his mouth.”
“Prince George and his sister, Princess Charlotte, were front and center to watch a fly-past of aircrafts by the Royal Air Force -- and Peter and Autumn Phillips' daughter, Savannah (the granddaughter of Princess Anne), hilariously made sure to keep them in check.”
“The royal family gathered on Buckingham Palace's balcony for the event, which brings together over 1400 parading soldiers, 200 horses and 400 musicians to honor Queen Elizabeth II's birthday.”


"Related content: to celebrate Queen Elizabeth's 92nd birthday, markel, Prince Harry Prince George and Princess Charlotte are bare shouldered at the royal wedding, breaking the Royal etiquette and becoming a lovely little boy and bridesmaid..."
"Please see more in the video below."
"Prince George and Princess Charlotte had a significant impact on Megan and Harry's royal wedding last month."
"Prince Philip, Kate and William's third child, Prince Louis, were not present."
"Samir Hussein / Daniel Lear Olivas / AFP also on the balcony, Queen Elizabeth, William and Kate, Prince Charles, Prince Harry and his new wife Meghan Markle, attended the event in a strapless dress, breaking Royal etiquette."
"Daniel Lyle Olivas / AFP / Getty imagesdaniel-lear-olivas / AFP / Getty imagesit is not sitting in silence, but Savannah released her seemingly clenched hand to celebrate."
"Another photo shows Savannah using a different strategy to express her views. She gives George a big boo."
"Fans couldn't take their eyes away from the 7-year-old girl. When she put her hand over Prince George's mouth to calm him down, she was surprised and expressionless to the camera."
Prince George and his sister, Princess Charlotte, stood in the front and in the middle, watching the RAF planes fly by. Peter and Savannah, the daughter of Phillips, happily ensured that they were under control
Members of the royal family gathered on the balcony of Buckingham Palace to take part in the event. More than 1400 marching soldiers, 200 horses and 400 musicians gathered to celebrate the birthday of Queen Elizabeth II



Number  1065
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“( 38 more photos in collection )Continue to full gallery nav_small_left nav_small_rightOriginally published as Nicole: ‘I want to thank ALL my children’”
“Picture: Getty 4 of 42 nav_small_close Want to see more?”
“It was the Australian star’s second win at the annual awards show, after being named Best Actress in an action movie in 2016 for Suicide Squad.”
“A stunned Robbie, 27, who missed out on the prize in the same category to Ladybird’s Saoirse Ronan at the Golden Globes earlier this week, appeared to be on the verge of tears as she was announced as the winner.”
“...media_camera The actress was visibly emotional.”
“Photo: Christopher Polk/Getty ImagesAs the former Neighbours star made her way to the stage, she was stopped by fellow nominee Ronan, who pulled her in for an emotional hug.”
“...media_camera Ronan embraced Robbie as she headed up to the stage.”
“Photo: Chris Pizzello/Invision/APFellow Aussie Nicole Kidman took home yet another award for her acclaimed role in the HBO miniseries Big Little Lies — and this time made a point of thanking “all my children” during her speech.”
“Kidman has in the past attracted attention for acknowledging only her two daughters with husband Keith Urban in award show speeches, and not the two adult adopted children she raised with ex-husband Tom Cruise.”
“‘I wanna thank all of my children who show me so much love,’ she said.”


(more than 38 photos in collection) continue full gallery navigation small left navigation small right originally published Nicole: 'I want to thank all my children' "
"Image: 42 navigation Mini approaches of Getty 4 want to see more?"
"This is the Australian star's second award at the annual awards ceremony, after winning best actress in an action film for" The Expendables "in 2016."
"Robbie, 27, missed the same award as saorse Ronan of Ladybug at the Golden Globes earlier this week, and when she was announced, she seemed to be about to cry."
“… The media and the camera, the actress is obviously emotional. "
"Photo: when Christopher Polk / Getty Images, a former neighbor star, stepped onto the stage, the nominees Ronan stopped her, pulled her in and gave her an emotional hug."
“… Ronan hugs Robbie in the media, and she goes to the stage. "
"Photo: Chris pitzello / invision / apfellow Aussie Nicole Kidman has won another prize for her role in the HBO miniseries big and small lies - this time, she specially thanks' my children 'in her speech."
"In the past, Kidman only admitted her two daughters and her husband Keith Urban at the awards ceremony, but did not admit her two adult adopted children raised by her and her ex husband Tom Cruise, which has aroused people's attention."
"I want to thank all my children for giving me so much love," she said



Number  1066
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Really ❤””
“John Galliano is a designer… Alexander McQueen.”It was also reported that Gabbana’s design partner Domenico Dolce compared her brand to the likes of commercial retailers like Zara and H&M.”
“After all, she was Posh Spice in the Spice Girls — still is!”
“— and she went on to launch her very own eponymous fashion label in 2008.”
“The line has gone on to great success: She shows at New York Fashion Week every season, collaborates with Estée Lauder on a beauty line and most recently, announced a partnership with Reebok to create an athleisure collection.”
“However, while the 44-year-old has attained quite a few accolades in her decade as a designer, there are still a few in the fashion world who don’t consider her one of their own.”
“Case in point: Dolce & Gabbana co-designer Stefano Gabbana.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Vittorio Zunino Celotto/GettyAlthough the two were friends back in the day — they were seen out in Italy together in 2008 in the photo above — as she built her design empire, he was not sold on her and her label’s rising success.”
““She’s a friend.”


"Really ❤””
"John Galliano is a designer Alexander McQueen。” According to another report, Gabbana's design partner Domenico Dolce compared her brand with commercial retailers such as Zara and H & M
"After all, she's the trendy spice of all Spice Girls - still is!"
"She launched her own fashion brand of the same name in 2008."
"The collection has been a huge success: she will appear at New York Fashion Week every season, launch a beauty collection with Estee Lauder, and recently announced a sports and leisure series with Reebok."
"However, although the 44 year old has won many honors in her 10 years as a designer, there are still some people in the fashion world who think she is not her own."
"Case study: Stefano Gabbana, CO designer of Dolce & Gabbana."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The credit for image zooming: Vittorio Zunino celoto / gettyalthough the two were friends at the time - they appeared together in Italy in 2008 in the photo above - when she set up her own design Empire, he was not betrayed by the increasing success of her and her brand."
"She's a friend."



Number  1067
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“On Monday, Jedediah Bila announced that it was her last day on the daytime talk show after joining the long-running program last August.”
“"So, this is my last day at 'The View' and I want to thank these ladies," the conservative-leaning panelist said of her co-hosts, Whoopi Goldberg, Sunny Hostin, Joy Behar and Sara Haines.”
“"What you don't know about us, these ladies, we're friends.”
“Sunny's texts, Sara, Whoopi, you're my inspiration.”
“Joy, when I need comedic relief, this is where I go.”
“So we're going to be friends no matter what.”
“WATCH: 'The View' Co-Host Jedediah Bila Announces Her EngagementBila, 38, couldn't leave without thanking The View's loyal viewers.”
“"I want to thank the viewers, even the ones that write me the hate tweets," she said.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"On Monday, jadidia bila announced that it was her last day on the day talk show since she joined the long-term show last August."
"So, this is my last day at the view, and I want to thank these ladies," the conservative leaning panel member said of her co hosts, Whoopi Goldberg, sunny hostin, joy Behar and Sara Haines
"What you don't know is, these ladies, we're friends."
"Sonny's text message, Sara, Wuwu, you are my inspiration."
"Joey, when I need comic relief, this is where I'm going."
"So we have to be friends anyway."
"Watch: the 38 year old bila can't help thanking the faithful spectators of 'lookout' who co hosted Jedediah bila's engagement ceremony."
"I want to thank the audience, even those who wrote me hate tweets," she said



Number  1068
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Most days are similar to the rest – another day.”
“And now here we are... Madeleine, our Madeleine – ten years.”
“And I think every parent could understand that what you want and what we have aspired to is to have all the reasonable lines of enquiry followed to a logical conclusion As well as dismissing criticism of the cost of the Met s inquiry as unfair the McCanns said they...”
““After the initial Portuguese investigation closed, essentially, no-one, no-one else was actually doing anything proactively to try and find Madeleine.”
““Since the Metropolitan Police actually started their investigation, it has taken a huge pressure off us, individually and as a family.”
“...last five years...”
“Madeleine McCann 10 years on Detectives still pursuing critical leads Asked how he and his wife were coping 10 years on Mr McCann answered I think we re doing a new normality really particularly over probably the last and it seems like a long time saying it but over the...”
“...still hope he said...”
“Kate and Gerry McCann whose daughter Madeleine disappeared from a holiday flat in Portugal ten years ago during an interview with the BBC s Fiona Bruce at Prestwold Hall in Loughborough Joe Giddens PA Wire PA We are still looking forward I think that s the most important thing we...”
“...that there is progress being made During the interview Mr McCann 48 acknowledged it was devastating not to have found Madeleine but said the most important thing was holding on to hope of tracing her...”


"Most days are similar to other days - another day."
"Now we're here... Madeleine, our Madeleine - ten years. "
"I think every parent can understand that what you want, and what we have been longing for, is to make all reasonable investigation clues come to a logical conclusion, and at the same time ignore the criticism of the investigation cost of the London police department, because the mckenzys said they..."
"After the initial Portuguese investigation, basically no one, no one else, took the initiative to try to find Madeleine."
"Since the London police really started the investigation, we have been under great pressure, both personally and in our families."
"The past five years"
"Madeleine McCann's 10-year-old detective is still pursuing key clues. When asked how he and his wife cope with the 10-year-old detective, Mr. McCann replied," I think we are doing a new normal, especially in the past. It seems like a long time to say, but in the past... "
“… Or do you want him to say... "
"Kate and Gerry McCann, her daughter Madeleine, disappeared from a holiday apartment in Portugal ten years ago, interviewed Fiona Bruce on the BBC in the hall of lurburk press wall, JOJO PA, we are still looking forward to, I think it's the most important thing for us..."
“…… Progress has been made in the interview. McKenzie 48 admits that it is devastating not to find Madeleine, but he says that the most important thing is to hold the hope of tracking her down.... "



Number  1069
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[28]References [ edit ]”
“14 On January 1 2018 The Wall Street Journal reported the controlling shareholder of Playboy Enterprises Inc private equity firm Rizvi Traverse was considering ending the U S print edition of Playboy Magazine and quoted Ben Kohn managing partner at Rizvi as stating the magazine has lost as much as...”
“[3][4] He has worked as the chief creative officer and chief of global partnerships at Playboy Enterprises, a company founded by his father Hugh Hefner.”
“[5][6] Hefner was also founder and initial chief executive officer of the startup company, Hop.”
“[7]Early life [ edit ]Hefner was born on September 4, 1991, in Los Angeles, California to Hugh Hefner (1926-2017) and Kimberley Conrad.”
“[1][8] He grew up in a mansion adjacent to the Playboy Mansion, which was purchased by his father after his parents separated.”
“[9] Hefner graduated from Ojai Valley School in 2009 and received a bachelor's degree from Chapman University in 2015.”
“[10]Career [ edit ]Hefner started working for Playboy Enterprises, Inc. when he was in college.”
“[11] In early 2016, Hefner, who was a board observer at the time, left the company due to disagreements with then CEO Scott Flanders about the direction the company was taking.”
“[2] Hefner then began editing, writing and publishing op-eds, which centered on politics, culture and philosophy.”


"[28] reference [Edit]"
"14 on January 1, 2018, the Wall Street Journal reported that private equity firm Rizvi traverse, the controlling shareholder of Playboy Enterprises Inc., was considering terminating the U.S. print edition of Playboy magazine, and quoted Ben Kohn, Rizvi's managing partner, as saying that the magazine had lost as much as..."
"[3] [4] he served as chief creative officer and head of global partnerships at Playboy enterprises, a company founded by his father, Hugh Hefner."
[5] [6] Hefner is also the founder and CEO of hop
"[7] early years [editor] Hefner was born on September 4, 1991 in Los Angeles, California, in Hugh Hefner (1926-2017) and Kimberly Conrad."
"[1] [8] he grew up in a mansion next to Playboy's, which his father bought after his parents separated."
"[9] Hefner graduated from Ojai Valley School in 2009 and received a bachelor's degree from Chapman University in 2015."
"Hefner started working for Playboy when he was in college."
"[11] at the beginning of 2016, Hefner, who was then an observer of the board of directors, left the company because of differences with Scott Flanders, the then chief executive officer, in the direction of the company's development."
Hefner then began to edit, write and publish critical articles focusing on politics, culture and philosophy



Number  1070
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to the Times report, Argento agreed to pay $380,000 to settle the allegations.”
“Argento was accused of having sex with Bennett at a hotel room in Marina del Rey, Calif., in 2013, when the actor was just 17 years old.”
“Weinstein faces up to life in prison if convicted on six charges of sexual assault and rape.”
“...allegations are not part of the criminal case against him...”
“The sheer duplicity of her conduct is quite extraordinary and should demonstrate to everyone how poorly the allegations against Mr Weinstein were actually vetted and accordingly cause all of us to pause and allow due process to prevail not condemnation by fundamental dishonesty Argento has not sued Weinstein and her...”
“...relationship with Mr Weinstein was between two consenting adults which lasted for more than four years...”
“What is perhaps most egregious is the timing which suggests that at the very same time Argento was working on her own secret settlement for the alleged sexual abuse of a minor she was positioning herself at the forefront of those condemning Mr Weinstein despite the fact that her sexual...”
““This development reveals a stunning level of hypocrisy by Asia Argento, one of the most vocal catalysts who sought to destroy Harvey Weinstein,” Brafman said.”
“Weinstein’s criminal attorney, Ben Brafman, argued in a statement that the revelations about Argento undermine her claims against Weinstein.”
“Argento has also been at the forefront of the movement to hold Hollywood’s sexual abusers to account.”


"According to the times, Argento agreed to pay 380000 dollars to settle the charges."
"In 2013, Argento was accused of having sex with Bennett in a hotel room in Marina Drey, California, when Bennett was only 17 years old."
"If convicted of six counts of sexual assault and rape, Weinstein will face life imprisonment."
“…… The charge is not a criminal case against him... "
"The two sides of her behavior are extraordinary. It should be proved to everyone how badly the charges against Mr. Weinstein were actually reviewed. Therefore, all of us should suspend and let due process prevail, instead of condemning aginto for not suing Weinstein and her with fundamental dishonesty..."
“…… The relationship with Mr. Weinstein was a relationship between two consenting adults that lasted more than four years... "
"Perhaps the most shocking thing is that this opportunity shows that while Argento is secretly solving the problem of her suspected sexual abuse of minors, she positions herself at the forefront of those who blame Mr. Weinstein, despite the fact that her sexual behavior..."
"This development reveals the alarming hypocrisy of Argento in Asia, one of the most vocal catalysts for trying to destroy Harvey Weinstein," braffman said
Weinstein's criminal lawyer Ben braffman said in a statement that the exposure of Argento weakened her charges against Weinstein
"Argento is also at the forefront of the campaign to hold Hollywood sex abusers accountable."



Number  1071
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And that's before he orders dessert."”
“In contrast, taxpayers will be paying $60 million per year just for Trump to visit his own properties like Mar-a-Lago.”
“If you constantly draw attention to yourself, spend all day distracting everyone and cost taxpayers millions of dollars, the perfect job for you isn't the military, it's the president of the United States."”
“And I get it.”
“Her final thoughts: "Trump says transgender people in the military would be a tremendous disruption.”
“She added: "I don't even think Trump knows what transgender means — he probably thinks transgender people are those cars that turn into robots."”
“You are so stupid.'"”
“"But I guess if I had to describe it, I'd say, 'Donald, you are so stupid.”
“"As a trans person, it's hard to articulate exactly how I feel," said Harrison.”
“Jimmy Fallon invited transgender comedian Patti Harrison on NBC's The Tonight Show to share her thoughts.”


"That was before he ordered dessert."
"In contrast, taxpayers pay $60 million a year just to visit Trump's own property (such as the Malag)," he said
"If you constantly focus on yourself, distract people all day, spend millions of dollars on taxpayers, then the best job for you is not the army, but the president of the United States."
"I see."
Her last thought was: "trump said transgender people in the military would be a huge destruction."
She added: "I don't even think trump knows what transgender means - he might think transgender people are cars that become robots."
"You are stupid."
"But I think if I had to describe it, I would say, 'Donald, you're stupid.'"
"As a transgender, it's hard to express exactly how I feel," Harrison said
"Jimmy Fallon invited transgender comedian Patty Harrison to share her thoughts on NBC's tonight show."



Number  1072
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She’s very stubborn that way.””
““She won’t do anything until she does it on her own.”
“Courtney Love on raising Frances Bean“I’m so proud of her,” Love said.”
“Absolutely.”Last year Love talked about what it was like raising her daughter, whom she described as “enigmatic” like her father.”
““So do I want to pursue my music further and see it come to fruition and see something further and see something palpable?”
“...to the other she said...”
“With regards to music I don t want to pigeonhole myself and say I am a musician or a visual artist because I feel like it s all encompassing and I feel like every bit of my art is related...”
“These days she’s focused on making music.”
“Post has been removed or is no longer public.”
“Instagram post not found.”


"She's stubborn like that."
"She won't do anything unless she does it herself."
"I'm proud of her," Courtney love said as she raised Francis bean
"Of course." Last year, AI talked about the feeling of raising her daughter, describing her daughter as "mysterious" as her father
"So, do I want to pursue my music further, see its achievements, see further things, see more obvious things?"
“… She said to the other
"About music, I don't want to classify myself as a musician or visual artist, because I think it's all inclusive. I think every bit of my art is relevant..."
"She's focused on music these days."
"The post has been deleted or is no longer public."
"Instagram post not found."



Number  1073
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She will promote her debut studio album, Camila, on the Never Be the Same tour, which kicks off April 9 in Vancouver, B.C.”
“Cabello came to fame with the girl group Fifth Harmony, and has since pursued a solo career.”
“"It we had food to eat, a roof over our heads and I was going to school, that was enough," she added.”
“It was a constant flow of having money, losing everything and then finding a way to get it again."”
“"We always had periods where my dad would be out of a job.”
“"My parents worked really hard," the star said.”
“She recalled her family's struggle to adjust in an interview with Billboard in February 2017.”
“U S when she was six years old...”
“21 thank you so much for your birthday wishes i love you guys so much that s my parents singing and being extra lol pic twitter com LvygqyDDeU camila Camila_Cabello March 5 2018 Cabello was born to Alejandro and Sinuhe Cabello in Havana Cuba in 1997 and immigrated to the...”
“"thank you so much for your birthday wishes, i love you guys so much (that's my parents singing and being extra lol."”


She will promote her first studio album "Camilla" at the "never the same" tour, which opens in Vancouver, British Columbia on April 9
"Cabello became famous with the women's group" fifth harmony "and began his solo career
"If we have food and a roof and I'm going to school, that's enough," she added
"It's a process of constant flow. When you have money, you lose everything, and then you try to get it again."
"We'll have a time when my dad's going to lose his job."
"My parents work hard," the star said
"In an interview with billboard in February 2017, she recalled her family's struggle in adjustment."
"When she was six years old, we were together..."
"21 thank you very much for your birthday wishes. I love you very much. This is my parents singing and becoming an extra lolpic twitter com lvygqydeu Camila Camilla, u Cabello March 5, 2018. Cabello was born in 1997 in Alejandro and sinuhe Cabello, Havana, Cuba, and immigrated to..."
"Thank you very much for your birthday wishes. I love you very much (this is my parents singing and becoming an extra lol)."



Number  1074
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Scott Garfield | Disney ABC Television Group | Getty Images...”
“Richard Cartwright | Disney ABC Television Group | Getty ImagesAfter high school, Pompeo worked as a bartender until her father encouraged her to pursue acting.”
“"'Are you out of your f------ mind?”
“"I was like, 'I'm not going to be stuck on a medical show for five years,'" she says.”
“When her agent brought her the script for "Grey's," Pompeo balked.”
“She went on to nab parts in "Old School" and "Daredevil" but, by 2004, Pompeo's career had hit a wall and she was almost broke.”
“That marked her first appearance on the big screen.”
“Her breakout moment came in 2002 when she landed a role as the love interest in "Midnight Mile."”
“Ellen Pompeo as Meredith Grey on ABC's "Grey's Anatomy."”
“However, he convinced her to audition anyway, if only to pay her rent.”


"Scott Garfield | Disney ABC TV Group | Getty pictures..."
"Richard Cartwright, Disney ABC television group, Getty Images after high school and Pompeo worked as a bartender after high school until her father encouraged her to perform."
"Are you crazy?"
"I thought, 'I won't be stuck in a medical show for five years,'" she said
"Pompeo hesitated when her agent brought her the play for" gray. "
She continued to play nab in old school and the expendables, but in 2004, Pompeo's career suffered a setback and she almost went bankrupt
"It marks her first appearance on the big screen."
Her breakthrough took place in 2002, when she played a similar role in midnight mile
Alan Pompeo plays Meredith gray in ABC's anatomy of gray
"But he talked her into auditioning, even if it was just to pay the rent."



Number  1075
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bogus pretentious TV talent show Read more at EOnline Step Up High Water Team Credits Reality Competitions Glee With TV Interest In Dance Based on the Step Up film franchise that grossed 650 million at the global box office YouTube s drama Step Up High Water focuses on several ambitious...”
“That is what is wrong with the music industry.”
““I asked my brother if there was even any salvageable wood so that maybe I could build a memorial art piece,” Bowersox said.”
“But the home, a two-story rustic farmhouse built more than a century ago that was a significant part of Bowersox’s childhood, is a total loss, she said.”
“In fact, the elder Bowersox was staying at a friend’s house the night of the fire.”
“There was a 90-minute waiting period where I didn’t know if my mom was alive.” Her mother, Kelly Lynn Bowersox, 55, was alive and well.”
““I called my brother and he didn’t answer.”
“It’s my ‘for sure’ home – it’s where it all started.” – Read more at NewsCheif.comBowersox helps mom recover from house fire – “I called my mom and she didn’t answer,” Bowersox told The Blade in a phone interview Saturday evening.”
“I absolutely love Polk County, Florida.”
““It’s phenomenal to be asked.”


"The fake and pretentious TV talent show" read more on eoline "the step up high water team owes the live action competition to the TV industry's interest in dance, which is based on the step up movie franchise's global box office of 650 million. YouTube's drama" step up high water "focuses on several ambitious films..."
"That's the problem with the music industry."
"I asked my brother if he had any wood to salvage so that I could make a commemorative work of art," balsox said
"But this house is a two-story Village cottage, built more than a century ago, which is an important part of balsox's childhood and a complete loss," she said
"In fact, on the night of the fire, old man balsox lived in a friend's house."
"There was a 90 minute waiting period and I didn't know if my mother was still alive." Her mother, Kelly Lynn balsox, 55, is alive and well
"I called my brother and he didn't answer."
"This is my" sure "home - this is where it all starts." ——Read more NewsCheif.comBowersox Helping mom recover from the fire - "I called my mom and she didn't answer," balsox told the blade in a telephone interview on Saturday night
"I really like Polk County in Florida."
"It's amazing to be asked that."



Number  1076
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...with the exception of Valentino who casually tucked himself in a corner as members of the Carlyle staff began clearing away bottles of Veuve Clicquot...”
““Through her talent and when I was back on stage she helped me with her amazing work to literally support me after delivering twins [in 2010].”
““I don’t have pierced ears and I’ve gone this long without, but maybe I ought to put that to rest,” Bailey said with a giggle.”
“The editor was hosting a party Sunday evening ahead of the Met Gala to toast the coffee table tome Harper s Bazaar 150 Years The Greatest Moments The fete sponsored by American Express was the first in a global series...”
“...that will give cardholders the opportunity to come face to face with leading figures in fashion and entertainment...”
“Wearing a tweed Isabel Marant wrap dress with matching cap, Dion expressed her excitement about attending her first ever Met Gala tonight.”
““This is like having a job for the first time or having a kiss for the first time — this is big,” the singer said.”
““I’m not going to have enough eyes [to see it all].”The mother of three is attending with Donatella Versace and will be outfitted by the Italian designer.”
““She’s always been supporting me and I mean that in different ways,” Dion explained.”
“Three months [after giving birth] I was on stage and I did not look at all like I just had twins.”


“…… In addition to Valentino, when Carlisle's staff began to clean up VIV kriquet's bottle, he casually hid himself in the corner... "
"Through her talent, she helped me finish her amazing work when I came back on stage, and she really supported me after [2010] twins."
"I didn't have a hole in my ear, I haven't had it for a long time, but maybe I should put it aside," he said with a giggle
"The editor held a party before the metropolitan celebration on Sunday night to toast the coffee table at Harper fair's greatest moment in 150 years. This event sponsored by American Express is the first in a global series... "
“…… This will give cardholders the opportunity to face the leaders in fashion and entertainment... "
Dion, dressed in Isabel malante tweed dress and a matching hat, expressed her excitement at her first blind date party tonight
"It's like having a job for the first time, or kissing for the first time - it's important," the singer said
"I don't have enough eyes." The mother of three attended with Donatella Versace and will be outfitted by the Italian designer
"She's been supporting me, I mean in a different way," Dion explained
"After three months (postpartum), I'm on stage, and it's not like I've just had twins."



Number  1077
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And as the texture of our culture changes, [equality] will manifest differently in other debates.””
“I was never in.”
“When Allure Magazine asked the 31-year-old if she identified as bisexual, the actress responded, “I don’t identify as anything.”“I’m a person,” explained Heard.”
““I like who I like.”
“I happened to be dating a woman, and people started taking pictures of us walking to our car after dinner.”
“I [was] holding her hand, and I realized that I have two options: I can let go of her hand and, when asked about it, I can say that my private life is my private life.”
“Or I could not let go and own it.”Heard, who previously married Johnny Depp, finalized her divorce from the actor earlier this year.”
“But before her rocky marriage became highly publicized, Heard was dealing with a different kind of unwanted attention over her sexuality.”
“When she starred opposite Nicolas Cage in 2011’s “Drive Angry,” followed by “The Rum Diary” that same year with her ex, Heard claimed critics believed she was putting her career in jeopardy as the romantic lead.”
““They pointed to no other working romantic lead, no other actress, that was out,” said Heard.”


"As our cultural structure changes, [equality] will be different in other debates."
"I've never been there."
When seduction asked the 31 year old actress if she thought she was bisexual, she replied, "I don't agree with anything." "I'm alone," Hurd explained
"I like the people I like."
"I happened to date a woman and people started taking pictures of us walking to the car after dinner."
"I held her hand, and I realized that I had two choices: I could let go of her hand, and when asked about it, I could say that my private life was my private life."
"Or I can't let go of it." Hurd, who previously married Johnny Depp, divorced the actor earlier this year
But before Hurd's bumpy marriage was publicized, she faced another kind of unnecessary attention to her sexual orientation
When she confronted Nicolas Cage in drive angry in 2011 and starred in the Rum Diary with her ex boyfriend in the same year, Hurd claimed that critics thought she was endangering her career as a romantic heroine
"They point out that there are no other romantic protagonists, no other actresses, and that's out there," Hurd said



Number  1078
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ford, a licensed pilot, co-starred with Boyega in 2015′s “Star Wars: The Force Awakens.”The British actor plays Finn, a former Stormtrooper who escapes the First Order to join the Resistance, in the latest installment the latest installment in the Star Wars franchise.”
“Boyega’s earlier tweets prompted a flurry of Star Wars jokes and memes online, including one from a fan who suggested Harrison Ford fly him to the premiere.”
“ADVERTISEMENTBoyega arrived on the red carpet, wearing a dark blue tuxedo and turtleneck.”
“His publicist told The Associated Press that his flight was able to leave Saturday morning, and Boyega calmed fans after his arrival with an update, saying he’d safely landed but his luggage didn’t make it.”
“Boyega started the day by tweeting from Atlanta: “Looks like no one’s leaving!” and “I actually NEED a pilot.” A snow storm led to hundreds of cancellations at Atlanta’s Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.”
“(Photo by Jordan Strauss/Invision/AP)NEW YORK (AP) — After tweeting that snow in Atlanta might keep him from making the “Star Wars: The Last Jedi” premiere in Los Angeles, actor John Boyega made it to the red carpet Saturday — and no starship was required.”
“(Photo by Jordan Strauss/Invision/AP)John Boyega arrives at the Los Angeles premiere of "Star Wars: The Last Jedi" at the Shrine Auditorium on Saturday, Dec. 9, 2017 in Los Angeles.”
“John Boyega arrives at the Los Angeles premiere of "Star Wars: The Last Jedi" at the Shrine Auditorium on Saturday, Dec. 9, 2017 in Los Angeles.”


Ford, a licensed pilot, CO starred with boyga in 2015's Star Wars: the awakening of the force. The British actor plays Finn, a former Stormtrooper, in the latest episode of the Star Wars series, who escaped the first order to join the resistance
"Boyga's earlier tweet sparked a series of Star Wars jokes and memes online, and one of his fans suggested that Harrison Ford fly him to the premiere."
"Advertising boyga walks up the red carpet in a dark blue evening dress and turtleneck."
"His PR staff told the associated press that his flight was able to take off on Saturday morning, and after boyga arrived, he reassured the fans with the latest news that he had landed safely, but his luggage didn't succeed."
Boyga tweeted from Atlanta to start the day: "it looks like no one's leaving! Hundreds of flights have been cancelled at Atlanta's Hartsfield Jackson International Airport after a snowstorm
(Jordan Strauss / invasion / AP) New York (AP) - actor John boyga made the red carpet on Saturday after tweeting that heavy snow in Atlanta might prevent him from premiering Star Wars: the last Jedi in Los Angeles - and didn't need a starship
(Jordan Strauss / invasion / AP Photo) on Saturday, December 9, 2017, in Los Angeles, John Boiga attended the Los Angeles Premiere of Star Wars: the last Jedi in the temple auditorium
"John Boiga attended the premiere of Star Wars: the last Jedi in Los Angeles on Saturday, December 9, 2017 at the temple auditorium in Los Angeles."



Number  1079
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Additionally, the winner of this historic season will be awarded $2 million, the largest prize in reality show history.”
“The new twist allows players to use the tokens to buy advantages to help players stay in the game or get themselves back in the game.”
“Fire tokens will serve as currency on the island and add more complexity to the already intense battle.”
“These returning masterminds will compete in epic challenges, face the return of Edge of Extinction, which gives voted-out players a second shot to win, and tackle a brand new layer of the game with the introduction of fire tokens.”
“...earn the title of Sole Survivor again...”
“The 20th anniversary edition of the groundbreaking series unites the most memorable heroic and celebrated champions from the past two decades in the biggest battle in the show s history as the series best strategists of all time fight to...”
“This edition features 20 legendary winners of Survivor who will return to compete against each other.”
“The Emmy Award-winning series returns for its 40th season, themed "Winners at War."”


"In addition, the winner of this historic season will receive $2 million, the biggest prize in reality show history."
"The new twist allows players to use tokens to buy advantages to help them stay in the game or return to the game."
"The firepower token will become the currency of the island, adding more complexity to the already fierce battle."
"These return planners will compete in epic challenges and face a return on the brink of extinction, which gives the eliminated players a second chance to win and deal with a whole new dimension of the game by introducing fire cards."
“… Get the title of sole survivor again... "
"The 20th anniversary edition of the groundbreaking series unites the most unforgettable heroes and famous champions from the biggest fight of the past two decades in the history of the show as the best strategist of the series all the time to fight for..."
"This version features 20 legendary survivor winners who will come back to compete with each other."
Season 40 of the Emmy award winning series focuses on "winners in war."



Number  1080
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s discrimination plain and simple.”The rapper’s deeply personal 4:44 also finds him apologizing to Beyonce over his past infidelities and lashing out at the Prince estate.”
“[It] is no different than discriminating against blacks.”
““Mama had four kids, but she’s a lesbian / Had to pretend so long that she’s a thespian,” Jay-Z said on the track.”
“Had to hide in the closet so she medicate Society shame and the pain was too much to take Cried tears of joy when you fell in love Don t matter to me if it s a him or her Following Jay Z s verses on Smile Gloria Carter delivers...”
“...a moving monologue about living in the shadows and her eventual coming out...”
““Living in the shadow.”
“Can you imagine what kind of life it is to live?”
“In the shadows people see you as happy and free, because that’s what you want them to see.”
“Living two lifes, happy but not free.”
“You live in the shadows for fear of someone hurting your family or someone you love,” Jay-Z’s mother said on “Smile.”“The world is changing and they say it’s time to be free,” she adds.”


In rapper 4:44, he also finds himself apologizing for Beyonce's past infidelity and attacking Prince manor
"It's no different from discriminating against black people."
"Mom has four children, but she's a lesbian / has to pretend she's an actor," Jay-Z said on the track
"I have to hide in the closet, so she treats social shame and pain too much. It doesn't matter to me that you cry when you fall in love. If it's the smile he or she follows jay z's poem Gloria Carter conveys..."
“… A touching monologue about living in the shadow, and her final coming out... "
"Living in the shadow."
"Can you imagine what life is like?"
"In the shadows, people think you're happy and free, because that's what you want them to see."
"Live two lives, happy but not free."
"You live in the shadow because you're afraid that someone will hurt your family or someone you love," Jay-Z's mother said on smile. The world is changing and they say it's time to be free. "



Number  1081
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hewitt also uploaded a video that showcased her pretty incredible cooking skills.”
“She also shared a photo of her dog, Duke, safely enjoying the view.”
“One is called yesterday and the other is called tomorrow, so today is the right day to love, believe, do and mostly live," the quote reads.”
“"There are only two days in the year that nothing can be done.”
“Her second photo in that series is actually a quote from Dalai Lama XIV, and we can see why she shared it.”
“Hewitt has already mastered the art of Instagram slideshows, showing she’s an Instagram natural.”
“The actress, who has recently appeared on television shows like Criminal Minds and her latest drama, The Client List, wanted to share a few fun eclipse-related pictures and decided that starting a fresh new social media account was the best option.”
“Prior to joining Instagram, Hewitt primarily used Twitter to interact with her fans — and even then, her interactions were a bit few and far between.”
“Hewitt’s brand new account launched on Monday, it’s already been verified.”
“Still, we’re happy that Jennifer Love Hewitt finally joined Instagram and is seeing what all the hype is about.”


"Hewitt also uploaded a video showing her incredible cooking skills."
"She also shared photos of her dog, Duke, enjoying the scenery safely."
"One is called yesterday, the other is called tomorrow, so today is the right day to love, to believe, to do, and mainly to live," it says
"There are only two days in a year when nothing can be done."
"Her second photo in that series actually quoted the words of the 14th Dalai Lama, and we can see why she shared this photo."
"Hewitt has mastered the art of instagram slides, showing that she was born with instagram."
"The actress, who recently appeared on the TV show" criminal mind "and her latest series" client list, "wanted to share some interesting pictures about the eclipse and decided that opening a new social media account was the best choice."
"Before joining instagram, Hewitt mainly used twitter to interact with her fans - even so, she had a little less interaction."
"Hewitt's new account was launched on Monday and has been verified."
"Nevertheless, we're glad that Jennifer Love Hewitt finally joined instagram and saw what all the hype was about."



Number  1082
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...in West Hollywood, California.”
“Image zoom Credit: Eric Charbonneau/REX/ShutterstockClint and Francesca EastwoodFrancesca, who was named Miss Golden Globe in 2013, was last spotted with her famous parents in October at the premiere of her film M.F.A.”
“For the magical outing, the first-time mom-to-be wore a fitted black dress under a flannel shirt and leather-type black jacket.”
“RELATED VIDEO: All the Times Scott Eastwood Looked Exactly Like His Dad!”
“...of Francesca s baby bump during a family trip to Disneyland on her Instagram Story...”
“Image zoom Credit MediaPunch REX Shutterstock Francesca Eastwood Image zoom Francesca Eastwood and Frances Fisher Image zoom Credit Morgan Eastwood Instagram Francesca Eastwood Image zoom Credit Morgan Eastwood Instagram Francesca and Morgan Eastwood One day before she walked the EMAs red carpet her younger sister Morgan Eastwood shared a glimpse...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
““We are very excited for what’s to come.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““Francesca and I are very happy and would like to share this private moment of joy with the rest of you,” the dad-to-be told The Blast.”
“The baby on the way will be her first with actor/trainer Alexander Wraith.”


“… In West Hollywood, California. "
"Credit for image zooming: Eric Charbonneau / Rex / shutterstock Clint and Francesca Eastwood Francesca were named Miss Golden Globes in 2013, and she was last seen with her famous parents at the premiere of the movie m.f.a. in October."
"For this magical trip, the first-time mother to be wore a black dress with a flannel shirt and a black leather jacket."
Related video: Scott Eastwood as like as two peas in his father!
“… In the story of Francesca on instagram, when the family went to Disneyland, they had a baby... "
Picture zooming credit card mediapunch Rex shutterstock Francesca Eastwood picture zooming Francesca Eastwood and Frances Fisher picture zooming credit card Morgan Eastwood instagram Francesca Eastwood picture zooming credit card Morgan Eastwood instagram Francesca and Morgan Eastwood the day before, she went to EMAS The red carpet shared a glimpse with her sister Morgan Eastwood. "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"We're very excited about what's coming." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"Francesca and I are very happy to share this personal happy moment with you," said the father who was exposed
"The baby on the road will be her first time with actor / coach Alexander ghost."



Number  1083
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Getty Images DJ Khaled gives us an inside look at life with his fiancee Nicole Tuck and his son Asahd...”
“1 2 Getty Images 3 Getty Images 4 Getty Images 5 Getty Images 6 Getty Images 7 Getty Images 8 Getty Images 9 Getty Images 10 Getty Images 11 Getty Images 12 Getty Images 13 Getty Images 14 Getty Images 15 Getty Images 16 Getty Images 17 Getty Images 18”
“Click through the gallery to check out the famous guests!”
“Sure, his birthday was actually November 26th, but who cares about celebrating a little later when you’ve got celebs like Fergie, Snoop Dogg, Kelly Rowland, Teyana Taylor, and Tiffany Haddish coming through?”
“In honor of DJ Khaled’s birthday, Diddy and the cast of The Four (a new competition show on FOX) came out to celebrate the music mogul.”
“You know, someone who throws you a birthday party with all of your famous friends at a private Beverly Hills mansion.”
“Get you a friend like Diddy.”


"Getty Images DJ Khalid, let's learn from the inside about his life with his fiancee Nicole Tucker and his son Assad..."
"1 2 image 3 image 4 image 5 image 6 image 7 image 8 image 9 image 10 image 11 image 12 image 13 image 14 image 15 image 16 image 17 image 18"
"Click gallery to see famous guests!"
"Of course, his birthday is actually November 26, but when you have celebrities like Fergie, Snoop Dogg, Kelly Rowland, Diana Taylor and Tiffany hadish coming, who would mind celebrating later?"
"In honor of DJ Khalid's birthday, Diddy and the cast of the four came out to celebrate the music mogul."
"You know, there's a birthday party for you and all your famous friends at Beverly Hills' private mansion."
"Find you a friend like Didi."



Number  1084
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...https://t.co/Bczx7P32lM — Ava DuVernay (@ava) April 21, 2017For more on Prince's legacy, watch the video below.”
“Pushing forward to beauty.”
“Prince, who died of an accidental drug overdose last April at age 57, heavily influenced the world of music with his groundbreaking pop songs and performances.”
“Celebrities honored the late "Purple Rain" singer one year after his tragic, untimely death via a slew of Instagram posts and tweets adorned with the #RIPPrince hashtag.”
“RELATED Purple Reign How Prince Continued to Dominate Pop Culture 1 Year After His Death Film director Spike Lee shared a photo of his most prized possession a gold guitar in the shape of the Prince symbol alongside the words This guitar will be handed down through generations of the...”
“Lee s will be put in my will...”
“Fellow GRAMMY-winning singer and longtime fan Usher posted a portrait of The Purple One with a purple umbrella rain emoji, one that many stars shared, including actress Taraji P. Henson and singer-songwriter Janelle Monáe.”
“This isn't the first time many of these celebs have paid tribute to the superstar -- Usher joined Major Lazer for a cover of "1999" at last year's Coachella music festival, while Monáe performed a medley of Prince tracks at last year's BET Awards.”
“Janelle Monáe Cindi Mayweather JanelleMonae April 21 2017 MORE Lenny Kravitz to Perform Prince Tribute at 2017 Rock and Roll Hall of Fame Ceremony Unforgettable actress Rosario Dawson posted a series of RIPPrince Instagram posts including an iconic quote and a snapshot of a rainy day in New York City...”
“...while Salma Hayek shared a collage of images dedicated to the singer...”


“... https://t.co/Bczx7P32lM-Ava  Duvernay (@ AVA) April 21, 2017 for more information about the prince's legacy, watch the following video. "
"Towards beauty."
Prince died in April of an accidental drug overdose at the age of 57. He had a great influence on the music world with his pioneering pop songs and performances
A year after the late "purple rain" singer's untimely death, many celebrities paid homage to him through instagram posts and twitter with the "ripple" tag
"Related to how the purple ruling prince continued to rule pop culture, one year later, he died, and film director Spike Lee shared a photo of his most precious property - a golden guitar next to the shape of the prince symbol, which will be handed down from generation to generation..."
"Li's will will be written in my will..."
Grammy winner and longtime fan Arthur has posted a portrait of a purple umbrella shared by many stars, including actress taraji P. Hansen and singer songwriter Janel Monet
It's not the first time many celebrities have paid homage to the superstar - usher added major Lazer's "1999" cover at last year's cochella Festival, while Monet performed a mix and match of Prince tracks at last year's best awards
"Janelle mon á e Cindi Mayweather janelemonae April 21, 2017 more Lenny Kravitz performs Prince salute at the 2017 rock and Roll Hall of fame ceremony unforgettable actress Rosario Dawson has released a series of riprince instagram posts, including an iconic quote and a snapshot of a rainy day in New York City..."
“…… Salma Hayek shared a jigsaw puzzle dedicated to the singer... "



Number  1085
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I owe everything to her.””
““I wrote back ‘Maybe,'” says Reid.”
“Look no further than Ryan Lochte and his wife Kayla Rae Reid.”
“The couple — who tied the knot (again!)”
“...on Sunday — first met online when the Olympic swimmer, 34, messaged the model, 27, on Instagram in 2016.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She was living in L.A. at the time and I was in Charlotte, North Carolina.”
“I went to L.A. for training and was going out to a club.”
“She was going out to the same club with her girlfriend,” Lochte tells PEOPLE exclusively.”
““I was like, ‘Oh, maybe we’ll finally get to see each other.”


"I owe her everything."
"I wrote back and said, 'maybe,'" Reed said
"And look at Ryan Rochette and his wife, Kayla ray reed."
"The couple - who's married again!"
“…… Last Sunday - in 2016, the 34 year old Olympic swimmer sent a message to the 27 year old model on instagram to meet online for the first time. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She lived in Los Angeles and I lived in Charlotte, North Carolina."
"I went to Los Angeles to train and get ready to go to a club."
"She went to the same club with her girlfriend," Rochette told people exclusive
"I thought," Oh, maybe we can finally meet. "



Number  1086
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Sofia Richie Hits the Town Without Scott Disick Following His 'KUWTK' Spat With Kourtney KardashianScott Disick Apologizes to Emotional Kourtney Kardashian After Introducing Sofia Richie to Their KidsSofia Richie On Boyfriend Scott Disick Facing Endless Criticism: 'I Just Get Really Angry'Related Gallery...”
“"If she's gonna have another baby why don't they just have one together?"”
“In a sneak peek of Sunday's all new Keeping Up With the Kardashians -- which airs at 9 p.m. ET/PT on E!”
“-- Kim tells her friend, Larsa Pippen, that Scott wants more kids with Kim's sister, Kourtney Kardashian.”
“Though they're not currently dating, Scott and Kourtney have been together on and off for years and share three children -- Mason, 8, Penelope, 6, and Reign, 3.”
“"Scott just texted me that he wants to have another baby [...] with Kourtney," Kim, 37, tells Larsa.”
“"I think he just wants one more... And she wants one more!"”
“Larsa, 44, offers her two cents, telling Kim, "If they both want to have more kids, like, why not have them together?”
“Their kids are gorgeous."”
“Kim points out an obvious flaw in the plan, noting that Scott, 35, and Kourtney, 39, were both in relationships at the time of filming; the former is currently dating Sofia Richie and the latter was previously with Younes Bendjima, though they split in August.”


"Embedded code restart" content: after Sophie aristic had a quarrel with Courtney Kardashian without Scott Disick, Scott Disick apologized to the emotional Courtney Kardashian after introducing Sophie Ritchie to their children. About his boyfriend Scott Disick, Scott Disick faces endless Criticism: "I'm really angry..."
"If she wants to have another child, why don't they have one together?"
"Catch up with Kardashian on peep Sunday's new show - it's on air at 9pm EST / Pacific time at e!"
"Kim told her friend Lhasa Pippen that Scott wanted to have more children with Kim's sister Courtney Kardashian."
"Although they haven't dated yet, Scott and Courtney have been together intermittently for several years. They have three children - Mason, 8, Penelope, 6, Reeve, 3."
"Scott just texted me that he wanted to have another child with Courtney ]Kim, 37, told Lhasa
"I think he just wants one more... She wants another one! "
Lhasa, 44, gave her two cents and told Kim, "if they all want to have more children, why not have them together?"
"Their children are beautiful."
"Kim pointed out an obvious flaw in the plan, pointing out that Scott, 35, and Courtney, 39, were both in love at the time of filming; the former is currently dating Sophia Ritchie, while the latter was with yones bengima, but they broke up in August."



Number  1087
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You won’t be judged."”
“"For me, the little bits that I’ve learnt so far is that it’s really important to have this conversation.”
“Everybody has mental health and we shouldn’t be ashamed of it and just having a conversation with a friend or family member can really make such a difference," William says from a room at Kensington Palace.”
““It’s time that everyone speaks up and really feels very normal about mental health; it’s the same as physical health.”
“Williams invited Gaga to participate after he read an open letter she issued through her Born This Way Foundation in which she revealed a sexual assault at 19 that left her with PTSD.”
“...tired and you are so sad and you are so full of anxiety that you can barely think she says...”
“In my life I go Oh my goodness look at all these beautiful wonderful things that I have I should be so happy but you can t help it if you wake up in the morning and you are so...”


"You won't be judged."
"For me, one thing I've learned so far is that it's very important to have this conversation."
"Everyone has mental health problems and we shouldn't be ashamed of them. Just talking to friends or family can really make a big difference," William said in a room at Kensington Palace
"It's time for everyone to say it and really feel that mental health is normal; it's the same as physical health."
"Williams invited Gaga to attend because he read an open letter she sent through the born this way foundation, in which she revealed that a one-time assault at the age of 19 led to her suffering from post-traumatic stress disorder."
“… Tired, you're so sad, you're so anxious, you can hardly imagine her saying
"In my life, I'm gone. Oh, my God, look at all these beautiful things I have. I should be very happy, but if you wake up in the morning, you can't help but..."



Number  1088
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Turns out, the moment wasn’t exactly romantic when Brown was filming with her co-star Finn Wolfhard.”
“The 13-year-old Stranger Things actress visited The Tonight Show on Tuesday to promote the Netflix show’s second season.”
“She decided to recap the beloved series' first season in an epic rap.”
““Let’s go back to Indiana circa 1983, just four boys in the basement, chillin’ playing D&D,” she began, effortlessly rapping in her jumpsuit.”
““There was Lucas, there was Willy Will, and Dustin, there was Mike.”
“But one night Will goes missing while he’s riding on his bike.”
“Yes, that’s when they met me, Eleven.”
“I had no hair on my head.”
“I had been so close to dead.”She continued, finally referencing her character’s signature traits, rapping, “All I need is my Eggo waffles, I’m in love with those.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"It turns out that the moment brown and her partner Finn wolfhard were filming was not romantic."
"The 13-year-old" strange things "actress visited" Tonight Show "on Tuesday to promote the second season of" Netflix show. "
"She decided to go back to the first season of this popular series with epic rap."
"Let's go back to Indiana around 1983, with only four boys in the basement, playing D & D games," she began, effortlessly rapping in jumpsuits
"Lucas, Willie will, Dustin, Mike."
"But one night will disappeared on his bike."
"Yes, that's when they met me, eleven years old."
"I don't have hair on my head."
"I'm dying," she went on, finally referring to the iconic feature of her character, rap, "I just need my waffles. I love them."



Number  1089
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here...”
“...email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Thanks for signing up to the News newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please...”
“LEMONADE Trailer HBO Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to the News newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by...”
“The 25-year-old Londoner responded to the comments and “tabloid gossip” with posts on Instagram clarifying that the rumours have no basis and she has the “utmost respect for Beyonce”.”
“Lemonade Singer actor and activist Zendaya right HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Actor and activist Amandla Stenberg HBO On Tuesday Ora s Instagram comments varied from the emojis to offensive misogynistic insults...”
“Z HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Hattie White Jay Z s grandmother HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Gwen Carr Eric Garner s mother HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Chloe and Halle Bailey of singing duo Chloe x Halle HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s...”
“Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Lisa Kaindé Diaz of music duo Ibeyi HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Lesley McSpadden Mike Brown s mother HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Leah Chase restaurant owner and Queen of Creole cuisine HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Jay...”
“Fulton Trayvon Martin s mother HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Serena Williams HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Oscar nominated actor Quvenzhané Wallis HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Naomi Diaz of music duo Ibeyi HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Ballerina Michaela DePrince HBO”
“Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Show all 16 1 16 Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Tina Knowles Beyoncé s mother and her husband Richard Lawson Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Model Winnie Harlow HBO Every cameo in Beyoncé s Lemonade Sybrina...”
“A day later they turned their attention to Rita Ora who is signed to Jay Z’s record label, yet currently involved in a legal battle with the label.”


“… If you would like to contact us, please check this box to read our complete mailing list agreement terms... "
“… Email please check the box, if you want to contact us to read our complete mailing list agreement terms, thank you for registering for newsletters verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors independent, hope to inform you of the offer and update information by email, please... "
"Lemonade Trailer HBO, please enter your email address, please enter a valid email address, please enter a valid email address to register. Thank you for registering the newsletters verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors independent. We hope to inform you of the offer and update in the following ways..."
The 25-year-old Londoner responded to the comments and "tabloid gossip" on instagram, clarifying that the rumors were groundless and that she "has great respect for Beyonce."
"Lemonade singer, actor and activist zendaya right HBO on Tuesday, in every guest appearance of Beyonce lemonade actor and activist amandra Stenberg HBO, instagram's comments range from facial expressions to disgusting insults to women..."
"Every time Z HBO plays Hattie white Jay in Beyonce lemonade, every time Z grandmother HBO plays Beyonce lemonade, every time Gwen Carr Eric Garner's mother HBO plays Chloe x Halle HBO in Beyonce lemonade..."
"Every time I guest star in Beyonce lemonade, Lisa caindiaz of HBO, the music group ibey, every time I guest star in Beyonce lemonade, every time I guest star in Beyonce lemonade, the mother of Leslie maxpaden Mike Brown, every time I guest star in Beyonce lemonade, every time I guest star in Beyonce lemonade, the owner of restaurant Leia chase and the queen of Creole food, HBO guest star in Beyonce lemonade, every time I guest star in Beyonce lemonade..."
"Fulton Trevor Martin's mother, every guest star in HBO Beyonce lemonade, every guest star in HBO Beyonce lemonade, Oscar nominated actor kuwenjan Wallis, every guest star music group in HBO Beyonce lemonade, every guest Ballerina MI in HBO Beyonce lemonade chaela DePrince HBO”
"Every guest of Beyonce lemonade shows every guest of all 16 1 16 Beyonce lemonade. Every guest of Beyonce lemonade Tina knows every guest of Beyonce's mother and her husband Richard Lawson Beyonce lemonade model Winnie Harlow HBO Beyonce lemonade sybrina..."
"A day later, they turned their attention to Rita Ola, who signed with jay z's record company but is now involved in a legal dispute with the record company."



Number  1090
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s made a big impact on his life and hasn’t partied at all since they met.””
““[Sofia’s] been great for him,” the source said.”
“...on Disick who has openly struggled with alcohol abuse and is the father to sons Mason 8 Reign Aston 3 and daughter Penelope 5 all with ex girlfriend Kourtney Kardashian...”
“Image zoom Credit Romain Maurice Getty Images for Haute Living Sofia Richie and Scott Disick RELATED VIDEO Scott Disick and Sofia Richie Continue Their PDA Tour of Miami with a Sweet Dinner A source recently told PEOPLE the two are very serious and that Sofia has been a positive influence...”
“The couple were first linked in May and have spent much of their time since then traveling, taking in trips to Miami, Venice, Milan, Puerto Vallarta and Los Cabos (to name a few).”
“Sofia and Disick appear happy as ever as they head into their first Christmas together.”
“The premise involved Disick throwing ice cubes at Sofia across the room as she attempted to catch them.”
“Disick labeling the video simply, “Night.”Image zoom Credit: Scott Disick/InstagramImage zoomSofia RichieImage zoomSofia RichieImage zoom Credit: Scott Disick/InstagramEarlier in the evening, he and Sofia played a game he called “Ice trader” in another video posted to his account.”
“She paired the top with some white briefs and matching cozy socks.”
“Wearing a long-sleeve sweatshirt designed to mimic St. Nick’s classic red-and-white coat and black belt, Sofia appeared to be having the time of her life and she let loose.”


"She has had a great influence on his life and has never been to a party since they met."
"(Sophia) was very good to him," the source said
“… In dixic, who openly struggles with alcoholism, is the father of son Mason 8 ruling Aston 3 and daughter Penelope 5 both with ex girlfriend Courtney Kardashian... "
"Image zooming credit Roman Morris Getty pictures advanced life Sophie and Scott Disick Related videos Scott Disick and Sophie arick continue their PDA trip to Miami with a sweet dinner a source recently told people that these two are very serious and Sophie has always been a positive influence..."
"The couple first got together in May, and since then they have spent most of their time traveling to Miami, Venice, Milan, port bayarta and Los Cabos (to name a few)
"Sophia and desik looked as happy as ever on their first Christmas together."
"The premise is that desik throws the ice to the other side of the room as Sophia tries to grab it."
Disc simply marks the video as "night.". Image zooming source: Scott disc / instagram image zoomsoia richieimage zoomsoia richieimage zooming source: Scott disc / instagram early in the evening, he and Sofia played a game he called "ice trade" in another video posted to his account
"She paired the top with some white underwear and comfortable socks."
"Sophia is wearing a long sleeve Sweatshirt that imitates Saint Nick's classic red and white coat and black belt design. She looks very interesting and relaxed."



Number  1091
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ever.”
“And he’s gonna be real bummed when he finds out you can’t even do that!” (No one has ever sounded more Canadian than this guy saying this line.”
“IHM mind control technique even though it definitely sounds like she s saying You re marrying me which would be a real curve ball...”
“DEANN You re mirroring me TERENCE Does it feel as false for you as it does for me I had to re watch this doozy five times before I realized that Deann is saying You re mirroring me apparently an...”
“...against her It s getting hard for you actually Why is everyone so horny this week...”
“DEANN I see you ve made plans to join us in Venice TERENCE That s because I couldn t bear the thought of being here without you DEANN Hmm I imagine that must be very hard for you TERENCE pressed...”
“Do yourself a favor: grab your favorite scene partner and read this one out loud for a fun segment of The Arrangement theatre.”
“But when Deann stops by his office to discuss the trip, the dialogue that ensues is downright puzzling.”
“He’s sending his wife Shelly Miscavige Deann (also Kyle’s producing partner) along in his place.”
“David Miscavige Terence Anderson is supposed to skip Venice to stay home and work on his new book for Scientology The Institute of the Higher Mind (IHM).”


"Never."
"When he finds out you can't even do that, he will be very depressed! "No one ever sounds more Canadian than the guy who said that."
"I have a mind control skill, even though it sounds like she said you're going to marry me. It's a curveball..."
"Dean, you're imitating me, Terence. Do you and I think it's fake? I had to look at it five times before I realized that Dean said you were imitating me, obviously a... "
“… It's getting more and more difficult for her, why is everyone so sexual this week... "
"Dean, I know you've planned to go to Venice with us, Terence. That's because I can't stand the idea of not having you here. Dean, well, I think it must be hard for you, Terence..."
"Do yourself a favor: find your favorite scene partner and read it aloud as an interesting part of the rehearsal theater."
"But when Dean came to his office to discuss the trip, the conversation that followed was completely incomprehensible."
"He sent his wife Shirley miskevich Dean (who is also Kyle's production partner) to replace him."
"David Miscavige Terence Anderson should skip Venice and stay at home to write a new book for Scientology, the Higher Institute of the mind (IHM)"



Number  1092
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And now, Loman’s suit will be added to this pile.”
““From someone who has been thought of as a good friend, involved only in a consensual relationship, these claims are not only mystifying to Mr. Weinstein, but deeply upsetting, and they are not supported by the facts,” Kupferstein said.”
“On Monday, German actress Emma Loman filed a suit in Los Angeles against the disgraced producer, alleging that he raped her in 2006 at the Cannes Film Festival.”
“She also claims that he threatened to ruin her career if she dared to come forward with the allegations.”
“Loman is suing for assault, violation of human-trafficking laws, battery, and false imprisonment, according to the Guardian.”
““Fearful both that no one would believe her and the potential retaliation from such a powerful figure, Loman stayed silent,” the lawsuit reads, per the Guardian.”
““It was only upon the late 2017 revelation of the scope of Weinstein’s wrongful actions .”
“.”
“...that Loman felt safe coming forward to seek redress for Weinstein’s rape of her.”In the suit, Loman claims she first met Weinstein in 2004 at the Venice Film Festival and that he later invited her to Cannes as his guest.”


"Now, Loman's suits will be added to this pile."
Kupferstein said: "from a person who is regarded as a good friend and only involves a mutually agreed relationship, these statements not only confuse Mr. Weinstein, but also make him deeply uneasy, and are not supported by facts."
German actress Emma Loman sued the disgraced producer in Los Angeles on Monday, accusing him of raping her at the Cannes Film Festival in 2006
"She also claimed that if she dared to make charges, he threatened to destroy her career."
According to the guardian, Loman is suing for beatings, violations of human trafficking laws, beatings and illegal imprisonment
According to the guardian, the lawsuit said: "Loman has been silent because he is worried that no one will believe her and that such a powerful person may retaliate against her."
"This is after Weinstein's scope of wrongdoing was disclosed at the end of 2017."
“.”
“…… Loman felt safe to come forward and seek compensation for Weinstein's rape. " In the lawsuit, Loman claimed that she first met Weinstein at the Venice Film Festival in 2004 and later invited her to Cannes



Number  1093
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hollywood Medium with Tyler Henry airs Wednesdays on E!”
“After everyone left he ended up passing away."”
“The sisters appear on Wednesday's episode of Hollywood Medium With Tyler Henry, where Henry warns Khloe, 32, that she might be susceptible to skin cancer and tells Kylie, 19, that she might be stuck in an unhealthy relationship.”
“RELATED: Kylie Jenner and Boyfriend Travis Scott Get Matching Tattoos – See the Pics!”
“"OK this just came through really strongly.”
“Skin, I'm seeing skin, I'm referencing to what looks like melanoma," Henry tells the Keeping Up With the Kardashians star.”
“"I'm getting a reference to three separate situations that I view as being problem areas.”
“You have a susceptibility on your back and there's a susceptibility on your leg and I need you to keep both in mind.”
“This is huge."”
“He then tells Kylie that there is a situation "with an individual from the past that you have been romantically involved with."”


"Hollywood media and Tyler Henry on Wednesday at e!"
"After everyone left, he died."
"The sisters appeared on Wednesday's Hollywood media show with Taylor Henry, who warned 32 year old Chloe that she might be vulnerable to skin cancer and told 19-year-old Kelly that she might be in an unhealthy relationship."
Related report: Kelly Jenner and her boyfriend Travis Scott got a matching Tattoo - look at the picture
"Well, it's really strong."
"Skin, I see skin, I mean things that look like melanoma," Henry told keep up with Kardashian
"I found three different situations and I think they are problem areas."
"Your back is susceptible and your legs are susceptible. I need you to remember these two."
"It's huge."
Then he told Kelly that there was a situation where "with someone in the past, you had a romantic relationship."



Number  1094
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She specializes in pop culture, country music, and news content.”
“QCWriter is a journalist who is fueled by espresso and motivated by determination.”
“Do you think her and Evan are in the midst of getting back together?”
“Over the last six months, there has been a tremendous amount of drama surrounding Staci, so her response was definitely unexpected.”
“Hmmm …What do you think her comments mean?”
“She also revealed that a “wife’s love” doesn’t just fade away after six months, referring to the time her and Evan have been broken up.”
“She went on to say she is very appreciative for the advice, but she has nothing but well wishes for Evan and his band.”
“According to Fox News, Staci responded by saying that Evan and his family will always mean something to her.”
“Staci seemed to frown upon that idea.”
“Here’s how it all went down:An Instagrammer decided to tell Staci she should remove all the photos of Evan from her social accounts.”


She is good at pop culture, country music and news content
"Qcwriter is a journalist, driven by espresso, driven by determination."
"Do you think she and Evan are getting back together?"
"There has been a lot of drama around Stacy in the last six months, so her reaction must have been unexpected."
"Well What do you think her words mean? "
"She also revealed that a" wife's love "will not disappear after six months, referring to the time when she and Evan broke up."
"She went on to say that she was very grateful for Evan's advice, but she had only good wishes for Evan and his band."
According to Fox News, Stacy responded that Evan and his family always meant something to her
"Stacy doesn't seem to approve of the idea."
"Here's the thing: instagrammer decided to tell Stacy that she should remove all of Evan's photos from her social account."



Number  1095
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...them consider following in Claire s footsteps Hit the comments with your Season 4 predictions...”
“Along the way the Frasers cross paths with notorious pirate and smuggler Stephen Bonnet in a fateful meeting that will come back to haunt the Fraser family Meanwhile in the 20th century Brianna and Roger navigate their complicated relationship and come across a piece of history that makes both of...”
“Per the official synopsis, Jamie and Claire “must negotiate a tenuous loyalty to the current British ruling class, despite Claire’s knowledge of the American Revolution to come.”
“(There’s also the not-small matter of the approaching American Revolution…) Meanwhile, back in Boston, Brianna and Roger become privy to some information that could alter the course of the Frasers’ lives.”
“After a violent storm shipwrecked them in America at the end of Season 3, Jamie and Claire begin Season 4 reuniting with Jamie’s family in the Colonies and figuring out where to make their home.”
“The new run of episodes will draw from Diana Gabaldon’s Drums of Autumn, the fourth book in the Outlander novel series.”
“(Watch a teaser trailer.)”
“The time-travel drama will return on Sunday, November 4, at 8/7c, Starz announced Thursday.”
“It can only mean one thing: Outlander is on its way back for Season 4.”
“Hear those drums of autumn in the distance?”


“…… They are considering following in Claire's footsteps and commenting on your forecast for the fourth quarter... "
"Along the way, the fraziers meet the notorious pirate and smuggler Stephen Bonet. It's a meeting destined to meet again, which will haunt the fraziers. At the same time, in the 20th century, Brianna and Roger steered their complex relationship and met a period of history, which made them both... "
According to the official syllabus, Jamie and Claire "although Claire is well aware of the coming American Revolution, they" must negotiate a weak loyalty to the current British ruling class. "
"(there is also a big problem, that is, the approach of the American Revolution...) At the same time, back in Boston, Brianna and Roger have some information that could change the trajectory of Fraser's life
"At the end of the third season, they were shipwrecked in the United States by a violent storm. At the beginning of the fourth season, Jamie and Claire were reunited with Jamie's family in the colony and decided where to settle down."
"The new series will be based on Diana galwalden's autumn drum, the fourth book in the Outland novel series."
(watch the trailer)
"The time travel show will return to 8 / 7 degrees Celsius on Sunday, November 4," stats announced on Thursday
"It can only mean one thing: Hollande is coming back in the fourth quarter."
"Do you hear the drums of autumn in the distance?"



Number  1096
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The flick is slated to hit US theatres on December 22.”
“He’s almost like a guerrilla filmmaker.”The Post tells the story of Ben Bradlee (Hanks) and Katharine Graham (Streep), and Graham’s decision to publish the Pentagon Papers in 1971, at the risk of losing her family-owned newspaper.”
“He just wants to figure it out as he goes along.”
“You mean can I just say high maintenance Meryl Streep Sharing his experience of working with Meryl Hank said She was mad at me because I didn t tell her Steven doesn t rehearse...”
“A couple of days back while appearing on The Late Show with Stephen Colbert Hanks jokingly said that his The Post co star was high maintenance After host Stephen Colbert explained to Hanks that many people trust him including his co star Streep Hanks playfully rolled his eyes and said...”
““By the way, the movie is dedicated to Nora Ephron, who claims that phrase – high maintenance – as her own,” noted Streep.”
“She said, “Just check the amount of time he took in hair and makeup and how much I did, and you’ll find out who’s high maintenance.”The three-time Oscar winner also dropped a little trivia about the phrase and its relation to the film.”
“Online.”
“While attending the premiere of her upcoming movie, The Post, Streep addressed the joke the actor recently made about her being “high maintenance,” reports E!”
“And her answer is like ‘mother’ of all comebacks.”


"The film is scheduled to be shown in American Theaters on December 22."
"He's like a guerrilla filmmaker." This article tells the story of Ben Bradley (Hanks) and Katherine Graham (Streep), and Graham's decision to publish the Pentagon report in 1971 at the risk of losing his family newspaper
"He's just trying to figure it out as he walks."
"Do you mean I can say that high maintenance Meryl Streep shared his working experience with Meryl Hank and said that she was angry with me because I didn't tell her Steven didn't rehearse..."
"A few days ago, when he appeared on the evening show with Stephen Colbert Hanks, the host Stephen Colbert explained to Hanks that many people trusted him, including his partner, Streep Hanks, who jokingly turned his eyes and said that his post co star was high maintenance..."
"By the way, the film is dedicated to Nora Efron, who claims that phrase - high maintenance - is her own," Streep said
"She said," just look at the time he spent on his hair and make-up and how much time I spent, and you'll know who has a high maintenance fee. "The three time Oscar winner also revealed some trivia about the phrase and its relationship with the film."
"Online."
At the premiere of the upcoming post, Streep talked about a recent joke made by the actor that she "has a high cost of living!"
"Her answer is like all comeback mothers."



Number  1097
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If you’re really feeling daring, pick up some hair chalk or temporary color spray rock out with pink, lavender or blue.”
“Make a hair statementPay a visit to your local salon (or braid bar, if your city has one) and opt for a messy fishtail braid.”
“In fact, many of us are perfectly content with sticking with our normal style of dress, but wouldn’t mind adding a small tweak or two to make things fun.”
“Below, we’ve rounded up some easy-to-replicate ideas about what to wear on New Year’s Eve that are understated but also festive and wholly chic.”
“Wear your best shoes—with jeans.”
“There’s no hard-and-fast rule that says thou shalt wear cocktail attire on December 31.”
“In fact, oftentimes the trick to looking like the most effortlessly stylish woman in the room is to take the opposite route by keeping your clothes basic—think skinny jeans and a go-to blouse—and adding your best shoes.”
“So modern!”
“Rock a statement ear cuffThe beauty of the ear cuff is its ability to make any outfit look that much edgier—a plus if you’re wearing a cocktail dress or “going out” clothes.”
“Clip a flower in your hairDo like supermodel Sasha Pivovarova and add a clip-in flower to your hair.”


"If you really feel bold, use chalk or temporary color spray to paint pink, lavender or blue."
"Make a manifesto, go to your local Salon (or braid, if you have one in your city) and choose a messy fishtail."
"In fact, many of us are very satisfied with sticking to our normal dress style, but we don't mind adding one or two tricks to make things interesting."
"Here, we summarize some easy to copy ideas about what to wear on New Year's Eve, which are low-key, festive and totally unique."
"Wear your best shoes with jeans."
"There is no hard and fast rule to wear cocktail dress on December 31."
"In fact, to look like the most effortless fashionable woman in the room, the usual trick is to take the opposite approach, keeping your clothes basically skinny jeans and top, plus your best shoes."
"It's so modern!"
"Rock a statement earcuffs the charm of earcuffs is that they can make any dress look more avant-garde-a bonus if you're wearing cocktail dresses or" going out "clothes."
"Like super model Sasha Pivovarova, put a flower in her hair and a flower in her hair."



Number  1098
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Young said she was “surprised” people noticed so quickly and quickly confirmed the speculation.”
“Follow SI Wrestling on FacebookFollowThe wedding was in the wee hours of April 9 and fans noticed Ambrose’s makeshift wedding ring (a hairband) the next night on Raw.”
“So we had to get a witness and we called and woke up a friend of ours and got it done.”(They live in Las Vegas, obviously.)”
“We're like, 'It's fine, you can come down.'”
“What's happening?'”
“Have you guys been drinking?”
“They were very concerned by the way because it was 1 o'clock in the morning, so technically it was Sunday and they were very concerned about us calling, they were like, 'Is everything OK?”
“It was so handy and his name was Pastor Pete and he lived around the corner from us, so he was there.”
“So we ended up going on Yelp and we found a 24-hour pastor to come to our backyard.”
““We were going to bed and he like busted out the ring and we were like, 'Oh man I guess we should do this now.'”


"Yang said she was" surprised "that people noticed so quickly and quickly confirmed this conjecture
"The follow Si wrestling wedding on Facebook follow took place in the early morning of April 9, and fans noticed Ambrose's temporary wedding ring (a hairband) the next night
"So we had to find a witness, and we called one of our friends and got it done." (apparently, they live in Las Vegas.)
"We said," it's OK, you can come down. "
"What happened?"
"Did you drink?"
"They were worried because it was 1 a.m., so technically it was Sunday. They were worried about us calling and they said," is everything ok? "
"It's very convenient. His name is pastor Peter and he lives near us, so he's there."
"So we started shouting and got a 24-hour priest to come to my backyard."
"We're going to bed, he seems to have broken the ring, and we say," oh my God, I think we should do it now. "



Number  1099
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"[9]See also [ edit ]Menendez: A Killing in Beverly Hills, a 1994 film also based on the murders.”
“...seeming disjointed...”
“8 Broadly s Mitchell Sunderland on the other hand praised the film s high low tone and Love in particular stating that Courtney Love s performance as Kitty holds the film together highlighting her ability to be over the top in one scene and subtle the next without the performance...”
“[7] Similarly, New York Post critic Robert Rorke lambasted the murder scene in Menendez: Blood Brothers as "creepy and amateurish" and felt the film generally lacked any insight.”
“[6]Reception [ edit ]Ken Tucker, writing for Yahoo!TV, found the film to be "a melodramatic mess" that "resembles a creepy high-school play" in quality.”
“[6] The film was shot in Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada, between February and March 2017.”
“[3][4]Cast [ edit ]Production [ edit ]On January 31, 2017, it was announced that Courtney Love had joined the cast of the film.”
“It aired on the Lifetime network in North America on June 11, 2017.”
“The film is based on the lives of Lyle and Erik Menendez, two brothers who were convicted of murdering their parents in Beverly Hills, California in 1989.”
“Menendez: Blood Brothers is a 2017 television film directed by Fenton Bailey and Randy Barbato, written by Abdi Nazemian, and starring Courtney Love, Nico Tortorella, Benito Martinez, and Myko Olivier.”


"[9] see also [editor] manedes: Murder at Beverly Hills, and the 1994 film was based on murder."
“… Seems to be out of touch... "
"On the other hand, the director Mitchell Sunderland praised the high and low profile of the film, especially the performance of Courtney love, because Kitty put the film together to highlight her ability to perform well in one scene and subtly in the next scene without acting..."
"[7] similarly, Robert Rorke, a critic of the New York Post, denounced" menedes: blood brothers. "（ Menendez:Blood Brothers ）The murder scene in the film is "creepy and amateurish" and considers the film generally lacking insight
"[6] reception [editor] Ken Tucker, writing for Yahoo! The TV station found the film "chaotic plot" and "similar in quality to the creepy high school drama"
"[6] the film was shot in Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada, from February to March 2017."
"[3] [4] cast [editor] production [editor] on January 31, 2017, it was reported that Courtney love had joined the cast of the film."
"It was broadcast on North America's lifelong television network on June 11, 2017."
The film is based on the lives of Lyle and Eric menedes, two brothers who murdered their parents in Beverly Hills, California, in 1989
“ Menendez:Blood Brothers It's a 2017 TV movie directed by Fenton Bailey and Randy barbato, written by Abdi nazemian, starring Courtney love, Nico tortorella, Benito Martinez and MYKO Olivier. "



Number  1100
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““If it weren’t for hitting ‘rock bottom’ I never would have had this amazing hill of life to climb back up.””
““I say thank you to a career that taught me so much, that while now retired, is still fun to go back to from time to time to do things the RIGHT way,” he says.”
“...lessons...”
“So I enrolled myself in the dietetics program at MATC and graduated with honors and got my first PT job and my first ironmantri under my belt two years later After nine years as a model Kraus is now retired from that career track but says it taught him valuable...”
““It was finally time to take charge of my health and fitness and learn how to do things the right way,” he says.”
““For two years I struggled in silence, always trying but never knowing how to compete with my counterparts.”After he “hit rock bottom” in 2007, Kraus realized that he needed to find a healthier way to achieve the look he wanted.”
““At the age of 20 I had developed an eating disorder while blindly attempting to keep up with the level of fitness of my fellow models and competitors,” Kraus, 31, wrote.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The fitness trainer posted on Instagram that he strictly limited his diet to lose weight.”
“...years as a model...”


"If I hadn't hit the bottom of the valley, I would never have climbed back this magical mountain of life."
"I want to thank a career that has taught me a lot. Although I'm retired now, it's still fun to go back and do things the right way from time to time," he said
“… Lesson... "
"So I signed up for matc's nutrition course and graduated with excellent grades. Two years later, I got my first Pt job and my first Datura. After nine years as a model, Klaus is now retired from this career path, but he says it has taught him something valuable.... "
"It's finally time to take charge of my health and fitness and learn how to do things the right way," he said
"In the past two years, I have been struggling silently and working hard, but I never know how to compete with my competitors." In 2007, after Klaus "fell to the bottom", he realized that he needed to find a healthier way to realize the image he wanted
"At the age of 20, I developed an eating disorder while blindly trying to keep up with the health of my models and competitors," Klaus, 31, wrote
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The fitness coach posted on instagram that he strictly restricted his diet to lose weight."
“… Years as a model... "



Number  1101
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Love Actually follow-up airs on May 25th on NBC to coincide with the United States’ designated Red Nose Day.”
“The Red Nose Day charity supports projects around the world that ensure kids are safe, healthy and educated.”
“The sequel first aired in the U.K. in March to coincide with its Red Nose Day.”
“Liam Neeson, Laura Linney, Colin Firth and Rowan Atkinson also star in the trailer and new sequel made by the original film’s writer-director Richard Curtis.”
“Meanwhile, Hugh Grant reprises his dance moves, though now he’s a little worse for wear, and Bill Nighy’s character boasts he’s had sex with a Kardashian, but he can’t recall which one.”
“This time around Andrew Lincoln’s character queries Keira Knightley’s character about his beard (she isn’t a fan).”
“Several scenes echo moments from the original movie, including the famous cue card scene.”
“The Red Nose Day Actually clip opens with scenes from the first film before introducing what’s currently happening in the characters’ lives.”
“The movie, which reunites key cast members from the original 2003 film, will air on Red Nose Day in May.”
“A new trailer for the Love Actually short sequel highlights where the characters are now, and for some, not much has changed.”


"To coincide with the red nose day in the United States, NBC broadcast a follow-up to love on May 25."
"The Red Nose Day Charity supports projects around the world to ensure children's safety, health and education."
"The sequel will be broadcast in the UK in March to commemorate its red nose day."
"Liam Nissen, Laura Lini, Colin Firth and Ron Atkinson also starred in the trailer of the film and the new sequel directed by original screenwriter and Director Richard Curtis."
"At the same time, Hugh Grant did his dance steps again, but now he's dressed a bit badly. Bill Nishi's character boasts that he had sex with Kardashian, but he can't remember which one."
"This time, the character of Andrew Lincoln asked the character of Keira Knightley about his beard (she's not a fan)
"There are several scenes that echo the moments in the original film, including the famous cue card scene."
"Red Nose Day" actually starts with the scene in the first movie and then introduces what's going on in the character's life
"The film, which will air on red nose day in May, brings together the main actors of the original 2003 film."
"A new" love "trailer is actually a short sequel, which highlights the character's current position. For some people, it doesn't change much."



Number  1102
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And although Ben Higgins chooses that moment to dramatically uncross— and then re-cross — his legs, the clip ends before revealing which guy Clare found love with.”
“Sitting right here,” Harrison says, as he gestures to her fellow cast members, inviting “the mystery man in Clare’s life” to stand up.”
““Well that man is here tonight.”
“Image zoomRELATED VIDEO: The ‘Bachelor Winter Games’ Cast Reveal Behind-the-Scenes Secrets, Biggest Flirt and MoreBut before Crawley gets a chance to go any further, Harrison reveals that the audience is about to meet the lucky guy.”
““[The] timing was so off, but it was so perfect for me because it was a man that just cared about if I was okay,” she adds, her voice brimming with emotion.”
““The second I got back to Sacramento, [I] checked my phone and I had a message from a guy,” she says, before taking a second to gather her thoughts.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a clip from Thursday’s reunion show, Crawley tells Chris Harrison that even though things didn’t work out with Benoit Beauséjour-Savard or Christian Rauch during the series, she found love as soon as she left Vermont and headed back home.”
“Despite having two guys interested in her, Clare Crawley didn’t have the best luck finding love on Bachelor Winter Games — but it all worked out in the end.”
“Despite having two guys interested in her, Clare Crawley didn’t have the best luck finding love on Bachelor Winter Games — but it all worked out in the endClare Crawley Says She’s in Love After Leaving Bachelor Winter Games — But Who’s the Lucky Guy?”


"Although Ben Higgins chose that moment to dramatically uncrosse - and then re cross - his legs, the clip ends before revealing which man Claire fell in love with."
"Just sit here," Harrison said, gesturing to her crew and inviting "the mysterious man in Claire's life" to stand up
"Well, the man is here tonight."
"Image zooming related video: the cast of the 'Bachelor Winter Olympics' revealed the secrets behind the scenes, the biggest flirtation, etc., but before Crowley got a further chance, Harrison revealed that the audience was about to meet a lucky guy."
She added: "the timing is too bad, but it's perfect for me because he only cares if I'm ok."
"The moment I got back to Sacramento, (I) checked my cell phone and got a message from a man," she said, then spent a second sorting out her thoughts
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In a video on Thursday's reunion show, Crowley told Chris Harrison that although her relationship with Benoit bosyol saward or Christian lauch was not going well in the show, she found love as soon as she left Vermont
"Although there are two men interested in Claire, Claire Crowley didn't find the good luck of love at the bachelor Winter Olympics - but in the end everything was successful."
"Although there are two men interested in her, Claire Crowley didn't find good luck in love at the bachelor Winter Olympics - but eventually Claire Crowley said she fell in love after leaving the bachelor Winter Olympics - but who is the lucky guy?"



Number  1103
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up here to get INSIDER's favorite stories straight to your inbox.”
“In this case, it looks like being a stickler paid off.”
“Neilson Barnard/Getty ImagesPeople think the Nativity scene really took her look to the next level.”
“Neilson Barnard / GettyTruly a look.”
“You probably missed that Nativity scene.”
“But the one thing that really stole the show was her combination headband and hat, which was actually a depiction of the Nativity scene.”
“She topped off her ensemble with loads of blue eyeshadow and a flower tucked behind her ear.”
“Parker wore a ruffled gold and silver gown with a dramatic train.”
“The actor, who previously said she's a "stickler" when it comes to dressing to the theme, made good on her word and arrived in an outfit that perfectly aligned with this year's "Heavenly Bodies: Fashion & The Catholic Imagination" exhibit.”
“After sitting out last year's Met Gala, Sarah Jessica Parker returned to the event on Monday night — and she brought her A-game.”


"Register here to send insider's favorite stories directly to your in box."
"In this case, being a persistent person seems to be rewarded."
"Nelson Barnard / Getty Images people think that the scene of the birth of Jesus really makes her look better."
"Nelson Barnard / took a look."
"You may have missed the scene of the birth of Jesus."
"But what really stands out is her headband and hat combination, which is actually a depiction of the scene of the birth of Jesus."
She covered her ears with a blue eye shadow and a bunch of flowers.
"Parker was wearing a gold and silver frock robe with a dramatic train."
The actress has previously said that she is a "persistent" person in terms of clothing. She is true to her words and wears clothes that perfectly match this year's "celestial bodies: fashion and Catholic imagination" exhibition
Sarah Jessica Parker returned to the scene on Monday night after missing last year's Metropolitan Gala and brought a wonderful game



Number  1104
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— continued, and the two were eventually joined by ensemble members from all of the night's nominated shows.”
“The song — repeatedly declaring, "This is for the people who lose!”
“Despite never winning, both hosts have earned Grammy and Tony nominations.”
“"Well you know, it is what it is," Groban said.”
“"No, nothing, nothing," Bareilles replied.”
“Groban quickly interrupted the song, asking Bareilles, "That can't be right, Sara, no Grammys for you?"”
“"We are your hosts / And we're perfectly suited to be / Because did you know / Neither one of us has never won anything," they sang in unison.”
“The duo could apparently relate, too.”
“What began as a dueling pianos performance between this year's hosts, Sara Bareilles and Josh Groban, turned into a dedication to every nominee that would be leaving the show empty-handed.”


"- go on, the two will eventually be joined by the ensemble members of all the nominated programs of that night."
The song - repeatedly proclaims, "it's for the lost!"
"Although they never won the prize, both hosts were nominated by Grammy and Tony."
"You know, that's what happened," Groban said
"No, nothing, nothing," replied bareyers
Groban quickly interrupted the song and asked Barry, "no way, Sarah, don't you have a Grammy?"
"We're your host / we're perfect / because you know / none of us has won anything," they sang in unison
"The two are obviously related."
"This year's duel between Sarah bareyers and Josh Groban began as a tribute to every nominees who would return empty handed."



Number  1105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Is Kate your favorite of the Big Three from “This is Us?””
“In this case, Metz’s stylist did make the dress slightly longer, but the original can be purchased online.”
“The actress has struggled with weight her entire life and even started doing Weight Watchers when she was 11 years old.”
“She says her family struggled to get by when she was growing up and she turned to food for comfort.”
“Because of her size, she says some of the most difficult experiences she had during her childhood revolved around back-to-school shopping.”
““It was terrible.”
“I had to settle for clothes.”
“I wanted cute little cutoff shorts, but I had to get the longer ones because of my thighs.”
“I thought, ‘Maybe I could cut them and maybe I could make them my own,’” she told People magazine last year.”
““It was really hard.”


Is Kate your favorite of the big three in this is us
"In this case, Metz's stylists do make the skirt a little longer, but the original can be purchased online."
"The actress has been struggling with her weight all her life and even started to observe her weight at the age of 11."
"As she grew up, her family was struggling and she turned to food for comfort," she said
Because of her short stature, her most difficult childhood experience was going back to school shopping, she said
"It's terrible."
"I had to settle for clothes."
"I want cute shorts, but because of my thighs, I have to buy longer ones."
"I thought maybe I could cut it out, maybe I could make it myself," she told people magazine last year
"It's really hard."



Number  1106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple had planned to marry on May 5 at a destination wedding.”
“I’m not gonna have a child, a human being, that will replace what a dog fills.”Cena, 40, and Nikki, 34, announced that they called off their engagement on Sunday, a year after he proposed during WrestleMania 33.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom From left: Winston, Nikki Bella and John Cena | Credit: Winston the Frenchie/Instagram; Inset: Broadimage/REX/Shutterstock“Look,” he told Rolling Stone in April 2016.”
““I know I cannot handle raising a child.”
“It’s like with the dog.”
“My biggest thing to Nicole about the dog was: Love dogs, but I can’t contribute to taking care of one.”
“I don’t have the time.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“Signup for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
““And just because everyone else is happy with children doesn’t mean that’s how I have to live,” he added.”


"The couple originally planned to get married at their destination wedding on May 5."
Senna, 40, and Nicky, 34, announced they canceled their engagement on Sunday, a year after he proposed in wrestling mania 33
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Image zooming from left to right: Winston, Nikki Bella and John cena | source: Winston the Frenchie / instagram; inset: broadimage / Rex / shutterstock" look, "he told rolling stone in April 2016."
"I know I can't afford to have children."
"It's like being with a dog."
"The most important thing I said to Nicole about dogs is: love dogs, but I can't help take care of them."
"I don't have time." Want to keep up with the latest news from people? "
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Just because other people are happy with their children doesn't mean I have to live like this," he added



Number  1107
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”
“Peyton Reed will be returning to the director’s chair for “Ant-Man and the Wasp,” which Disney will release on July 6.”
“They’ll be joined by Michelle Pfeiffer, Laurence Fishburne, Hannah John-Kamen.”
“Michael Douglas, Bobby Cannavale, Judy Greer, and Michael Peña will all be reprising their roles.”
“), the film follows Scott Lang/Ant-Man as he deals with being placed under house arrest in further proof that no good deed goes unpunished.”
“Set between “Captain America: Civil War” and the just-released “Avengers: Infinity War” (so much war!”
“Watch the trailer below.”
“Paul Rudd’s bite-sized superhero becomes the latest Avenger-adjacent hero to get the sequel treatment in the film, which upgrades Evangeline Lilly’s character from civilian to sidekick.”
“Lest you forget that the Marvel Cinematic Universe continues to expand, a new trailer for “Ant-Man and the Wasp” is here to remind you that our eventual heat death is at least a few years away.”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"
"Payton Reid will return to directing ant man and the hornet, and Disney will be released on July 6."
"Michelle Pfeiffer, Lawrence fishbourne and Hannah John Carmen will also attend."
"Michael Douglas, Bob cannaval, Judy Greer and Michael Pena are all going to play their roles again."
"), which tells the story of Scott long / ant man under house arrest, further proves that nothing good goes unpunished."
Set between "Captain America: Civil War" and just released "Avenger: Infinite War" (so many wars! "
"Look at the trailer below."
"Paul Rudd's mouthful superhero has become the latest Avenger hero in the film to receive sequel treatment, upgrading the role of Evangeline Lily from civilian to partner."
"In order to make you forget that the universe of amazing movies continues to expand, a new trailer for ant man and wasp is here to remind you that we are still at least a few years away from our final death."



Number  1108
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Aaron Carter Breaks Down in Tears Detailing the Events Surrounding His DUI Arrest This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“For more on his arrest, watch the video below.”
“"What I need is for people to understand that I'm human and that I make mistakes just like every other human in this world, but I would never risk my life or my girlfriend's life" he said.”
“Aaron Carter explained his recent DUI arrest to ET, breaking down in tears.”
“RELATED: Comedian Brandon Mychal Smith Reported Frontrunner for Nick Cannon Hosting Gig on 'AGT'The Disney Channel alum isn't the only star recently dealing with DUI drama.”
“He recently appeared in Dirty Grandpa, and has a recurring role on You're the Worst and Sweet/Vicious.”
“Smith started his acting career at age 8 in a small role in She's All That, before continuing on in roles on Phil of the Future, Sonny with a Chance, and So Random!”
“His blood alcohol level was reportedly at twice the legal limit.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Exclusive: Alan Carter is in tears, detailing his arrest for drunk driving. This video is not available because we can't load sponsor information. "
"For more information about his arrest, please watch the video below."
"What I need is for people to understand that I'm human and I'm going to make mistakes like everyone else in the world, but I'm not going to risk my own or my girlfriend's life," he said
"Alan Carter explained to et about his recent arrest for drunk driving, and he was in tears."
"Related story: comedian Brandon Mychal Smith reports that Nick Cannon's lead singer at AGT, the alumni of Disney Channel, is not the only bright star dealing with drink driving incidents recently."
"He recently appeared in dirty grandfather, with a recurring role in you are the worst, sweet / vicious."
"Smith started his acting career at the age of 8, playing a small role in" that's what she is ", and then continuing to play roles in" Phil of the future "and" sunny with a chance ", and it's very casual!"
"His blood alcohol level is reported to be twice the legal limit."



Number  1109
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bruns’ lawyer entered a not guilty plea on her behalf.”
“...arraigned on charges of manslaughter criminally negligent homicide and assault stemming from the March 5 crash that killed Abigail and Joshua...”
“The actress 35 appeared in the revival of The King and I on Friday stepping back into the role of Lady Thiang a part that won her a Tony Award in 2015”
“Miles is sharing the role with Naoko Mori in the production of the Rodgers & Hammerstein musical, which transferred from New York City’s Lincoln Center Theater and opened in London’s West End in July.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Last night, our friend @RuthieAnnMiles was a triumph in @KingandIWestEnd,” wrote Miles’ costar Kelli O’Hara.”
““Every moment was a gift and continues to be.”“She is singing like an angel and commanding the stage with a heavenly force,” O’Hara, 42, added.”
““An inspiration to all.”
“I knew you would want to know Image zoom Ruthie Ann Miles performing with The King and I cast during the 2015 Tony Awards Credit Theo Wargo Getty Images Image zoom Ruthie Ann Miles in LCT s The King and I Credit Paul Kolnik Many at the show and beyond...”
“...shared their thoughts about Miles return on social media...”


"Burrows' lawyer pleaded not guilty on her behalf."
“…… He was arraigned for manslaughter and the plane crash that killed Abigail and Joshua on March 5. "
"The 35 year old actress reappeared the role of Mrs. Tien in the king and my resurrection last Friday, which won her a Tony Award in 2015."
Myers will work with Naoko mori on the production of Rogers and Hammerstein's musical, which is converted from the Lincoln Center theatre in New York City and opens in the west end of London in July
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Last night, our friend @ Ruthie Ann miles won at @ kingand I west end," miles' partner Kelly O'Hara wrote
O'Hara, 42, added: "every moment is a gift and will continue."
"Inspiration for all."
"I know you'll want to know image zooming Ruth Ann Miers with king and I during the 2015 Tony Awards performance credit theo voggetti image zooming Ruth Ann Miers with king and I credit Paul kolnik many in the show and beyond..."
“… Shared their thoughts on miles return on social media... "



Number  1110
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...s marriage proposal...”
“Let s go As for the inspiration behind the names Monroe was named after Marilyn Monroe who has been an inspiration to Carey 42 while Moroccan comes from the top tier of Carey s New York City apartment which features Moroccan inspired décor and was also the site of Cannon...”
“It appears the twins may already have nicknames, as Cannon Tweeted, “Roc and Roe!”
“Carey and Cannon’s daughter did not receive a middle name because the singer herself doesn’t have one.”
“Scott is both the middle name of Cannon, 30, and his grandmother’s maiden name.”
“Carey and hubby Nick Cannon’s son is named Moroccan Scott Cannon and their daughter is named Monroe Cannon, the couple announced on her official Web site.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Mariah Carey recently dropped a hint that her newborn twins’ names would each begin with the letter “M.” Now, the mystery has been cleared up.”
“The singer named her son Moroccan Scott and her daughter MonroeDid you guess correctly?”


“… "My proposal..."
"Let's take a look at the inspiration behind the name. Marilyn Monroe is named after Marilyn Monroe. Marilyn Monroe has always been the source of inspiration for Kelly 42, while Moroccans come from the top floor of Kelly's New York City apartment, which features Moroccan style decoration and is also the location of cannons..."
"It seems that the twins may already have a nickname, as cannon tweeted," rock and rock! "
"Kelly and cannon's daughter didn't get a middle name because the singer didn't have a middle name."
"Scott is both the middle name of 30-year-old cannon and his grandmother's maiden name."
"Kelly and her husband Nick Cannon have a son named Scott cannon of Morocco and a daughter named Monroe cannon," the couple announced on their official website
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Maria Kelly recently hinted that the names of her newborn twins would start with the letter "m". Now, the mystery has been solved
"The singer named her son Scott, a Moroccan, and her daughter Monroe. Are you right?"



Number  1111
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...as a mother Credit Rex Features Cristiano Ronaldo Jr stars with his dad in advert for CR7 junior collection...”
“They ve brought a lot of happiness and joy to my life 7 Ronaldo also has twins as well as son Cristiano Jr Credit Instagram 7 Rodriguez was taken to hospital in Madrid on Sunday night Credit Splash News 7 Ronaldo now has four children as Rodriguez prepares for life...”
““Spending time with them, being by their side, smiling and laughing with them.”
“Being a father and seeing my family grow is without doubt the greatest privilege I’ve had.”
““I can’t wait to be a dad again.”
““It has softened me and given me a different perspective on what is really important in my life.”
“It s taught me things about love that I never knew existed...”
“Cristiano Ronaldo and Georgina Rodriguez announce their fourth child will be named Alana Martina SUN BETS BET 10 GET A FREE 30 BET 7 Alana Martina is the latest addition to Ronaldo s ever growing brood Credit Getty 7 The couple have been together for around a year Credit Getty...”
“Reflecting on life as a father at the launch of his new clothing line last week, Ronaldo said: "Being a father is a unique and personal journey, something that has changed me completely.”
“Rodriguez was admitted to hospital this evening in Madrid, around nine days earlier than predicted by the Spanish media.”


“… As a mother, credit Rex Features Cristiano Ronaldo as a little star with his father in the advertising CR7 teen collection. "
"They brought a lot of happiness and joy to my life. 7 Ronaldo and twins and his son Cristiano junior credit instagram 7 Rodriguez was sent to Madrid hospital on Sunday night credit splash news 7 Ronaldo now has four children and Rodriguez is preparing for life..."
"Be with them, be with them, laugh with them."
"It's undoubtedly my greatest honor to be a father and watch my family grow up."
"I can't wait to be a dad again."
"It softened me and gave me a different perspective on what really matters in my life."
"It taught me something about the existence of love that I never knew..."
"Cristiano Ronaldo and Georgina Rodriguez announced that their fourth child will be named Alana Martina sun bet 10 to get a free 30 bet 7 Alana Martina is the latest member of Ronaldo's growing parent-child credit Getty 7. The couple have been together for about a year, credit Getty..."
Ronaldo reviewed his life as a father at last week's launch of his new clothing line, saying: "being a father is a unique personal journey, which has completely changed me."
"Rodriguez was taken to hospital in Madrid tonight, about 9 days earlier than the Spanish media predicted."



Number  1112
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But so long as celebrities still have problems finding love, just like the rest of us, then there will always be more fodder for additional seasons.”
“Hey, he's a single guy, and it doesn't seem like there's any bad blood between the former Jersey Shore star and Malika.”
“And while she said she's looking to date, she also said, "It's not a quick, instantaneous thing and I just need to take my time."”
“News, Malika is currently single — her relationship with Ronnie didn't last.”
“Malika HaqqAccording to an interview with E!”
“So, let's see how the Season 2 cast fared.”
“But the best way to draw new celebrities to Famously Single is to show how much things have improved for the ones who have stayed in the loft and done the show.”
“It will be hard to find a group with more challenges than the Season 2 cast, which featured three members who have already been on at least one reality show looking for love before.”
“...is waiting until Famously Single finalizes a new cast, gets them together, and begins production before announcing the third season.”
“Perhaps E!”


"But as long as celebrities have trouble finding love, just like the rest of us, there will always be more material in the new season."
"Hey, he's a bachelor. There doesn't seem to be any bad blood relationship between the former Jersey coast star and Malika."
"Although she said she was looking for a date, she also said," it's not a quick, instantaneous thing, I just need to take my time. "
"There's news that Malika is single - her relationship with Ronnie doesn't last long."
"Malika hakadin said in an interview!"
"Well, let's see how the actors perform in season two."
"But the best way to attract new celebrities to become famous singles is to show those who stay in the attic how much their situation has improved."
"It's hard to find a more challenging crew than the second season crew, which has three members who have been on at least one reality show to find love before."
“… Is waiting for the famous single to complete, a new cast to bring them together, and start production, then announce the third season. "
"Maybe e!"



Number  1113
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Phillippe 18 and son Deacon 14 as her dates to the premiere...”
“RELATED VIDEO Beyoncé Had Plenty of Snacks Even a Juice Box on Hand to Help Blue Make It Through the Grammys Beyoncé wasn t the only one to make the movie night a family affair Reese Witherspoon who stars as Mrs Whatsit in the film brought look alike daughter Ava...”
““It’s a whole lot to put on, but when I did the whole scene out in the middle of the grasses and the golden grasses, I thought, ‘I am a relative of Beyoncé — a distant relative of Beyoncé,’ ” she told Entertainment Tonight on the blue carpet.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Which, to “Beyoncé’s aunt.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“It was appropriate that the Grammy winner attended the screening, given that Oprah Winfrey compared her whimsical character in the film, Mrs.”
“(Get all the outfit details here!)”
“Beyoncé finished off her outfit with neutral heels and a pair of small frame sunglasses, which are quickly becoming part of her signature look.”
“The dress had a plunging neckline and showed plenty of leg.”
“Beyoncé, 36, also posted several snaps of her ensemble, a white dress with a blue flower pattern and ruffled skirt.”


"Philippe 18 and her son Dicken 14 as her date premiere..."
"Related video Beyonce has a lot of snacks and even a juice box in hand to help blue pass the Grammy Awards. Beyonce is not the only one to make movie night a family event. Reese Witherspoon, who starred in Whatsit's wife in the movie, brought a look like daughter eva..."
"It's a very difficult scene to perform, but when I shot the whole scene between the grass and the golden grass, I thought I was Beyonce's relative - Beyonce's distant relative," she said on the blue carpet of entertainment tonight
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
For Beyonce's aunt, do you want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements? Is there a celebrity mom blog
"Given Oprah Winfrey's comparison of her whimsical nature in the film, it's appropriate for the Grammy winner to be present."
"(get all the details of the dress here!)"
"Beyonce finished her look with high heels and a pair of small framed sunglasses, which soon became part of her signature look."
"The neckline of the dress sagged, revealing its plump legs."
"Beyonce, 36, also had a couple of fitted photos, a white dress with blue flowers and a frilly skirt."



Number  1114
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Also returning will be Orlando Bloom and Keira Knightley in their roles as Will Turner and Elizabeth Swann, who were last seen in 2007’s “At World’s End.”“Tales” also stars Javier Bardem, Kaya Scodelario, Brenton Thwaites, Kevin McNally, and Geoffrey Rush.”
“The fifth installment of Disney’s swashbuckling franchise will see a departure from 2011’s “On Stranger Tides” in an effort to return to the original film’s feel.”
“The stunt comes just a month before “Pirates of the Caribbean: Dead Men Tell No Tales” sails into theaters May 26.”
“(@BaileyNielson) April 27, 2017Depp even abandoned ship to entertain guests waiting in line on the facade of the attraction.”
“Well… pic.twitter.com/oAyIIu1e56 — B.”
“You know those little Disney Myths like…Johnny Depp will dress up as Jack Sparrow and sit in the Pirates of the Caribbean Ride?”
“Some lucky riders were able to capture footage of Depp getting into character on social media.”
“This is not the first time Depp has stopped by the ride that inspired 2003’s “Curse of the Black Pearl,” but this is his first appearance during the “Dead Men Tell No Tales” era of his iconic captain’s log.”
“Instead of the usual animatronic in Depp’s likeness, visitors were treated to the actual actor reciting lines from the popular film franchise while brandishing his sword at the Anaheim, California, theme park.”
“Johnny Depp surprised Disneyland park-goers Wednesday evening when he dressed up as Captain Jack Sparrow aboard the “Pirates of the Caribbean” ride.”


Orlando Bloom and Keira Knightley will also return, playing Will Turner and Elizabeth Swann. Their last appearance was in "the end of the world" in 2007. Javier Baden, Kaya skodiro, brenton Switz, Kevin McNally and Geoffrey rush will also play in the tales
"In order to return to the original feeling, Disney's fifth luxury movie series will be different from 2011's" strange tide. "
The stunt is only a month away from the release of Pirates of the Caribbean: the dead don't tell stories on May 26
(@ baileynielson) on April 27, 2017, Depp even abandoned the ship to entertain guests in line at the front of the scenic spot
"Well pic.twitter.com/oAyIIu1e56 -B.“
"Do you know those little Disney myths, such as Will Johnny Depp dress up as Jack Sparrow and sit on the Pirates of the Caribbean
"Some lucky drivers are able to capture Depp's entry into the role on social media."
"It's not the first time Depp has stopped on the inspiration journey of Curse of the black pearl in 2003, but it's his first appearance in the iconic era of captain's diary," the dead don't tell stories. "
At Anaheim theme park in California, tourists are invited to recite lines from popular movie series while waving swords, instead of electronic cartoons like Depp
Johnny Depp surprised Disneyland visitors by posing as captain jack sparrow on board the Pirates of the Caribbean on Wednesday night



Number  1115
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...he deadpanned.”
“What is the shape of my head going to look like?"”
“It wasn't about what she lost.”
“It was about what she feared she might find.”
“Hudson chose the style for an upcoming film directed by singer Sia, and as she explained to Jimmy Kimmel Thursday night, her "character is just a shaved-head kind of girl."”
“"It's funny, too, because when (the cut) first started, I didn't think about it because it was (for) the role," she explained.”
“"It was like, 'Oh, let's do this!'"”
“Actress Kate Hudson attends the 21st Annual Urbanworld Film Festival at AMC Empire 25 theater on September 23, 2017 in New York City.”
“J. Countess / WireImageSia and the actress' 6-year-old son, Bingham, did the honors, and as they got underway, Hudson suddenly focused on a newfound fear.”
“"Oh!”


“… He has no expression
"What shape will my head be?"
"It's not because she lost something."
"That's what she's afraid she'll find."
Hudson chose the style of an upcoming film directed by singer thea, who, as she explained to Jimmy Kimmel on Thursday night, "is just a girl with a shaved head."
"It's also interesting because at the beginning, I didn't think about it, because it's for the character," she explained
"It's like," Oh, let's do it! "
"On September 23, 2017, actress Kate Hudson attended the 21st City World Film Festival at AMC Empire 25 theater in New York."
"Countess J. wireimagesia and the actress's six-year-old son Bingham were honored, and when they started, Hudson suddenly focused on a newly discovered fear."
"Oh



Number  1116
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jokes That He Was Emily Blunt s Stalker Before They Married...”
“You realize when you are in something that really touches people that it does offer an escape Related Stories Emily Blunt and John Krasinski Are a Tortured Married Couple in the A Quiet Place Trailer Emily Blunt Is Annoyed AF That Her Daughter Is Developing an American Accent John Krasinski...”
“Blunt has starred in several box-office hits—The Girl on the Train, The Devil Wears Prada, Into the Woods, to name a few—so it's easy to see why fans might feel comfortable approaching her in public.”
“Krasinski, on the other hand, played friendly Regular Guy Jim Halpert for several seasons on The Office.”
“Obviously, people feel connected to him.”
“That being said, Blunt and Krasinski are still entitled to their privacy, as we all are, and shouldn't feel obligated to take photos or chat with fans.”
“Several celebrities have opened up about why they refuse to take selfies with people in public, and Blunt just added her voice to the chorus.”
“In a new interview with Vanity Fair, Blunt says she's not into snapping for photos with fans—not anymore, at least.”
“And it's not because she doesn't want to meet the people who watch her films: She just wants a more genuine exchange.”
““Social media has changed the landscape, so an encounter with you is valued more as a social media currency than a genuine interaction,” Blunt told the magazine.”


"Joking that he was Emily Bronte's stalker before she got married..."
"You realize that when you're in a place that really touches people, it does provide a story about escape. Emily Bronte and John krazinski are a tormented married couple who tow a trailer in a quiet place. Emily Bronte is very angry because her daughter is developing an American accent, John krazinski..."
"Bronte has starred in several box office hits, such as the girl on the train, the devil in Prada, walking into the forest and so on, so it's easy to understand why fans are willing to approach her in public."
"Krazinski, on the other hand, played several friendly seasons with Jim Halpert in his office
"Obviously, people feel connected to him."
"Nevertheless, Bronte and krazinski still have the right to their privacy, and we are both, and should not feel obliged to take photos or chat with fans."
"Several celebrities said publicly why they refused to take selfies in public. Bronte just added her voice to the chorus."
"In a new interview with vanity fair, Bronte said she no longer likes taking pictures with her fans, at least not now."
"It's not that she doesn't want to see the people who see her films: she just wants a more sincere exchange."
"Social media has changed the world, so meeting you is more like a social media currency than real interaction," Bronte told the magazine



Number  1117
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That's where your heart belongs to.””
“The now-deleted snap reportedly read: “It's all about who you look for in a crowded room.”
“Kardashian has remained silent on the subject and while an official comment is yet to be made, in a recent Instagram Stories post, the star seemed to suggest that she would be staying with her man.”
“The duo’s relationship had been in the spotlight since earlier this year after allegations surfaced days before their daughter True’s birth that Thompson had been spotted with another woman.”
““Everyone hopes she will come back to Los Angeles once True is a little older.”( Hated: Khloe Kardashian and boyfriend Tristan Thompson / Splash News )The news comes after the star hinted that she is staying with Thompson following his cheating scandal.”
““They are letting her have her space in Cleveland and keep her routine, but wish they could have more moments together as a family unit and have True around more.”
“A source told the publication: “Everyone is understanding of her situation and they are all trying to be there for her, but obviously want her home.”
“...news the socialite’s family “want her home” with them.”
“According to E!”
“The 33-year-old model move to Cleveland with boyfriend Tristan Thompson prior to the birth of their child.”


"Your heart belongs here."
"It's all about who you're looking for in a crowded room," the now deleted snapshot said, according to the report
"Kardashian has been silent about this, although there has been no official comment, but in a recent instagram article, the star seems to have hinted that she will live with her man."
"Since earlier this year, the relationship between the two has been the focus of attention, as accusations surfaced that Thompson was found with another woman a few days before their daughter truer was born."
"Everyone hopes that once she really grows up, she will come back to Los Angeles." (obnoxious: chloka Dashan and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson / splash News) the news came after the star hinted that she would live with Thompson after the scandal
"They let her have her own space in Cleveland and keep her daily life, but hope they can spend more time together as a family unit and have more reality around them."
"Everyone is learning about her, they are trying to help her, but obviously they want her to go home," a source told the media
“… The family of the news socialite "wants her home" to be with them
"According to e!"
"The 33 year old model moved to Cleveland with her boyfriend Tristan Thompson before the baby was born."



Number  1118
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Officials are reviewing the play.”
“Here's a replay:9:56 p.m.: Eagles score possible touchdownEagles tight end Zach Ertz completes a pass, but there's discussion whether he had control in the end zone.”
“Their "Next Man Up" mentality when injuries arose was inspiring to anyone who has ever faced a setback, as was their willingness to embrace the role of underdogs.”
“They consistently wowed us with their dynamic play and relentless pursuit of victory.”
“The 2017-18 Philadelphia Eagles are Super Bowl Champions, and they've brought tremendous joy to hundreds of thousands throughout the City and region.”
“...we ve dreamed of...”
“FlyEaglesFly SBLII pic twitter com rJ3F075x9P NFL NFL February 5 2018 Sunday February 4 11 20 p m Philadelphia Mayor Jim Kenney releases statement about Eagles victory For so many who have called themselves Eagles fans for a generation this is the day the game the season and the team...”
“An emotional Jason Kelce reflects on his journey in becoming a @SuperBowl champion.”
“...the world to me...”
“...https t co oKESarSedm CBS Philly CBSPhilly February 5 2018 12 13 a m NFL tweets a video of Super Bowl LII highlights 12 04 a m Eagles center Jason Kelce gets emotional I ve officially accomplished the best thing in this sport with a group of guys that mean...”


"Officials are reviewing the play."
"Here's a replay: 9 PM: 56:00: hawks score, maybe touchdown. Hawks press tuzac eltz to finish the pass, but whether he controls the end zone is still under discussion."
"When injured, their" next man "mentality inspires anyone who has ever faced setbacks, and so is their willingness to accept the role of the weak."
"We've been amazed by their energy and their relentless pursuit of victory."
"In the 2017-18 season, the Philadelphia Eagles are Super Bowl Champions, and they have brought great joy to hundreds of thousands of people in the whole city and region."
“… We dream of... "
"Flyeaglessfly sblii pic twitter com rj3f075x9p NFL NFL on Sunday, February 5, 2018, at 11:20 on February 4, Fei City Mayor Jim Kenney issued a statement to tell so many people who call themselves a generation of eagles fans about the eagles' victory. This day is the day of the game, the season and the team..."
"Jason kelce looks back on his career as a Super Bowl champion with emotion."
“… My world... "
“… HTTPS t co Ke sarsedm CBS Philly cbspilly on February 5, 2018 and December 13, 2018, the NFL released a video of Super Bowl LII on twitter, focusing on the excitement of Jason kelce, the 1204 a m Eagles center. I officially completed the best thing in the sport. A group of people mean... "



Number  1119
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She'd like to close her racing career by competing at next month's Daytona 500 and the Indianapolis 500 in late May, a farewell she has dubbed "The Danica Double."”
“Patrick is shifting her career off the racetrack and into the business of her personal brand.”
“Now I'm going to cheer for the whole team."”
“"Take out the word 'probably.'”
“"Now I am probably going to cheer for the whole team," she added.”
“She told the AP the two first met at The ESPYS in 2012 and that despite her allegiance to the rival Bears, "I told him a long time ago I'd always root for him as a player.”
“Patrick in late November ended a five-year relationship with fellow NASCAR driver Ricky Stenhouse Jr.Patrick and Rodgers have been linked romantically since the start of the new year, right before Patrick began promoting her new fitness book.”
“Rodgers split from actress Olivia Munn in 2017 after a three-year relationship.”
“"Yes, Aaron and I are dating," Patrick told The Associated Press.”
“Patrick, a Chicago Bears fan, confirmed Monday she is dating the Green Bay Packers quarterback.”


"She wants to end her racing career and take part in next month's Daytona 500 and late May's Indianapolis 500, which is what she calls the" Danica Duo "farewell race
"Patrick is moving her career from racetrack to her personal branding business."
"Now I'm going to cheer for the team."
"Get rid of the word 'possible'"
"Now I may have to cheer for the whole team," she added
"She told the associated press that they first met in 2012, despite her allegiance to bear," I told him long ago that I had supported him as a player
Patrick ended his five-year relationship with race car driver Ricky Steinhaus at the end of November, and Rodgers had a romantic relationship with Patrick from the beginning of the new year, just before he began to sell her new fitness book
"Rogers and actress Olivia moon broke up in 2017 after three years in love."
"Yes, Alan and I are dating," Patrick told the associated press
Chicago Bears fan Patrick confirmed on Monday that she was dating the Green Bay Packers quarterback



Number  1120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Appearances...”
“Despite this, however, Garrett became unfaithful and fell in love with another woman who, unbeknownst to him was a federal agent.”
“...truth is your father broke the law and he hurt our family honey...”
“He's in prison because he deserves to be.” ―Chelsea to Levi on Garrett[src]Garrett Grayson is a character on Raven's Home.”
“He is the father of Levi and the ex-husband of Chelsea.”
“He is first mentioned in "Baxter's Back!".”
“HistorySometime after high school, Chelsea met a man named Garrett who she fell in love with and eventually married.”
“Chelsea's mother and Raven both disapproved of Garrett.”
“According to Chelsea, after marrying her, he doted on her and refused to let her do any housework, doing all the cooking and cleaning.”
“During their marriage, the pair had a son, whom they named Levi.”


"Appearance..."
"Nevertheless, Garrett was unfaithful and fell in love with another woman. He didn't know she was a federal agent."
“…… The truth is that your father broke the law and hurt our family, dear... "
"He went to jail because he deserved it." Garrett [SRC] Garrett Grayson is a character in Raven's house
"He's Livy's father and former husband of Chelsea
He was mentioned for the first time in "Baxter's back."
Some time after graduating from history high school, Chelsea met a man named Garrett. She fell in love with him and finally got married
"Neither Chelsea's mother nor Raven approve of Garrett
"According to Chelsea, after he married her, he spoiled her and refused to let her do any housework, do all the cooking and cleaning
They married and gave birth to a son named Levi



Number  1121
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“OMG.”
“The actress has always looked good, but at 51 she looks freaking amazing (and definitely defies the normal science of aging).”
“Now, her trainer is spilling what’s behind Halle's toned, fit physique.”
“Peter Lee Thomas has been working with Halle for about two years, and told People she’s super committed to fitness.”
““I had no idea what her age was when I met her.”
“I never looked or was interested in that, and when I found out, I was absolutely shell-shocked because she has the discipline and athleticism of a 25-year old."”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"My God."
"The actress has always been beautiful, but at 51 she looks amazing (and absolutely against the normal science of aging),"
"Now, her coach has said everything behind Haley's body building."
"Peter Lee Thomas worked with Harry for about two years and he told people that she was very committed to fitness."
"I didn't know her age when I saw her."
"I've never seen it and I'm not interested in it. When I found out, I was completely shocked because she had the discipline and sportsmanship of a 25-year-old."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information



Number  1122
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Who knows, though?””
““I had to keep it hush-hush from you guys.”He added: “Baby number two may be coming soon.”
“The couple have welcomed their second child, a baby boy named Beckett, on Monday, February 12.”
“The newborn joins 17-month-old big brother, Boomer.”
“The Olympic champ announced the news on Instagram on Tuesday, February 13, sharing a sweet pic of Johnson with Boomer and their newborn son.”
““Magical moments yesterday… Nicole and I would like to introduce Beckett Richard Phelps to the world!” he captioned the photo.”
““We had a healthy baby boy and a healthy mama.”
“I truly do feel like the happiest man in the world.”
“Being able to build our family to now 4 (6 with doggies) is so incredible!#familyof4now.”The pair announced that they were expecting a new bundle of joy in August by posting matching photos to their social media accounts of Johnson, 32, holding their son.”
““Number 2 on the way!!!!”


"But who knows?"
"I have to keep silent with you." He added: "baby number two may soon be born."
On Monday, February 12, the couple welcomed their second child, a baby boy named Beckett
"Newborns join the 17 month old brother, baby boomers."
"The Olympic champion announced the news on instagram on Tuesday, February 13, and shared a sweet picture of Johnson with Boomer and their newborn son."
"Yesterday's magic moment Nicole and I want to introduce Beckett Richard Phelps to the world! "He added a title to the photo."
"We have a healthy baby boy and a healthy mother."
"I really feel like the happiest person in the world."
"It's incredible that we can build our family up to four (six with puppies)! #The two posted photos of Johnson, 32, holding his son on social media and announced that they were looking forward to a new round of joy in August
"No.2 is on the way!!"



Number  1123
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Catch a sneak peek of Lopez on Thursday’s episode of Will & Grace below:Will & Grace, Thursday, March 8, 9/8c, NBC”
““She is a welcomed guest any time she wants to come back,” he concludes.”
““She comes to play and that’s what it’s all about.”Could we see Lopez on the show next season?”
““We were so excited to get Jennifer back,” he gushes.”
“Like his TV alter-ego, Hayes was excited to have Lopez back on the show after she appeared twice in 2004 on Will & Grace‘s original NBC run.”
““Much to Jennifer’s character’s chagrin, she’s just about had it with this guy named Jack McFarland,” the actor teases.”
“Says Hayes, “Even with the smallest part—a dead body—Jack still can’t get it right.” Could Jack get fired before he’s able to fulfill his first big acting break?”
“And how hard is playing a corpse for the aspiring actor?”
““It’s Shades of Blue on Will & Grace, but it’s also Jack filming the show Shades of Blue.” Got that?”
““The episode is a show within a show,” Sean Hayes tells us of his character Jack’s big TV break on the real-life crime drama.”


In "will and grace" on Thursday, you can peek at Lopez below: "will and grace, March 8, Thursday, 9 / 8C, NBC"
"She's a welcome guest whenever she wants to come back," he concludes
"She's here to play, that's all." Can we see Lopez on next season's show? "
"We're glad that Jennifer's back," he gushed
"Just like his TV" the other self, "Hayes was happy to get her back on the show after Lopez appeared twice on will and Grace's original NBC show in 2004
"To the chagrin of Jennifer's character, she's just fed up with a guy named Jack McFarlane," the actor joked
Hayes said, "even if it's the smallest part - a dead body, Jack still can't do it well." Can jack be fired before he completes his first performance breakthrough? "
"How hard is it for an aspiring actor to play a corpse?"
"It's will and Grace's shadow blue, but Jack's also shooting shadow blue. Do you understand? "
Sean Hayes tells us about his character Jack's breakthrough in real life crime TV series



Number  1124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In December 2017, Us Weekly exclusively confirmed that the Abby Lee Dance Company owner had completed a prison Release Preparation Program as well as received a certificate in personal finance.”
“Along with prison time, she was fined $40,000 along with a $120,000 judgment, and ordered to two years of supervised release.”
“...into the United States...”
“She added I think one thing that I take from working with her is I learned how to deal with difficult people with different types of people As previously reported the reality star was also sentenced for not reporting the 120 000 worth of Australian currency that she had brought...”
““Never say never, but I’ve pretty much distanced myself for a while.”The 16-year-old dancer did, however, reveal that she “really learned so much from” Miller.”
““Probably not,” Sioux told Us about the possibility of reconnecting with Miller post-jail.”
“Us Weekly caught up with former mentee of Miller’s, Nia Sioux, at the Midnight Sun premiere on Thursday, March 15, who dished on leaving her former Dance Moms life behind.”
“Her new date is now projected to be May 25, which “includes credit for good conduct time that may be earned throughout the remainder of her sentence,” the bureau told Us Weekly on Friday, March 16.”
“However, due to good behavior, her initial release date of June 21 has been moved up.”
“The 52-year-old former Dance Moms star was sentenced to 366 days in federal prison in May 2017 for bankruptcy fraud.”


"In December 2017, American weekly exclusively confirmed that the boss of Abby Lee dance company completed the prison release preparation plan and obtained the personal financial certificate."
She was fined $40000 and sentenced to $120000 and released from prison for two years
“… Entering the United States... "
"She added that I think one of the things I learned from working with her was that I learned how to deal with different types of people, and as previously reported, reality TV stars were sentenced for not reporting the value of a $120000 she brought..."
"Never say never, but I've been away from myself for a while." However, the 16-year-old dancer revealed that she "really learned a lot from Miller."
"Probably not," Sue told us, possibly reconnecting with Miller prison
At the midnight sun's premiere on Thursday, March 15, American weekly interviewed Miller's former student, NIA sue, about her life as a dance mom before she left
"Her new date is now expected to be May 25, which" includes the possible time for good conduct during her sentence, "the agency told us weekly on Friday, March 16
"However, due to her good performance, her debut date was advanced to June 21."
"The 52 year old former dance mom star was sentenced to 366 days in federal prison in May 2017 for bankruptcy fraud."



Number  1125
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He’s dominate Phase 3, for sure.”
“Brolin on one of Marvel s heftiest contracts...”
“2, Avengers: Infinity War, Ralph Breaks the Internet (cameo), Avengers: EndgameConfirmed upcoming films: None… see abovefurther reading: Complete Marvel Movie Release SchedulePOM KLEMENTIEFFMantisFilms appeared in so far: Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“VIN DIESELVoice of GrootFilms appeared in so far: Guardians of the Galaxy, Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“In the end, Marvel went with Bradley Cooper, and we expect they got him on a long contract.”
“2, Avengers: Infinity War, Avengers: EndgameConfirmed upcoming films: NoneFinding the right voice for Rocket was a difficult one, with various comedians, voice actors, and film stars all coming in to read test lines.”
“2 – Stan Lee Cameo ExplainedBRADLEY COOPERVoice of RocketFilms appeared in so far: Guardians of the Galaxy, Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“...further reading: Guardians of the Galaxy Vol.”
“We wouldn’t be surprised if he is done with Disney after that, which is a shame given his mo-cap, and non-mo-cap, performances added a lot of character to this sometimes sterile universe.”
“The length of his Marvel contract is unclear, but returned for Endgame.”


"He's definitely dominant in the third stage."
"On Marvel's heaviest contract..."
"2, Avenger: Infinite War, Ralph breaks the Internet (guest), Avenger: end the game, confirm the upcoming movie: none See above for further reading: the complete Marvel movie release schedule POM klementieffmantis movie appears so far: Guardian of the galaxy volume. "
"So far, grott's voice of diesel has appeared in: Guardian of the galaxy, guardian of the galaxy."
"Eventually, marvel signed Bradley Cooper, and we expect them to sign a long-term contract with him."
"Avenger: the Infinite War" and "Avenger: the end" confirm the upcoming films: it is difficult to find the right dubbing for the rocket, and all kinds of comedians, dubbing actors and movie stars will come to read the test lines
"2 - Stan Lee guest stars in Bradley Cooper's the voice of the rocket movie to date: the guardian of the galaxy, the guardian of the galaxy volume."
“… Read more: Guardian of the galaxy
"We won't be surprised if he breaks up with Disney after that. It's a shame, because his Mo cap and non Mo cap performances add a lot of personality to this sometimes barren world."
"The duration of his contract with Marvel was unclear, but it was eventually returned."



Number  1126
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s time to go see her, Tess,” Randall says.”
“That’s my brother.”Tess hasn’t seen “her” in awhileBack on the Season 2 finale, we got our first glimpse of an older Randall and an older Tess.”
“Sterling K. Brown: We’ve all [in the cast] known that it’s Rebecca, though the audience didn’t know, and we know why it’s Rebecca and you guys will find out at the end of the season what it is.”
“How soon are we going to find out why everyone is gathering to see her?”
“TheWrap: How did you feel about the reveal Rebecca is the mysterious future “her” we’ve all been wondering about?”
“So since we didn’t get anymore new hints on screen, TheWrap was able to gather a few clues for you while speaking with Brown about Randall winning the Philadelphia City Council race and how those election results might impact the Pearsons in the present and the future.”
“Also Read: 'This Is Us' Season 3: 'ER' Alum Goran Visnjic Cast as Beth's Teacher on Backstory Episode“This Is Us” returned from hiatus tonight with an episode that jumped between the past and present — but didn’t head into the future again.”
“Does that mean they separate or even divorce?”
“That spat led to Randall sleeping on the couch, and a not so happy vibe between the happy couple in the present, with some hints in the future indicating the two are only communicating between Adult Tess.”
“The episode also ended with a fight between our Present Day Beth and Randall, because Randall refused to drop out of the city council race, when the polls show he won’t win and his wife asks him to give up and come back to helping his family.”


"It's time to see her, Tess," Randall said
"That's my brother." Tess didn't see "she" in the last episode of season 2 for a long time. We saw old Randall and old Tess for the first time
"Stirling K. Brown: we all know it's Rebecca, although the audience doesn't know, we know why it's Rebecca, and you'll know what it is at the end of the season."
"How long will it take us to figure out why everyone got together to see her?"
"The wrap": how do you feel about the revelation of "Rebecca" in "Rebecca is the mysterious future we've always wanted to know"
"So, since we don't get any new cues on the screen anymore, the wrap gathered some clues for you when talking with brown about Randall's winning the city council election in Philadelphia and the impact of these election results on the present and future of the Pearsons."
"Also read: 'this is our' third season: 'er' Alan Golan Visnjic plays Beth's teacher backstage episode 'this is our' return to rest tonight and jump between the past and the present with an episode - but not towards the future."
"Does that mean they are separated or even divorced?"
"The quarrel caused Randall to sleep on the sofa. The atmosphere between the happy couple is not very pleasant now. Some hints in the future indicate that they are only communicating with adult Tess."
"This episode also ended with the fight between Beth and Randall today, because Randall refused to withdraw from the city council election. At that time, the polls showed that he would not win, and his wife asked him to give up and come back to help his family."



Number  1127
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Last week, Kardashian revealed on her site and app that she has “a couple of names in mind” but is in no rush to decide.”
““We’re similar moms and have been two peas in a pod lately!”Image zoom Khloé Kardashian’s daughter True | Credit: Khloe Kardashian/InstagramRELATED VIDEO: The Kardashian KidsWhile baby True doesn’t have a middle name as of now, that could change.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Khloe Kardashian also calls sister Kim an "angel during pregnancy," as she prepared to welcome her daughter True, who arrived April 12Baby True is thinking pink.”
“The daughter of Khloé Kardashian and Tristan Thompson has quite the setup in which to get her Zs, judging from new photos of the nursery that the reality star shared to her website and app Monday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Visible are a comfy-looking piece of white lounge furniture, a rocking horse, a large lamb toy, a white dresser and a pink-and-white butterfly mobile.”
“A large pink stuffed bunny sits inside True’s crib, which is the same one Kardashian’s sister Kim Kardashian West used for all three of her children.”
““I’m obsessed with True’s Nursery Works lucite Vetro crib!”
“It’s feminine but still cool, which is the vibe of the nursery,” writes Kardashian, 33.”


Last week, Kardashian revealed on her website and app that she "has a few names in mind" but is not in a hurry to decide
"We are similar mothers. Recently, we are like two peas in a pod! "Image zooming khlo é Kardashian's daughter true | image source: Khloe Kardashian / instagram related video: Kardashian kidswille baby true currently has no middle name, which may change."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
She also called her "angel during pregnancy" because she was ready to meet her daughter who arrived on April 12. She was really, really thinking about pink
"According to the new nursery photos shared by the reality TV star on Monday's website and app, the daughters of heloe Kardashian and Tristan Thompson are well placed to get her ZS."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"What you can see is a comfortable looking white leisure furniture, a rocking chair, a lamb toy, a white dressing table and a pink butterfly car."
"There's a big pink rabbit sitting in truer's crib. It's the same crib that Kardashian's sister Kim Kardashian West used for three children."
"I'm obsessed with real nursery work, Lucite vitro crib!"
"It's feminine, but it's still cool, it's the atmosphere of the nursery," Kardashian, 33, wrote



Number  1128
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Michael Fassbender and Alicia Vikander on Their Instant Chemistry On and Off-Screen!”
“Hear what they had to say in the video below.”
“Last year, the lovebirds reminisced about how they met to ET.”
“The Tomb Raider star began dating Fassbender in 2014 and they worked together in the 2016 drama The Light Between Oceans.”
“They were then photographed wearing wedding rings and hanging out with family last weekend.”
“MORE: Alicia Vikander and Michael Fassbender Enjoy Beach Party Ahead of Rumored WeddingThe gorgeous couple got married in Ibiza earlier this month, according to multiple reports.”
“Another fan also posed with the Oscar winner and a very smiley Fassbender in Verona, and took to social media to share her encounter.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"This video is not available because we were unable to load the sponsor's email."
Exclusive: Michael Fassbender and Alicia wickander's on-screen and off-screen chemistry
"Listen to what they say in the video below."
"Last year, the couple recalled how they met on et
"Tomb Raider stars have been dating farsbender since 2014, and they worked together in the 2016 drama light of the sea."
"They were also photographed last weekend wearing wedding rings with their families."
More information: Alicia vicander and Michael Fassbender enjoy a beach party before their legendary wedding. According to several reports, the beautiful couple married in Ibiza earlier this month
"Another fan also took pictures in Verona with the Oscar winner and the smiling faspin, and shared her experience on social media."



Number  1129
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Ministry of Tourism who were not an official sponsor of the event issued a statement on Friday saying they re extremely disappointed with the way the events unfolded and apologizing to all who traveled to our country for this event...”
“We are working tirelessly to ensure each guest leaves the island safely and ask for everyone s patience and cooperation as we continue to provide ongoing updates via email and our official social media channels as they become available including refund information Image zoom Credit Noam Galai WireImage The Bahamas...”
“Due to circumstances beyond our control, we must postpone this experience,” the event organizers said in a statement.”
““Fyre Festival set out to provide a once-in-a-lifetime musical experience on the islands of Exuma.”
“Music acts Designer, Tyga, and Pusha T.Late Friday morning, festival organizers postponed the entire event indefinitely.”
“...flight from Miami and performances by Blink 182 Rae Sremmurd Skepta to G O O D”
“...making sure everyone is refunded He continued I truly apologize as this is NOT MY FAULT but I m taking responsibility I m deeply sorry to everyone who was inconvenienced by this Tickets for the event ranged from 4 000 to upwards of 250 000 and guests were promised a...”
“I will make a statement soon I m heartbroken at this moment my partners and I wanted this to be an amazing event it was NOT A SCAM as everyone is reporting I don t know how everything went so left but I m working to make it right by...”
““We are working right now on getting everyone of [sic] the island SAFE that is my immediate concern,” he wrote in a tweet on Friday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"The Ministry of tourism, which is not the official sponsor of the event, said in a statement on Friday that they are extremely disappointed with the development of the event and apologize to all those who went to China to participate in the event..."
"We are making unremitting efforts to ensure that every guest leaves the island safely, and please cooperate patiently. We will continue to provide the latest information through email and official social media channels, including refund information, image zooming credit Noam galai WireImage the Bahamas..."
"We have to postpone this experience because of conditions beyond our control," event organizers said in a statement
"The Fyre Festival is designed to provide a once-in-a-lifetime musical experience for the islands."
Music performance designers TEGA and Pusat. Late Friday morning, festival organizers postponed the event indefinitely
“… Flights and shows from Miami to gold
“… Make sure everyone gets a refund, he continued, I'm really sorry because it's not my fault, but I have to take responsibility, I'm deeply sorry for everyone who is inconvenient, tickets for this event range from 4000 to more than 250000, and promise guests one... "
"I will make a statement soon, I am very sad to my partner, I hope this is an amazing event, this is not a hoax, because everyone is reporting, I don't know how everything is so left, but I am trying to make it right..."
"We are now trying to make everyone on the island safe, which is my top concern," he tweeted on Friday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  1130
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“April 28 2017”
“We owe you an apology con t Fyre Festival fyrefestival April 30 2017 Guests have been sent a form that will provide the necessary information to apply for a refund Fyre Festival fyrefestival April 30 2017 Bahamas official statement on Fyre Festival FyreFestival pic twitter com NQo8AmXZlQ The Bahamas VisitTheBahamas...”
“To our guests and staff thank you again for your all patience as we navigate our next steps...”
“FyreFestival is a dream vision we poured our hearts souls into creating 2017 fell dramatically short of even modest expectations Fyre Festival fyrefestival April 30 2017 We re heartbroken that we let down all the guests who put their faith in us con t Fyre Festival fyrefestival April 30 2017”
“Both statements can be read below.”
“The Bahamas Tourism board also issued a statement of their own on Friday.”
“I’m deeply sorry to everyone who was inconvenienced by this.”In addition, an apology was issued Sunday from the official Fyre Festival Twitter account.”
“Also Read: 'Heartbroken' Ja Rule Says His Disastrous Fyre Festival 'Not a Scam'“I truly apologize as this is NOT MY FAULT,” he wrote, “but I’m taking responsibility.”
“Shortly after guests arrived, Blink-182 cancelled, citing doubts they could provide “the quality of performances we always give fans.”On Friday, Ja Rule posted a statement on social media saying that the festival was “not a scam” and that he was “heartbroken” at what had happened in the Bahamas.”
“...had been left in the dark with no instructions from festival organizers...”


"April 28, 2017"
"We owe you an apology for the festival of April 30, 2017. The guests received a form that will provide the necessary information to apply for a refund. The official statement of the Bahamas Festival on April 30, 2017 fyrefestival pic twitter com nqo8amxzlq the Bahamas visitthe Bahamas..."
"Thank you again to our guests and staff for your patience in our next action..."
"Fyrefestival is our dream and vision. Fyrefestival in 2017 is far lower than our expectation. Fyrefestival April 30, 2017 fyrefestival April 30, 2017 fyrefestival let all our confident guests down. We are very sad."
"Both statements can be read below."
"The Bahamas Tourism Board also issued its own statement on Friday."
"I'm very sorry for the inconvenience." In addition, the official Fyre Festival twitter account also issued an apology statement on Sunday
"It also said: 'sad' Ja Rule said his disastrous Fyre Festival 'is not a hoax'," I really apologize because it's not my fault, "he wrote," but I have to take responsibility. "
Soon after the guests arrived, Blink-182 canceled the show, questioning whether they could provide "the quality of the show we've been giving to our fans.". In a statement on social media on Friday, Ja Rule said the festival was "not a hoax" and that he was "sad" about what happened in the Bahamas
“…… I was kept in the dark and didn't get the instructions from the festival organizers.... "



Number  1131
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m just going to leave it in his capable hands.””
“I think that the movement is being ingested in so many other ways that I couldn’t begin to judge whatever he’s doing.”
“Monica Calif Bring your coat...”
“It’s cold!” she admonished him as she quickly put hers on after posing for photos.”
“Hayek was nominated for her role as a holistic medicine practitioner in the comedy/drama that also stars John Lithgow, Connie Britton, Jay Duplass and Chloë Sevigny.”
““I’m not going to win,” Hayek said of her nomination, “but I already won by being here.” (The award went to Frances McDormand.)”
“Asked if Hayek thought change is around the corner for women, she said, “I think it’s coming our way, slowly but surely.” She added, “It’s time to grow and better ourselves and learn new things.”
“It’s an emotional moment.” She said the Time’s Up movement will be addressed in some capacity at tomorrow’s Academy Awards ceremony.”
““Not just words, but [through] actions,” she said, cryptically, in Spanish.”
“Pinault stood proudly by Hayek’s side as she completed interviews and even held a reporter’s recorder for her when she wasn’t within reach of a group interview being conducted with Hayek in the distance.”


"I'll give it to him."
"I think the movement is being absorbed in so many other ways that I can't begin to judge what he's doing."
"Monica, take your coat..."
"How cold! "She warned him that after posing for a picture, she quickly put it on."
"Hayek was nominated to play a general practitioner in a comedy / drama starring John Lisco, Connie Britton, Jay dupras and Chloe Savigny."
"I won't win," Hayek said of her nomination, "but I've won here." (to Francis mcdorman.)
Asked if Hayek thought women's change was coming, she said: "I think change is coming to us, slowly but surely." She added, "it's time to grow, get better and learn new things."
"It's an exciting moment." As time goes on, she said, she will speak in some capacity at tomorrow's Oscars
"It's not just language, it's action," she said mysteriously in Spanish
"When she finished the interview, Pino was proud to stand beside Hayek, and even when she was not far away from the scope of the group interview with Hayek, she held the reporter's recorder for her."



Number  1132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And I think he’s going to have a great public life, if he should so choose.””
““Were my grandfather alive today, he’d be excited about how far we have come as a nation since 1963, he would feel a sense of urgency about the challenges that lie ahead and he most certainly would not be a Republican,” Schlossberg wrote.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“1.”
“Schlossberg has been living in Japan the past year.”
“Schlossberg, whose mother, Caroline, is the U.S. ambassador to Japan, graduated from Yale in 2015 with a degree in history with a focus on Japanese history.”
“After graduation, he joined his mom in Japan, where he worked at Suntory, a distillery company, where he assisted the CEO s office with research and speech writing, and studied the Japanese language.”
“2.”
“Schlossberg is becoming one of the more public Kennedy s of his generation While his older sisters Rose and Tatiana have become more visible this past year Rose 27 recently launched a comedy web series offering females tips for surviving an apocalypse while her sister Tatiana 25 is a reporter...”
“...for The New York Times it s Jack who s been more vocal about politics...”


"If he wants to, I think he will have a good public life."
"If my grandfather were alive today, he would be excited about what we have achieved as a nation since 1963, he would feel a sense of urgency about the challenges ahead, and he would certainly not be a Republican," Schlossberg wrote
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“1.”
"Schlossberg lived in Japan last year."
"Slossberg's mother, Caroline, is the U.S. ambassador to Japan. She graduated from Yale University in 2015 with a degree in history, majoring in Japanese history."
After graduation, he went to work with his mother in Japan, worked for a liquor company in Suntory, assisted the CEO's office in research and speech writing, and learned Japanese
“2.”
"Schlossberg is becoming one of the more public members of his generation, while his sister rose and Tatiana have become more attractive in the past year. Rose recently launched a comedy network series on the 27th to provide women with the secret of surviving an apocalypse, while her sister Tatiana was a reporter on the 25th..."
“…… For the New York Times, it's Jack who speaks more about politics... "



Number  1133
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...a finalist or semi finalist...”
“...awards edit Non finalist Talent Joan Teets 1950 Margaret Aandahl 1953 Claudia Gullickson 1960 Denise Fledderman 1967 Georgia Ann Becker 1973 Daureen Podenski 1980 Rosie Sauvageau 2013 Other awards edit Winners edit Declared as winner Declared as winner Ended as a runner up Ended as a runner up Ended as...”
“Placements edit Miss America Cara Mund 2018 Cara Mund 2018 Top 10 Donna Grotberg 1977 Tina Curran 1989 Roxana Saberi 1998 Donna Grotberg 1977 Tina Curran 1989 Roxana Saberi 1998 Top 16 Jacky Arness 2015 Awards edit Preliminary awards edit Preliminary Talent Karen Kopseng 1965 Rosie Sauvageau 2013 Non finalist...”
“The year in parentheses indicates the year of the national competition during which a placement and/or award was garnered, not the year attached to the contestant's state title.”
“Gallery of past titleholders [ edit ]Results summary [ edit ]The following is a visual summary of the past results of Miss North Dakota titleholders at the national Miss America pageants/competitions.”
“[3] She competed for the title of Miss America 2020 in December 2019.”
“[2]Haley Wolfe of Carrington was crowned Miss North Dakota on June 15, 2019 at Williston High School in Williston, North Dakota.”
“[1] In 2017 Cara Mund became the first North Dakotan to win the Miss America title, when she won the Miss America 2018 pageant.”
“The first Miss North Dakota to compete at Miss America was Kitty Page in 1949.”
“The Miss North Dakota competition is the pageant that selects the representative for the state of North Dakota in the Miss America pageant.”


“… Final or semi final... "
“… Award editor's not shortlisted genius Joan titz 1950 Margaret Andal 1953 Claudia gulkson 1960 Dennis Friedman 1967 Georgia Ann Becker 1973 Darlene podensky 1980 Rosie sawagog 2013 other award editor's winners announce as winners announce as winners end as runners up end as runners up end as... "
"Miss USA internship editor Cara mund 2018 Cara mund 2018 top 10 Donna grotberg 1977 Tina Curran 1989 Roxana Saberi 1998 Donna grotberg 1977 Tina Curran 1989 Roxana Saberi 1998 top 16 Jacky Arness 2015 prize editor's primary award editor's primary talent Karen kopseng 1965 Rosie sauvageau 2013 non final player..."
The year in brackets refers to the year of the national competition in which the position and / or award was awarded, not the year in which the contestant's state champion belonged
"The visual summary of Miss North Dakota winners in previous Miss America beauty pageants / competitions is as follows."
"[3] she competes for Miss America 2020 in December 2019."
"On June 15, 2019, at Williston high school in Williston, North Dakota, Haley wolf of Carrington won the title of Miss North Dakota."
"[1] in 2017, Kara Mond won the 2018 Miss America beauty contest, becoming the first North Dakota contestant to win the title of Miss America."
"The first Miss North Dakota to compete in the Miss America contest was Kitty page in 1949."
"The Miss North Dakota contest is a beauty contest in which the representatives of North Dakota are selected in the Miss America beauty contest."



Number  1134
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But this is her baby and her life, and I'll just have to respect her decision — even if I totally think it's the wrong one.”
“Elite Daily reached out to Kardashian and Thompson's teams regarding both reports but did not hear back by the time of publication.”
“TBH, I totally thought Khloé Kardashian would be the first one to split from casa Thompson and head for L.A. in the wake of the cheating scandal that reportedly rocked her world — and mine!”
“— but it looks like her baby daddy is the one who's on the move.”
“Tristan Thompson left Cleveland one week after Kardashian gave birth in order to head for Indianapolis for the NBA playoffs.”
“Is the Revenge Body star relieved to finally be alone with her daughter, True?”
“Probably.”
“Like, give the girl some space, dude!”
“According to People, Kardashian can't wait to get out of Ohio, but is stuck there with little True until her doctors give her the thumbs up to fly home to Cali.”
“Meanwhile, Thompson and the rest of the Cleveland Cavaliers are in Indiana for their playoff games against the Pacers on April 20 and 22.”


"But it's her children and her life, and I have to respect her decision - even if I totally think it's the wrong decision."
Elitist daily contacted Kardashian and Thompson's team about the two reports, but received no reply as of press time
"TBH, I totally think Kardashian will be the first to leave Casa Thompson and go to Los Angeles for the deception scandal, which is said to have shocked her world - and mine!"
"But it looks like her little dad is moving."
"Tristan Thompson left Cleveland for Indianapolis for the NBA playoffs a week after Kardashian gave birth
"Vengeance is finally alone with her daughter, really?"
"Maybe."
"For example, give the girl some space, man!"
"According to people magazine, Kardashian can't wait to leave Ohio, but she has little sense of reality until doctors give her a thumbs up and let her fly back to Kali."
Meanwhile, Thompson and the Cavaliers will play in Indiana for the playoffs against the Pacers on April 20 and 22



Number  1135
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Right now, though, he’s not looking at it as a competition — “I’ll get way too nervous if I think of it that way,” he says — but rather just another great opportunity to perform.”
““I hear music in a strong way.”
“The formerly blind singer, 17, made Simon Cowell’s jaw drop just seconds into his take on The Jackson 5’s “Who’s Lovin’ You.” After receiving a standing ovation from the judges and audience, Howie Mandel slammed the coveted button.”
““I wanted to cry,” Guardino tells EW, reliving the unexpected moment of glory.”
““I was really nervous before I got on stage.”
“I was just thinking, I can’t mess up.”
“I can’t mess up.”
“But when I saw everything that was going on with the judges, all my nerves turned into strong energy and excitement.”
“I started going off on the song and getting comfortable.”Making Guardino’s AGT experience even more special: He was able to watch all the action go down.”


"But now he doesn't see it as a game -" he said. "If I think so, I'll be too nervous. It's just another good chance to perform."
"I hear the music very loud."
The 17-year-old former blind singer surprised Simon Cowell within seconds of his duel with Jackson 5's who loves you. After receiving standing ovations from the judges and the audience, Howie Mandel suddenly pressed the button of his dreams
"I want to cry," Guardino told the Wall Street Journal, reliving the unexpected moment of glory
"I was really nervous before I went on stage."
"I'm just thinking, I can't screw it up."
"I can't screw it up."
"But when I saw what happened to the judges, all my nerves turned into powerful energy and excitement."
"I started to sing this song and felt comfortable." This makes Guardino's AGT experience even more special: he can see all the movements going on



Number  1136
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I don’t know so much about their personal relationship because he doesn’t share a whole lot, but I love her,” Mallette told PEOPLE at the Justice Speaks Holiday Benefit Luncheon in L.A in December.”
“...headlines for unfollowing each other on Instagram but a source close to the family told PEOPLE at the time that their recent estrangement wasn t solely because of the singer s reunion with Bieber...”
“...new interview...”
“Mandy Teefey admitted that she’s “not happy” her 25-year-old daughter has rekindled her romance with the “Sorry” singer, 23, during an interview with Gossip Cop.”
“She also revealed she has not spoken to Bieber in “years,” not even via text message.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After splitting from The Weeknd (née Abel Tesfaye) in October, Gomez began spending time with Bieber, whom she first started dating in 2010.”
“But despite Teefey s feelings about her daughter s decision to give her on again off again ex another chance she told Gossip Cop she knows Gomez is old enough to make her own choices Selena can live her life however she wants as long as she is happy safe...”
“...and healthy she said...”
“She is 25 years old and knows what is at stake with her health she continued adding that Gomez is an adult and can make her own choices Image zoom Mandy Teefey left and Selena Gomez Credit Steve Cohn Invision for Netflix AP In December Gomez and her mother made...”


"I don't know much about their personal relationship because he doesn't share much, but I love her," marlette told people at the "justice speech" holiday benefits luncheon in Los Angeles last December
“… But a source close to their family told people at the time that their recent estrangement was not just due to the singer's reunion with Bieber... "
“… New interview... "
In an interview with gossip police, Mandy tifi admitted that her 25-year-old daughter was "unhappy" and that she and the 23-year-old "sorry" singer had rekindled a relationship
"She also revealed that she had not spoken to Bieber for" many years "or even sent a text message."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After breaking up with n é e Abel tesfaye in October, Gomez began spending time with Bieber, who she dated for the first time in 2010."
"However, although Tiffany is sad about her daughter's decision to give her another chance, she tells gossip police that she knows that Gomez has grown up and can make her own choices. Selena can live her life as she likes, as long as she is happy and safe..."
“…… She said
"She's 25 years old and knows what's wrong with her health. She went on to add that Gomez is an adult who can make his own choice of image zooming, Mandy Tiffany left and Selena Gomez credit Steve Cohen invision for Netflix Associated Press in December Gomez and her mother made



Number  1137
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It was just such a surreal moment for me because I’ve looked up to all the SI models and my mom — they’ve always been my inspirations.”See more of Christie and Sailor's stunning SI Swimsuit photos here:”
“I don’t get hurt by this stuff,” Sailor added.”
“But I’m fine.”
“I’m not trying to be her.”
“And to have people say I’m never going to have what she has or be what she is.”
““To be compared to my mother who has this extremely successful career under her belt when I’m just getting started?”
““I grew up looking at these photos of my mom, never thinking that I would ever be able to do that,” she told People.”
““You’re out of my sandy footprints, and you are on your own!”Sailor’s been vocal about the pressure she feels following in her mother’s footsteps as a model.”
““You’re on your own now,” Christie told Sailor after delivering the good news.”
“...there with reflectors putting the light on you The one year later Christie broke the news to Sailor herself that she would be joining SI Swimsuit 2018 rookie class...”


"It's a surreal moment for me because I admire all the Si models and my mom - they've always been my inspiration." Check out more amazing Si swimsuit photos of Christie and Zeller here:
"I'm not going to be hurt by these things," he added
"But I'm fine."
"I don't want to be her."
"Let people say I'll never have what she has or be what she is."
"Compared with my mother, she had a very successful career when I was just starting out?"
"I grew up looking at these pictures of my mom and never thought I could do that," she told people
"You left my footprints on the beach, you're on your own! "As a model, sailor has been talking about the pressure she felt to follow in her mother's footsteps."
"You're on your own now," Christie told seller after delivering the good news
“…… A year later, Christie disclosed to sailor that she would join the rookie class of Si swimsuit 2018. The reflector will shine on you... "



Number  1138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“They saw each other recently.”
“But days before the actual ceremony, Harry and Davy had a final, emotional phone call, Vanity Fair reports.”
“Davy was Harry's most serious girlfriend before Markle; they dated on and off for seven years, from 2004 to 2011.”
“As recently as September 2015, The Sun and other outlets were reporting Harry still had feelings for her and that the two tried to make their relationship work again in summer 2015.”
“They had "one last hurrah" in Africa, and their time there was kept secret from the press.”
“Ultimately, they split because Davy didn't want to lead such a public life.”
“Davy was not invited to the second, more intimate reception, and she practically didn't even go to the wedding at all after her call with Harry, a family friend told Vanity Fair.”
““It was their final call, a parting call in which they both acknowledged Harry was moving on," the source said.”
“"Chelsy was quite emotional about it all, she was in tears and almost didn’t go to the wedding.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"They've met recently."
"But a few days before the wedding, Harry and David made a final, emotional call," Vanity Fair reported
"David was Harry's most serious girlfriend before mark; they dated off and on for seven years, from 2004 to 2011."
"In September 2015, the sun and other media also reported that Harry still had feelings for her and the two tried to restart their relationship in the summer of 2015."
They are "cheering for the last time" in Africa, where their time is kept secret from the media
"In the end, they broke up because David didn't want to have such a public life."
A family friend told vanity fair that David was not invited to the second more intimate reception. After talking to Harry on the phone, she didn't actually go to the wedding at all
"This is their last call and they all admit that Harry is leaving," the source said
"Chelsea was so excited about it that she cried and almost missed the wedding



Number  1139
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Laughs] It was like watching somebody jump for a cliff and just miss it and fall.”
“Redd: Someone like Chance picks things up real fast.”
“The actors do their best to get laughs; the writers sweat, hoping they won’t have to sit through a five-minute bit as it bombs.”
“They’re lucky if they get 10 to 15 minutes with the host to rehearse their sketch before auditioning it at the table.”
“Stephen: We cram into Eli's office and run through it, getting notes where we can.”
“As a writer, you're just praying that people remember the rhythm [of the joke], especially with music — it's so dependent on timing.”
“If someone is off or misses their cue, it can screw the whole thing up.”
“Brueggemann: Or if someone is visibly uncomfortable.”
“This happens with hosts sometimes: It becomes obvious by the performance at the table that the host is not comfortable singing in a rhythm.”
“It could be the greatest sketch ever, but if you're not rehearsed enough to be able to perform it at the table, sometimes they'll pass on it because they just don't trust that it can be done.”


"(laughter) it's like watching someone jump to the edge of a cliff, miss it and fall off."
"Red: people like chance will soon find out."
"The actors do their best to get laughter; the writers are sweating, hoping they don't have to wait five minutes."
"They are lucky to have 10 to 15 minutes to rehearse with the host before the audition at the dinner table."
"Stephen: We crowded into Eli's office and looked around for notes."
"As a writer, you just pray that people remember the rhythm, especially the music - it's too time-dependent."
"If someone goes crazy or misses the cue, it's going to screw things up."
"Brugman: or if someone is obviously uncomfortable."
"This sometimes happens to the host: from the performance at the dinner table, it is obvious that the host is not comfortable singing in rhythm."
"It may be the greatest sketch ever, but if you don't rehearse enough to perform at the table, sometimes they pass it on because they just don't believe it can be done."



Number  1140
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Back then, they talked about Harry Styles’s hair: the royal, perhaps with just a smidgen of jealousy given the clean-cut look he has to sport, asked if he was ever going to cut it.”
“They first met at the perfectly named Royal Variety Performance in London in 2015, when Harry Styles was still (hold back those tears) performing with One Direction, and Prince Harry had not even yet met Meghan Markle (imagine!).”
““Let me know when you want to leave all this behind and go grab a pint.”It was a reunion of sorts.”
““Over there is the door,” we assume he said.”
“At one point, Prince Harry gestures to the right.”
“The greeting looks all very civil, like they’d practiced it, all nods and pleasantries.”
“...impishly awaiting his turn trying to keep a straight face...”
“More exciting perhaps is this video footage of the interaction between the Harrys tweeted from a One Direction fan account that trains its eagle eyes on Styles as he rises aloft to other ventures other industries There you see Styles...”
“Which is exciting!”
“The occasion was the London red carpet premiere of Christopher Nolan’s World War II Dunkirk, marking the first time the public would be privy to Styles’s much-anticipated acting chops.”


"At that time, they talked about Harry stiles' hair: the royal family, maybe just a little bit jealous, because he had to keep his hair clean and asked if he wanted a haircut."
"The first time they met was at the Royal Variety Show in London in 2015, when Harry Stiles was still (holding back tears) performing in one direction, and Prince Harry hadn't even met Megan markel (imagine!)."
"Tell me when you want to put all this behind you and have a pint of beer." It was a party of all kinds
"That's the door over there," we suspect he said
"Once Prince Harry gestured to the right."
"Greetings look polite, just like they've practiced. They're all nods and greetings."
“… Playfully waiting for his turn, trying to keep an honest face... "
"Perhaps more exciting is this video clip. This video is the interaction of Harley's family on twitter. It comes from a one-way fan account. When he enters other industries from above, this account trains his eagle eye on style. You can see the style of other industries there..."
"It's exciting!"
"It was the red carpet Premiere of Christopher Nolan's World War II Dunkirk in London, marking the first time that the public will learn about styles' much anticipated acting."



Number  1141
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pair also locked lips while walking the 2018 Oscars red carpet in March.”
“I love you.”LoCicero has publicly supported the Annihilation actress and was by her side during the Emmy Awards in September 2017 and the Screen Actors Guild Awards in January.”
“...praised him on his 31st birthday in August 2017 writing on Instagram To my king...”
“So he thought I was just being super sweet to him and I thought he was just being sweet on me because I m the lead Rodriguez gushed over the actor in December 2016 on their first Christmas together writing that his love has been the greatest gift She also...”
““He thought I was being nice to him because I am nice to everyone that comes on the show,” she said on Live With Kelly and Ryan in November 2017.”
“I painted my own reality.’”Rodriguez and LoCicero, 31, met in 2016 when he appeared on an episode of her hit CW show.”
““‘I never painted dreams.”
““‘They thought I was a Surrealist, but I wasn’t,’” she captioned the picture, quoting artist Frida Kahlo.”
“The Golden Globe winner, 34, sparked engagement speculation on Monday, July 30, after posting an Instagram photo of herself sporting a diamond ring.”
“Gina Rodriguez is engaged to boyfriend Joe LoCicero, a source exclusively reveals to Us Weekly.”


"They also locked their lips when they walked on the red carpet for the 2018 Oscars in March this year."
"I love you." Rocero has publicly supported the "annihilation" actress, and has fought alongside her at the Emmy Awards in September 2017 and the Screen Actors Guild Awards in January
“… On his 31st birthday in August 2017, he praised him for writing to my king on instagram... "
"So he thinks that I am super sweet to him, and I also think that he is sweet to me, because I am the protagonist Rodriguez. When they spent Christmas together for the first time in December 2016, he told the actor that his love is her greatest gift..."
"He thinks I'm good to him because I'm good to everyone on the show," she said in a live broadcast with Kelly and Ryan in November 2017
"I described my own reality." Rodriguez, 31, met lochelo in 2016 when he appeared in an episode of her hit CW show
"I've never painted a dream."
"They think I'm a surrealist, but I'm not," she added a title to the photo, quoting artist Frida Carlo
"The 34 year old Golden Globe winner posted a picture of herself wearing a diamond ring on instagram, sparking speculation about her engagement."
"Gina Rodriguez is engaged to her boyfriend Joe rossicello, an exclusive source told us weekly



Number  1142
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Lady Antebellum isn’t quite yet done expanding their family band: Shortly after Scott revealed her pregnancy, she announced she is expecting twin daughters.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“The Lady Antebellum guitarist and singer welcomed his second child with wife Kelli on Friday, Dec. 22, the couple announced on social media.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Daughter Lillie Renee Haywood was born in Nashville at 11:14 a.m., weighing 7 lbs., 6 oz., and measuring 19 inches long.”
““We’d like to welcome our beautiful Christmas gift Lillie Renee Haywood,” the proud new dad captioned the sweet photo taken in the hospital.”
“He added, “She is named after both of her grandmothers.”
“Kelli and Lillie are happy and healthy, and Cash is already a great big brother.”
“God is good!”The couple are already parents to 3-year-old son Cash Van.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"The prewar lady hasn't fully expanded their family band: soon after Scott revealed that she was pregnant, she announced that she was looking forward to twin daughters."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
The couple announced on social media that the pre war guitarist and singer had his second child with his wife, Kelly, on Friday, December 22
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"My daughter, Lily Renee Heywood, was born in Nashville at 11:14 a.m., weighing 7 pounds, 6 ounces and 19 inches long."
"We want to welcome our beautiful Christmas present, Lily Renee Heywood," the proud new dad wrote under the title of a sweet photo taken at the hospital
"She was named after her two grandmothers," he added
"Kelly and Lily are happy and healthy. Cash is a great big brother."
"God is good! "The couple are the parents of their 3-year-old son's cash car."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  1143
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But the thing I ask every parent that I really admire, the one comment they all have is that they wish they had kids earlier.””
“And if I could give that to my child, just that open-mindedness, I’d be so happy.”In October, the Massachusetts native confirmed the sex of her baby while appearing on The Ellen Degeneres Show.”
“Mindy Kaling has welcomed her first child, a daughter named Katherine Kaling, E!”
“...reports.”
“The publication reports that Kaling, 38, gave birth on Friday, December 15.”
“The Mindy Project creator who has not yet shared the identity of her baby’s father, revealed that she was expecting her first bundle of joy in August while appearing on the Sunday edition of the Today show.”
“Telling host Willie Geist she was “really excited,” the star added she was ready for a new adventure.”
“I have a lot of control over a lot of aspects of my life and this is one where I m like OK it s out of my hands which is kind of a fun feeling When Geist 42 asked...”
“...what type of parent the A Wrinkle in Time actress will be she responded It s so easy to criticize parenting until you re a parent so one of the nice things about becoming a parent is that I ll...”
“...be able to openly criticize other parenting because I will have a child Kaling added that her late mother Swati Roysircar set a great example...”


"But when I ask every parent, I really admire them. They all have a comment that they want to have children early."
"If I can give this to my children, that is, the open mind, I will be very happy." In October, the Massachusetts native confirmed her child's gender when she appeared on Ellen DeGeneres
"Mindy Carlin has her first child, a daughter named Catherine Carlin, e!"
“… Report. "
"The publication reports that the 38 year old gave birth on Friday, December 15."
"The creator of Mindy's project has not yet revealed the identity of her child's father. She revealed that she was looking forward to her first happiness when she participated in the Sunday edition of today show in August."
"Tell host Willie gaster she's" really excited, "the star added, adding that she's ready for a new adventure."
"I have a lot of control over many aspects of my life. It's a place that makes me feel good. It's out of my control. It's an interesting feeling. When gaster 42 asked..."
“… What kind of parents a wrinkled actress would be, she replied, "it's easy to criticize parenting until you're a parent, so one of the benefits of being a parent is that I'll..."
“… Being able to publicly criticize other parents because I'm going to have a child, Carlin added that her late mother, swatiroiska, set a great example... "



Number  1144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out the video below to hear more about the frightening upcoming season.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Billy Eichner Talks 'AHS: Cult' Role: 'I Get to Be Dramatic and Violent and Sexual'American Horror Story: Cult premieres Sept. 5 at 10 p.m. ET/PT on FX.”
“Although last year’s sixth season was shrouded in secrecy -- the theme, Roanoke, wasn’t actually revealed until the premiere -- Murphy and FX execs decided to give fans a bit of a preview this year.”
““People may not be prepared to see that side of me,” the 38-year-old actor added.”
““I think that will be interesting for a lot of people.”In a recent interview with ET, Billy Eichner revealed that he gets to be “dramatic and violent and sexual” on the show.”
““The season that we begin shooting in June is going to be about the election that we just went through,” Murphy said on Watch What Happens Live with Andy Cohen in February.”
“WATCH: Ryan Murphy Reveals 'American Horror Story' Season 7 Will Be About 2016 ElectionThe upcoming season of the popular FX series will be centered around the 2016 president election.”
“Two new trailers for the seventh season of American Horror Storyhave dropped, and though both are only a few seconds long, they will leave you shook.”
“Don’t watch these videos before bed.”


"Check out the video below to learn more about the terrible season ahead."
"Exclusive: Billy Eisner talks about the role of 'ah: cults':' I get dramatic, violent and sexual 'American horror story: cults premiere on September 5 at 10 p.m. Eastern time / Pacific time in Forex."
"Although the sixth season of last year was shrouded in a secret - the theme" Roanoke "was not revealed until the premiere - the executives of Murphy and FX decided to give fans a preview this year."
"People may not want to see that side of me," the 38 year old actor added
"I think it's fun for a lot of people." In a recent interview with ET, Billy Eisner revealed that he was "dramatic, violent and sexual" in the show
"The season we started filming in June will be about the election we just went through," Murphy said in February, watching live with Andy Cohen
"Watch: Ryan Murphy revealed that the seventh season of the American horror story will be about the upcoming season of the 2016 election, and the popular FX series will focus on the 2016 presidential election."
Two new trailers for Season 7 of American horror stories have been dropped. Although they are only a few seconds long, they will make you shiver
"Don't watch these videos before you go to bed."



Number  1145
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The minute you talk about enjoying yourself, being curious, that is still taboo.'”
“You have no morals, and you're seen as some kind of sexual deviant or someone who can't be in a monogamous relationship.”
“I want to share a drunk face with you.”
“I saw that you were quote "drunk as a skunk" when taking that photo, and I would like to see your drunk face.”
“The Ghost in the Shell actress first extended her generous invitation in an April 26 YouTube video posted by Denver, which amassed 1.4M views'I want to meet you in person.”
“...better matched the 32 year old Tony winner s custom Michael Kors silver halter gown than Geraldine s black pantsuit on the red carpet at AMC Lincoln Square Theater I want to meet you...”
“She has got to remember to take it easy on me I m 40 years older than her Twinning Johansson and Dodd sported matching kohl rimmed eyes and held Judith Leiber sequinned clutches reading Hello my name is Scarlett and Hello my name is Geraldine Glam duo Unsurprisingly the purse...”
“The Arkansas 25-year-old told Global News: 'My grandma said in our group chat, "I'm not going to be square, I'm going to drink with [Scarlett] and see if I can drink her under the table.”
“Scarlett said.”
“Holy crap!'”


"When you talk about happiness and curiosity, it's still taboo."
"You don't have morality, you're seen as some kind of pervert, or you can't be in a monogamous relationship."
"I want to share a drunken face with you."
"I saw you quote 'drunk like a skunk' when you took that picture. I want to see your drunken face."
On April 26, Denver released a video on youtube, which attracted 1.4 million people to watch "I want to see you once." this is the first time the female star of "ghost in an empty shell" has generously invited her
“…… On the red carpet of AMC Lincoln square theater, it matches Geraldine's black trousers better than Tony Weiner's customized Michael Coles silver suspender dress, 32 years old. I want to see you... "
"She must remember to take it easy on me. I'm 40 years older than her twins, Johnson and Dodd. My eyes are held together with Judith Leber's sequined hand. It says," Hello, my name is Scarlett. Hello, my name is Geraldine gram. My wallet... "
"This 25-year-old from Arkansas told globe news," my grandmother said in our group chat, "I don't want to put on airs. I'm going to have a drink with [Scarlett] to see if I can drink her under the table."
"Said Scarlett
"My God!"



Number  1146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on AMC.”
“The Walking Dead season finale airs this Sunday at 9 p.m.”
“...genre Talk ShowIf the fights on The Walking Dead look intense and realistic, well, that’s because sometimes they actually are.”
“In an interview on The Howard Stern Show, Jeffrey Dean Morgan revealed that costar Andrew Lincoln accidentally broke his nose during while they were acting out a climactic fistfight between Negan and Rick for a scene in last December’s mid-season finale.”
““I knew immediately, when the scene started and the cameras started rolling, that we were too close to each other,” Morgan, who plays Negan, told Stern.”
““We’re toe-to-toe.”
“I punch, he punches, and neither of us moves.”
“We’re both taking punches, you know what I mean?”
“And on like the second punch, he just cracked me on the bridge of my nose.”
“I think I dropped to a knee.”


"Et on AMC."
"The end of the zombie season is on at 9 p.m. this Sunday."
“… Type conversations show that if the fight against the walking dead looks fierce and realistic, well, it's because sometimes they are actually
In an interview with the Howard Stern Show, Jeffrey Dean Morgan revealed that in the mid season finale last December, partner Andrew Lincoln accidentally broke his nose in a fierce fight between negan and Rick
Morgan, who plays Nigen, told Stern: "when the scene starts and the camera starts to rotate, I immediately know we're too close."
"We hit the nail on the head."
"I fight, he fight, we don't move."
"We're all being beaten, you know what I mean?"
"Like the second punch, he just hit me on the bridge of the nose."
"I think I fell to my knee."



Number  1147
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on the Royal Family, watch below.”
“Good to see my friend Prince Harry in London to discuss the work of our foundations & offer condolences to victims of the Manchester attack.”
“The 32-year-old royal and Obama were all smiles as they posed together for a photo, shared by the Kensington Palace's social media accounts.”
“Looking dapper as always, Harry donned a midnight blue suit, while Obama kept it classic with a black suit and white button-up shirt.”
“RELATED: Prince Harry and Meghan Markle Are All Smiles Arriving at Pippa Middleton's Reception -- See the Pic!”
“"Prince Harry hosted former US President Barack Obama at Kensington Palace today," read the caption on Instagram posted by the Palace.”
“"They discussed a range of shared interests including support for veterans, mental health, conservation, empowering young people and the work of their respective foundations.”
“They also discussed this week's terrorist attack in Manchester, with President Obama offering his condolences to the victims and support for those recovering from injuries."”
“Obama also tweeted about their reunion and once again offered his condolences to the bombing victims.”
“"Good to see my friend Prince Harry in London to discuss the work of our foundations & offer condolences to victims of the Manchester attack," he wrote.”


"For more information about the royal family, see below."
"It's nice to see my friend Prince Harry in London discussing the work of our foundation and offering condolences to the victims of the Manchester attack."
"Royal, 32, was smiling when they took a picture with Obama, and Kensington Palace's social media account shared their picture."
Harry wore a midnight blue suit and looked as smart as ever, while Obama kept the classic with a black suit and white button shirt
Related report: Prince Harry and Megan markel come to Pippa Middleton's reception with a big smile - see you
"Prince Harry received former U.S. President Barack Obama at Kensington Palace today," read the headline on the instagram released by Kensington Palace
"They discussed a range of common interests, including support for veterans, mental health, care, empowerment of young people and the work of their respective foundations."
"They also discussed this week's terrorist attack in Manchester, and President Obama expressed condolences to the victims and supported their recovery."
"Obama also tweeted the news of their reunion and once again expressed his sympathy to the victims of the bombing."
"It's nice to see my friend Prince Harry in London discussing the work of our foundation and offering condolences to the victims of the Manchester attacks," he wrote



Number  1148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[13][14][15][16]Filmography [ edit ]As producerAs actress2001 – Donnie Darko...”
“Both were born via gestational surrogacy.”
“She and Drew Barrymore own the production company Flower Films.”
“Early life [ edit ]Juvonen was born in Connecticut and raised in Mill Valley, California.”
“[1] Of Finnish descent,[2][3] she is the daughter of aviation industry executive William H. Juvonen, a Stanford University alumnus and former Marine Aviator.”
“[4] In September 1961, while flying a gunnery mission as a new aviator undergoing fleet replacement pilot training in VMF 334, he experienced a wing failure at the fold joint and ejected from his F-8C Crusader jet.”
“[5] William Juvonen later became an aviation executive before his death in 2018.”
“Juvonen graduated from the University of Southern California with a degree in sociology and cooperative education.”
“[6]Career [ edit ]After graduating, she worked odd jobs, including at a dude ranch in Wyoming, as a private flight attendant, and for an artist who was trying to eradicate homelessness.”
“She later became an assistant to Clarence Clemons, a member of the E Street Band.”


"[13] [14] [15] [16] cinematographer [editor] as producer of actresses in 2001 - Donnie Darko..."
"Both were born through surrogacy."
"She and Drew Barrymore own a film company, flower movies."
Zhu was born in Connecticut and grew up in Mill Valley, California
"She is Finnish [2] [3] and the daughter of William H. zhuvonen, an alumnus of Stanford University, a former Navy pilot and an aviation executive."
[4] In September 1961, as a new pilot, he trained as a replacement pilot in VMF 334. During the shooting mission, he encountered a wing failure at the folding joint and ejected from the f-8c crusader
"[5] William Juvonen later became an aviation executive before his death in 2018."
"Chu graduated from the University of Southern California with a degree in sociology and cooperative education."
"After graduating as a career [editor], she took odd jobs, including working as a private stewardess at a Dodd ranch in Wyoming and working for an artist trying to eliminate homelessness."
She later became an assistant to Clarence Clemens, a member of the E Street Band



Number  1149
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'”Click through the gallery above to check out the sweetest photos of Blake with Kingston, Zuma and Apollo!”
““At this point in my life, I kind of had put [children] as like, ‘Well that wasn’t meant to be.’ And then all of a sudden, it happens one way or another, and it’s like, ‘Wow, I missed out on a lot.”
““It’s so fun,” Blake admitted last month, while discussing his relationship with the boys.”
“Gwen and Blake aren’t married or even engaged, but Blake definitely acts like a stepfather to the boys and treats them like his own when they’re together.”
“Too cute!”
“Of course, Gwen has also brought them to many of his concerts, and shared social media videos of them rocking out backstage.”
“From fishing, to trekking through the mud and so much more, the kids always seem so happy when they’re spending time with Blake.”
“The boys have taken quite a liking to Blake, and have taken several trips to his home in Oklahoma, where he’s taught them all his country ways.”
“Despite never having any babies of his own, Blake has proven to be the perfect father for his girlfriend’s kids, and we’ve rounded up some of the most adorable pics of him bonding with Kingston, Zuma and Apollo.”
“The exes agreed to a 50/50 joint custody agreement when they finalized their divorce in 2016, but when we see the children in public, it’s often with Gwen and her boyfriend, Blake Shelton.”


"'" click on the gallery above to see the sweetest photos of black with Kingston, Zuma and Apollo! "
"At this point in my life, I kind of take [children] as' well, that's not what I meant. ' And all of a sudden, things happen in one way or another, like, "Wow, I missed a lot."
"It's fun," Blake admitted last month when he discussed his relationship with the children
"Gwen and Blake are not married or even engaged, but Blake definitely treats the two boys like a stepfather. When they are together, they treat them like their own children."
"How lovely
"Of course, Gwen also took them to many of his concerts and shared their social media videos of rock and roll backstage."
"From fishing to trudging in the mud, the children are always so happy with black."
"The kids love Blake and have been to his home in Oklahoma several times, where he teaches them all the country life styles."
"Although he has never had a child of his own, Blake has proved to be the perfect father of his girlfriend's children, and we have collected some of the most lovely photos of him with Kingston, Zuma and Apollo."
"Two ex girlfriends agreed to a 50 / 50 co custody agreement when they finalized their divorce agreement in 2016, but when we see children in public, it's often Gwen and her boyfriend black Sheldon."



Number  1150
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Evan: I just feel really lucky I have family that loves and supports us in the way they do.”
“What was it like to have the family agree to be shown as part of the series?”
“Slowly but surely, we thought it would be nice to do a documentary or document it in some kind of way that was entertaining and [gave people a chance] to get to know us.”
“We started to realize a lot of where the inspiration came from comes from our actual life and our home life and our relationship and our family.”
“Then it ended up kind of turning into something else.”
“It was something that was a long time coming so we really wanted to document it.”
“For one, it was the first time we’ve ever done it together like this.”
“We wanted to film the process because we were having a lot of fun with it.”
“It all started with me and Ashlee working on our album.”
“We were definitely frightened [Laughs].”


"Evan: I'm really lucky to have a family that loves and supports us as much as they do."
"What's it like to get your family to agree to show as part of the show?"
"Slowly, but surely, we think it's good to make a documentary or record it in some entertaining way, to get to know us."
"We're beginning to realize that a lot of inspiration comes from our real life, family life, relationships and family."
"Then it became something else."
"It's something that takes a long time to complete, so we really want to record it."
"First of all, this is the first time we've done this together."
"We wanted to film the process because we had a good time."
"It all started with Ashley and I working on our album."
"We must have been scared (laughter)."



Number  1151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Nickyʼs journey shows the viewer that if you follow your passion, then anything is possible."”
“"The series story arc is one of renewal and redemption, which are timeless themes," notes Terrero.”
“The network previously announced it would air the series first during the summer, with Netflix following suit.”
“But now, it's the streaming service that gets the first shot at sharing the story of the rise, fall and rebirth of the hit-making reggaeton singer.”
“Nicky Jam: El Ganador, will be available on the streamer starting Friday, November 30 in Latin America and Spain.”
“Telemundo has not set a date yet for its release in the United States and Puerto Rico, where it holds the rights to the series.”
“According to a Telemundo, programming conflicts prompted the delay in airing the bioseries.”
“"Due to the airing of the World Cup and Exatlón during the summer, we are looking at other scheduling options, but have not made a decision yet," states a company spokesperson.”
“The 13-episode musical drama stars Nicky Jam as himself, with Avery Rodríguez portraying him as a child and Puerto Rican urban pop singer and rapper Darkiel playing him as a young Nicky.”
“The series will show how Nick Rivera Caminero becomes Nicky Jam his humble beginnings in Boston where he was born his life in Puerto Rico his rise to fame how he battled drug and alcohol addiction his downfall and how his decision to move to Colombia paved the way for...”


"Nicky's journey tells the audience that if you follow your passion, everything is possible."
"The arc of this series is a renewal and redemption, which is the eternal theme," trero said
"The TV network has previously announced that it will premiere the play in the summer, and Netflix will follow suit."
"But now, it's streaming services that are the first to share the story of reggae's rise, decline and rebirth."
“Nicky  Jam:El Ganador It will be launched in Latin America and Spain on Friday, November 30. "
"Telemundo has not yet set a date for its release in the United States and Puerto Rico because it owns the rights to the series."
"According to telemundo, the clash resulted in a delay in the broadcast of the biology series."
"Due to the broadcast of the world cup and summer league, we are considering other schedules, but no decision has been made yet," a company spokesman said
"Nicky jam plays himself in this 13 episode musical. Avery Rodriguez portrays him as a child. Puerto Rican City pop singer and rapper dakier portrays him as a young Nicky."
"The series will show how Nick Rivera caminello became Nick jam, the humble starting point of his birth in Boston, his life in Puerto Rico, his fame, his fight against drug addiction and alcoholism, his downfall, and his decision to move to Colombia..."



Number  1152
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She felt the love too – and enjoyed some help towards her college fees.”
“And the star duly replied, offering support to more than 30 of them in the form of tuition or help in paying off college loans.”
“But none of that would have happened without the chutzpah of CJ.”
“It was 19 minutes after midnight on Sunday morning when CJ, a 21-year-old student working two jobs to pay her college fees, dropped her tweet.”
“She had just seen a message from Minaj to her international fans – the rapper said she would pay their airfare from any country should they win a contest to spend time with her at the upcoming Billboard music awards in Las Vegas.”
“It was all very well for Minaj to help out fans from around the world with plane tickets, CJ thought, but what about those struggling in the US, who couldn’t even afford to go to school?”
““Well you wanna pay for my tuition,” she tweeted back at the star.”
“Six minutes later, Minaj replied.”
“Sure, she said – as long as your grades are good enough:Show me straight A's that I can verify w/ur school and I'll pay it.”
“Who wants to join THAT contest?!?”


"She also felt love - and enjoyed some help with tuition."
"The stars responded in time, providing support to more than 30 of them in the form of tuition fees or helping pay off university loans."
"But none of this would have happened without CJ's impudence."
"It was 19 minutes after midnight on Sunday morning, and 21-year-old CJ (a student with two jobs to pay for college tuition) gave up her microblog."
"She just saw a message from Minagi to her international fans - rappers say that if they win the competition, she will pay for their tickets from any country to join her in the upcoming Billboard Music Awards in Las Vegas."
"It's good for minaji to help fans around the world with air tickets," CJ thought. But what about those who are struggling in the United States and can't even afford to go to school? "
"Well, you want to pay my tuition," she told the star on Weibo
"Six minutes later, Minagi replied
"Of course, she said - as long as your grades are good enough: show me direct a, I can prove your school, and I'll pay."
"Who wants to compete?"



Number  1153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Parker on Baywatch, Anderson appears to have no reservations about modelling in the buff despite blowing by the half-century mark.”
“Best known for playing C.J.”
“In another, Polunin is seen stalking the 1990s pin-up model while a fully-nude Anderson – martini in hand – gazes back over her shoulder.”
“In one such image captured by U.S. photographer David LaChapelle, Polunin licks the upper portion of Anderson’s bare chest while caressing the former Playboy Playmate.”
“...boy of ballet...”
“Try refreshing your browser or Pam Anderson 50 poses nude for King Kong magazine Back to video The 50 year old Anderson stuns in a number of racy images in Issue 4 of King Kong alongside Sergei Polunin the bad...”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
“And by the looks of it, the busty beauty’s body hasn’t changed much since her days of running on beaches.”
“Article contentBaywatch babe Pam Anderson bares all in the most recent edition of King Kong magazine.”


"Parker is watching in the Bay, and Anderson seems to have no reservations about the model in buff despite blowing the logo for half a century."
"The most famous is playing C.J."
In another photo, polunin is following a 1990s model, while the naked Anderson (martini in hand) stares at her from behind
"In one of these pictures taken by American photographer David lachapel, polunin licks Anderson's bare upper chest while stroking the former Playboy playmate."
“… Ballet boy
"Try refreshing your browser or PAM Anderson taking 50 nude photos for King Kong magazine, and go back to the fourth issue of King Kong. 50 year old Anderson and Sergei polunin are together, taking a series of energetic photos..."
“… Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"Sorry, this video can't be loaded."
"And from the appearance, this burly beauty has not changed much since she ran on the beach."
"The content of the article is published in the latest issue of King Kong."



Number  1154
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Forbes figures are based on numbers from Nielsen, Pollstar and IMDB, SoundScan, BookScan, ComScore and NPD, as well as interviews with industry experts and many of the stars themselves.”
“Methodology:The Forbes global Celebrity 100, edited by Zack O’Malley Greenburg and Natalie Robehmed, ranks "front of the camera" stars around the globe using their pretax earnings from June 1, 2017 through June 1, 2018, before deducting fees for managers, lawyers and agents.”
“28), cofounder of Pink Floyd, joins the ranking for the first time as the largest-earning newcomer, along with musicians Imagine Dragons (No.”
“Roger Waters (No.”
“The Celeb 100 earnings minimum is $35 million, and 11 entertainers have earned $100 million or more over the past year – more than double the number from the past two years combined.”
“List members represent 17 countries: U.S., U.K., Barbados, Portugal, Ireland, Brazil, Argentina, Australia, Switzerland, Canada, China, Mexico, Colombia, Germany, Spain, Greece, India.”
“Over the past two decades, more than 700 actors, actresses, musicians and other stars have appeared on the list, accumulating a total of $80 billion in earnings.”
“2018 Celebrity 100 Highlights:The world’s 100 top-earning entertainers pulled in a combined $6.3 billion pretax over the past 12 months, up 22% from last year, and the third highest sum in the list’s 20-year history.”
“The Rock (story p. 102) nearly doubled his 2017 $65 million payday, and his acting-related earnings are the largest ever recorded in the 20 years Forbes has tracked the Celebrity 100.”
“Dwayne ‘The Rock’ Johnson, earning $124 million, rounds out the top five.”


Forbes' data are based on data from Nielsen, pollstar and IMDB, Soundscan, BookScan, comScore and NPD, as well as interviews with industry experts and many stars themselves
"My theory: Forbes' global celebrity 100, edited by Zack O'Malley Greenburg and Natalie robehmed, uses pre tax income from June 1, 2017 to June 1, 2018 to rank the world's" in front of the camera "stars, after deducting the fees of managers, lawyers and agents."
"28", one of the founders of Pink Floyd, joined the musician imagine dragons for the first time, becoming the highest paid newcomer
"Roger Waters
"The minimum income of celebrity 100 is US $35 million. In the past year, 11 artists have earned US $100 million or more, more than twice the total of the past two years."
"Members of the list represent 17 countries: the United States, the United Kingdom, Barbados, Portugal, Ireland, Brazil, Argentina, Australia, Switzerland, Canada, China, Mexico, Colombia, Germany, Spain, Spain, Spain.".
"Over the past 20 years, more than 700 actors, musicians and other stars have been on the list, with a cumulative revenue of $80 billion."
"2018 celebrity 100 hours of lighting: in the past 12 months, the top 100 artists in the world have earned a total of $6.3 billion in pre tax income, an increase of 22% over last year, which is the third highest income in the 20-year history of the list
"The rock star (page 102) nearly doubled his payday in 2017, and his performance related income set the highest record in 20 years since Forbes tracked the top 100 celebrities."
"Dwayne 'rock' Johnson made 124 million dollars, ranking among the top five."



Number  1155
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After modeling a series of jackets and a sharp hunter green top coat, Pete quips: "I feel like I should reshoot my intro for the show."”
“...when picking out clothes.”
“...think like an 18 year old kids like those are cool...”
“Three charming Pete to Tan revelations He never NEVER thinks he s sexy he doesn t even have mirrors at my house cause I don t like my face and his fashion sense is a case of arrested development I”
“(Yes, her dad is Larry David of "Seinfeld" and "Curb Your Enthusiasm" fame.)”
“The 24-year-old admits he wants to dress to impress his mate Cazzie David's "cool family."”
“So why the attempted upgrade?”
“In the new video posted "SNL's" YouTube page (check it out above), Tan pokes fun Pete's Staten Island roots and frozen-in-puberty vibe before pulling a few chic looks from the Saks racks for him to model.”
“It's so funny, I thought I was like, kind of dressing well, but it's so nice to know that I've been dressing like [bleep] the entire time."”
“"...”


After modeling a series of jackets and a sharp hunter green top, Pitt joked: "I think I should have remade my profile for the show."
"When choosing clothes"
"It's cool to think like an 18-year-old..."
"Three charming Pete to tan exposure, he never thinks he's sexy, he doesn't even have a mirror in my house, because I don't like my face and his sense of fashion is an example of me."
(yes, her father is Larry David from Seinfeld and suppress your passion.)
The 24-year-old admitted that he wanted to wear it to impress his partner, Katie David's "cool family"
"So why try to upgrade?"
In a new video released on the "SNL's" YouTube page (see above), Tan teases Pete about his roots in Staten Island and the atmosphere frozen in adolescence, and then takes some chic shapes from the shelves of saxophone to make him a model
"It's funny. I thought I was well dressed, but I'm glad to know that I've always been well dressed."
“"...”



Number  1156
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““in this moment… I have no words.”
“...what to say was the perfect thing to say...”
““I will always be your problem.”Mary Cooper enters the room and asks if Leonard will give them a minute.”
““Don’t be silly Leonard,” Sheldon says while embracing Leonard.”
“He has no problem telling his friend that he’s proud of him and that, after today, he’ll officially be Amy’s problem.”
“The episode cuts to Leonard doing his best to straighten Sheldon’s bowtie and getting emotional.”
““Thanks, this’ll be a big help!” an oblivious Hamill says, walking off with Wheaton’s notebook.”
“He approaches Hamill and tells him that he was awake all night working on notes for the wedding.”
“Wheaton takes the news poorly, due in large part to the fact that Howard waited until the day of the wedding to break it to him.”
“Instead, he asks Hamill to officiate the wedding, stealing the job away from Sheldon’s former rival, Wil Wheaton.”


"At this moment I have nothing to say. "
“… What is the most perfect... "
"I'll always be your problem." Mary Cooper came into the room and asked Leonard if she would give them a minute
"Don't be silly, Leonard," Shelton said as he hugged him
"He has no doubt told his friends that he is proud of him, and from today on, he will officially become Amy's problem."
"This episode hits Leonard as he tries to straighten Sheldon's bow tie and become emotional."
"Thank you, it will help a lot!"! "Said a forgetful Hamil, and went away with Wheaton's notebook."
"He came up to Hamill and told him that he had been taking notes for the wedding all night."
"Wheaton didn't respond well to the news, largely because Howard didn't tell him until the wedding day."
Instead, he got Hamill to marry him and took the job from will Wheaton, Sheldon's former rival



Number  1157
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Like, 'Do not post that picture, Mom.'"”
“"My little one is a little too little, so we kind of make the decision for her, but my older daughter definitely has a voice.”
“"My husband and I discuss things about when I post about our children and my kids actually have a voice in that, too," she said.”
“According to the actress and soon-to-be host, her family has always been clear and open about their boundaries.”
“While the show will definitely be bringing viewers into Philipps’ world, there’s one thing she’ll be keeping off-limits — and that’s stories about her family that they haven’t personally approved.”
“She said that she’ll be bringing on a ton of celeb guests, and we’re almost positive that Michelle Williams, her BFF/soulmate, will be one of the first (Philipps noted that Williams already voiced an interest).”
“...is so supportive of female talent."”
“I think there's, you know, plenty of space for another female voice in late-night, and I'm so happy that E!”
“"I am so excited to bring this show to E!”
“It's my perspective on things," she said.”


"Like," don't post that picture, mom. "
"My little daughter is a little too young, so we make decisions for her a little bit, but my eldest daughter certainly has a say."
"My husband and I discussed something about our children, and my children have a say in that," she said
"According to the actress who will be the host, her family has always been very clear and open about their boundaries."
"Although the show will definitely bring the audience into Phillips' world, there is one thing she will be banned from - that is, the story about her family, who did not personally approve it."
"She said she would bring a lot of celebrity guests, and we're almost certain that her boyfriend / soul mate, Michelle Williams, will be the first (Philipps notes Williams has shown interest)
“… Very supportive of women. "
"I think, you know, there's enough room for another female voice in the middle of the night, and I'm glad to hear e!"
"I'm very happy to bring this program to you!"
"It's my view of things," she said



Number  1158
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He s showing a reporter key spots from The Keepers Keough s soon to be shuttered campus now plastered with no trespassing signs and patrolled by security guards the haunted house esque rectory where the priest Maskell once lived Cesnik s apartment and the shopping village where she was last...”
““We always knew Gemma would come back, so I never took her seriously,” he says with a laugh as he rides inside a car making its way through Baltimore’s suburbs.”
“Amateur sleuthsHoskins has always liked true-crime stories; she’s watched “Dateline” and “20/20” every Friday night for years.”
“AdvertisementIt wasn’t long before the two started a new Facebook group, this one seeking justice for Cesnik.”
“One person, however, came to Hoskins’ defense: Schaub.”
“Hoskins, wanting to help reporter Tom Nugent figure out who had hurt Cesnik, posted a message to a Facebook page for Keough High alumni, but was berated for muddying up a space usually filled with birth and anniversary announcements with such an unpleasant topic.”
“Her death remained a sad, murky mystery until Hoskins got a call from a former Baltimore Sun reporter searching for anyone who had been a student of Cesnik’s.”
“(Amy Kaufman / Los Angeles Times)Cesnik’s body wasn’t discovered until Jan. 3, 1970, abandoned in a snowy, wooded area just a few miles from where she lived.”
“AdvertisementThe driveway across from Sister Cathy Cesnik’s apartment where her car was found abandoned.”
“The Muhly’s bag was still inside the vehicle.”


"He showed reporters the key locations in the campus where keepers Keough is about to close. The campus is now covered with signs forbidding illegal entry. Security personnel are patrolling. Pastor Maskell once lived in the haunted house of cesnik apartment, the archdiocese, and the shopping village where she lived for the last time..."
"We always knew Gemma would come back, so I never took her seriously," he said with a smile, as he drove through the suburbs of Baltimore in a car
"An amateur detective has always loved real crime stories; for years, she watched dateline and 20 / 20 every Friday night."
"Soon after the ad, the two men set up a new Facebook group to do justice for cesnick."
"However, there is a man to defend Hoskins: Schob."
Hoskins wanted to help journalist Tom Nugent find out who hurt cesnick. He posted a message on Facebook for Keo alumni, but was accused of using such an unpleasant topic to mess up the space usually filled with birth and anniversary announcements
"Her death was a sad and mysterious mystery until Hoskins got a call from a former Baltimore Sun reporter looking for anyone who had been a cessnik student."
(Amy Kaufman / Los Angeles Times) sesnick's body was not found until January 3, 1970, and was abandoned in a snowy, wooded area a few miles from where she lived
"In the driveway opposite sister Cathy sesnick's apartment, I found her car abandoned."
"Murray's bag is still in the car."



Number  1159
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I feel like you can wear these boots year round.””
“Meanwhile Jessie is managing to keep quite busy with her career even without reality TV her first book Just Jessie came out earlier this month and she teased that she ll be releasing new music and going on tour next...”
“Ever since season three of Jessie James Decker and Eric Decker’s reality show, Eric & Jessie, wrapped in Oct. 2017, fans have been anxiously waiting for more episodes.”
“Unfortunately, it looks like that’s not going to happen.”
““We probably won’t do another season of our reality show,” Jessie told HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY, while promoting her new collection with JustFab.”
““I feel good about closing that chapter.”
“But I feel we love working together, so there’s always the possibility of doing television together in some capacity.”The first season of Eric & Jessie aired in 2013, followed by season 2 at the beginning of 2014.”
“However, after the birth of their first child, Vivianne, Eric and Jessie decided to take a break for a few years.”
“Now, they certainly have their hands full, as two more kids have come since Vivi: Eric Jr. and Forrest.”
“...year...”


"I think you can wear these boots all year round."
"At the same time, Jesse is trying to maintain a fairly busy career, even without reality shows. Her first book just came out early this month, and she joked that she will release new music and tour next..."
"Since the third season of Jessie James Decker and Eric Decker's reality show Eric & Jessie ended in October 2017, fans have been anxiously waiting for more episodes."
"Unfortunately, it doesn't seem to happen."
"We probably won't do another reality show," Jesse told Hollywood life exclusively while promoting her new series with just fab
"I feel good to finish that chapter."
"But I think we like to work together, so it's always possible to do TV shows together in some capacity." Eric and Jesse was broadcast in the first season of 2013 and in the second season of early 2014
"However, after their first child was born, Vivian, Eric and Jesse decided to take a few years off."
"Now, they must be very busy, because there are two more children after vivi: Little Eric and Forrest."
“… Year... "



Number  1160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gloria Estefan, Stevie Wonder, Big Bad Voodoo Daddy (1999)Yes, Big Bad Voodoo Daddy played the Super Bowl and we will never be able to take that away from them.”
“23.”
“This was a halftime show to forget.”
“To make it worse, the people on the field appeared to be moving around carrying fluorescent light bulbs.”
“Sure, it’s a popular genre, but a huge chunk of the audience had no clue what “Tuckered Out” or “It’s a Little Too Late” were, or why they needed to care about bland smiling girls in 10-gallon hats.”
“Clint Black, Tanya Tucker, Travis Tritt, and the Judds (1994)There is nothing sadder than a country spectacular, especially when the most imaginative performance available is a horde of people dressed as cowboys and cowgirls.”
“27.”
“...gateway of time has opened once again to give us hope Thanks but no thanks...”
“I would have given anything to hear Sussudio instead we got Phil Collins in a backwards Kangol hat and the world s saddest cargo pants singing something called Two Worlds Oh and Edward James Olmos kept coming out to offer weird narration like As it does every thousand years the...”
“To make it even worse, each performer sang an original song, so the audience didn’t recognize any of it.”


"Gloria Estefan, Steve wonder, the Bad Voodoo Dad (1999) Yes, the Bad Voodoo dad played the super bowl, and we can never take it away from them."
“23.”
"It's a forgotten half-time show
"To make matters worse, people on the pitch seem to be walking around with fluorescent bulbs."
"Of course, it's a popular type, but a large part of the audience doesn't know what 'tucked out' or 'it's little too late' is, or why they need to care about plain girls with a 10 Gallon hat and a smile on their face."
Clint black, Tania Tucker, Travis trit, and Jude (1994) there is nothing sadder than the spectacle of a country, especially when the most imaginative performance is a group of people dressed up as cowboys and cowboy girls
“27.”
“…… The door of time opens again and gives us hope. Thank you, but no thanks... "
"I'm willing to give everything to listen to susudio. Instead, let's make Phil Collins sing a song called" two worlds "with a Kango hat on his back and the saddest cargo pants in the world. Oh, Edward James Olmos) keeps coming forward and offering weird narratives, as it does every thousand years... "
"What's worse, every performer sang an original song, so the audience couldn't recognize it."



Number  1161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I love him with all of my heart.””
“″[Carmelo] and I are the best of friends and our number one commitment is to our son, Kiyan,” she continued.”
“The television personality stopped by “The Wendy Williams Show” on Tuesday to promote the new season of “Power,” the Starz show in which she stars.”
“When the host asked about the status of her split from the NBA star, La La said she did not plan to file for divorce just yet.”
““Not right now, I’m not,” the 38-year-old said.”
““You know marriages are tough, and you know that.”
“We all know that.”
“It’s filled with ups and downs.”
“We are just going through a time right now.”The Puerto Rican actress, who tied the knot with Carmelo in 2010, said the most important thing for her was her 10-year-old son.”
““I would absolutely never say a bad thing about my husband.”


"I love him with all my heart."
"Carmelo and I are best friends and our first commitment is to our son KIJAN," she continued
The TV celebrity visited the Wendy Williams show on Tuesday to promote her new season of power
"When the host asked about her breakup with NBA stars, Lala said she didn't plan to divorce yet."
"Not now, I can't," the 38 year old said
"You know marriage is hard, and you know it."
"We all know."
"It's full of ups and downs."
The Puerto Rican actress, who married Carmelo in 2010, said the most important thing for her was her 10-year-old son
"I will never speak ill of my husband."



Number  1162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This looks especially bad as Minnick has been harsh on Edwards for weeks.”
“Yes, she actually forgot to tell the police that Edwards was missing.”
“But when Keith runs too close to some chemicals in an abandoned lab, he causes a huge explosion.”
“Keith is trying to start a fire so the doors will open, but Edwards manages to set him on fire instead.”
“They end up in an abandoned wing of the hospital, where they run into Erin (Darby Camp), a young girl who’s been wandering the halls while she waits for her little sister to be discharged.”
“But because of the lockdown, all the exit doors are locked.”
“Also Read: Jason George to Leave 'Grey's Anatomy' for Firefighter SpinoffKeith, aware that he’s been found out, orders Edwards to help him escape the hospital.”
“When Allison wakes up, she alerts Bailey and the others to Keith’s threat and the hospital goes into lock down.”
“What follows is a chain of events that reminds us of some of “Grey’s” classic disaster episodes.”
“The residents don’t find this out in time, however, and Keith tricks Edwards into taking him out of his room.”


"It looks particularly bad because Minnick has been tough on Edwards for weeks."
"Yes, she forgot to tell the police that Edwards was missing."
"But when Keith runs too close to some chemicals in an abandoned laboratory, he can cause a huge explosion."
"Keith is trying to make a fire so that the door can be opened, but Edwards tries to set him on fire instead."
"They finally met Irene (camp Darby) in an abandoned wing of the hospital, a young girl wandering in the hall, waiting for her sister to leave the hospital."
"But because of the blockade, all the exit doors are locked."
"Also read: Jason George left" Gray's Anatomy "to fireman spinovkeith, realized that he had been found, and ordered Edwards to help him escape the hospital."
"When Alison woke up, she alerted Bailey and others to Keith's threat, and the hospital was cordoned off."
"The next series of events reminds us of some of the classic disaster episodes in gray."
"But the residents didn't notice it in time, and Keith tricked Edwards into taking him out of the room."



Number  1163
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Everyone on the Jenner side is fine.”
“She taught me about character and so much growing up and I just feel like I don’t respect the character that she’s showing now.”Kim Kardashian’s younger sister, Khloe Kardashian, is also “taking it a little tough,” Caitlyn said at a book signing, according to RadarOnline.”
“I have a lot of friends that know the truth and know what I’ve been through and know the whole situation,” Caitlyn said.”
“...obviously when you do a book like that there are different opinions...”
“Why does everything have to be that Kris is such a bitch She added I ve never been so angry and disappointed in somebody in my whole life In response the Olympic gold medalist said on Good Morning America that the book is extraordinarily honest It is my perspective and...”
“... Everything she says is all made up.”
““I read it and basically the only nice thing she had to say was that I was great socially at a party one time.”
“In a recent episode of “Keeping Up With the Kardashians,” Kris fumed with anger about passages in “The Secrets of My Life” that claimed she knew Caitlyn was transgender before they wed.“None of it makes sense,”Kris said to daughters Khloe and Kim Kardashian.”
“(Their differing takes on their marital woes have been a topic of discussion for years.)”
“It was something Caitlyn grew to resent, she said, and she would steal her wife’s gowns and purses to wear while traveling.”


"Jenna's people are very nice."
"She's taught me a lot about character and growth, and I just don't think I respect the character she's showing right now," Caitlin said at a sign off, according to radarlonline
"I have a lot of friends who know the truth, know what I've been through, and know the whole situation," Caitlin said
“…… Obviously, when you write such a book, you will have different opinions... "
"Why is everything like this, Chris is such a whore, she added, I've never been so angry and disappointed in my whole life to respond to the Olympic gold medalist saying, Good Morning America, this book is very honest, this is my point of view and..."
"... everything she said was a fabrication."
"I've read it. Basically, the only good thing she has to say is that I was very sociable at a party once."
In a recent episode, keep in touch with Kardashian, Chris is furious at the statement in the secret of my life that she knew Caitlin was transgender before she got married. "It doesn't make sense," Chris told his daughters, Chloe and Kim Kardashian
"(their different views on marital misfortune have been the subject of discussion for many years.)
"It's something that Caitlin is getting more and more disgusted with. She said she would steal her wife's dress and purse to wear when traveling."



Number  1164
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Notes and references [ edit | edit source ]”
“The two lead the droid starfighter on a pursuit over a nearby comet.”
“You I Will Next episode Accidental Allies The Starfighter Stunt is the twelfth episode of the first season of the animated micro series Star Wars Forces of Destiny...”
“The episode takes place during Star Wars: The Clone Wars.”
“It was first released as part of the first special on October 1, 2017 and it was released on Youtube on October 4.”
“[2]Official description [ edit | edit source ]While Ahsoka teaches Padmé how to pilot, they come under attack by a droid starfighter.”
“Plot summary [ edit | edit source ]In space, Padawan Ahsoka Tano is teaching Senator Padmé Amidala starfighter combat maneuvers.”
“Both women are flying a pair of N-1 starfighters.”
“Tano's ship is yellow while Amidala's ship is silver.”
“R2-D2 is also riding in the astromech socket of Padmé's starfighter.”


Notes and references [edit | edit source]
"The two men led the robot starfighter to chase over the nearby comet."
"The next episode of Star Wars stunt is the 12th episode of the first season of the micro series the power of Star Wars destiny..."
"This episode took place during Star Wars: The Clone Wars."
"It was first released as part of the first special on October 1, 2017 and on YouTube on October 4."
"[2] official description [editor | editorial source] when Ahsoka taught Padme how to drive, they were attacked by a robotic starfighter."
"In space, apprentice Ahsoka Tano is teaching Senator Padme Amidala's starfighter exercise."
"Both ladies are flying a pair of n-1 starfighters."
"Tano's boat is yellow, and Amidala's is silver."
"R2-D2 is also carried on the space mechanical socket of the Padme starfighter."



Number  1165
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out Romper's new video series, Romper's Doula Diaries:Watch full episodes of Romper's Doula Diaries on Facebook Watch.”
“Clearly, the model, mother, and reality star is happy to finally share her good news, and she should be!”
“America’s Next Top Model cycle 3 winner and current Real Housewives of Atlanta star, Eva Marcille, is pregnant with her second child, a baby boy, with her boyfriend, Michael Sterling, Us Weekly reported on Tuesday.”
“According to the publication, Marcille shares her first child — 3-year-old daughter, Marley Rae — with her ex-boyfriend Kevin McCall.”
“Along with an Instagram post from Nov. 21, Marcille revealed that she was expecting her second child in an exclusive interview with People, saying that after her daughter had told her she wanted it to be a boy.”
“And as it turns out, the little girl's wish came true!”
““I felt like she willed it in her favor,” Marcille said of her daughter’s prediction, adding that she was “beyond elated to be having a boy.”She also spoke about the surprise she felt in discovering she was pregnant, as she originally just felt a little off.”
““My body felt super weird,” she told People.”
““I didn’t know what was going on.”
“I went to the doctor and because of my symptoms, he decided to do an ultrasound to see if I had any cysts or tumors or fibroids or things of that nature.”And while the ultrasound obviously wasn’t what she expected, it was definitely some happy news.”


Take a look at Romper's new video series, Romper's doula diary: watch the full collection of Romper's doula diaries on Facebook watch. "
"Obviously, models, moms and reality TV stars are happy to finally share her good news. She should be!"
Atlanta star EVA marcille, the next top model winner in the third cycle, and her boyfriend Michael Sterling are pregnant with their second child, a baby boy, US Weekly reported Tuesday
According to the publication, Marcel and her ex boyfriend Kevin McCall shared her first child, Mary ray, a three-year-old daughter
"Together with an instagram post on November 21, Marcel revealed in an interview with people that she was pregnant with her second child and that she wanted to have a boy after her daughter told her."
"As a result, the little girl's wish came true!"
"I think she's willing to do that," Marcel said of her daughter's prediction, adding that she was "extremely happy to have a boy.". She also talked about her surprise when she found out she was pregnant, because at first she just felt a little uncomfortable
"My body feels very strange," she told people
"I don't know what happened."
"I went to the doctor and because of my symptoms, he decided to have an ultrasound to see if I had cysts, tumors, fibromas or something like that." Although the ultrasound was obviously not what she expected, it was definitely good news



Number  1166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Shop the gorgeous covers ahead.”
“There’s something for everyone, from wellness reads to beauty books.”
“And because everyone loves a good celebrity read, we’ve rounded up 10 pretty celebrity books that would look amazing on your coffee table.”
“We’re talking about glamorous, glossy coffee table books with shiny covers and pages filled with professionally taken pictures.”
“And, no, we don’t mean beaten-down paperback novels from high school.”
“As many home-decor lovers know, one of the easiest ways to jazz up a coffee table is with a book.”
“Have no fear, celebrities such as Kim Kardashian, Cameron Diaz, and Mary-Kate and Ashley Olsen are here to help.”
“But aside from a candle here and there and a water-circle stain or two, many rarely ever decorate one of the most central pieces of furniture in our house.”
“It’s where we gather to watch television, chat with friends, sip a cup of morning (or late-evening) joe, and relax with our feet up, unwinding from a day of stress.”
“If the living room was a body, the coffee table would be its heart.”


"Buy a gorgeous front cover."
"From health books to beauty books, everyone has their own hobbies."
"Because everyone likes to read famous books, we have collected 10 beautiful famous books, which will look good on your coffee table."
"We're talking about dazzling coffee table books with shiny covers and professionally photographed pages."
"And, no, we're not talking about high school paperbacks."
"As many home decorators know, one of the easiest ways to make a coffee table easy is to read a book."
"Don't worry, celebrities like Kim Kardashian, Cameron Diaz, Mary Kate and Ashley Olsen will come to help."
"But with the exception of one candle and one or two water ring stains, many people rarely decorate the core furniture of our house."
"Here, we get together to watch TV, chat with friends, have a cup of morning (evening) tea, lift our feet to relax, and get rid of the pressure of the day."
"If the living room is a body, the coffee table is its heart."



Number  1167
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At the same time, the actor had to explore the more sympathetic aspects of Koresh, like the sharp sense of humor Kitsch was surprised to learn that he had.”
“It’s just like — it’s kind of his birthday every day, if you think about it."”
“"I think he was incredible at giving purpose, which everyone in life searches for," the actor says.”
“After studying him extensively, Kitsch has an opinion about how Koresh built up such a faithful following.”
“By the time the audience meets Koresh (born Vernon Wayne Howell) in the Paramount series, he's the unquestioned, infallible leader of what some might call a "cult," whose followers believe he is the "lamb" spoken about in the Book of Revelation.”
“Those kind of things go a long way for me, and it allows you as an actor to just kind of marry yourself to it," Kitsch says.”
“And he would send over three songs that were very Koresh-like.”
“Or whatever.”
“Paramount"Sometimes I’d just email him during the shoot at two or one in the morning, saying, 'What kind of song would Dave sing in this next scene we’re doing on Thursday?'”
“In addition to having that first-person retelling to consult, Kitsch was also in direct contact with Thibodeau himself throughout the production.”


"At the same time, actors have to explore some more compassionate aspects of coresh, such as his keen sense of humor. Kitsch is surprised to learn that he is compassionate."
"If you think about it, it's like every day is his birthday."
"I think he's incredible at giving goals, which everyone in life is looking for," the actor said
"After extensive study of him, Koch has his own view on how Koresh built such a loyal follower."
"When the audience meets coresh (born in Vernon Wayne Howell) in the paramount series, he is the undoubted and absolutely correct leader of what some might call the" cult ", and his followers believe that he is the" lamb "mentioned in the book of revelation
"This kind of thing helps me a lot, it allows you as an actor to marry yourself to it," Koch said
"He will send three songs, much like Koresh."
"Or something."
"Paramount" sometimes I email him at 2 or 1 a.m. and say, "what kind of song will Dave sing in our next show on Thursday?"
"In addition to the first person retelling consultation, kitsch also had direct contact with thibodo himself in the whole production process."



Number  1168
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““The Plaintiff and the Defendant have irreconcilable differences which have caused the breakdown of the marriage for a period of at least six months which make it appear that the marriage should be dissolved and that there is no prospect of reconciliation,” Farley’s complaint stated.”
“RELATED: Jersey Shore: Jenni ‘JWoww’ Farley Reveals She Almost Divorced Roger Once Before Finally FilingAfter nearly three years of marriage, Farley filed for divorce from Mathews on Sept. 12, according to New Jersey’s Asbury Park Press.”
““Rome wasn’t built in a day,” Mathews wrote alongside a photo of the pair dining together.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Snooki on JWoww’s Split from Roger Mathews: “I Think They’re Gonna Be Fine”Earlier this month, Farley and Mathews celebrated their anniversary by having dinner together — and then taking a ride in a horse-drawn carriage.”
““@meilanimathews favorite time of the year  just got home from Spain and we are putting in some werkkkkkk,” she wrote alongside the video.”
“Sherevealed that they decided on Moana-themed costumes because the Disney film is their son’s “favorite movie.”Over the weekend, the mother of two also shared a sweet — and spooky — video of her daughter showing off all of the festive decorations in their front yard.”
““Behind the scenes of the Matthew’s annual Halloween photoshoot,” Farley wrote on her own Instagram account, alongside a short clip of the video.”
“The pair also made an video giving fans a look at their festive Halloween photoshoot.”
“F— cauliflower” he added, referring to the couple’s son Greyson 2.”
“Except cauliflower.”


"The irreconcilable differences between the plaintiff and the defendant led to the breakdown of the marriage for at least six months, which made it seem that the marriage should be dissolved, and there was no prospect of reconciliation," Farley's complaint said
"Related reports: Jersey coast: according to aspery Park press, New Jersey, Jennie Farley revealed that she nearly divorced Roger once and finally filed for divorce. After nearly three years of marriage, Farley filed for divorce with Matthews on September 12. "
"Rome wasn't built in a day," Matthews wrote next to a picture of two dining together
"Related video: when jwoww broke up with Roger Matthews, snowey said," I think they'll be OK. "Earlier this month, Farley and Matthews had dinner together to celebrate their wedding anniversary, and then took a carriage."
Next to the video, she wrote: @ meilanimathews just came home from Spain at the most popular time of the year, and we are playing some werkk
Sheriver said they decided to wear a Moana themed costume because Disney movies were their son's "favorite movies.". Last weekend, the mother of two shared a sweet and weird video of her daughter showing all the festive decorations in their front yard
"Behind Matthew's annual Halloween photo," Farley wrote on her instagram account, adding a video clip
"They also made a video for fans to see their group photo on Halloween."
"F-cauliflower," he added, refers to the couple's son, Grayson 2
"Except for cauliflower."



Number  1169
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...contestants DeMario Jackson and Olympios both of whom had reportedly been drinking heavily all day...”
“We take all such allegations seriously.”
“Shortly after Warner Bros. released a statement Tuesday announcing that an investigation had produced no evidence of sexual misconduct on the show’s set last week, an attorney for the 25-year-old business owner and former Bachelor contestant has confirmed she will continue to pursue the allegations.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It needs to be made clear that production of Bachelor in Paradise was shut down because of multiple complaints received from BiP producers and crew member on the set,” Olympios’ attorney Martin Singer tells PEOPLE in a statement.”
““It was not shut down due to an complaint filed by Corinne against anyone.”The statement continues, “It comes as no surprise that Warner Bros., as a result of its own internal investigation, would state that no wrong doing had occurred.”
“Our own investigation will continue based on multiple new witnesses coming forward revealing what they saw and heard.”Image zoom Credit: Getty (2)On Tuesday, 10 days after announcing production had officially been halted, Warner Bros. confirmed that filming will soon resume.”
““As we previously stated, we recently became aware of allegations regarding an incident on the set of Bachelor in Paradise in Mexico.”
“The safety, security and well-being of the cast and crew is our number one concern, and we suspended filming so that the allegations could be investigated immediately and thoroughly.”
“Given their results the series will resume production and will air this summer on ABC WATCH Corinne Olympios Breaks Silence on Bachelor in Paradise Scandal This Is My Worst Nightmare PEOPLE sources previously confirmed season 4 production was suspended after a producer raised concerns about an alleged sexual encounter between...”


“…… It is reported that the contestants demario Jackson and Olympus have been drinking all day.... "
"We take all these charges seriously."
"Shortly after Warner Bros. issued a statement on Tuesday announcing that an investigation had found no evidence of sexual misconduct on the show last week, the lawyer for the 25-year-old entrepreneur and former single player confirmed that she would continue to pursue the charges."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's important to be clear that the production of" Bachelor in heaven "was shut down because of repeated complaints from BiP producers and crew members on the set," Olympus lawyer Martin Singh told people in a statement
"The company didn't close because Colleen complained to anyone." "It is not surprising that Warner Bros, as a result of its own internal investigation, will declare that no misconduct has occurred," the statement continued
"Our own investigation will continue as a number of new witnesses come forward to reveal what they have seen and heard." Photo zooming credit: 10 days after Getty (2) announced the official shutdown on Tuesday, Warner Bros. confirmed that filming will resume soon
"As we said before, we recently learned about the accusations about the set incident of" Bachelor of paradise "in Mexico."
"The safety, security and welfare of the actors and staff are our top priority, and we suspended filming so that we can immediately and thoroughly investigate the charges."
"In view of their results, the series will resume production and will be on ABC this summer to watch Corinne Olympus break the silence in the singles scandal in paradise, which is my worst nightmare before confirming the production suspension in the fourth quarter after the producers raised a concern about so-called sexual contact..."



Number  1170
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Feimster plays Colette Kimball-Kinney on the Hulu series and has been a series regular since 2015.”
““My favorite response to this post so far has been from someone who was upset with me because they thought I didn’t know how to spell fiancé But, seriously, thank you guys for all the love,” she tweeted.”
“!”Image zoom Credit: InstagramLater, Feimster thanked her Twitter followers by sharing her favorite fan reaction.”
“I will officiate,” the actress, 38, wrote on Instagram in the comments section to which Feimster responded: “YES PLEASE!”
““This is exciting!!”
“And no one was happier about the engagement than Mindy Project star and creator, Mindy Kaling!”
“Image zoom“A few days ago Fortune asked me to join her on a magical adventure to Big Sur….yes, yes, a thousand times, yes,” Smith captioned her three photos.”
““After two and a half years with my beautiful lady, she’s officially my feyoncé,” Feimster wrote along with photos of her and fiancée Smith, who showed off her diamond ring.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Mindy Project star, 37, shared the happy news on Instagram and Twitter Friday with three photos of the couple celebrating their engagement in Big Sur, California, where they had been enjoying a vacation at the Post Ranch Inn.”


"Femster, who plays klaette Kimball Ginny in the Hulu series, has been a regular in the series since 2015."
"My favorite response so far is that people are very dissatisfied with me because they think I don't know how to spell my fiance, but really, thank you for your love," she tweeted
"! image scaling credit: instagram later, feimster thanks her twitter fans by sharing her favorite fan reactions
"I will host," the 38 year old actress wrote in instagram's comments column, and femster replied, "yes, please!"
"It's exciting!"
"No one is more happy to be engaged than Mindy Carlin, the star and creator of Mindy project!"
Image zooming a few days ago Fortune magazine invited me to take a magical adventure with her in big sur Yes, yes, a thousand times, yes, "Smith captioned her three photos
"After two and a half years with my beautiful lady, she officially became my fayock," femster wrote, along with photos of her and fiancee Smith showing diamond rings
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 37 year old project Mindy star shared the news on instagram and twitter on Friday, along with three photos of the couple celebrating their engagement in Grand Sur, California, while they were on holiday at the back Ranch Hotel



Number  1171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...was playing opposite Johnny Depp the Aquaman star said...”
““I don’t want to be alone.”Despite having a successful career, he said his life feels empty without someone to share it with.”
“The Tesla CEO discussed his recent breakup with Amber Heard during an interview with Rolling Stone, where he admits, “Well, she broke up with me more than I broke up with her, I think.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I was really in love, and it hurt bad,” Musk said.”
“The pair were first linked together last year, as each was weathering a public uncoupling: Heard and actor Johnny Depp finalized their divorce in January, while Musk filed for divorce from Westworld actress Talulah Riley in early 2015.”
“The actress, 31, and tech magnate, 46, called it quits because of increasingly busy schedules, a source told PEOPLE in August.”
“However, they were spotted out together in Australia just days after news of their split broke.”
“Image zoom Credit: Elon Musk/InstagramMusk said that he “cannot be happy” without a girlfriend.”
““‘I never want to be alone.’ That’s what I would say,” he explained.”
““I will never be happy without having someone.”


“… Playing opposite Johnny Depp, the Aquarian star said
"I don't want to be alone." Despite the success of his career, he said no one shared it with him and his life was empty
In an interview with rolling stone, Tesla's chief executive talked about his recent breakup with amber Hurd, admitting: "well, I think she broke up with me more than I did with her. Get news, feature and other push notifications. "
"I'm really in love and sad," Musk said
"The two got together for the first time last year because they both experienced an open decoupling: Hurd and actor Johnny Depp finalized their divorce agreement in January, while musk filed for divorce with Western actress tarula Riley in early 2015."
A source told people in August that the 31 year old actress and 46 year old tech tycoon resigned because of their increasingly busy work
"However, just a few days after the news of their breakup came out, they were found together in Australia."
Credit for image zooming: Elon Musk / instagram musk says he "won't be happy" without a girlfriend
"I never want to be alone." He explained
"I will never be happy without anyone."



Number  1172
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ON AIR: Weeknights (12:37-1:37 AM, ET/PT) ORIGINATION: CBS Television City, Los Angeles (Filmed in HD) PREMIERE: March 23, 2015 HOSTED BY: James Corden BANDLEADER: Reggie Watts PRODUCED BY: CBS Broadcasting Inc. EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS: Ben Winston & Rob Crabbe...”
“Since Corden took the reigns as host in March 2015, he has quickly become known for generating buzzworthy viral videos, such as Carpool Karaoke.”
“Additionally, bandleader Reggie Watts and the house band provide original, improvised music throughout the show.”
“Corden differentiates his show by offering viewers a peek behind-the-scenes into the green room, bringing all of his guests out at once and lending his musical and acting talents to various sketches.”
“Each week night, THE LATE LATE SHOW with JAMES CORDEN throws the ultimate late night after party with a mix of celebrity guests, edgy musical acts, games and sketches.”


"Broadcast time: weeknights (12:37-1:37 am, et / PT) Original: CBS television city, Los Angeles (HD shooting) Premiere: March 23, 2015 host: James Corden band leader: Reggie watts production: CBS broadcasting Inc. executive producer: Ben Winston & rob Crabbe..."
"Since cordon became the host in March 2015, he has quickly become famous for making popular viral videos, such as carpooling karaoke."
"In addition, band leader Reggie watts and the family band provide original improvisation throughout the performance."
"Cordon's show is different. He allows the audience to have a glimpse of the green house behind the scenes, bring out all the guests at once, and apply his music and performance talents to various sketches."
"Every night, James Corden's" late night show "hosts the ultimate Midnight Party, including celebrity guests, avant-garde music shows, games and skits."



Number  1173
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Love you Momby.”Just one day after Carrie’s death, her mother, movie icon Debbie Reynolds, died at age 84.”
““I would tell you, from my perspective that there’s certainly no news that Carrie did drugs.”
“According to the coroner, the Star Wars actress, who died last December at the age of 60, showed signs of having taken multiple drugs, though officials could not determine whether those contributed to her death.”
“She also had a buildup of fatty tissue in the walls of her arteries.”
“The coroner said Fisher’s manner of death would be listed as undetermined.”
“In a statement to the AP, the late movie star’s brother, Todd Fisher, said he was not surprised by the findings.”
““We’re not enlightened.”
“There’s nothing about this that is enlightening,” he said.”
“I am not shocked that part of her health was affected by drugs.”Carrie battled drug addiction and mental illness for many years.”
“Shame and those social stigmas are the enemies of progress to solutions and ultimately a cure.”


"Love you, mom." The day after Carrie's death, her mother, film icon Debbie Reynolds, died at the age of 84
"I want to tell you, from my point of view, there must be no news of Carrie taking drugs."
"According to the coroner, the Star Wars actress, who died in December last year at the age of 60, showed signs of taking a variety of drugs, but officials are not sure whether these drugs were the cause of her death."
"She also has fat tissue on the walls of her arteries."
"The coroner said Fisher's mode of death will be listed as pending."
Todd Fisher, the late movie star's brother, said in a statement to the associated press that he was not surprised by the discovery
"We are not enlightened."
"It's not inspiring," he said
"I'm not shocked that part of her body is affected by drugs." Carrie had been fighting drug addiction and mental illness for many years
"Shame and these social stigmas are the enemies of the solution and ultimately healing of progress."



Number  1174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ 4.”
““I really want to lose all this weight, so maybe I can get him back … He told me, straight to my face, he wasn’t attracted to me anymore.” Kardashian’s response: “Mmm,” telegraphing her best concerned face.”
“It’s one thing to use moderate exercise as an outlet during a breakup—anything that helps ground oneself in times of chaos is good.”
“But this is a far cry from the spectacle into which she’s spun her enjoyment of exercise.”
“That all sounds good: It’s been proven that exercise can lead to happiness, and there are tons of studies on the effect of physical movement on one’s overall well-being.”
““I started slow and eventually I started working out four to five days a week,” she said.”
“In 2013, Kardashian “decided to turn to fitness as a form of therapy and as a stress reliever,” as she wrote on Instagram.”
““I started working out during my divorce, but it was more for sanity reasons,” she told ET.”
“Plus, Kardashian herself said that she began to work out as a method of stress relief, which, according to her, had nothing to do with losing weight.”
“What’s more, the idea that “haters” should be our greatest motivators is so twisted, because if one is using the imagined idea of someone else’s perception as a gauge for personal growth, the scale is pretty much guaranteed to come out skewed.”


“ 4.”
"I really want to lose weight, so maybe I can get him back He told me straight out that he was no longer attracted to me. " "Well," Kardashian replied, patting her most concerned face
"It's one thing to do moderate exercise when you break up, and in times of chaos, anything that helps stabilize you is good."
"But it's very different from the way she weaves the fun out of exercise."
"It all sounds good: it turns out that exercise can bring happiness, and there is a lot of research on the effect of physical exercise on a person's overall well-being."
"I started slowly and ended up exercising four to five days a week," she said
In 2013, Kardashian wrote on instagram: "she decided to use fitness as a way to treat and reduce stress."
"I started exercising during the divorce, but it was more out of reason," she told et
"In addition, Kardashian herself said that starting exercise was a way to reduce stress, which, according to her, had nothing to do with losing weight."
More importantly, the idea that "haters" should be our greatest motivation is so distorted, because if one uses other people's views as a measure of personal growth, then the scale will certainly be biased



Number  1175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a clip from their reunion special Nicole Snooki Polizzi Jenni JWoww Farley Paul Pauly D DelVecchio Mike The Situation Sorrentino and Sammi Sweetheart Giancola look back on old hookups and one in particular that stands out is JWoww s scandalous season one rendevous with Pauly D EXCLUSIVE Mike The...”
“Situation Sorrentino Confirms Jersey Shore Reunion Everyone Is Just So Excited Jenni would you still f k Pauly...”
“Snooki asks, prompting Pauly to remember, "She's the first one I sorta hooked up with in the house!"”
“Of course... while JWoww was cheating on her then-boyfriend in the show's inaugural season, Pauly knows better than to go after her now that she's got two kids with her husband of two years, Roger Mathews.”
“"Roger would kill me," Pauly laughed.”
“"Beat me up!"”
“WATCH: 'Jersey Shore' Stars Jam Out to Show's Old Theme Song!”
“A First Look at Their 'Reunion Road Trip'Of course, JWoww was able to clap back on Snooki by bringing up one of her past transgressions"Would you still f**k Mike [Sorrentino]?"”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"In the segment of their reunion special Nicole Snookie Polizzi Jennie jwoww Farley Paul D. Delvecchio Michael, Sorrentino and Sammy's sweetheart giankola review their past relationship. One of the highlights is the exclusive performance of jwoww's gossip Season 1 with Paul D. Michael..."
"Situation Sorrentino confirmed that everyone is so excited about the reunion on the west coast of Jersey. Jennie, you're going to f k poly..."
"She's the first person I've ever hooked up with in my family!" he asked
"Of course... Although jwoww betrayed her then boyfriend in the premiere season of the show, Paulie knew that since she had two children with her husband, Roger Matthews, who had been in love for two years, she would not go after her. "
"Roger will kill me," Paulie laughed
"Hit me!"
"Look: 'Jersey coast' stars are packed with the old theme song shown!"
"At the first sight of their" reunion tour ", of course, jwoww can fight back by mentioning a violation of snooky's past behavior:" will you still deal with Mike? "



Number  1176
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Sweet Sensitive Side Exclusive This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“RELATED CONTENT Beyonce and JAY Z Make Glamorous Appearance at Art Show in L A New Dad Travis Scott Performs During NBA All Star Weekend Justin Bieber Jamie Foxx and Michael B Jordan Heat Up 2018 NBA All Star Celebrity Game Watch Jamie Foxx s Youngest Daughter Dish On His...”
“See more in the video below.”
“Stars like Jimmy Kimmel, Jack Nicholson, Dave Chapelle, Snoop Dogg, Ellen Pompeo, Julianne Moore and Arnold Schwarzenegger were all in attendance at the 67th All-Star Game, which featured teams picked by captains LeBron James and Stephen Curry.”
“Allen Berezovsky/Getty ImagesAllen Berezovsky/Getty ImagesAllen Berezovsky/Getty ImagesWhile Bey's husband, JAY-Z, and their two other children, twins Rumi and Sir, were missing from the family's big night out, the NBA All-Star Weekend has attracted plenty of celebs.”
“Queen Bey rocked a chic asymmetric draped wrap skirt by Jacquemus under a brown hoodie and PVC boots by Gianvito Rossi, while Blue sported jeans, a moto jacket and matching black booties.”
“The mother-daughter duo -- who were joined by Bey's mom, Tina Knowles Lawson and her husband, Richard Lawson -- couldn't have looked more stylish at the game.”
“The 36-year-old singer sat courtside at the NBA All-Star Game at Los Angeles' Staples Center on Sunday, where she and Blue Ivy were spotted posing for a few selfies.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Exclusive video on sweet sensitive end is not available because we can't load sponsor's message..."
"Beyonce and jay z appear at the Los Angeles Art Show. New Dad Travis Scott performs Justin Bieber, Jamie Fox and Michael B. Jordan warm up for the 2018 NBA all star masters to watch Jamie Fox's little daughter on the disc..."
"Please see more in the video below."
"Jimmy Kimmel, Jack Nicholson, Dave shapel, Snoop Dogg, Alan Pompeo, Julian Moore and Arnold Schwarzenegger all played in the 67th all star game, including the team chosen by captains LeBron James and Stephen curry."
"When Alan Berezovsky and their other two children, twins Rumi and jazz, disappeared on the family's big night, NBA all star weekend attracted a lot of celebrities."
"Queen bee is wearing jacquemus' fashionable asymmetrical pleated skirt, gianvito Rossi's Brown Hoodie and PVC boots, as well as blue sport jeans, moto jacket and black boots."
"The mother daughter combination - Betty's mother, Tina Knowles Lawson, and her husband, Richard Lawson, took part in the competition - looked very fashionable in the competition."
"The 36 year old singer was sitting on the sidelines of the NBA all star game at Staples Center in Los Angeles on Sunday when she was found posing with blue ivy



Number  1177
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Slimed celebrities [ edit ]”
“[7][8][9]Movies [ edit ]Television [ edit ]Music [ edit ]Miscellaneous [ edit ]International nominations [ edit ]The following are nominations for awards from Nickelodeon's international networks, which had the categories and awards presented during continuity during their individual airings of the main American ceremony.”
“[5] Winners are listed first and in boldface.”
“For the movie categories, voting was opened on February 26, with voting on music categories opened on March 5, television voting beginning on March 12, and a variety of miscellaneous categories on March 19.”
“Unlike past years where the voting periods for all categories opened all at once, one genre opened up to voting per week, along with several show-only category voting windows.”
“Hosts [ edit ]Performers [ edit ]Presenters [ edit ]Winners and nominees [ edit ]Nominations were announced on February 26, 2018.”
“Afterwards, a new episode of Knight Squad was shown.”
“[4]A new episode of Henry Danger premiered before the ceremony.”
“[2][3] The show also gave an honor to the people protesting in the March for Our Lives movement that occurred on the same day, including other honors coming from award winners such as Millie Bobby Brown, Camila Cabello, Liza Koshy, and Zendaya.”
“John Cena returned as host of the ceremony for the second consecutive year.”


"Slim celebrity [editor]"
"[7] [8] [9] movie [Edit] TV [Edit] music [Edit] miscellaneous [Edit] international nominations [Edit] the following are the nominations for the awards of Nickelodeon international network, which launched categories and awards continuously during individual broadcast periods of major award ceremonies in the United States."
"[5] the winners come first in bold."
"Voting for films will start on February 26, for music on March 5, for television on March 12 and for miscellaneous items on March 19."
"Unlike the opening of voting periods for all categories at the same time in the past few years, there is one category of voting per week and several voting windows showing only categories."
"Host [editor] performer [editor] host [editor] winners and nominators [editor] nominations were announced on February 26, 2018."
"After that, there was a new episode of Cavaliers."
"[4] a new episode of Henry Tangier premiered before the ceremony."
[2] [3] the show also pays tribute to the people who protested in the march for our lives movement held on the same day, including other honors of winners such as Millie Bobbie brown, Camilla Cabello, Lisa Kosi and zendaya
"For the second year in a row, John Senna is the host of the awards ceremony."



Number  1178
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And it’ll take time for people to adjust.””
“A petition from more than 1.2 million users begged the company to reconsider its redesign, eventually forcing a somewhat dismissive response from Snap Inc itself.”
“Kylie Jenner, one of the first wave of celebrities whose fame grew primarily on Snapchat over other social media firms, shared her disappointment with the app on Twitter late on Wednesday: “sooo does anyone else not open Snapchat anymore?”
“Or is it just me ... ugh this is so sad,” she said.”
““[S]till love you tho snap ... my first love”.”
“...sooo does anyone else not open Snapchat anymore?”
“Or is it just me... ugh this is so sad.”
“Kylie Jenner KylieJenner February 21 2018 Jenner s tweet combined with growing fears on the part of investors that a long awaited usability focused redesign may not solve Snapchat s user growth issues sparked a plunge in the company s stock which fell 6 over the course of Thursday clearing...”
“1 3bn from its market capitalisation...”
“The redesign of the app saw Snapchat move away from its previous split between “messages” and “stories”, the social media convention invented by the company but usurped by Facebook’s Instagram.”


"People need time to adapt."
"A petition from more than 1.2 million users asked the company to reconsider the redesign, eventually forcing snap to make some dismissive responses of its own."
Kylie Jenner, one of the first celebrities to make her name mainly from snapchat, rather than other social media companies, shared her disappointment with the snapchat app on twitter late Wednesday: "so who else doesn't have snapchat anymore?"
"Or is it just me... "Ah, that's pathetic," she said
Until I fall in love with you... My first love
“… Is there anyone who doesn't open snapchat anymore? "
"Or is it just me... Ah, that's pathetic. "
"Kylie Jenner Kylie Jenner's tweet on February 21, 2018, coupled with investors' growing concern that the long-awaited redesign focusing on usability may not solve snapchat's user growth problem, led to a sharp drop in the company's stock, which fell 6% in the settlement process on Thursday..."
"The market value is 1.3 billion..."
The redesigned app has freed snapchat from the old "message" and "story" boundaries, which were invented by the company as a social media convention but usurped by Facebook's instagram



Number  1179
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The collection will include three eye shadow palettes, 40 lipsticks, 12 lip pencils, 5 eye pencils and mascara, ranging from $125-$25, and will launch on patmcgrath.com on September 16th.”
“...crave instant glamour gratification in digitally empowered digital era makeup explains McGrath in a statement...”
“With this new iteration of PAT McGRATH LABS I am sharing my secrets unzipping my 87 suitcases and revealing the technique and the truth behind every eye skin and lip I have ever created to my fellow beauty junkies who...”
“After creating seven limited-edition collections, makeup legend Pat McGrath is finally unveiling a range of 61 products -- and for the first time ever, they won't sell out.”


"The series will include 3 eye shadow palettes, 40 lipsticks, 12 lip pens, 5 eye pens and mascara, priced at $125-25, and will be launched in June 1, 2011. patmcgrath.com9 May 16. "
“… Eager to satisfy the instant glamour of make-up in the digital age, "McGrath explained in a statement
"In the new generation of Pat McGrath lab, I will share my secrets, unzip 87 suitcases, and reveal to my beauty lovers the skills and truth behind every eye skin and lip I create, they..."
"After creating seven limited edition collections, cosmetics legend pat McGrath finally launched 61 collections - and for the first time in history, they won't sell out."



Number  1180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Thus, it is wholly improper for the State or any witness to refer to the decedent as a ‘victim’ since such a reference inaccurately characterizes the events relevant to the instant charge.””
“Soules, like all other accused persons in the State of Iowa, is presumed innocent,” the documents read, and also state that, “The State has not charged Mr. Soules with any crime asserting he is criminally responsible for the death of the decedent.”
“Friday wedding of Bachelor contestant Sharleen Joynt...”
“In photos obtained by E!, the 35-year-old reality star looked happy as he grinned at the camera.”
“He wore a classic black suit jacket, crisp white button-down shirt and long skinny black tie.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Thursday, he had been spotted at an airport in the Big Apple — wearing a camouflage-printed baseball cap, a blue fitted half-zip sweater, grey pants and white sneakers as he pulled his luggage before grabbing a taxi.”
“Joynt, who withdrew from Juan Pablo Galavis‘ season, married fiancé Andy Levine at New York City’s Battery Park Gardens on Friday — two years after Joynt announced the engagement on Instagram in February 2015.”
““Today’s the day!” she wrote on Instagram Friday afternoon.”
““I’m marrying this #silverfox tonight and couldn’t be happier.”Image zoom Sharleen Joynt marries Andy Levine | Credit: BACKGRIDOn April 25, Soules was arrested at 1:16 a.m. after a deadly car crash in Iowa, where he lives.”


"Therefore, it is totally inappropriate for the state or any witness to refer to the deceased as a 'victim' because this statement does not accurately describe the events related to the immediate charge."
"Solles, like all other defendants in Iowa, is presumed innocent," the document said, adding that "the state government has not charged Mr. solles with any crime, claiming that he was criminally responsible for the death of the deceased."
"Celine Jon's wedding on Friday..."
"In E! The 35 year old reality TV star grinned at the camera and looked very happy
He wore a classic black suit jacket, a white button shirt and a thin black tie
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
On Thursday, he was found at an airport in New York - he was wearing a camouflage printed baseball cap, a blue half zipper sweater, gray trousers and white sneakers, pulling his luggage and then catching a taxi
"Jondt pulled out of Juan Pablo galavis's marriage and married his fiance, Andy Levine, on Friday at Battery Park Gardens in New York City - two years ago, jondt announced his engagement on instagram in February 2015."
"Today! "She wrote on instagram on Friday afternoon."
"I can't be happier to marry this Silverfox tonight." Photo zooming Charlene JONETTE and Andy Levin married | source: backgrid April 25, sules was arrested at 1:16 a.m. after a fatal car accident in Iowa, where he lives



Number  1181
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The model and the “Love Me Now” singer also have three other dogs: named Pippa, Penny and their newest addition, Pablo, who they adopted in October.”
“My old man monster I love you pic.twitter.com/3kpdQAFxsj — christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) November 14, 2017Although Puddy is on the road to recovery, Teigen told her fans that his health was still not fully back to normal.”
“Chrissy Teigen’s dog Puddy is home following a health scare this past weekend.”
“The bulldog reunited with Teigen and John Legend’s daughter, Luna, after undergoing emergency treatment for heart failure.”
““My BABY IS BACK!!!!!!!”
“Bulldog you made me cry harder than any other living being ever has.”
“My old man monster I love you,” the model tweeted on Tuesday, November 14, along with a video of the pup and her 18-month-old daughter reuniting in her home.”
“My BABY IS BACK!!!!!!!”
“She tweeted he does have a tumor on his heart and he s basically a 70 year old man beast but I am so happy to have him home right now for he does have a tumor on his heart...”


The model and "love me now" singer also has three other dogs: Pippa, penny and their new member Pablo, which they adopted in October
"My old monster, I love you pic.twitter.com/3kpdQAFxsj -Christina Taigen (@ christyteigen) November 14, 2017 although Pudi is on the way to recovery, Taigen told her fans that his health is still not fully restored to normal. "
"Chris tegan's dog, pudy, went home last weekend for a health scare."
"The bulldog was reunited with Logan and John Regan's daughter Luna after receiving emergency treatment for heart failure."
"My child is back!!!"
"Bulldog, you make me cry more than any other living person."
On Tuesday, November 14, a model tweeted, "my old man monster, I love you," along with a video of the dog reuniting with her 18 month old daughter at home
"My child is back!!!"
"She tweeted that he does have a tumor in his heart. He is basically 70 years old, but I'm glad he can go home now, because he does have a tumor in his heart..."



Number  1182
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Be That as It May” — Herizen Guardiola, The Get Down**WINNER “You’re the One That I Want” — ensemble, Grease: Live...”
“Jerome Moonlight Emma Stone Ryan Gosling La La Land Emma Watson Dan Stevens Beauty and the Beast Taraji P Henson Terrence Howard Empire Zac Efron Anna Kendrick Mike Dave Need Wedding Dates Best Villain Allison Williams Get Out Demogorgon Stranger Things Jared Leto Suicide Squad WINNER Jeffrey Dean Morgan The...”
“Hollywood’s hottest stars hit L.A.’s Shrine Auditorium on Sunday, May 7, for the 2017 MTV Movie & TV Awards.”
“The show hosted by Pitch Perfect s Adam Devine celebrates the biggest and best movies and TV shows in categories including Best Kiss Best Villain Tearjerker and Best Fight Against the System Jordan Peele s directorial debut Get Out leads the nominees with six nods followed by Beauty and the...”
“Beast with four nominations including Best Actor in a Movie for Emma Watson...”
“Netflix’s Stranger Things also earned nods in four categories — two for Millie Bobby Brown.”
“The Fast & Furious franchise, meanwhile, scored the coveted Generation Award.”
“This is the first year the honor is not going to an individual actor.”
“See the full list of nominees below, and check back throughout the night to see the winners.”
“We’ll be updating this list as categories are announced.”


"Nevertheless" - Guardiola, the next * * winner "you are the one I want" - ensemble, grease: Live
"Jerome moonlight Emma stone Ryan Gosling La La Land Emma Watson Dan Stevens beauty and beast taraji P Henson Terrence Howard Empire Zack evron Anna Kendrick Michael Dave needs a wedding date best villain Alison Williams going out about strangers in Demogorgon Jared Leto suicide team champion Jeffrey Dean Morgan the..."
"Hollywood's hottest star appeared in the temple auditorium of Los Angeles on May 7 (Sunday) for the 2017 MTV film and Television Awards."
"Hosted by pitch perfect s Adam Devine, the show celebrates the biggest and best movie and TV shows in the categories of best kiss, best villain tear gas and best confrontation system. Jordan Peel's directorial debut" going out "leads the nominees with six nods, followed by beautiful women and women
"The beast won four nominations, including Emma Watson's best movie actor..."
"Netflix's strange things has also won four awards - two are Millie Bobbie brown."
"At the same time," speed and passion "series won the coveted generation award
"This is the first year, the honor does not belong to individual actors."
"Take a look at all the nominations below and check the winners all night."
"We will update this list when we announce categories."



Number  1183
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She passes out immediately after removing her bracelet, and when two of Chase’s lacrosse teammates try to take advantage of her, Chase realizes that maybe he shouldn’t have abandoned his old friends for aspiring rapists.”
“In an act of rebellion, Karolina takes off the bracelet she received when she was initiated into the church at birth, and her flesh becomes a sparkling pastel rainbow.”
“Morgen is a filmmaker committed to verisimilitude, and he’s an inspired choice to direct a superhero project with a grounded perspective.”
““Reunion” is the first fictional work directed by Brett Morgen, a documentarian who has worked on films like the Academy Award–nominated On the Ropes, Cobain: Montage of Heck, and this year’s Jane.”
“It also has some cheeky teases of future plot points, like an inflatable dinosaur pool toy, the significance of which longtime fans will immediately understand.”
“It’s sunny and colorful, but also a bit sinister, teasing the darkness at the root of these teenagers’ privileged lives.”
“The title sequence sets the tone for the rest of the episode, providing glimpses of different L.A. environments — from lavish homes to grimy streets and rolling hills — backed by synth-heavy chillwave music.”
“With its shaky handheld camerawork and sickly green palette, the cold open is a tense, gritty introduction to the world of Runaways, providing a seedy image of Los Angeles that is wiped away when the story jumps to the wealthy neighborhoods where the central teenagers live.”
“Destiny plays a key role later in the episode, but her time on this series is limited, and the help she receives from two members of the Church of Gibborim will ultimately doom her.”
“The episode begins with a runaway, Destiny (Nicole Wolf), but she isn’t one of the main characters.”


"She took off her bracelet and fainted immediately. When two of Chase's Lacrosse teammates tried to take advantage of her, chase realized that maybe he shouldn't abandon his old friend for the sake of an aspiring rapist."
In a revolt, Carolina takes off the bracelet she received when she was born and enters the church. Her body turns into a colorful rainbow
"Morgen is a filmmaker dedicated to realism, an inspired choice to direct a superhero project from a down-to-earth perspective."
"Reunion" is the first fictional work directed by Brett Morgan. As a documentary director, he has participated in the Oscar nominated films "on the rope", "Coban: Huck's Montage" and "Jane" this year
"It also makes some shameless jokes about future plot points, such as an inflatable dinosaur swimming pool toy, which long-term fans will understand immediately."
"It's sunny and colorful, but it's also a bit sinister, teasing the dark roots of these teenagers' privileged lives."
"The title sequence sets the tone for the rest of the episode, providing a glimpse of the different environments in Los Angeles - from luxurious homes to dirty streets and rolling hills - with synthesizer heavy cold wave music behind them."
"With its shaky hand-held photography and sickly green palette," cold door "is a work that nervously and persistently introduces the world of fugitives. When the story jumps to the affluent community where teenagers live in the center, the dirty image of Los Angeles disappears."
"Fate plays a key role in the later part of the episode, but her time in the series is limited, and the help she gets from two members of the gibeline church will eventually destroy her."
"This episode starts with a runaway fate (Nicole Wolf), but she's not one of the main characters."



Number  1184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe I have other things I’m supposed to do?’”
“Paul dated the Friends actress when he worked on a film called The Object of My Affection with her.”
“It was so tough, man.”
“‘We were broken up and the producers were like, “Hey would you wanna do six episodes of the show?” And I was like “Maybe it would be good to work through this breakup.”‘It was horrible.”
“At the time, he and Jennifer had recently broken up, according to Huff Post Live.”
“He played Rachel's love interest Joshua on the show.”
“Jennifer and Tate were engaged briefly, which comes as a shock to most dedicated Friends fans.”
“He then appeared on Friends as Phoebe’s beau, Mike, through most of the final season.”
“He played Will Colbert in a single episode of Friends called The One With the Rumor.”
“Here’s all you need to know about all that and more.”


"Maybe I have something else to do?"
"Paul was dating his friend's actress when he was making a movie called I love her with."
"It's hard, man."
"We broke up, and the producer said," Hey, do you want to play six episodes? I just thought, "maybe it'll be good to survive this breakup." "It's terrible."
"According to a live report by the huff post, at that time, he and Jennifer recently broke up."
"He played Rachel's funny Joshua on the show."
"Jennifer and Tate were briefly engaged, which shocked most fans of enthusiastic friends."
"For most of the last season, he appeared in friends as Phoebe's boyfriend, Mike."
"He played will Colbert in an episode of friends called" the man with the rumor. "
"That's all you need to know."



Number  1185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She shared videos and photos of the party to Instagram.”
“Hi.”Image zoom Pete Davidson | Credit: Ariana Grande/InstagramImage zoom Pete Davidson and Ariana Grande | Credit: Splash NewsThe former Nickelodeon star began birthday celebrations early on Monday with friends and brother Frankie Grande.”
“The duo headed to karaoke with friends inside Frames Bowling Lounge on Tuesday to celebrate the songstress 25th birthday where they teamed up to sing Evanescence s 2003 hit Bring Me to Life The performance was captured on Grande s Instagram story as she nailed the lead vocals and Davidson...”
“...seemed just as comfortable on the stage as he provided the back up...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“But the fun didn’t stop there.”
“Grande also belted out Beyoncé s Love On Top while Davidson showed off his rapping skills with Eminem s Superman Frames has a private karaoke room with a separate entrance called the Lyric Lounge which was completely covered before Grande s arrival to maintain secrecy the New York Post s...”
“Page Six reported...”
“Like any good birthday party, Grande’s included a cake.”
“Hers featured a throwback photo of herself as a little girl sweetly smiling with the words Happy Birthday Ariana Image zoom Pete Davidson and Ariana Grande Credit Ariana Grande Instagram Image zoom Pete Davidson Credit Ariana Grande Instagram Image zoom Pete Davidson Credit Ariana Grande Instagram Image zoom Ariana Grande...”


"She shared the video and photos of the party with instagram."
"Hi." Picture zooming Peter Davidson | source: Ariana grand / instagram image zoom Peter Davidson and Ariana grand | source: splash news the former nickel star started a birthday celebration with her friend and brother Frankie grand earlier on Monday
"On Tuesday, the two and their friends went to karaoke in frames bowling lounge to celebrate the singer's 25th birthday, where they sang" bring me to life ", a popular song of 2003 by evance. This performance is recorded in Grande's instagram story. She has locked in the lead singer and Davidson... "
“… It seems as comfortable on stage as he is as a stand in... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"But the fun is more than that."
"Grand also puts Beyonce's love on top, while Davidson shows his rap skills with Eminem's superman. Before grand arrived, there was a private karaoke hall with a separate entrance called the lyric lounge. To keep it a secret, the New York Post reported... "
"Page six report..."
"Like any good birthday party, grand has a cake."
"Her feature is a retrospective photo, she is a little girl, with a sweet smile, it says happy birthday, Arianna picture zoom, Peter Davidson and Arianna Grande credit, Arianna Grande instagram picture zoom, Peter Davidson credit, Arianna Grande instagram picture zoom, Peter Davidson credit, Arianna Grande instagram picture zoom Liana grand... "



Number  1186
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prince George and Princess Charlotte are set to attend as page boy and flower girl and it remains to be seen whether they will steal the limelight from their aunt.”
“Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play nowLater this month, Kate's sister Pippa Middleton will wed fiance James Matthews in a ceremony at her local church.”
“The clip prompted comparisons to Prince William and Kate Middleton's wedding in 2011, when flower girl Grace Van Cutsem upstaged the couple's first kiss by covering her ears due to the noise of the crowd.”
“His antics prompted a sharp nudge from fed-up cousin Leah Isadora Behn, aged 12, who looks as though she was keeping him in check.”
“It was such a 'blink and you'll miss it' moment, he almost got away with it, but unfortunately for him, cameras captured everything.”
“The cheeky chap, son of Crown Prince Haakon and Crown Princess Mette-Marit, then decided to kick it up a notch and performed the popular 'dab' move (you can watch the video to see exactly how this one works) prompting giggles from the children around him.”
“Prince Sverre, who is third in line to the Norwegian throne - just like Britain's Prince George - could be seen mumbling and pulling faces, drawing eye rolls from his cousins and sister.”
“(Image: Getty)But to the left of the monarchs in clips of the celebrations, a cheeky young prince was doing his best to keep fellow youngsters entertained - and totally stole the show.”
“As the Norwegian royal family and nobility gathered on the balcony of an Oslo palace to celebrate the King Harald and Queen Sonja's 80th birthdays, well-wishers waved and cheered.”
“The latest kid to totally upstage a monarch is 11-year-old Prince Sverre Magnus of Norway.”


"Prince George and Princess Charlotte will be present as paging boys and flower girls. It remains to be seen whether they will steal the limelight from their aunt."
"Video loading video not available Click to play Click to play video will automatically play soon 8 cancel play now later this month, Kate's sister Pippa Middleton will be married to her fiance James Matthews in the local church."
"The video compares it to the wedding of Prince William and Kate Middleton in 2011, when grace van cutsem, a playboy, covered her ears and snatched the couple's first kiss because of the crowd."
"His antics aroused strong resentment from his 12-year-old cousin Leah Isadora Behn, who seemed to control him."
"It was a 'blink of an eye, you'll miss' moment, and he almost got away with it, but unfortunately, the camera caught everything."
"This cheeky guy, the son of crown prince harken and princess met Marit, later decided to take it to a higher level and performed the popular" DAB "(you can watch the video to see how it works), which caused the laughter of the children around him."
"You can see Prince Sverre, the third in line to the throne of Norway, muttering like Prince George of England, pulling his face and attracting the eyes of his cousins."
"(information photo: Getty) but in the clip of the celebration, on the left of the monarchs, a cheeky young prince is doing his best to make other young people happy - completely robbing the show."
When the royal family and nobles of Norway gathered on the balcony of a palace in Oslo to celebrate the 80th birthday of King Harald and queen Sonia, the benefactors waved and cheered
"The latest child to surpass the monarch is 11 year old Norwegian Prince svermagnas."



Number  1187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I think secretly we just want to spend more time together!”RELATED VIDEO: ‘Sweet Valley High’ Alum Brittany Daniel Opens Up About ‘Love At First Sight’ With Husband Adam Touni...”
“Guests enjoyed a buffet-style meal from Tres La Catering that included bites such as steak and eggs, Maine lobster rolls, quinoa spinach bites and more.”
“The Sweet Valley High alum Brittany Daniel and her boyfriend Adam Touni have tied the knot, PEOPLE confirms.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We are overwhelmed by the outpouring of love and affection shared by our friends and family on this special day,” the couple said in a statement to PEOPLE.”
“We are so grateful to have this kind of support as we start this journey together The couple said their I do s at The Carondelet House in downtown Los Angeles on Saturday in front of 150 of their closest friends and family including maid of honor and Daniel s...”
“...twin sister Cynthia Daniel Hauser and castmates from BET s The Game...”
“The bride, wearing a beautiful custom-made Trish Peng gown, took her groom by surprise during their first look before the ceremony.”
“The magical moment was captured by celebrity photographer Michael Segal and his team at Michael Segal Photography.”
“The urban chic celebration, put together by Charley King of Blue Bell Events, was infused with copper, gray and blush tones throughout the decor.”


"I think we just want to stay together more! "Related video: Sweet Valley High School Alumni Brittany Daniel opens' love at first sight 'with her husband Adam tooney..."
Guests enjoy a buffet of Tesla restaurants, including steak and eggs, Maine Lobster rolls, quinoa spinach, etc
"It has been confirmed that Brittany Daniel and her boyfriend Adam tooney are married."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On this special day, we are overwhelmed by the love and affection that our friends and family pour out," the couple said in a statement to people magazine
"We are very grateful for the support, and we start this journey together. The couple said "I do s..." in front of 150 of their closest friends and family, including the bridesmaid and Daniel s, at Carondelet house in downtown Los Angeles on Saturday
“… My twin sister, Cynthia Daniel Hauser, and my friends at the game
The bride wore a beautiful custom-made Cui Shipeng dress, which surprised the groom at the first sight before the wedding
"This amazing moment was shot by famous photographer Michael Segal and his team at Michael Segal photography company."
"City fashion celebration, the blue bell event by King Charlie, is the whole decoration of copper, gray and blush colors."



Number  1188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tuesday's reunion special also featured Ryan Buckley and his wife Jaclyn Schwartzberg, as well as Jonathan Francetic and his estranged wife Molly Duff.”
“Can’t wait to hit them with the “Boy/girl if you don’t get your butt over!” Talking through me teeth - my little Haitian baby,' he wrote.”
“'I promise that I'm right here no matter what,' he assured her.”
“'At least we know we'll be good parents,' Jephte said while trying to comfort her, and Shawniece agreed that he will be a 'great father.'”
“'We don't have it figured out, and for this to happen, I'm like, "What?"'”
“...now we can actually take baby steps together because we re having a baby Shawniece told him We are still trying to figure the whole marriage thing out she added...”
“When Jephte opened the box he found a pair of baby sneakers Father to be Jephte looked shocked at first but he had a bright smile on his face once the news had sunk in Next step I know that you wanted to take baby steps in the beginning but...”
“Say what?”
“I'm not a perfect person and I know you're not a perfect person, but I know that you care.'”
“'I don't have it all figured out.”


"Tuesday's reunion special also includes Ryan Barkley and his wife, Jacklyn schwarzberg, as well as Jonathan Francis and his separated wife, Molly Duff."
"Can't wait to hit them with" boy / girl "if you don't turn your ass over! "Speak through my teeth - my little Haitian baby," he wrote
"I promise I'll be here no matter what happens," he assured her
"At least we know we're going to be good parents," jeffert said as he comforted her, and Shaw agreed that he would be a "great father."
"We haven't figured it out yet. If this happens, I'll say, 'what?'"
“… Now we can take our time together because we have a child, and Sean's niece told him that we are still trying to solve the whole marriage problem, she added
"When jeffert opened the box, he found a pair of baby sports shoes. Jeffert, the father to be, looked shocked at first, but he had a bright smile on his face. As soon as the news reached the next step, I knew you wanted to take the baby's step at the beginning, but..."
"Say what?"
"I am not a perfect person, I know you are not a perfect person, but I know you care."
"I'm not sure yet."



Number  1189
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In October 2016, they reunited with the rest of their castmates to celebrate the life of their late costar and friend...”
“But all of this seems a little bit ironic now, since Tisha and Martin are back friends again.”
“Tisha, of course, starred on Martin Lawrence’s hit 90’s show, ‘Martin’ for five seasons before the sitcom went off the air in 1997 due to serious riffs between Martin Lawrence and Campbell-Martin.”
“Duane Martin and Tisha both starred in Kevin Harts scripted reality series, Real Husbands of Hollywood for the past couple of seasons.”
“Over the course of their marriage, the pair, who wed in 1996, had two children: sons Ezekiel, 8, and Xen, 16.”
“You May Also Like The Secret to Burning More Calories Is...“It’s an emotional time and I graciously ask for privacy for me, our children and the rest of our family,” she shared.”
“While there have been many rumors of husband Duane Martin’s sexuality and possible infidelity, the couple has never responded and seem to have always pushed forward.”
“The pair had been repeatedly featured on just about everyone’s list of Black Love couples who have stood the test of time.”
““After 27 years of being together and two amazing children, it pains me to announce that I’ve filed for divorce,” Tisha, 49, said in the statement.”
“The couple shares a total of 27 years together, and 21 years of marriage.”


"In October 2016, they reunited with other crew members to celebrate the lives of their late partners and friends..."
"But it all seems a little ironic now, because Tisha and Martin are old friends again."
"Of course, Tisha starred for five seasons in Martin Lawrence's hit show Martin in the 1990s, and then the sitcom went off air in 1997 because of a serious feud between Martin Lawrence and Campbell Martin."
Both Duane Martin and Tisha have appeared in Kevin Hart's reality series, Hollywood's reality husband for the past few seasons
During their marriage, they married in 1996 and have two children: Ezekiel, 8, and Sen, 16
"The secret that you may also like to burn more calories is..." "It's an emotional moment and I politely ask for privacy for me, our children and the rest of our family," she said
"Although there are a lot of rumors about the sexual orientation and possible infidelity of her husband, Duane Martin, the couple never responded and seem to be moving forward."
"This couple has been on almost everyone's black couple list many times, and they have stood the test of time."
"After 27 years together and having two wonderful children, it's painful for me to announce a divorce," Tisha, 49, said in a statement
"The couple spent 27 years together and 21 years married."



Number  1190
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We love you."”
“Rest In Peace, sweet angel.”
“Her Touched by an Angel co-star Roma Downey said the service was a celebration of her life with "love and laughter and tears."”
“A post shared by Roma Downey (@romadowney) on Dec 9, 2017 at 3:09pm PSTDowney posted a picture of the memorial service's program.”
“"We just gave Della a beautiful send off.”
“She would have loved it," Downey wrote.”
“"We celebrated her life with love and laughter and tears, great stories and fond memories with music and prayer and beautiful uplifting readings from the Bible (Psalm 27 and John 3.16)."”
“She called it a "a loving memorial fitting for the beloved star she was and a joyful celebration of her wonderful life well lived."”
“Reese died on Nov. 19 at age 86 at her California home.”
“"God speed sweet Della Reese.”


"We love you."
"Rest in peace, dear angel."
She was moved by an angel partner, Roma Downey, who said the service was to celebrate her life with "love, laughter and tears."
"Roman Downey (@ romadowney) posted a photo of the memorial service on pstdowney at 3:09 p.m. on December 9, 2017."
"We just gave della a a nice farewell."
"She'll like it," Downey wrote
"We celebrate her life with love, laughter, tears, great stories and good memories, with music, prayer, and uplifting beautiful readings from the Bible (Psalm 27 and John 3.16)
She called it "a remembrance of her love for her beloved star and a happy celebration of her wonderful life."
"Reese died at his home in California on November 19 at the age of 86."
"God bless you, dear della Reese."



Number  1191
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Network at 9 p.m. ET/8 p.m. CT Sundays.”
“Back in October 2015, she also had a shoulder-length 'do.”
“Kylie cut her hair again today 11/25/17 A post shared by Kylie Jenner (@kyliesnapchat) on Nov 25, 2017 at 11:41am PST"Cut off all my hair again," Kylie wrote in the caption for a Snapchat video.”
“In the clip, the 20-year-old is seen running her fingers through her hair as she listens to music.”
“As PEOPLE points out, Kylie also posted a Snapchat video earlier this week that showed her best friend Jordyn Woods cutting the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star's hair.”
““Jordyn’s cutting my hair with some kitchen scissors,” Kylie said.”
“Woods also told Kylie's professional stylist to "watch out" because she is "coming for you."”
“As a supermodel, Kylie has sported various hairdos in her career.”
“Before that, she had her hair dyed blond.”
“New episodes of KUWTK air on E!”


"9pm ET / 8PM ET Sunday."
"As early as October 2015, she also made a shoulder length" do. "
"Kelly had her hair cut again today 11 / 25 / 17," Kelly wrote in the title of the snapchat video of a post "cut my hair again" shared by Kelly Jenner (@ Kylie snapchat) at 11:41 a.m. Pacific Standard Time (PST) on November 25, 2017
"In the clip, the 20-year-old listens to music while stroking her hair with her fingers."
"As people have pointed out, Kelly also released a snapchat video earlier this week showing her best friend, Jordan woods, cutting off the hair of Kardashian's star."
"Jordan is cutting my hair with kitchen scissors," Kelly said
Woods also told Kelly's professional stylist to be "careful" because she was "here for you."
As a supermodel, Kelly has a variety of hairstyles in her career
"Before that, she dyed her hair golden."
"A new episode of kuwtk air in E!"



Number  1192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was particularly incensed at reports that a then-19-year-old Charlie Sheen allegedly raped Corey Haim when Haim was 13 on the set of “Lucas,” an accusation Sheen himself has denied — and sued over.”
“Judy Haim previously slammed Feldman for speaking of Corey Haim’s alleged sexual assault and abuse, even sending him a cease and desist in 2016, after which Feldman promised he’d stop talking about Corey Haim in the press.”
“The news of Haim’s portrayal in Feldman’s film may not sit well with the late actor’s mother.”
“The “Stand By Me” actor’s 2013 appearance on “The View,” in which Barbara Walters chided him for speaking out against “an entire industry,” went viral last year.”
“Additionally, it will help me buy the security and the legal team I need to protect my family until the project is released.”Feldman’s allegations of pedophilia in Hollywood have resurfaced in light of sexual harassment and sexual assault allegations against Harvey Weinstein, Kevin Spacey and director James Toback.”
“...a video about the Truth project I will make the film I will direct the film I will produce the film and I will self distribute it to guarantee it gets a theatrical release with your donations...”
“I propose to do this by making a film that will be the most honest and true depiction of child abuse ever portrayed by telling my own story in a very real way in a very honest way with no editing no censorship no studio behind it he said in...”
“Last year Feldman launched an IndieGogo campaign seeking 10 million to create an affront against child sexual abuse and expose an alleged pedophilia ring with his movie...”
“Haim was physically raped I was physically assaulted and as a result of those actions and the fact that I had to carry that burden all those years really it was a raping of not only our emotional lives but also our collective work and career as The Two Coreys...”
““I believe this title represents the truth I have been promising to tell and it also represents the truth of what happened,” Feldman, 47, told Us Weekly on Tuesday.”


"She was particularly annoyed by the report that Charlie Sheen, then 19, raped Corey Haim when he was 13 on the set of Lucas," a charge sheen herself has denied - and sued
"Judy Haim criticized Feldman for talking about Cory Haim's suspected sexual assault and abuse, and even issued a suspension order to him in 2016. After that, Feldman promised not to talk about Cory Haim in the media."
"The news about Haim's role in Feldman's films may not be suitable for the late actor's mother."
"This' support me 'actor appeared in the view in 2013, and Barbara Walters scolded him for speaking out against' the whole industry 'in the film, which became popular last year."
"In addition, it will help me buy the security and legal team and I need to protect my family until the project is released." Feldman's allegation of paedophilia resurfaced in Hollywood in the light of sexual harassment and assault charges against Harvey Weinstein, Kevin Spacey and director James stolbach
“… A video about project truth. I'm going to make this movie. I'm going to direct this movie. I'm going to make this movie. I'm going to release it myself, so that it can be dramatized with your donation... "
"I propose to make a film that describes child abuse in the truest and truest way, telling my own story in a very real way, without editing, without censorship, without studio," he told the New York Times
"Last year Feldman launched an indie gogo campaign, seeking $10 million to create an insult to child sexual abuse, and used his film to expose an alleged paedophile gang..."
"Haim was raped and I was attacked personally. Over the years, I have to bear this heavy burden. This is not only the rape of our love life, but also the rape of our collective work and career as two Koris..."
"I believe the title represents the truth I've always promised to say and the truth of what happened," Feldman, 47, told us weekly on Tuesday



Number  1193
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At the moment, she wants more privacy.”
“'She doesn’t want to be photographed.”
“So much pink There was pink in her pool too as three sitting areas were shown Quite the spread There were also tents and long tables as well as a big bar Another look Here is another angle of the bash it appeared early in the day as guests were...”
“According to a People source, the theme of Kylie’s pink baby shower was 'pajama party,' similar to the one Kim threw in 2015.”
“And the reality TV icon did not share her party on social media.”
“...weekend...”
“A child was seen next to a large floral arrangement A big bar There was plenty of space for wine glasses and wine bottles Kylie has yet to admit she is expecting her first child with rapper Travis Scott though she did seem to flash an engagement ring over the...”
“They were in Kylie's back yard making arrangementsIs that little North?”
“The setting: Kylie had on a cream colored silk pajama set as did her mother Kris.”
“Her swimming pool was also filled with pink flowers.”


"At the moment, she wants more privacy."
"She didn't want to be photographed."
"There's too much pink. There's pink in her swimming pool, too, because it shows three rest areas, tents and long tables, and a big bar. Another shape here is another angle of carnival. It appears earlier in the day, just like a guest... "
"According to a person familiar with the matter, the theme of Kelly's pink baby shower is' Pajama Party ', similar to the party hosted by Kim Jong Il in 2015."
"And reality TV idol didn't share her party on social media."
“… Weekend... "
"Someone saw a child next to a big flower arrangement. A big bar has enough room for glasses and bottles. Kelly hasn't admitted that she's looking forward to her first child with rapper Travis Scott, although she seems to be flashing an engagement ring in..."
"They made arrangements in Kelly's backyard, in that little north?"
Background: Kelly is wearing Beige silk pajamas, and so is her mother Chris
"Her swimming pool is full of pink flowers, too."



Number  1194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That was the win,” she said.”
““I set out four years ago to create better roles for women in film and television.”
“Image zoom Credit: Rob Latour/Variety/ShutterstockFor full Emmys coverage, click here.”
“Burrell’s TV daughter Ariel Winter walked the carpet with her boyfriend Levi Meaden, showing off her legs in a stunning dress with a high slit.”
“The Modern Family cast also had a blast ahead of the show as Jesse Tyler Ferguson arrived and immediately ran over to say hi to RuPaul as Ty Burrell walked by and made him laugh.”
“...joined the actor on the carpet, where she complimented Bathe’s dress as she showed off her new ring.”
“Brown’s This Is Us costar Mandy Moore (who’s newly engaged!)”
“Go to People.com/peopletv, or download the app on your favorite streaming device.”
“Image zoom Credit: John Shearer/WireImageWatch the full episode of People & Entertainment Weekly Red Carpet Live, streaming now on PeopleTV.”
“Brown adorably carried his wife’s train as they walked the carpet.”


"That's victory," she said
"I started to create better roles for women in movies and TV four years ago."
"Photo zooming credit: Rob Latour / variety / shutterstock to get the full Emmy story, click here."
"Burrell's TV daughter Ariel winter and her boyfriend Levi meaden are walking on the carpet, showing off their legs in a stunning dress with high slits."
"With the arrival of Jesse Taylor Ferguson, the actors of" modern family "were also very excited before the show started. When ty berrell passed by, he immediately ran to say hello to rupaul, which made rupaul laugh."
“…… Walking on the carpet with the actors, she praises Bath's skirt and shows off her new ring
"Brown's this is Mandy Moore, an American actor
"Go to people's net / people's TV, or download the app on your favorite streaming media device. “
"Image scaling credit: John shearer / wireimagewatch people & Entertainment Weekly live on the red carpet, now on people TV."
"Brown walked lovingly on the carpet with his wife's train on his back."



Number  1195
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The two were spotted on an afternoon shopping trip on Friday.”
““He wants to be sober and healthy.”Along with spending time with his family, Affleck is also still going strong with girlfriend Lindsay Shookus.”
““He has been very on top of his health and responsible,” adds the source.”
“He “is doing well,” a source tells PEOPLE.”
“Image zoom Credit: Alberto E. Rodriguez/WireImageAffleck has been continuing his treatment for alcohol addiction.”
“The Argo star capped off that holiday by taking his daughters to see the hit musical Hamilton.”
“In addition to spending Christmas Day together as a family, the pair were spotted taking a morning stroll together in Los Angeles in December and got together for Thanksgiving as well.”
“Affleck and Garner, both 45, separated in 2015 and filed for divorce this April.”
“She got a lot of gifts.”Despite their split, the stars have remained amicable and continue to co-parent their kids, Violet, 12, Seraphina, 9, and Samuel, 5.”
“Seraphina had friends over for cake.”


"The two were found on a shopping trip on Friday afternoon."
"He wants to stay awake and healthy." In addition to being with his family, Affleck is also with his girlfriend Lindsay schokus
"He has always been very healthy and responsible," the source added
"He did a good job," a source told people
"Image scaling credit: Alberto E. Rodriguez / wireimageaffleck continues to treat alcohol addiction."
"Argo star took his daughters to see the hit musical Hamilton and ended his holiday."
"In addition to the family's Christmas together, they were also found hanging out in Los Angeles in December last year for Thanksgiving together."
"Affleck and Ghana, both 45, separated in 2015 and filed for divorce in April this year."
"She got a lot of presents." Despite their breakup, the stars are still friendly and continue to raise their children together, violet, 12, Serafina, 9 and Samuel, 5
"Serafina invited her friends over for cake."



Number  1196
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There’s also a spa, two swimming pools, a theatre and a bar for when you and your closest millionaire friends need to unwind.”
“The villa, available at a reasonable $16,500 a night, offers eight suites, includes over 30,000 square feet and covers about five acres in an already isolated peninsula.”
“From equipment rentals to lift passes, just partaking in the sport itself can be tough on your bank account.”
“Now we can’t lie to you: skiing, in general, is an expensive hobby to have.”
“...with your mega star rapper husband perfect for every kind of relationship...”
“Vail in particular is a great place to hit the slopes if you re stuck in an awkward co parenting situation with your alcoholic sex addict ex partner or if you re just trying to get away from it all...”
“...there...”
“You really can t pick a better place in the United States to go skiing than Colorado with incredible ski towns like Aspen and Breckenridge the state s glorious expansive mountain range offers a lot to the winter lovers out...”
“After all, when you have a 10 person camera crew following you around 24/7 it’s sort of essential that at least some of your vacations involve physical activity.”
“The Kardashians are no exception to this rule and it’s understandable when you consider that skiing is excellent exercise.”


"There is also a spa, two swimming pools, a theater and a bar for you and your closest millionaire friends to relax."
"The villa is reasonably priced at $16500 a night, has eight suites, covers more than 30000 square feet, and covers about five acres on an isolated peninsula."
"From equipment leasing to weight lifting passes, just taking part in the sport itself can make it difficult for your bank account."
"Now we can't lie to you: Generally speaking, skiing is an expensive hobby."
“… Perfect relationships with your superstar rapper husband... "
"If you're in an embarrassing co parenting situation with an ex partner of an alcoholic or a sex addict, or you just want to get rid of it, will is especially a good place to go uphill..."
“… There... "
"In the United States, you really can't find a better ski resort than Colorado, where there are incredible ski towns like aspen and Brackenrich. The state's magnificent mountains provide a lot of skiing grounds for winter lovers... "
"After all, when you have a 10 person crew following you around 24 / 7, at least some of your holiday activities are essential."
"The kardashians are no exception. It's understandable when you think skiing is a good sport."



Number  1197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We all loved him on Bachelorette.”During his run on The Bachelorette, local news station KAMC caught up with Nance’s mother, who revealed about his experience on the show: “He said it was the best thing that ever happened to him.””
““I was addicted to prescription pain medicine.”
“Michael Nance — who competed on Emily Maynard‘s season 8 of The Bachelorette — has died, PEOPLE has confirmed.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“A representative for the Austin Police Department tells PEOPLE the precinct received a 911 call shortly after 2 p.m. on Monday and arrived at the scene to find Nance, 31, unresponsive.”
“He was rushed to the hospital, where he was pronounced dead.”
“No cause or manner of death has been determined yet, though Nance’s death does not appear to be a result of foul play.”
“An autopsy is being performed Tuesday, with toxicology results expected to take weeks.”
“Nance appeared on the ABC reality series when he was 26 and revealed in his Bachelorette introduction package that he had previously struggled with prescription painkillers abuse.”
““Right now, life is good, but I haven’t put as much focus on my love life because the way I was a couple years ago, no one would have wanted to be around me,” he said.”


"We all like his performance in bachelor." During his performance in bachelor, the local news station kamc interviewed Nancy's mother and revealed her experience in the show: "he said it was the best thing that happened to him."
"I'm addicted to prescription painkillers."
"Michael nance - who took part in Emily Maynard's season 8 bachelor - has passed away and people have confirmed it."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A representative of the Austin police department told people that shortly after 2 p.m. on Monday, the branch received a 911 call and arrived at the scene to find that 31 year old NANs did not respond."
"He was rushed to hospital and declared dead."
"The cause or manner of death has not yet been determined, but it seems that NANs's death was not due to mischief."
"An autopsy was conducted on Tuesday and toxicological results are expected to take weeks."
"NANs appeared on ABC's reality TV series at the age of 26 and revealed in his singles kit that he had previously struggled with the abuse of prescription painkillers."
"Now, life is wonderful, but I don't put too much energy into my love life, because as a few years ago, no one wants to be with me," he said



Number  1198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Deadline first broke the news of Bayer’s exit.”
“She also had a main role in Amy Schumer’s “Trainwreck.”“Saturday Night Live” airs simultaneously on both coasts tonight at 8:30 p.m. EST/8:30 p.m. PST on NBC.”
“Television Association Award and earned an American Comedy Award nod as well...”
“Some of Bayer s most iconic characters and celebrity impressions include Miley Cyrus Rachel from Friends Jacob the bar mitzvah boy on Weekend Update and Rebecca Stern Markowicz co host of J Pop America Fun Time Now During her tenure on SNL Bayer was twice nominated for an Online Film...”
“She is currently the longest-serving female cast member.”
“Bayer had been with the NBC variety show since 2010 where she spent two years as a featured player before being promoted to repertory during Season 38.”
“...both Moynihan and Bayer...”
“It has been a dream come true Bayer also posted an image of a sketch written by Colin Jost saying Thanks for this goodbye sketch at the table Saturday night s SNL hosted by Dwayne The Rock Johnson with Katy Perry as musical guest will mark the final appearances for...”
““Thank you SNL for 7 years of laughs, love and incredible memories,” she posted on Instagram.”
“This casting news comes just two days after Bobby Moynihan shared he was departing after nine seasons on the late-night staple.”


"The deadline started with Bayer's exit."
She also plays a major role in Amy Schumer's train crash. "Saturday night live" was broadcast simultaneously on NBC's two coasts at 8:30 p.m. EST / 8:30 p.m. PST
"TV Association Award, also won the American Comedy Award..."
"Some of Bayer's most representative personages and celebrity impressions include friend Miley Cyrus Rachel of Jacob's update at the weekend and j pop America fun time now, CO hosted by Rebecca stern Markowitz during her tenure at SNL, who won two online movie nominations..."
"She's the longest serving actress so far."
"Bayer has been working on NBC variety shows since 2010, where she worked as a close-up actress for two years before being promoted to play in season 38."
"Moynihan and Bayer are..."
"It's a dream come true. Bayer also released an image of a sketch written by Colin Jost. Thank you for this farewell sketch on the table. SNL on Saturday night is hosted by Dwyane rock Johnson, and Katie Perry will mark her last appearance as a music guest..."
"Thanks for SNL's seven years of laughter, love and incredible memories," she wrote on instagram
"Just two days ago, Bobbie Moynihan revealed that he would leave after nine seasons of late night staple



Number  1199
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for a collaboration with Demi, Luis added: “That’d be pretty badass.””
“Demi, I think she’s great,” he said.”
“When I think about an amazing collaboration it would probably be Rihanna.”
““There’s a lot of females out there.”
“It’s a wrap  A post shared by Luis Fonsi (@luisfonsi) on Oct 21, 2017 at 8:55pm PDTWhile Luis kept mum on who he was collaborating with, the 39-year-old admitted that he would love to work with Demi.”
“He explained, “It’s a secret because we are still working on it literally as we speak.”Finished!”
“USA that he had an “amazing collaboration” in the works, but couldn’t disclose at the time which artist was on the track.”
“USA about having the song of the summerBack in August, Luis — who previously worked with Justin Bieber on his record-breaking song Despacito — revealed to HOLA!”
“...video shoot A post shared by Demi Lovato ddlovato on Oct 21 2017 at 4 26pm PDT MORE Luis Fonsi talks to HOLA”
“The 25 year old shared a photo of herself getting ready to shoot a music video which Luis commented on in Spanish writing What s up Demi The Confident singer later commented on a photo of Luis wrapping a video on set writing Hi Fonsi CLICK FOR FULL GALLERY Music...”


As for the partnership with Demi, Lewis added: "that would be pretty bad."
"Demi, I think she's great," he said
"When I think of an amazing collaboration, it could be Rihanna."
"There are a lot of women out there."
"This is an article published by Luis Fonsi (@ LuisFonsi) at 8:55 p.m. on October 21, 2017. Luis is silent about his partner, and the 39 year old admits that he is willing to work with Demi."
"It's a secret, because we're still studying literally," he explained
He said he had "amazing cooperation" in his work, but could not reveal which artist was working at that time
"There's a song of summer in August that Louis - who worked with Justin Bieber, and his record breaking song despacito - revealed to Hora!"
“… Video capture: Demi Lovato dlovato shared more posts at 4:26 pm on October 21, 2017
"At the age of 25, she shared a picture of herself preparing to shoot a music video. Luis commented on the video in Spanish, wrote what's up Demi's confident singer, and later commented on a picture of Luis packing a video on the set, wrote hi Fonsi, click on the whole library music..."



Number  1200
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““This will help avoid pigmentation on the face.”
“Mr Perry said: “Do regular steams at home, exfoliate a couple of times a week, drink vast amounts of water to keep skin hydrated and wear a sun protection factor at all times.”
“Doctor Ross Perry, skin care expert and owner of skin clinics chain Cosmedics, told Express.co.uk that in order to get Meghan’s constant glowing complexion there are several hacks you can follow.”
“Acne is common during pregnancy but after announcing she is expecting her first child, the former Suits actress’ skin appeared more gorgeous than ever.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“We will use your email address only for sending you newsletters.”


"It helps to avoid facial pigmentation."
"Take a regular steam bath at home, exfoliate a few times a week, drink plenty of water to keep your skin hydrated, and wear sunscreen all the time," Mr. Perry said
Dr. Ross Perry, a skin care specialist and owner of cosmedics, a skin clinic chain, told reporters that in order to keep Megan's skin radiant, you can use the following methods
"Acne is common during pregnancy, but after announcing that she is going to have her first child, the former actress in a suit looks more beautiful than ever."
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"We will only use your email address to send you a press release."



Number  1201
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They dig through the earth and find Maria buried.”
“From the mud on his shoes, Benson and Fin find chips of burnt wood in the mud and trace it back to the empty lot at Felipe's.”
“Benson then instructs Maria not to lie to her, and Maria hangs up.”
“Fin goes to the location and learns it burned down three months prior.”
“When questioned further, Maria says Richard buys her food from "Felipe's Burgers", which is 20 blocks away from the search area.”
“Morales suggests Richard could have spoofed Garcia's phone number, making the task of tracing the call harder.”
“Munch leads a search of the surrounding apartments, but fails to turn up any leads.”
“Fin tracks down Garcia and orders him to take him to his apartment, but finds his daughter Angela safe there.”
“Cragen learns the phone Maria is calling from is registered to a cab driver named Ricardo Garcia, who was arrested for assaulting his wife.”
“The call is put through to Olivia Benson, and Maria tells her the telephone belongs to her father Richard and her mother, Beatrice, is dead.”


"They dug up the soil and found Maria buried."
"From the mud on his shoes, Benson and Finn find charred wood chips in the mud and trace them to the empty space of Felipe's house."
"Then Benson instructed Maria not to lie to her, and Maria hung up."
"Fin went to the place and learned that it was burned down three months ago."
When asked further, Maria said Richard bought food from "Philippe hamburger," which is 20 blocks away from the search area
"Morales thinks that Richard may have forged Garcia's phone number, making it more difficult to track the call."
"Munch was in charge of searching the surrounding apartments, but he didn't find any clues."
Finn finds Garcia and orders him to take him back to his apartment, but finds his daughter Angela safe there
Klegan learned that Maria was calling a taxi driver named Ricardo Garcia, who was arrested for assaulting his wife
"Olivia Benson is on the line. Maria tells her it's her father Richard and her mother Beatrice is dead."



Number  1202
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The family was on the show to promote their upcoming television series, The Lowe Files.”
“The next two answers were tougher for the boys, who had to respond to what Rob's hidden talent was and what makes him laugh.”
“"Maybe the loophole wasn't the way to go," said John.”
“The right answer was "eternal life" and Matthew's response most closely matched his father's, although Rob said he should have gone with John's answer of wishing for more wishes.”
“"If a genie could grant Rob one wish, what would he wish for?"”
“Goodfellas was the unanimous response.”
“"If Rob could only watch one movie for the rest of his life, what would it be?"”
“The first question was pretty easy for the boys, who were meant to guess the correct answer as Rob answered alongside them.”
“"Don't embarrass me," Rob told his two sons as Fallon explained the rules of the game.”
“Rob Lowe and his sons Matthew and John stopped by The Tonight Show on Monday to play the "Best Son Challenge," a parent-son version of "The Newlywed Game."”


The family publicized their upcoming TV series, the Roy files
"The next two answers are more difficult for boys, who have to respond to what Rob's hidden talent is and what makes him laugh."
"Maybe this loophole is not the solution," John said
The correct answer is "eternal life", Matthew's answer is closest to his father's, although rob said he should agree with John's answer and hope to have more wishes
"If a spirit can satisfy a wish of rob, what will he have?"
"Goodfellas is the same answer."
"If rob could only see one movie in his life, what would it be?"
"The first question is very easy for children. When rob answers with them, they have to guess the right answer."
"Don't embarrass me," rob said to his two sons as Fallon explained the rules of the game
Rob law and his sons Matthew and John watched the "best son challenge," a parent-child version of the "Newlywed Game," on Monday's "Tonight Show."



Number  1203
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I can’t believe that bitch said that, I can’t stand her!””
“Praises Donald Trump s Family Values Afterward Giudice s makeup artist Priscilla DiStasio overheard Vergara allegedly say Why d you make me take a picture with that woman Priscilla heard it and Priscilla s freaking out Giudice said...”
“And I was just like I didn t even do anything And I was so mad at myself because I was like Bitch I don t even want to take a picture with you RELATED VIDEO RHONJ s Teresa Giudice...”
““She didn’t want to take a picture,” Giudice said.”
“I don’t care.”Image zoom Credit: Gabriel Olsen/Getty; Tara Ziemba/GettyWhen they did go to take the picture, Vergara, 45, posed in front of Giudice, the RHONJ alumna claimed.”
“” ‘Alright, that’s fine.’ I never ask for a picture because I’m so not like that.”
““We’re in the green room and my publicist from Bravo was like, ‘You’re going to run into Sofia so you’re going to take pictures together,’ ” Giudice said.”
“She went on to say that the two met backstage at an event.”
“You would think that she would be nice — she’s an immigrant!”Giudice, 45, was born in New Jersey to parents who emigrated from Italy.”
“She has an accent, she has more of an accent than me.”


"I can't believe that bitch said that. I can't stand her!"
"After praising Donald Trump's family values, Priscilla distassio, Judith's make-up artist, overheard Fagara say why you wanted me to take a picture with that woman. Priscilla heard that. Priscilla was scared. Judith said..."
"I'm like I didn't do anything. I'm angry with myself because I'm like a whore. I don't even want to take a picture with you."
"She didn't want to take pictures," Judith said
"I don't care." Photo source: Gabriel Olsen / Getty; Tara Ziemba / Getty rhonj alumni claim that when they went to take photos, Vergara, 45, posed in front of Giudice
"Well, that's good." I never ask for photos because I'm not that kind of person
"We were in the green house, and my PR staff from Bravo said, 'you'll meet Sophia, so you'll take pictures together,'" Judith said
"She went on to say that they met backstage at an event."
"You think she's going to be good - she's an immigrant! Judith, 45, was born in New Jersey to parents who immigrated from Italy
"She has an accent, which is stronger than me."



Number  1204
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In addition to the aforementioned “Dynasty,” the other returning series are “Supernatural,” “Crazy Ex-Girlfriend,” “Jane The Virgin,” “Black Lightning,” “The Flash,” “Supergirl,” “DC’s Legends of Tomorrow,” “Arrow,” “Riverdale” and “The 100.””
“The CW has renewed 11 series for the 2018-19 television season.”
“This comes on the heals of the CW’s midseason freshman drama “Life Sentence” getting canceled.”
“However, “Dynasty” was among the 10 series the network renewed back in April.”
““Valor” actually beat the CW’s freshman series “Dynasty” in the ratings (that latter series is averaging 697,000 total viewers and 0.19 in the demo).”
“Its season concluded in late January 2018 with an average of 958,000 total viewers and a rating of 0.21 in the 18-49 demo.”
““Valor” debuted on the CW’s fall 2018 schedule but failed to receive the back-nine pickup.”
“The series came from executive producers Bill Haber, Anna Fricke and Kyle Jarrow, and was a co-production from CBS Television Studios and Warner Bros. Television.”
“The military drama that followed an elite unit of U.S. Army helicopter pilots starred Matt Barr, Christina Ochoa, Charlie Barnett, Corbin Reid, W. Tre Davis, Nigel Thatch and Melissa Roxburgh.”
““Valor” has been canceled by the CW after one season.”


"In addition to the dynasty mentioned above, other return series include supernatural, crazy ex girlfriend, Virgin Mary, black lightning, lightning, super girl, DC's legend of tomorrow, arrow, Riverdale and 100 people."
"CW continued 11 series for the 2018-19 season."
"This happened when CW's midseason drama" life imprisonment "was cancelled."
"However," Dynasty "is one of the 10 series of online sequels in April this year."
Bravery actually beat CW's new series Dynasty in terms of audience rating (the latter's average total audience rating was 697000, 0.19 in the demonstration)
"The season ended in late January 2018 with an average audience of 958000 and a score of 0.21 in 18-49 presentations."
Bravery made its debut on CW's fall 2018 program, but failed to win the last nine ratings
"The series, from executive producers bill Harper, Anna Frick and Kyle Jarrow, is a joint production of CBS television studios and Warner Bros
The U.S. Army's elite helicopter pilots are starring Matt Barr, Christina Ochoa, Charlie Barnett, Corbin Reid, W. Trey Davis, Nigel sage and Melissa Roxburgh
Bravery was cancelled by CW after a season



Number  1205
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She's my wife - everything she says is right.'”
“Ashton explained: 'She called it...so that's it.”
“And one year later, Mila Kunis is back as the mother of two in the film's sequel, Bad Mom's Christmas.”
“The 33-year-old actress was spotted on Wednesday rocking a holiday themed apron on the Atlanta, Georgia set of the movie.”
“It's the first film she's worked on since welcoming son Dimitri five months ago.”
“Beaming: Mila Kunis was spotted on Wednesday rocking a holiday themed apron on the Atlanta, Georgia set of the movie Bad Mom's ChristmasMila beamed while on set.”
“The beauty rocked the colorful Christmas apron over a striped blouse, adding jeans and sneakers.”
“Mila was seen chatting with a co-star in between filming.”
“The mother of two wore her dark brunette locks pulled back with just a touch of makeup on her face.”
“Taking a quick break between scenes: She first stepped into the role of Amy Mitchell in 2016Bad Mom's Christmas is set to hit theaters on November 3, 2017.”


"She's my wife - everything she says is right."
"Ashton explained: 'she called it So that's it. "
"A year later, Mira Kunis played the mother of two in the film sequel" bad mother's Christmas. "
On Wednesday, the 33 year old actress was photographed waving a Holiday Themed apron on the set in Atlanta, Georgia
"This is her first film since she welcomed her son Dimitri five months ago."
"Beaming: Mira Kunis was seen rocking her holiday themed apron in the movie" bad mom's Christmas "in Atlanta, Georgia, on Wednesday
The beautiful woman wore a colorful Christmas Apron over her striped shirt, jeans and sneakers
"Mira was seen chatting with a co star between filming."
"The mother of two has dark hair, pulled back, and only a little makeup on her face."
"Take a break between the two scenes: her first role as Amy Mitchell in 2016," mother's Christmas, "will be released on November 3, 2017



Number  1206
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After that night at Jezebel’s, Offred says, she never sees Moira again.”
“She chose life in Jezebel’s over being sent to the Colonies, where most political prisoners and dangerous people are sent.”
“Aunt Lydia supervised the women, giving speeches extolling Gilead’s beliefs that women should be subservient to men and solely concerned with bearing children.”
“At the center, women were indoctrinated into Gilead’s ideology in preparation for becoming Handmaids.”
“After her capture, Offred’s marriage was voided (because Luke had been divorced), and she was sent to the Rachel and Leah Re-education Center, called the Red Center by its inhabitants.”
“Offred and Luke took their daughter and attempted to flee across the border into Canada, but they were caught and separated from one another, and Offred has seen neither her husband nor her daughter since.”
“They cracked down on women’s rights, forbidding women to hold property or jobs.”
“Using the military, they assassinated the president and members of Congress and launched a coup, claiming that they were taking power temporarily.”
“The architects of Gilead began their rise to power in an age of readily available pornography, prostitution, and violence against women—when pollution and chemical spills led to declining fertility rates.”
“Offred’s best friend, Moira, was fiercely independent.”


Alfred said that after a night at Jezebel's, she would never see Moira again
"She chose to live in Jezebel instead of being sent to a colony where most political prisoners and dangerous people were sent there."
Aunt Lydia supervised women and delivered a speech praising Gilead's belief that women should obey men and only care about childbearing
In the center, women were instilled in Gilead's mind to prepare for becoming maids
After her arrest, Alfred's marriage was annulled (because Luke was divorced), and she was sent to the Rachel and Leah re education center, which local residents call the "red center."
Alfred and Luke tried to escape to Canada with their daughter, but they were caught and separated. Since then, Alfred has never seen her husband and daughter again
They suppress women's rights and prohibit them from owning property or work
They used the army to assassinate the president and members of Congress, launched a coup, claiming they were in power temporarily
Gilead's architects came to power in an era of pornography, prostitution and violence against women, when pollution and chemical spills reduced fertility
"Alfred's best friend Moira is very independent."



Number  1207
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jon Snow be killed again...”
“Her character has always been viewed as a mother figure.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“Now the hit HBO series has overtaken the George R.R.”
“Martin novels that is based upon, fans have gone into overdrive trying to work out how the show will conclude.”
“The Game of Thrones season seven finale saw Jon Snow played by Kit Harington and Daenerys Targaryen Emilai Clarke enjoy a steamy romp after they believed Cersei Lannister Lena Headey had promised to help them defeat the Night King Vladimir...”
“Furdik...”
“However, Cersei has chosen to betray the pair in the hope that they will be killed and she can continue to rule Westeros in peace.”
“Following her betrayal, fans have begun to speculate about how Jon and Daenerys will cope without her help.”
“One in particular has theorised that they will have to make a huge sacrifice in order to safe the country.”


"Jon Snow was killed again..."
"Her character has always been regarded as the image of a mother."
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"Now the hit HBO series has surpassed George R.R."
"Martin's novel is based on it, and fans have gone into a frenzy to try to figure out how the play will end."
"In the finale of game of Thrones Season 7, Jon Snow, played by kit Harrington and Danielle tangorian Emily Clark, enjoys a passionate frolic after believing that Selsey Lannister Lena Heidi promised to help them defeat the night King Vladimir..."
"Freddick..."
"However, cersei chose to betray the two men in the hope that they would be killed and she could continue to rule westrow peacefully."
"After her betrayal, fans began to speculate about how Jon and Denise would respond without her help."
"In particular, it has been suggested that they must make great sacrifices for the sake of national security."



Number  1208
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Star Wars: Episode IX will be released in December 2019.”
“The late Carrie Fisher, who died in 2016, will return through unused footage filmed for 2015’s The Force Awakens.”
“'Star Wars: The Last Jedi' (2017) LucasfilmFor Star Wars IX, Tran rejoins franchise vets like Mark Hamill, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO), and Billy Dee Williams (back as Lando Calrissian), and her fellow new era hitters Daisy Ridley, John Boyega, Adam Driver, Lupita N’yongo, and Oscar Isaac.”
“Luckily, Tran isn’t going anywhere.”
“But they sure wanted to make Star Wars great again.”
“In a statement that’s since been deleted, the group lamented the “forced diversity” of the franchise and sought to “Bring back the Straight White Male Hero,” even though that’s not a thing that can go away.”
“Given that Tran is one of the franchise’s few female characters of color (she is Vietnamese-American), of course things erred on the vile side of things.”
“There isn’t proof, but a Facebook group with the unwieldy name “Down With Disney’s Treatment of Franchises and Its Fanboys” claimed responsibility for the online harassment.”
“Instead of being normal people and doing anything else, these internet trolls opted to berate members of the cast and crew, with Tran receiving the brunt of their efforts.”
“Earlier this summer, Tran deleted her only few social media accounts after a harassment campaign was carried out by a bunch of racist, sexist turd-golems who hated Rian Johnson’s Star Wars: The Last Jedi.”


Star Wars: Episode 9 will be released in December 2019
"The late Carrie Fisher, who died in 2016, will return through unused footage for the 2015" force awakening. "
"Star Wars: the last Jedi (2017) Lucas filmed for Star Wars nine, and tran rejoined professional veterans like Mark Hamill, Anthony Daniels (C-3PO) and Billy Di Williams (formerly rando Calrissian), as well as her new era thugs Daisy Ridley, John boyga, Adam deliff and Lupi TA nyongo and Oscar Isaac. "
"Fortunately, tran is not going anywhere."
"But they do want to make Star Wars great again."
"In a statement that was later deleted, the group regretted the 'forced diversification' of franchises and sought to 'bring back white male heroes', although it is not something that can disappear."
"Given that tran is one of the few women of color characters in the series (she's Vietnamese American), of course things go wrong on the evil side."
"Although there is no evidence, a Facebook group called" down with Disney's attitude towards franchises and its fans "claimed responsibility for the cyber harassment incident."
"Instead of becoming ordinary people or doing anything else, these Internet trolls chose to reprimand the crew members and the crew members, and tran was the first to bear the brunt."
Earlier this summer, tran deleted her few social media accounts because of harassment by a group of racists, sexists and trash puppets who hated Ryan Johnson's Star Wars: the last Jedi



Number  1209
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“I love him, we love each other, but there are days that have been difficult.”And just when you thought the difficult relationship talk was over, cue Nick’s chiming in about their “struggles.” “There are days that have been difficult."”
“While the couple seemed picture perfect, for Bachelor Nation it was the break up we all saw coming.”
“Here’s why: Distance Absence may make the heart grow fonder, but not when you barely know the person!”
“Vanessa’s from Canada and Nick lives in Los Angeles and from the start of their relationship (they knew each other for only six weeks before getting engaged) Vanessa seemed pretty apprehensive about leaving her family to start a life with Nick in L.A.”
“While she did make the move, leaving her job as a special education teacher, Vanessa was back-and-forth between Montreal and the L.A. which no doubt affected their relationship.”
“Article continues below advertisementTheir After The Final Rose Appearance Who could forget the couple’s most cringe worthy TV moment?”
“Immediately following the airing of their proposal Nick and Vanessa had one of the most awkward post-engagement moments EVER.”
“While they should have been in engagement bliss, Nick Viall and Vanessa Grimaldi did more talking about their relationship problems than they did about how in love they were.”
““I’m not going to sugarcoat things" — please sugarcoat, please — "some days are tougher than others, like any relationship,” Vanessa admitted.”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"I love him, we love each other, but some days are hard." At the end of what you think is a difficult relationship conversation, hint that Nick is cutting in on their "struggle.". "Some days are tough."
"Although this couple looks perfect, for the bachelor country, we are all seeing the breakup coming."
"The reason is as follows: the distance may make people closer, but not when you hardly know that person!"
"Vanessa is from Canada and Nick lives in Los Angeles. From the beginning of their relationship (they only knew each other for six weeks before their engagement), Vanessa seems very worried about leaving her family and starting a life in Los Angeles with Nick."
"Although Vanessa left her job as a special education teacher, she did travel back and forth between Montreal and Los Angeles, which undoubtedly affected their relationship."
The article goes on to say in the following advertisement, "after the last appearance of the rose, who can forget the most worthwhile TV moment for the couple?"
"Nick and Vanessa went through the most embarrassing moment of their engagement right after their proposal was broadcast."
"Although Nick Villar and Vanessa Grimaldi should have enjoyed their engagement, they talked more about love than they did about love."
"I'm not going to whitewash anything - please whitewash, please - some days are harder than others, just like any relationship," Vanessa admits



Number  1210
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He also missed his own charity ball in June last year when he was struck down by flu.”
“He was ill this summer, when he was forced to pull out of X Factor's London auditions.”
“Cowell had been at a Little Mix concert and had woken up at 6.45am, according to reports.”
“He gave a quick thumbs up before walking through the door of his gated house, where a white Toyota sports car and white Audi were also parked on the drive.”
“The star was wearing grey jogging bottoms, a dark sweater and appeared to have a hospital tag around his left wrist.”
“I feel better now."”
“"I've got a bit of concussion.”
“The X Factor judge added: ""I fainted and fell down the stairs.”
“"I will be back but I don't know about tomorrow," he said.”
“Giving a thumbs-up on his doorstep, he cast doubt about whether or not he would appear on The X Factor this weekend, the first live show of the series.”


"Last June, he was knocked down by the flu and missed his charity ball."
"He was ill this summer when he was forced out of the X factor audition in London."
"It's reported that Cowell attended a small mix concert and woke up at 6:45 in the morning."
"He quickly thumbs up and goes through the door of his house with a gate, and there's a white Toyota sports car and a white Audi in the driveway."
"The star is wearing grey jogging pants, a dark sweater and seems to have a hospital label on his left wrist."
"I feel much better now."
"I have a concussion."
"X factor," the judge added, "I fainted and fell down the stairs."
"I'll be back, but I don't know about tomorrow," he said
"Thumbing up at home, he doubted whether he would be on X factor this weekend, the first live show in the series."



Number  1211
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Grey’s recently aired its 300th episode, planting it firmly in Gunsmoke, ER, and Law & Order territory when it comes to mainstream longevity in TV.”
“(Rhimes will continue to serve as a producer on Grey’s and her other ABC shows for as long as they continue to run, although it’s worth noting that Krista Vernnoff is the series’ actual showrunner.)”
“Hence, presumably, why the network continues to renew the series, even after creator Rhimes announced last year that she was jumping ship to start developing shows for Netflix.”
“Still starring Ellen Pompeo as Meredith Grey, a woman who has seen some serious shit by this point, the show remains one of ABC’s highest-rated offerings despite its advancing years.”
“Variety reports that ABC has just renewed its functionally unkillable medical drama Grey’s Anatomy for a landmark 15th season, officially making the show the network’s longest-running primetime drama series ever.”
“Photo : Byron Cohen ( ABC )While Scandals may blow over, co-stars may die, and even living content well Shonda Rhimes might depart for richer, more digital pastures, the core crew at Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital continues to soldier on.”


"Gray recently aired its 300th episode, and when it comes to mainstream longevity on TV, it's firmly rooted in smoke of gunpowder, emergency room and law and order."
(Rhimes will continue to be producer of Grey's and her other ABC shows as long as they continue to air, but it's worth noting that Krista vernnoff is the real host of the series.)
As a result, it is speculated that even if the creator Rhimes announced last year that she would switch to Netflix to develop the show, the TV network will continue to broadcast the show
The show still stars Ellen Pompeo, and Meredith grey is a woman who has seen some serious scandals so far. Although the show has been on air for many years, it is still one of ABC's most watched shows
ABC has just continued its nonfunctional medical drama "Grey's Anatomy" for season 15, making it the longest running prime time TV series in ABC's history, variety reported
"Photo: Although the scandal of Byron Cohen (ABC) may subside, the co star may die, and even the good life content of seanda Reims may go to richer and more digital pastures, the core staff of gray Sloan Memorial Hospital continue to fight."



Number  1212
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Can you relate to Eva’s mom guilt?”
“They are both angels, they are just different kinds of angels," she laughed.”
“"They are pretty opposite.”
“...but still alike...”
“Eva may be going through her own inner struggle but her daughters couldn t be the wiser as the actress confessed that her 3 year old is kind of oblivious that she does anything besides be her mom The clothing designer also dished on how her daughters are very different...”
““It's like, 'Ugh, this is gonna be there forever now.'"”
“"I'm all for obviously taking care of myself—that's how I can take care of them of course—but that guilt that is just kind of always there,” she said.”
“However, she said that doesn’t take away her guilt.”
“...necessary...”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Can you understand EVA's mother's guilt?"
"They're all angels, they're just different types of angels," she laughs
"They are just the opposite."
“… But it's still the same... "
"EVA may be experiencing her own inner struggle, but her daughters are becoming more and more intelligent because the actress admits that her 3-year-old daughter does nothing but be a mother. The fashion designer also talked about how different her daughters are... "
"It's like," ah, it's going to last forever. "
"I'm all for taking care of myself, of course, that's the way I can take care of them, but there's always that guilt," she said
"However, she said it didn't eliminate her guilt."
“… Necessary... "



Number  1213
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Transparent Judith Light Transparent Anna Chlumsky Veep Outstanding Supporting Actor in a Drama Series...”
“Judy Davis Feud Laura Dern Big Little Lies Jackie Hoffman Feud Regina King American Crime Michelle Pfeiffer The Wizard of Lies Shailene Woodley Big Little Lies Outstanding Supporting Actress in a Comedy Series Vanessa Bayer Saturday Night Live Leslie Jones Saturday Night Live Kate McKinnon Saturday Night Live Kathryn Hahn...”
“In total, online platforms like Netflix, Amazon, and Hulu racked up more than 120 Emmy nominations this year, with Netflix’s Stranger Things coming in as one of the most-nominated shows of the year.”
“(It earned 18 different Emmy nominations, second only to Saturday Night Live and HBO’s Westworld, each of which tied at 22 nominations.)”
“But as it turned out, it was actually a very quiet night for both Stranger Things and Westworld, with each show getting shut out over the course of the ceremony.”
“Netflix still had a decent showing, with The Crown and Master of None picking up some awards, but the real winner was The Handmaid’s Tale.”
“Hulu’s series won a number of big awards, including Outstanding Drama Series.”
“The other big winner was HBO’s Big Little Lies, which ended up winning five awards in total over the course of the evening, including Outstanding Limited Series.”
“We’ve got the complete list of tonight’s winners (and losers) below.”
“Rather than wade through hours of speeches and sketches, you can find out who won right here.”


"Transparent Judith, transparent Anna kronsky WIP is an outstanding supporting role in a drama series..."
"Judy Davis doesn't lie to Laura Dean big lie Jackie Hoffman doesn't lie to King Regina American crime Michelle Pfeiffer lies wizard Shereen Woodley big lie little lie comedy series outstanding supporting actress Vanessa Bayer live on Saturday night Leslie Jones live on Saturday night Kate McKinnon live on Saturday night Katherine Hahn..."
"Online platforms like Netflix, Amazon and Hulu have received more than 120 Emmy nominations this year, and Netflix's strange things is one of the most nominated shows this year."
(the film received 18 different Emmy nominations, behind only "Saturday night live" and HBO's "west world" with 22 nominations each.)
"But it turned out to be a very quiet night for strangers and the western world, and every show was turned away during the ceremony."
"Netflix still has a decent performance, crown and anonymous have won some awards, but the real winner is the maid's story."
"Hulu's series won many awards, including excellent drama series."
"Another big winner was HBO's big and small lies, which won a total of five awards that night, including the outstanding limited edition series."
"We have a full list of the winners (and losers) tonight below."
"Instead of trudging through hours of speeches and sketches, it's better to find out who won here."



Number  1214
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To find out more about Universal Orlando Resort, check the website.”
“Two more The Wizarding World of Harry Potter lands have since opened in Universal Studios Japan and Universal Studios Hollywood.”
“The Wizarding World of Harry Potter opened at Universal Studios back in 2010, with fully-immersive locations recreated from the Harry Potter series.”
“Intriguing.”
“The ride will also feature wizarding world characters and creatures, and ‘a few surprises along the way’.”
“The Dragon Challenge’s successor is being described as a ‘new generation of thrill ride’ and will feature ‘a new level of storytelling’ during the experience.”
“The rollercoaster’s final day of operation will be 4 September this year, so ride it while you can.”
“The ride will replace Hogsmeade’s Dragon Challenge, a double-rollercoaster experience.”
“A new attraction will be added to the Hogsmeade section of The Wizarding World of Harry Potter, and is set to be one of the ‘most highly-themed coaster experiences’ the theme park destination has ever introduced.”
“The Wizarding World of Harry Potter at Universal Orlando Resort will have a brand-new addition in 2019.”


"To learn more about Universal Orlando Resort, please visit the website."
"Since then, two world of Harry and Potter have been opened in Universal Studios and Universal Studio Hollywood."
"Harry Porter's magic world opened in 2010 at Universal Studios, completely immersed in the scenes of Harry Porter series."
"Intriguing."
"There will also be characters and creatures from the wizarding world, as well as" some surprises along the way. "
"The successor of the Dragon challenge is described as" a new generation of thrilling riding ", and will feature" a new realm of storytelling "during the experience."
"September 4 this year will be the last operation day of the roller coaster, so you can take it."
"This ride will replace Hogsmeade's Dragon challenge, a double roller coaster experience."
"There will be a new attraction in Hogsmeade District of Harry Potter magic world, which will be one of the most themed roller coaster experiences ever launched by the theme park."
"In 2019, there will be a new addition to Harry Potter at Universal Orlando Resort."



Number  1215
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I won’t do anything terrible.””
“But if he doesn’t … I’ll just slap him around.”
“He’s going to go to jail and die in jail.”
“The law will get him.”
“This pig will get his comeuppance.”
““A courageous and wonderful human being and doesn’t deserve to have been treated that way by this pig.”
“He’d be in a wheelchair.”“My daughter is a wonderful person,” Paul said.”
“...blacklisting allegations against Weinstein when the public did noting If I had known it he would not be walking...”
“Directors Terry Zwigoff and Peter Jackson corroborated Mira s claims alleging that Weinstein s interference cost Mira roles in Bad Santa and Lord of the Rings Paul claims he only learned about the seemingly endless sexual harassment and assault and...”
“...refused his sexual advances...”


"I won't do anything terrible."
"But if he doesn't I'll give him a slap. "
"He's going to jail. He's going to die in jail."
"The law will catch him."
"This pig will be rewarded."
"A brave and beautiful man should not be treated like that by this pig."
"He'll be in a wheelchair." "My daughter is a wonderful person," Paul said
“…… When the public noticed that if I knew he couldn't walk, the blacklist charges against Weinstein... "
"Director Terry zweigoff and Peter Jackson confirmed Mira's claim that Weinstein's intervention cost Mira's role in" Bad Santa Claus ", while Paul claimed that he only knew about seemingly endless sexual harassment and abuse, and..."
“… Refuse his sex... "



Number  1216
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, it becomes clear that he prefers talking to Kara.”
“Instead, she calms herself and calls Kenny over to sit with her after Alex rudely brushes him off.”
“This leads to a fight, and the sisters go to bed angry.”
“Kara tries to get her to talk about her feelings, and Alex calls Kara on her hypocrisy, saying that she’s asking Alex to talk now when she herself spent six months being closed off whenever Alex tried to help her.”
“Upstairs, Alex is drinking something much stronger than coffee in their childhood bedroom when Kara joins her.”
“Kara insists she’s fine.”
“Eliza urges Kara to remember to let herself heal, too.”
“Eliza thinks that Kara constantly punishes herself for daring to have feelings and be weak sometimes, but Kara says that she’s “accepting the fact that I’m human,” and that she has to “walk away from certain…vulnerabilities,” meaning romantic relationships, among other things.”
“Then Eliza turns to Kara and her miserable year that has most recently taken Mon-El away from her.”
“Kara says that she brought Alex here hoping to help her feel better, and Eliza agrees it might be good for her, saying that Alex needs to “lean into” her pain, rather than pretend it doesn’t exist.”


"But obviously he prefers to talk to Carla."
"Instead, she calms down and after Alex rudely refuses Kenny, she asks Kenny to come with her."
"It led to a fight and the sisters went to bed angrily."
"Carla tried to get her to talk about her feelings. Alex called Carla and said she was hypocritical. She asked Alex to talk now, and every time Alex tried to help her, she was imprisoned for six months."
"Upstairs, when Carla and Alex were together, Alex was drinking something much stronger than coffee in their childhood bedroom."
"Carla insisted she was fine."
"Eliza urges Carla to remember to heal herself as well."
"Eliza thinks that Kara often punishes herself because she dares to have feelings, sometimes even becomes weak, but Kara says that she" accepts the fact that I am human ", and that she must" stay away from some Weakness, "which means romantic relationships and so on."
"Then Eliza turned to Carla and her tragic year, which recently took away Monel from her."
Carla said she brought Alex here to make her feel better, and Eliza thought it was good for her. She said Alex needed to be "considerate" of her pain, rather than pretending it didn't exist



Number  1217
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related: Mary-Kate Olsen and Olivier Sarkozy 'Seem So Happy' in Their Marriage According to Carla Bruni...”
“Although she didn't walk the runway, according to The Sun, she later joined Hadid, Campbell, Bruni, and others backstage before moving to the star-studded gala dinner.”
“Current A-list model Bella Hadid and original '90s supermodel Carla Bruni bare a striking resemblance to one another, and even they agree.”
“Indeed, he two models were finally spotted together and posed for an illustrative side-by-side snapshot.”
“The fateful meeting took place at the Cannes Film Festival.”
“So any conspiracy theories that the two are the same person or there's some sort of time travel involved can end, but where conspiracy theory ends, another begins.”
“Uploading the photo to Instagram on Monday, Bruni decided to start a rumor of her own.”
“"Do I have a hidden daughter?”
“@bellahadid," the former first lady of France wrote in the caption.”
“The whole thing was orchestrated by none other than Naomi Campbell, who invited the two to her charity gala dinner on Sunday night.”


"Related report: according to Carla Bruni, the marriage of Mary Kate Olsen and Olivier Sarkozy" looks very happy "..."
"Although she didn't go on stage, according to the sun, she later joined Hardid, Campbell, Bruni and others backstage, and then moved to the star gathering celebration banquet."
"Today's A-class model Bella Hadid has amazing similarities with the super model Carla Bruni of the 1990s, and they even agree."
"In fact, he finally found two models together and posed in a side-by-side illustrative pose."
"The fateful meeting took place at the Cannes Film Festival."
"So any conspiracy theory that two people are the same person or that involves some kind of time travel can end, but where the conspiracy theory ends, another begins."
"Bruni uploaded the photos to instagram on Monday, and she decided to refute the rumors herself."
"Do I have a hidden daughter?"
"Bella Hadid," the former French First Lady wrote in the title
"Naomi Campbell planned the whole thing. She invited them to a charity dinner on Sunday night."



Number  1218
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the pals in action, below.”
“Eileen joined RHOBH in Season 5, giving fans an inside look at her glam life as a soap star, as well as her marriage to actor Vincent Van Patten.”
“Thanks for your love and support guys!!!"”
“But you never know, I might be popping in from time to time just to see what the ladies are up to!”
“Lives it s best for me and my family if I step away from being a Housewife for now...”
“Eileen confirmed her RHOBH exit in July in a statement to The Daily Dish After a lot of careful thought I ve decided because of my crazy schedules at The Young and The Restless as well as Days of Our...”
“"She's lovely."”
“"Eileen is one of the most understanding, kind, and giving human beings I've ever met -- and what you see on TV is what you get," she said about her pal and sometimes The Young And The Restless co-star.”
“Well, lucky for you, Erika explained all.”
“So what is it that makes Eileen such a great BFF?”


"Look at the comrades below."
"Irene joined RHOBH in the fifth season, giving fans a glimpse of her brilliant life as a soap opera star and her marriage to actor Vincent van patten."
"Thank you for your love and support!"
"But you'll never know, I might come and see what the ladies are doing from time to time!"
"If I stop being a housewife now, it will be the best for me and my family..."
"Irene confirmed her departure from RHOBH in a statement in July. Before that, I thought a lot about it, because of my crazy schedule when I was young and the days when we were upset..."
"She's lovely."
"Irene is one of the most understanding, kind and dedicated people I've ever met - what you see on TV is what you get," she said of her friends and sometimes of her young and restless partner
"Well, you're lucky," Erica explained
"So what makes Irene such a wonderful boyfriend?"



Number  1219
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“—With files from the Associated Press...”
“The allegations made in the documentary Whitney, which was made with the cooperation of Houston’s family, immediately cast a new light on Houston’s troubled life.”
“The documentary, directed by Kevin Macdonald, suggests that Houston was allegedly sexually abused as a child by Dee Dee Warwick, Houston’s cousin and the sister of soul singer Dionne Warwick.”
“The news comes near the end of the film, when Houston’s former longtime assistant, Mary Jones, alleges that Houston told her that she was molested as a young child by her cousin Dee Dee, the niece of Houston’s mother Cissy Houston.”
“READ MORE: Lorde apologizes for posting ‘poorly chosen’ Whitney Houston quote on InstagramJones mentions that Houston’s alleged molestation had a lasting effect on her life and contributed to her late-life drug problems.”
“Story continues below advertisement“It made her question her sexual preference,” she says in Whitney.”
“Jones also says that Houston never told her mother because I think she was ashamed Jones continues If Cissy had known she would have done something about it because Cissy loves her children READ MORE Lars von Trier serial killer movie causes mass walkout at Cannes Houston s half brother...”
“Gary Garland Houston also says he was molested between the ages of seven and nine by a female family member and says his sister was abused too...”
“Dee Dee Warwick, who was 18 years older than Houston, died in 2008.”
“She was twice nominated for a Grammy Award and sang backup for Wilson Pickett, Aretha Franklin and others.”


"- file from the Associated Press..."
"The accusations made in the documentary Whitney, which was shot with the cooperation of the Houston family, immediately cast a new dawn on the difficult life of Houston."
"This documentary, directed by Kevin McDonald, shows that Houston was sexually abused as a child by Dee Dee Warwick, Houston's cousin and soul singer Dean Warwick's sister."
"The news came at the end of the film when Mary Jones, a former longtime assistant in Houston, claimed that Houston told her that she had been harassed as a child by her cousin Dee Dee, the niece of Houston's mother, Cissy Houston."
"Read more: the house of Lords apologized for Whitney Houston's comments on instagram Jones, saying that Houston's alleged sexual harassment had a lasting impact on her life and led to the drug problem in her later years."
"It made her question her sexuality," she said in Whitney magazine
"Jones also said that Houston never told her mother because I think she was ashamed Jones continued if sissy knew what she would do, because sissy loved her children and read more Lars von Trier serial killer movies that led to a mass strike in Cannes, Houston's half brothers..."
"Gary garland Houston also said that he was molested by a female family member between the ages of seven and nine, and that his sister was also abused..."
"Diddy Warwick, 18 years older than Houston, died in 2008."
She has been nominated for two Grammy Awards, and has performed substitutes for Wilson Pickett, Aretha Franklin and others



Number  1220
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s time to go see her, Tess,” Randall says.”
“That’s my brother.”Tess hasn’t seen “her” in awhileBack on the Season 2 finale, we got our first glimpse of an older Randall and an older Tess.”
“Sterling K. Brown: We’ve all [in the cast] known that it’s Rebecca, though the audience didn’t know, and we know why it’s Rebecca and you guys will find out at the end of the season what it is.”
“How soon are we going to find out why everyone is gathering to see her?”
“TheWrap: How did you feel about the reveal Rebecca is the mysterious future “her” we’ve all been wondering about?”
“So since we didn’t get anymore new hints on screen, TheWrap was able to gather a few clues for you while speaking with Brown about Randall winning the Philadelphia City Council race and how those election results might impact the Pearsons in the present and the future.”
“Also Read: 'This Is Us' Season 3: 'ER' Alum Goran Visnjic Cast as Beth's Teacher on Backstory Episode“This Is Us” returned from hiatus tonight with an episode that jumped between the past and present — but didn’t head into the future again.”
“Does that mean they separate or even divorce?”
“That spat led to Randall sleeping on the couch, and a not so happy vibe between the happy couple in the present, with some hints in the future indicating the two are only communicating between Adult Tess.”
“The episode also ended with a fight between our Present Day Beth and Randall, because Randall refused to drop out of the city council race, when the polls show he won’t win and his wife asks him to give up and come back to helping his family.”


"It's time to see her, Tess," Randall said
"That's my brother." Tess didn't see "she" in the last episode of season 2 for a long time. We saw old Randall and old Tess for the first time
"Stirling K. Brown: we all know it's Rebecca, although the audience doesn't know, we know why it's Rebecca, and you'll know what it is at the end of the season."
"How long will it take us to figure out why everyone got together to see her?"
"The wrap": how do you feel about the revelation of "Rebecca" in "Rebecca is the mysterious future we've always wanted to know"
"So, since we don't get any new cues on the screen anymore, the wrap gathered some clues for you when talking with brown about Randall's winning the city council election in Philadelphia and the impact of these election results on the present and future of the Pearsons."
"Also read: 'this is our' third season: 'er' Alan Golan Visnjic plays Beth's teacher backstage episode 'this is our' return to rest tonight and jump between the past and the present with an episode - but not towards the future."
"Does that mean they are separated or even divorced?"
"The quarrel caused Randall to sleep on the sofa. The atmosphere between the happy couple is not very pleasant now. Some hints in the future indicate that they are only communicating with adult Tess."
"This episode also ended with the fight between Beth and Randall today, because Randall refused to withdraw from the city council election. At that time, the polls showed that he would not win, and his wife asked him to give up and come back to help his family."



Number  1221
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“What are we even doing with our lives?”
“Oh, and she's only 13 years old.”
“...https://t.co/2og0OPLqbg â€” Kp (@KierstenPollard) February 6, 2018I love this friendship sfsjsjsh pic.twitter.com/iUkRQV3QtR â€” Shanay ðŸ’« (@KylosBraids) February 6, 2018Yep: Millie Bobby Brown is part of a massively successful, Golden Globe-nominated TV show and she's friends with the Kardashians.”
“...this is so cute ðŸ’•ðŸ’• â€” Ù‹ (@proudmillieb) February 6, 2018Imagine being less than 18 with this kind of relationship with Kim Kardashian; Jesus, what am I doing wrong????????”
“My Valentines Day came earlyðŸ’• pic.twitter.com/y41Ug87zvy â€” Millie Bobby Brown (@milliebbrown) February 6, 2018Twitter found the whole thing almost too adorable for words.”
“Youâ€™re the best.”
“Thank you @KimKardashian for my amazing gifts!”
“And judging by their latest Twitter exchange, it's just as healthy as ever.”
“Kris and Kim were quick to respond on Twitter, and a glorious new friendship was born.”
“It started properly last November, when Brown confessed her love of Keeping Up with the Kardashians on The Tonight Show with Jimmy Fallon.”


"What are we doing in our lives?"
"Oh, she's only 13."
“... https://t.co/2og0OPLqbg ——KP (@ kierstenpollard) February 6, 2018 I love this friendship pic.twitter.com/iUkRQV3QtR “ShanayðŸ«（@KylosBraids）2018 Yep:Millie Bobby  Brown is part of a very successful Golden Globe nomination TV show, and she's a friend of the Kardashian family
“… It's so cute ···························································································································································
"My Valentine's day comes early" pic.twitter.com/y41Ug87zvy – Millie Bobby Brown (@ milliebbrown) on February 6, 2018, twitter found that the whole thing was too cute to express in words
"And you?" ™ "You are the best."
"Thank you @ Kim Kardashian for the gift!"
"From their latest twitter conversation, it's as healthy as ever."
"Chris and Kim responded quickly on twitter, and a glorious new friendship was born."
"Last November, Brown told Jimmy Fallon about her love for the kardashians on the tonight show, and it all started right."



Number  1222
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Katy Perry Hosting 2017 MTV Video Music AwardsMiley Cyrus, The Weeknd, Kendrick Lamar to Perform at 2017 MTV VMAs...”
““Let’s hope I don’t f–k it up.”Earlier this week, Miley Cyrus released the music video for her latest single, “Younger Now,” with the younger Cyrus expected to drop a full LP later this year.”
““I’ve loved Katy since I was a little girl, and I can’t thank her enough for giving me this incredible opportunity,” the teen said.”
“Cyrus, who released her debut single “Make Me (Cry)” earlier this year and garnered an MTV VMA nod for “Best New Artist,” gushed about the opportunity to perform ahead of the “Roar” singer for 21 dates on her tour.”
“The schedule was pushed back “due to unavoidable production delays,” Perry revealed Thursday via social media.”
“The 17-year-old will join Carly Rae Jepsen and Purity Ring as the opening acts for Katy Perry on the North American leg of her Witness tour, which kicks off in Montreal Sept. 19.”
“Noah Cyrus may not be as famous as her older sister, Miley, but the next few months could be a gamechanger for the budding singer.”


"Katie Perry hosts MTV music video Grand Prix 2017, smiley Cyrus, the weeknd, Kendrick Lamar will perform at MTV Vmas 2017..."
Earlier this week, Miley Cyrus released a music video of her latest single, younger now, and is expected to release a full record later this year
"I've loved Katie since I was a child, and I'm very grateful that she gave me this incredible opportunity," the child said
Cyrus, who released her debut single "make me cry" earlier this year and was nominated as "best new artist" by MTV VMA, gushes that she has a chance to perform 21 days before the "roar" singer's tour
"Due to inevitable production delays, the schedule has been delayed," Perry said on social media on Thursday
"The 17-year-old girl will join Carly ray Jepson and" the ring of purity "as the opening remarks of Katie Perry's Witness tour to North America, which will begin in Montreal on September 19."
"Noah Cyrus may not be as famous as her sister Miley, but in the next few months he may become a game changer for this budding singer."



Number  1223
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My father is a champion for all Americans — women, of course....”
““Politics is politics, as I’m learning,” Ivanka Trump said, shrugging off the reaction to her comments at the panel.”
“Ivanka Trump, who was deeply involved with her father’s campaign and has been instrumental in his administration in the first three months in office, positioned herself as someone who is still in humbling listening-tour mode.”
“But there was a deep curiosity in Europe, ahead of her visit here, about the first daughter's new role in her father's administration.”
“This is very early for me; I’m listening, learning.”The questions asked of Trump seemed more direct than those about women in the workforce posed to other panelists.”
“That is my goal.”
“...enacting incremental positive change...”
“It has been a little under 100 days and it has just been a remarkable and incredible journey She did not define what her new role as a senior White House official entailed but said she cares very much about empowering women in the workplace and defined her goal as...”
“...”
““I’m rather unfamiliar with this role as well.”


"My father is the champion of all Americans - a woman, of course..."
"Politics is politics, and I'm learning that," said Ivanka trump She shrugged off her comments at the group meeting
"Ivanka trump was deeply involved in her father's campaign. In her first three months in office, she played an important role in her administration and positioned herself as a person still in the humble listening mode."
"But before she visited Europe, there was a strong curiosity in Europe about the new role of her first daughter in her father's government."
"It's too early for me; I'm listening and learning." The question to trump seems to be more direct than the question to other panel members about women in the labor force. "
"That's my goal."
“… Implementing progressive positive change... "
"It's been less than 100 days. It's been an extraordinary and incredible journey. She doesn't define what her new role as a senior White House official means, but she says she's very concerned about empowering women in the workplace and defines her goal as..."
“...”
"I'm quite new to the character, too."



Number  1224
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It starts snowing on my head sometimes.”
“And while it looks great for the character, it’s become a poor life choice, because my hair, when it’s dyed, it starts coming out in droves.”
“Per Mr. T, Rob Thomas’s instructions, I was told to chew as much scenery as possible, brains included.”
“AdvertisementAt WonderCon, you talked about how it was a role that really had you chewing the scenery.”
“It’s such a fun thing to play with.”
“I feel like we strike a good balance between the drama and the gore and the comedy.”
“But yeah, overall, it was the funny.”
“And that pilot script was a real page turner, and I was laughing the whole way, and there were some cringe-worthy moments.”
“And for most of my career, I hadn’t been allowed to do humor.”
“And of course I knew of [series co-creator] Rob Thomas from his years of “Veronica Mars’ and “Party Down,” and I know he’s very adept at humor.”


"Sometimes it starts to snow on my head."
"Although it looks like it's a good fit for the character, it's a bad life choice, because after I dyed my hair, it began to grow in groups."
"According to Mr. T, Rob Thomas, I was told to chew the landscape as much as possible, including the brain."
"In Wondercon's ad, you talked about how this character is a feast for your eyes."
"It's fun to play."
"I think we have a good balance between drama, blood and comedy."
"But on the whole, it's interesting."
"That pilot script turned the page. I laughed all the way and had some moments to flinch from."
"For most of my career, I was not allowed to be humorous."
"Of course, I know Rob Thomas from years of Veronica Mars and the end of the party. I know he's very good at humor."



Number  1225
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more:Chrissy Teigen gets real about how celebrities really lose the baby weightWhile everyone was mom-shaming Chrissy Teigen, they forgot about John Legend...”
“And TBH we’re super excited about it already.”
“Whatever route Chrissy decides to take, we’re sure it will be right for her and her family.”
““I love John and Luna more than I can imagine loving anything, and John and I still hope to give Luna a few siblings…Postpartum hasn’t changed that,” Chrissy wrote in the Glamour essay.”
“Her essay for Glamour back in March opened up a lot of conversation around these important topics.”
“For her, it’s all about encouraging women to seek support and not let postpartum depression bring them down.”
“So far, Chrissy’s been pretty real about her pregnancy and postpartum depression experiences.”
“It couldn’t be any worse than it was—could it?” she said in the Marie Claire interview.”
“Maybe I should be scared [of having postpartum depression again], but I don’t know.”
“But I loved being pregnant.”


"Read more: Chris tegan when everyone humiliates Chris tegan, they forget the legend of John..."
"We're already very excited."
"No matter which way Chris decides to go, we believe it's right for her and her family."
Chris wrote in the charm essay: "I love John and Luna more than I can imagine. John and I still hope to give Luna some brothers and sisters Postpartum doesn't change that
"The article she wrote for glamour in March focused a lot on these important topics."
"For her, it's about encouraging women to seek support and not letting postpartum depression disappoint them."
"So far, Chris's experience of pregnancy and postpartum depression is quite real."
"No worse than now? "She said in an interview with Mary Claire."
"Maybe I should be afraid (of postpartum depression again), but I don't know."
"But I like to be pregnant."



Number  1226
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“North, who is also in the Big Apple with her parents, spent time with mom making custom ice cream before the listening party.”
“For all of those albums, the rapper threw elaborate listening parties which, like Nas’, were streamed online.”
“He’s one of the producers of Nas’ album and appears on one of its tracks — as do The-Dream and 070 Shake.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Kardashian West wore a sleeveless, black, Lycra one-piece short look to the event with thigh-high grey boots and a cross-strap bag.”
“The mother of three’s hair was pulled up in a half ponytail.”
“West, meanwhile, rocked a neon yellow shirt and a grey hoodie, which he paired with green pants, white socks and white sneakers.”
“Image zoom Kim Kardashian West and Kanye West | Credit: Johnny Nunez/WireImageImage zoom Kim Kardashian West and Kanye West | Credit: Robert Kamau/GC ImagesImage zoom Kim Kardashian West | Credit: James Devaney/GC ImagesJoining Kardashian West at the even were pals La La Anthony and Jonathan Cheban.”
“Other stars in attendance included 2 Chainz, Chris Rock, Fab, AZ and Havoc.”
“This is the fourth West-produced album that’s dropped over the past few weeks — the others being Pusha-T’s Daytona and West’s own albums, ye and Kids See Ghosts (a collaborative LP with Kid Cudi).”


"North is also at big apple with her parents. Before the concert, she and her mother make custom ice cream together."
"For all of these albums, rappers hold elaborate listening parties, just like NAS, playing on the Internet."
"He was one of the producers of the albums of the North American record companies and appeared in one of the songs - so was dream and 070 shock."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Kardashian West attended the event in a sleeveless, black, Lycra all-in-one skirt with grey boots and cross straps up to the thighs."
"The mother of three had her hair half tied."
Meanwhile, West was wearing a neon yellow shirt and a grey Hoodie, paired with green pants, white socks and white sneakers
"Image zooming Kim Kardashian West and Kanye West | source: Johnny Nunez / wireimageimage zooming Kim Kardashian West and Kanye West | source: Robert Kamau / GC imagesimage zooming Kim Kardashian West | source: James Devaney / GC imagesjoin Kardashian west at the event are pals La Anthony and Jonathan Cheban."
"Other stars present included 2 chainz, Chris Rock, Fab, AZ and havoc."
"This is West's fourth album released in the past few weeks - other albums are pushat's" Daytona "and West's own album" leaves and kids watching ghosts "(released in collaboration with kid Cudi)



Number  1227
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That wasn’t easy on them.”The former couple first became linked in January, when they were spotted sharing a kiss while out on a romantic dinner date.”
““It’s been hard with him being on tour and her shooting in New York.”
““She and Abel have been going back and forth for a few months about their relationship,” an insider told PEOPLE at the time of their breakup.”
“...quietly stepped back from her career over the summer because she was recovering from a kidney transplant...”
“Image zoom Credit Johnny Nunez WireImage John Meanwhile Gomez has kept several photos of The Weeknd whose real name is Abel Tesfaye for her 130 million followers to look back on in fact the most recent picture was shared on Sept 5 a week before she revealed the reason she...”
“This comes after Gomez rekindled a romance with ex Justin Bieber (and they were recently spotted kissing) so that may have influenced The Weeknd’s decision to erase the “Wolves” singer from his photo-sharing history as well.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The singer, who earned a Grammy nomination on Tuesday, unfollowed his ex-girlfriend and deleted all photos of her from his account following their split in October after 10 months of dating.”
“The Weeknd and Selena Gomez split in October after 10 months of datingThe Weeknd Leaves No Trace of Selena Gomez on His Social Media by Deleting All Photos of HerThe Weeknd has made his breakup with Selena Gomez Instagram official.”


"It's not easy for them." The former couple first contacted in January when they were found sharing a kiss on a romantic dinner date
"He's on tour and she's shooting in New York, which makes me sad."
"She and Abel have been talking back and forth about their relationship for several months," a person familiar with the matter told people when they broke up
"This summer, she quietly quit her career because she is recovering from a kidney transplant..."
"Image zooming credit Johnny Nunez has also kept several weekend photos with her real name Abel tesfaye for her 130 million fans to review. In fact, the most recent one was shared on September 5 a week ago, when she didn't disclose her reasons..."
"Before that, Gomez and former Justin Bieber had rekindled a relationship (they were recently found kissing), so this may have affected the decision this week to erase the wolf singer from the history of photo sharing."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The singer, who was nominated for a Grammy award on Tuesday, broke up with his ex girlfriend after a 10 month date and then removed all of her photos from his account
"The weekend broke up with Selena Gomez in October after 10 months of dating. All photos of Selena Gomez were deleted at the weekend, leaving no trace of Selena Gomez on social media. I broke up with Selena Gomez on instagram at the weekend. "



Number  1228
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The two watched performances by The Head and The Heart and Travis Scott.”
“Selena and The Weeknd couldn't seem to keep their hands off each other throughout the day.”
“Poppy Delevingne, Jordyn Woods, Brooklyn Beckham and Russell Simmons made sure to stop by the day party as well.”
“Paris Hilton, Rita Ora, Chanel Iman and Shay Mitchell were just some of the "curated" crowd that was treated to Zeel App massages, beats spun by Odd Future's DJ Taco and food by Catch LA.”
“On Friday, he hit up one of the parties put on by Velocity Black x 1 OAK, which kicked off its annual Coachella soirees with an epic mega-day bash called the Up & Down Desert Beach Party, complete with resort-style beach-club vibe.”
“Tyga partied separately from Kylie Jenner throughout the weekend.”
“NewsApril 2017Coachella 2017 All Access: Go Inside This Year's Star-Studded Music FestivalWeekend 1, Day 1: Friday April 14, 2017: After traveling through private planes, Uber rides and even a helicopter (we see you Sofia Richie), dozens of celebrities kicked off a jam-packed weekend.”
“E!”


"They watched head and heart and Travis Scott."
"Serena and Zhou de seem to keep taking their hands away all day."
"Bobbie delaviny, Jordan woods, Brooklyn Beckham and Russell Simmons will definitely stop at the party that day."
Paris Hilton, Rita Ola, Chanel Iman and Shea Mitchell were just one of the "curators" who received the zeel app massage, the DJ taco of odd future and the beat of food by catch la
"Last Friday, he attended a party hosted by velocity black x 1 oak, which opened the annual Coachella soires with a holiday style beach club atmosphere with a grand party called up & down desert beach party."
"Over the weekend, TEGA and Kelly Jenner had separate parties."
"News April 2017 all visits to Coachella 2017: enter this year's star studded Music Festival weekend 1, day 1: April 14, 2017 Friday: after experiencing private jets, Uber rides and even helicopters (see Sophia Ritchie), dozens of celebrities started a crowded weekend."
“E！”



Number  1229
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As the official parliament website states: “Although not prohibited by law, it is considered unconstitutional for the Monarch to vote in an election,” referring to Queen Elizabeth II.”
“Meghan, who will seek British citizenship after her marriage to Harry, will likely not participate in future UK elections.”
“Like every member of the royal family, Meghan will likely have security with her everywhere she goes.”
“Have you ever seen the Duchess of Cambridge all by herself?”
“Go out in public totally alone.”
“Related article: The Greatest Royal Family Moments To Relive From 20172.”
“(via Hello!)”
“To put it another way, “She was essentially saying: ‘I miss eye contact,’” Barzun said.”
“In 2014, U.S. ambassador Matthew Barzun told Tatler magazine that The Queen confided in him and revealed that selfies were “disconcerting” and “strange” to her.”
“On top of all this, Queen Elizabeth allegedly isn’t a fan of the selfie.”


As the parliament's official website says, "although not prohibited by law, it is unconstitutional for a monarch to vote in an election," referring to Queen Elizabeth II
"Megan and Harry will seek British citizenship after their marriage, and she is likely not to participate in future British elections."
"Like every member of the royal family, Megan feels secure wherever she goes."
"Have you ever seen the Duchess of Cambridge alone?"
"Traveling alone in public."
"Related article: review the greatest moment of the royal family from 20172."
"Hello!"
"To put it another way," she basically said, "I miss eye contact."
"In 2014, U.S. ambassador Matthew Barzun told Tatler magazine that the queen confided in him and revealed that her self portrait made her" uneasy "and" strange. "
"In addition, it is said that Queen Elizabeth does not like to take selfies."



Number  1230
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Back in Los Angeles, The Bellas are doing a photo shoot at Global Fitness.”
“Rusev ends the argument by telling Lana, that she should have married a Greek guy instead, if she wanted to be able to make changes.”
“To which Rusev states, that there will be no such thing at this wedding.”
“They start arguing over who will play the role of maid of honor.”
“Later on, Rusev and Lana are on the road together.”
“The first one took place in Malibu and this one will be more in line with Rusev’s wishes of having a traditional Bulgarian wedding.”
“When they do arrive, Lana off screen talks about their upcoming wedding, which is their second.”
“Rusev’s mom Slavka is awaiting her son and Lana’s arrival at the airport.”
“We are now in Sofia, Bulgaria.”
“She says that she was disappointed that she wasn’t drafted to Smackdown Live and is unsure of what her future will be.”


"Back in Los Angeles, the Bellas are taking pictures at the global fitness center."
"Rousseff finally told Lana that if she wanted to make a change, she should marry a Greek man."
"Rousseff said there would be no such thing at this wedding."
"They started arguing about who was going to play the bridesmaid."
"Then Rousseff and Lana went on their way together."
"The first wedding was held in Malibu, which will be more in line with Rousseff's desire to hold a traditional Bulgarian wedding."
"When they arrive, Lana talks off the screen about their upcoming wedding, which is their second wedding."
"Rousseff's mother slavka is waiting for her son and Lana at the airport."
"We are now in Sofia, Bulgaria."
"She said she was disappointed because she wasn't called up to live and wasn't sure what her future would be like."



Number  1231
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Send us news tips at fightclub@sportskeeda.com...”
“She got a series of good pops during her latest run, and no matter what anyone else says, the proposal at WrestleMania was a heart-warming moment for fans of Total Divas and Nikki herself.”
“Nikki Bella turned down the opportunity to appear on the latest season of Dancing With The Stars in favour of focusing on her WWE return.”
“The news was revealed on the most recent episode of E!”
“Network’s Total Divas.”
“In case you didn’t know...”
“Dancing With The Stars is an American television show, and the concept is fairly obvious given the name.”
“A string of celebrities swap their regular lives for the dancefloor in an attempt to impress the judges and take home the title at the end of the season.”
“Some fans may be familiar with the show courtesy of Chris Jericho’s stint on it a few years back.”
“The heart of the matterOn the aforementioned episode of Total Divas, Nikki had the following to say to her agent when it came to actually accepting the opportunity.”


"Send us news tips" fight club@ sportskeeda.com 。。。”
"In her latest run, she got a series of good pop music. No matter what others say, the proposal at the wrestling frenzy is a warm moment for fans of total divas and Nicky himself."
"Nicky Bella turned down the chance to appear in the latest season of dance with the stars and turned to her WWE return."
"The news is in the latest episode of" E! "
"The total number of days on the Internet."
"In case you don't know..."
"Dancing with stars" is an American TV program, and the concept is obvious
"In order to impress the judges and win back the title at the end of the season, a series of celebrities have switched their daily life to the dance floor."
"Because of Chris Jericho's performance a few years ago, some fans may be familiar with the show."
Heart of Metro in the above-mentioned total queen, Nicky said the following words to her agent: when she really accepted the opportunity



Number  1232
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Period Sunday Oct 7 7 8 PM 60 MINUTES Regular Time Period 8 9 PM GOD FRIENDED ME Regular Time Period 9 10 PM NCIS LOS ANGELES Regular Time Period 10 11 PM MADAM SECRETARY Season 5 Premiere Denotes NFL doubleheader...”
“10 11 PM BULL Wednesday Oct 3 8 9 PM SURVIVOR Regular Time Period 9 10 PM SEAL TEAM Season 2 Premiere 10 11 PM CRIMINAL MINDS Season 14 Premiere Saturday Oct 6 8 9 PM CRIMETIME SATURDAY 9 10 PM CRIMETIME SATURDAY 10 11 PM 48 HOURS Regular Time...”
““Magnum P.I.” Karen Neal/CBSIt is a one-time thing this year as CBS is summoning its biggest comedy series to help launch its completely revamped Monday lineup.”
“Big Bang and Young Sheldon are expected to provide a strong launch pad for CBS’ Magnum P.I.”
“...reboot in the Monday 9 PM slot, followed by the relocated Bull at 10 PM.”
“Airing the two returning comedies on the first Monday of the season also will allow for additional circulation and promotion for the new CBS half-hour series assigned to the Monday 8 PM hour, comedies The Neighborhood and Happy Together, which will debut Oct. 1.”
“CBS will offer a double serving of Big Bang and Young Sheldon during premiere week as the comedies also will air originals in their regular Thursday 8 PM and 8 30 PM time periods respectively leading to the season premiere of Mom at 9 PM and the debut of the...”
“...network s Murphy Brown revival at 9 30 PM”
“It’s mostly status quo for the rest of CBS’ fall premiere strategy, with the season premiere of Survivor and the finale of Big Brother again taking over premiere Wednesday before the network’s regular lineup, anchored by Survivor at 8 PM, debuts in Week 2.”
“Here are the fall premiere dates for new and returning CBS series with new series in bold and new days and time slots noted Monday Sept 24 8 8 30 PM THE BIG BANG THEORY Season 12 Premiere 8 30 9 PM YOUNG SHELDON Season 2 Premiere 9 10 PM”


"Sunday, October 7, 7:8:60 PM, 8:9 PM, God bless me, 9:10 pm, NCIS, Los Angeles, 10:11 PM, Mrs. secretary, premiere of the fifth season to show the NFL Double Champion..."
"10:11 p.m. bull Wednesday October 3 8:9 p.m. survivor normal time 9:10 p.m. seal Season 2 premiere 10:11 p.m. criminal psychology Season 14 premiere Saturday October 6 8:9 p.m. Crimean time Saturday 9:10 p.m. Crimean time Saturday 10:11 p.m. 48 hours normal time..."
Karen Neal / CBS will launch its biggest comedy series this year to help launch its new Monday lineup
"The big bang and young Sheldon are expected to provide a powerful launch pad for CBS magnum p.i."
“… Restart at 9 p.m. on Monday, and then relocate the bulls at 10 p.m. "
"The return of these two comedies on the first Monday of the season will also bring additional circulation and promotion opportunities for CBS's new half-hour series comedy neighborhood and happy together, which will premiere on October 1."
"CBS will offer the double services of big bang and young Sheldon in the premiere week, because the comedy will also broadcast the original at 8:00 p.m. and 8:30 p.m. on Thursday, leading to the season premiere of mom at 9:00 p.m. and the premiere of mom..."
“… Murphy Brown of the Internet resurrected at 9:30 p.m
"The rest of CBS's autumn premiere strategy is basically the same," he said. "The season premiere of survivor and the finale of big brother will take over again on Wednesday, while the regular lineup hosted by survivor at 8pm will premiere in the second week."
"Here are the autumn premiere dates of CBS's new series and the return series, which are shown in bold type, on Monday, September 24 at 8:30 p.m. the big bang season 12 premieres at 8:30 p.m. and the young Sheldon Season 2 premieres at 9:10 p.m."



Number  1233
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Months later she and Brooklyn had split again, but the Carrie star has fuelled rumours of a romantic reunion once more.”
“She rested her head on a fresh faced Brooklyn s shoulder in the shot which she captioned 5 years ago with Beckham commenting Love you x Walk a mile in her shoes The actress also shared a snap of her trainers and what appear to be Brooklyn s shoes as...”
“...in a new interview with The Cut that he sometimes has to ask his more enthusiastic fans to calm down when they run into him...”
“Public display The pair haven t been shy about their rekindled love on Instagram regularly liking each other s snaps and commenting on them Supporting her man Moretz posted a simple love heart emoji under a snap of Brooklyn posing in a white T shirt and basketball cap He admitted...”
“Yet Brooklyn recently admitted that he has a few 'fangirls' at Parsons School of Design in NYC, where is studying photography.”
“Now that the British teenager has moved to New York City to study, he's been able to meet up with the beauty regularly.”
“In the cute picture, the couple were seen cosied up to one another as they snapped a selfie outdoors.”
“...they stand at the top of some steps It comes after Brooklyn who is a photography student at Parsons School of Design shared a sweet snap of the pair which he captioned Thinking of this one xx...”
“Cute couple Whilst Brooklyn has revealed he has plenty of fangirls at college he only has eyes for his stunning girlfriend Cute Their smitten social media exchange comes after the Kick Ass star shared a sweet black and white throwback snap of the couple from five years ago Happy together...”
“It's no biggie.'”


A few months later, she and Brooklyn broke up again, but the "Carrie" star sparked rumors of a romantic reunion
"She leans her head on the shoulder of a new face in Brooklyn, a picture she took five years ago, when Beckhams commented," love you, walk a mile in her shoes. The actress also shared a snapshot of her sneakers and shoes that look like Brooklyn... "
“… In a new interview, he sometimes has to ask his more enthusiastic fans to calm down when they meet him... "
"It's open to show that the two people have no taboo about rekindling their love on instagram. They often like each other's snapshots and comment that the man who supports her, Moretz, pasted a simple heart-shaped picture of love under the snapshot of Brooklyn wearing a white T-shirt and basketball cap. He admits that..."
"Brooklyn recently admitted, however, that he had several 'fangirls' at Parsons School of design in New York, where he studied photography."
"Now that the British teenager has moved to New York City to study, he can meet the beauty regularly."
"In this lovely picture, someone saw the couple making out with each other while taking a self portrait outdoors."
“… They stood at the top of some steps. Brooklyn, a photography student at Parsons School of design, shared a sweet snapshot of the couple. He wrote in the title, "think of this XX..."
"A lovely couple. Although Brooklyn revealed that he had many lovers in college, he only looked at his beautiful girlfriend. Their passionate exchange on social media was the happy couple five years ago after the handsome star shared a sweet black-and-white photo..."
"It's no big deal."



Number  1234
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I can just be accountable for myself and my actions."”
“"It certainly is now.”
“"What I was accused of by a woman was of touching her breast while giving her a hug," Affleck said, referring to Hilarie Burton's tweets from October.”
“"I don't remember it, but I absolutely apologized for it.”
“I certainly don't think she's lying or making it up."”
“It s just the kind of thing we have to as men I think as we become more aware of this be really really mindful of our behavior and hold ourselves accountable and say If I was ever part of...”
“...the problem I want to change Affleck added...”
“"I want to be part of the solution.'”
“And to not shy away from these awkward or strange encounters we might have had where we're sort of navigating and not knowing."”
“SEE ALSO These are the grossest celebrity responses to the Harvey Weinstein allegations Affleck and Colbert discussed the disease like nature of Hollywood s sexual impropriety focusing on Weinstein with whom Affleck worked closely early in his career but leaving...”


"I can be responsible for myself and my actions."
"Now, of course."
"I was accused by a woman of touching her chest while hugging her," Affleck said, referring to Hillary Burton's October tweet
"I don't remember, but I absolutely apologize for that."
"I certainly don't think she's lying or fabricating."
"This is exactly what we have to do as men. I think when we are more and more aware of this, we should really pay attention to our own behavior, let ourselves take responsibility, and say if I was It's part of the story. "
“… What I want to change, Affleck added
"I want to be part of the solution."
"In order not to avoid these embarrassing or strange encounters, we may sail in places we don't know."
"These are the most vulgar celebrity responses to Harvey Weinstein's accusations. Affleck and Colbert discussed the nature of Hollywood sexual misconduct, focusing on Weinstein. Affleck worked closely with Weinstein early in his career, but later left..."



Number  1235
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She's back: Ciara was previously nominated at the American Music Awards in 2005 and 2013 in the Favorite Soul/R&B Female Artist category...”
“...the Permagel Ultra Glide Eye Pencil in Blk Coffee to define Ciara s brows before using the same pencil to blend a soft almond shaped eye patter from the lash to crease...”
“The 32-year-old singer held hands with her four-year-old son as they arrived at the Microsoft Theater in downtown Los Angeles for the annual event.”
“Ciara let her hair down for the awards ceremony with her tight dark curls down below her shoulders.”
“Cute date: Ciara brought her son Future Zahir as her date on Tuesday to the American Music Awards in Los AngelesShe showed her toned legs in a short black dress with green and yellow trim and side zippers and black gladiator heels.”
“Future stole the show in a bright red and blue Gucci coat, crisp white T-shirt and dark blue Gucci trousers.”
“He completed his outfit with white Gucci sneakers and beamed while hitting the carpet with his mother.”
“Ciara beamed with pride as she escorted her son down the red carpet, showing off a radiant glow that was amplified by her stunning makeup look, which was created by Yolanda Frederick for Pat McGrath Labs.”
“'For the perfect red carpet glow, I applied Skin Fetish: Highlighter Balm + Duo to the high points of the face and then layered a touch of Bronze Nectar 003 from Skin Fetish: Sublime Skin Highlighting Trio,' Yolanda revealed.”
“Stylish outfit Future Zahir wore a red and blue Gucci jacket along with Gucci trousers and sneakers New song Ciara was set to perform her new song Level Up with Missy Elliott Before perfecting the complexion however the makeup artist started the look off with the eyes and brows using...”


"She's back: Sheila was nominated as the most popular soul / R & B female artist category at the 2005 and 2013 American Music Awards..."
“… Before using the same pencil to blend the soft almond shaped eye shadow from eyelashes to wrinkles, use the Permagel Ultra Glide eye shadow pen in black coffee to define the eyebrows of Ciara. "
"The 32 year old singer and her 4-year-old son went hand in hand to the Microsoft theater in downtown Los Angeles for the annual event."
"Sheila's hair was down at the awards ceremony, with tight black curls under her shoulders."
"Lovely date: Sheila took her son's future Zahir to the American music awards ceremony in Los Angeles on Tuesday. She was wearing a short black skirt with green and yellow trim, side zippers and black Gladiator heels to show off her strong legs. "
"Future came out in a bright red and blue Gucci coat, a cool white T-shirt and dark blue Gucci trousers."
"He finished his costume in white Gucci sneakers and was elated when he patted on the carpet with his mother."
"When she took her son to the red carpet, Sheila's face was filled with a proud smile, showing a radiant light magnified by Yolanda Frederick's amazing makeup for pat McGrath labs."
"In order to make the red carpet shine perfectly, I put skin on the top of my face," Yolanda revealed Fetish:Highlighter Balm+Duo And then apply skin Fetish:Sublime Skin  Highlighting trio's Bronze nectar 003. "
"Fashion clothes future Zahir wears red and blue Gucci jacket, gucci pants and sneakers new song Sheila is set to perform her new song level with Missy Elliott before perfecting the complexion, however makeup artists start using the look of eyes and eyebrows..."



Number  1236
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But the truth is we just weren’t getting along.””
“It was a tough decision and we are both very sad about it.”
“Luann D Agostino and husband Tom D Agostino filed for divorce she was gushing about their love on The Real Housewives of New York City reunion and telling her castmates that she and Tom had worked hard to be happy together...”
““I’ve earned it, though, right?”
“We’ve earned it,” the 52-year-old former countess said in a clip from part 2 of the reunion, which airs Wednesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Her comment came after Cohen asked Luann to tell the audience the things about Tom that she loves — “that maybe people don’t get from seeing the show.”Image zoom Luann and Tom D’Agostino | Credit: Chance Yeh/FilmMagicLuann was happy to oblige Cohen’s request.”
““He’s not a TV person so he might come off a little awkward because he’s probably nervous as most people would be in that situation.”
“Especially with what happened,” Luann said.”
““Tom is actually a great guy who loves me.”


"But the truth is we don't get along well."
"It was a difficult decision and we are all very sad."
"LuAnn D Agostino and her husband Tom D Agostino filed for divorce. She talked about their love on the real housewife who was reunited in New York City, and told her friends that she and Tom worked hard to be happy together..."
"But I deserve it, don't I?"
"We deserve it," the 52 year old former Countess said in an excerpt from the second part of the reunion broadcast on Wednesday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"After Cohen asked Luan to tell the audience what she likes about Tom, she made this comment -" maybe people won't get "picture zooming Luan and Tom dagostino | credit: chance Yeh / film magic LuAnn is happy to meet Cohen's request."
"He doesn't like watching TV, so it might be a bit embarrassing because he might be as nervous as most people are."
"Especially what happened," Luan said
"Tom is actually a good man who loves me."



Number  1237
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2009”
“It really does.”
“Brooklyn Decker and Andy Roddick, have welcomed their second child together, a baby girl, Us Weekly can confirm.”
“The couple welcomed their baby girl, Stevie, in Austin, Texas in late November.”
“Decker, 30, revealed the news in an Instagram post on Wednesday, January 3.”
““A newborn, a toddler, a dog in a cone, a dog with a tumor but I’m having a good hair day so it’s fine we’re fine I’m fine,” the model wrote alongside a photo of herself cradling the infant.”
“The 35-year-old former tennis pro announced that the couple were expecting their second bundle of joy while being inducted into the International Tennis Hall of Fame in Newport, Rhode Island, in July.”
“During the athlete’s heartwarming speech, the star acknowledged his mother, Blanche, his late father, Jerry, his wife, Decker, their 2-year-old son, Hank, and to the surprise of many: their baby-to-be.”
““Brook, I don’t know how you juggle it all,” Roddick said.”
““You hear a lot of guys find it very tough to walk away from professional sports, but you are the reason my personal transition into a quasi-everyday life has been gratifying and full.”


“2009”
"It's true."
American weekly confirmed that Brooklyn Decker and Andy Roddick had already shared their second child, a baby girl
In late November, the couple welcomed their baby girl Stevie in Austin, Texas
"Dirk, 30, revealed the news on instagram on Wednesday, January 3."
"A newborn, a toddler, a conical dog, a dog with a tumor, but I have good hair today, so it's good, we're good, I'm good," the model wrote next to the picture of her holding the baby
The 35 year old former tennis professional announced that the couple were looking forward to their second happiness when they were selected at the International Tennis Hall of fame in Newport, Rhode Island, in July
In the touching speech, the star paid tribute to his mother Blanche, his late father Jerry, his wife Decker and their two-year-old son hank. To many people's surprise, their baby to be
"Brooke, I don't know how you deal with all this," Roddick said
"You've heard that many people find it difficult to leave professional sports, but you are the reason why I have made a personal transition to quasi daily life, which has always been satisfying and fulfilling."



Number  1238
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Clearly, you and I both out-punted our coverage.”FROM PEN: EW Staffers Pick Their Least Favorite Pop Culture Moments of 2016”
“WE HOPE SO.”Confirmed Rogen, 35, “Always.”On Friday, Timberlake finally joined the party, writing, “Don’t sell yourself short, @Sethrogen.”
“She wrote back later that afternoon, “@Sethrogen are you flirting with us?”
“It seems, however, that at least Biel has taken the comment as a profession of affection.”
“Miller Rogen echoed the sentiment, adding “#BetterLookingUs” in a retweet.”
““Me and my wife have recently come to the unsettling realization that @jtimberlake and @JessicaBiel are the better looking version of us,” joked Rogen on Twitter, Wednesday, sharing a photo of him and his wife alongside a similar, street shot of Justin Timberlake and his spouse Jessica Biel.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Seth Rogen and wife Lauren Miller Rogen are seeing similarities between themselves and another Hollywood couple.”
“WE HOPE SO," wrote Biel in response to the comedianSeth Rogen and His Wife Think Justin Timberlake and Jessica Biel Are the 'Better Looking Version of Us'This is (sort of) us.”
“"@Sethrogen are you flirting with us?”


"It's clear that you and I appreciate our coverage." From Pen Club: EW staff choose their least favorite pop culture moment of 2016
"We hope so." "It's always like this," confirmed 35 year old Logan Last Friday, Timberlake finally joined the party, writing: "don't short yourself, @ sethrogen."
Later that afternoon, she wrote back, "Seth Logan, are you flirting with us?"
"However, it seems that bell at least regards this comment as a profession of love."
Miller Logan made the same point, adding "better looking us" to the forwarding
"My wife and I recently began to realize that @ jtimberlake and @ Jessica Biel are better looking versions of us," Logan joked on twitter on Wednesday The photo of him and his wife is shared with a similar street photo of Justin Timberlake and his spouse Jessica Biel
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Seth Logan and his wife Lauren Miller Logan see the similarities between themselves and another Hollywood couple."
"We hope so," bell wrote in response to comedian Seth Logan and his wife, who thought Justin Timberlake and Jessica bell were "better looking versions of us" - it's (to some extent) us. "
"@ sethrogen, are you flirting with us?"



Number  1239
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She admitted, “[Derek and I] both have two nephews right now [whom] we absolutely adore and we spend a lot of time with, so I’m really excited to buy all the girly fun stuff because we’ve been buying boy things for years.””
“...embrace all things girly girl...”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“MLB great Derek Jeter and wife Hannah Davis Jeter have welcomed their first child, a baby girl name Bella Raine, The Players' Tribune tweeted FridayThe rookie of the year has arrived!”
“MLB great Derek Jeter and wife Hannah Davis Jeter have welcomed their first child, a baby girl, The Players’ Tribune shared on Twitter Friday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Congratulations Derek and @hannahbjeter on the birth of your baby girl, Bella Raine Jeter, born Thursday, Aug. 17,” reads the announcement tweet.”
“The New York Yankees also took to Twitter to send their well wishes to the new parents, tweeting, “Congrats to Derek & Hannah Jeter on the birth of their daughter, Bella Raine Jeter.”
“We can’t wait to meet her!”The happy couple announced their pregnancy in February, after tying the knot in July of last year.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"She admitted," we both have two nephews now, we adore them very much, and we spend a lot of time together, so I'm really excited to buy all the things girls like, because we've been buying boys' things for many years. "
“… Embrace everything, girl... "
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Derek Jeter and his wife Hannah Davis Jeter have their first child, a baby girl named Bella Ryan," the player Tribune tweeted Friday
"Big league great Derek Jeter and his wife Hannah Davis Jeter have their first child, a baby girl," the player Tribune tweeted Friday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Congratulations to Derek and @ hannahbjeter, your baby girl, Bella Ryan Jeter, born on Thursday, August 17," the announcement tweeted
"The New York Yankees also tweeted their best wishes to their new parents, which read," congratulations to Derek and Hannah Jeter, their daughter Bella Ryan Jeter
"We can't wait to see her! "The happy couple married in July last year and announced their pregnancy in February this year."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  1240
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“On the cover, Swift is shown in an embellished red dress by YSL that screams fashion-over-function, swapping her classic red lip for a deep purple tone.”
“The editorial will echo a similar sentiment to much of Swift's Reputation art, since photographers Mert Alas and Marcus Piggott shot both sets of visuals.”
“This will be the second cover story for the mag's new Editor in Chief, Edward Enninful, after he took the reigns from Alexandra Shulman for the Dec. 2017 issue -- which featured Adwoa Aboah as its cover star.”
“The singer will be featured in a twelve page spread, titled "TAYLOR REMADE."”
“British Vogue has revealed its first cover of the new year, featuring none other than Taylor Swift.”


"On the cover, swift, wearing a red dress designed by YSL, is famous for fashion rather than function. She changed her classic red lips to a deep purple tone."
"This editorial will echo many of Swift's famous works of art, as photographers Matt ARAS and Marcus Piggott shot both sets of pictures."
"This will be the second cover story of the magazine's new editor in chief, Edward Enninful, who replaced Alexandra Shulman in a December 2017 issue of the magazine, whose cover star is adwoa aboah."
The singer will appear in 12 pages with the title "Taylor remake"
"British Vogue has unveiled the first cover of the new year, featuring Taylor Swift."



Number  1241
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“On Monday night, Beyonce and JAY-Z posed in the Angelika Film Center's elevator in New York City, after a private screening of Woody Allen's upcoming movie, Wonder Wheel, which stars JAY-Z's pal, Justin Timberlake and Kate Winslet.”
“The two were celebrating the rapper's 48th birthday.”
“Beyonce went '90s chic with her crimped curls, purple lipstick and a green-and-black checkered dress that had a hint of floral embellishments at the slit.”
“She paired the style with a blue fur coat, a mesh top with the word "unity" on the sleeve, a burgundy velvet purse, Krewe cat-eye sunglasses and black strappy shoes.”
“As for JAY-Z, he wore a maroon suit that he paired with a white T-shirt and matching sneakers, along with several big gold chains.”
“Splash News The photo op comes years after the 99 Problems rapper and Solange Knowles made headlines when surveillance footage from a hotel elevator was leaked which showed Beyonce s younger sister lunging at her brother in law just moments after they attended the 2014 Met Gala in New York...”
“City...”
“The couple kept mum about the incident for several years until JAY-Z spoke with Rap Radar hosts Elliott Wilson and Brian “B.Dot” Miller in August about the infamous footage.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
On Monday night, Beyonce and Jez posed in the elevator of New York City's Angelica film center, starring Jez's friends Justin Timberlake and Kate Winslet, after the private screening of Woody Allen's upcoming movie "the wheel of magic."
"The two are celebrating the rapper's 48th birthday."
"Beyonce wore 90s fashionable curly hair, purple lipstick, and a green and black checked dress, with some flower scent on the slit."
"She paired it with a blue fur coat, a mesh top with the words" unity "on the sleeves, a purplish red velvet purse, krewe cat's-eye sunglasses and black lace up shoes."
"As for Jay-Z, he's wearing a chestnut suit with a white T-shirt and matching sneakers, and a few big gold chains."
"Splash news made headlines a few years ago when a surveillance video of a hotel elevator was leaked, showing Beyonce's sister pouncing on her brother-in-law shortly after they attended a blind date party in New York in 2014..."
"City..."
"For several years, the couple remained silent about the incident until August, when Jay-Z talked to rap radar hosts Elliott Wilson and Brian" B. dot "Miller about the infamous video."



Number  1242
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by kristen bell (@kristenanniebell) on Feb 14, 2018 at 11:01pm PSTA post shared by kristen bell (@kristenanniebell) on Sep 14, 2016 at 3:19pm PDT”
“They’ve been candid about their struggles as a couple, including their “toxic” first year together and the therapy they say is the key to marriage.”
“Bell and Shepard, who share two daughters, Lincoln, 4, and Delta, 2, wed in 2013 after years of dating.”
“It’s a privilege to go through it with a partner,” she continued.”
““In 10 yrs, when the dopamine has waned, remember: life is a crazy ride.”
“She also advised that “necessary separateness” is key to any good relationship, which makes sense especially if you’re both in-demand working actors.”
“A post shared by kristen bell (@kristenanniebell) on Feb 14, 2018 at 12:21pm PSTBell’s top suggestion is to “stay vulnerable with each other,” which she believes promotes intimacy and connection.”
“She ended up with A-to-Z list of tips on how to maintain a healthy relationship.”
“!’” Bell wrote in the caption.”
“You are an old married woman, shouldn’t you have some wisdom to share?”


"A post shared by Kristen bell (@ kristenniebel) at 11:01 PM PST on February 14, 2018 a post shared by Kristen bell (@ kristenniebel) at 3:19 PM PST on September 14, 2016"
"They spoke frankly about their struggle as a couple, including their first year together as" toxic. "They said that treatment is the key to marriage."
Bell and Shepard have two daughters, Lincoln, 4, and delta, 2, who married in 2013 after years of dating
"It's an honor for me to go through all this with my partner," she continued
"Ten years later, when dopamine goes down, remember: life is a crazy journey."
She also suggests that "necessary separation" is the key to any good relationship, especially when you all need working actors, which makes sense
"Christine bell (@ kristenniebell) shared a post at 12:21 noon on February 14, 2018, and Bell's first suggestion was" keep each other vulnerable ", which she believed would promote intimacy and connection."
"She ended up with a series of suggestions on how to maintain a healthy relationship."
"!" bell wrote in the title. "
"You're an old lady. Shouldn't you share some wisdom?"



Number  1243
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Not like you needed another reason to stock your beauty shelves with coconut oil, but accomplishing Lea Michele-style hair is definitely a plus.”
“News’s tutorial below.)”
“(See E!”
“Then that’s it—it’s ready to be styled into a voluminous ponytail or worn as is.”
“After slathering the concoction in your hair, Polko’s final trick is blowdrying or rough-drying the hair to add extra volume and texture.”
““I like to put it together because if I’m working it in, then I more evenly distribute it,” she said.”
“Not only does the mixture provide natural-looking texture, but by mixing the spray with the coconut oil, Polko is better able to control how she works in the product than if she used the spray alone.”
“Specifically, Polko uses IGK’s Rich Kid Coconut Oil Gel and Beach Club Texture Spray, which she mixes in her hands to give “grit” to clean hair.”
“...the holy grail of everything beauty.”
“...a k a...”


"It's not like you need another reason to put coconut oil on your beauty stand, but finishing lea Michele style hair is definitely a bonus."
"Here's a news tutorial."
"(see e!"
"That's it. You can make it into a fluffy ponytail or wear it as it is."
Polko's last trick is to use a hair dryer to dry or coarsely dry your hair to increase its volume and texture
"I like to put it together because if I put it together, then I'll distribute it more evenly," she said
"This mixture can not only provide natural texture, but also can control the way she works in the product by mixing spray with coconut oil and using Kobe spray alone."
"Specifically, the use of IGK's rich family coconut oil gel and Beach Club texture spray is used by her, and she mixed the spray in her hands to bring" gravel "to her hair.
"The Holy Grail of all beauty"
“… a k a…”



Number  1244
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Reynolds previously opened up to PEOPLE in November about how supportive his wife has been during his battle with ankylosing spondylitis, a chronic inflammatory condition of the joints that can lead to extreme pain and, in the worst cases, spinal fusion.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
““After 7 beautiful years together, Aja and I’s marriage has come to an end,” the musician announced on Thursday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Our children continue to be the most important thing in our lives, & we will continue to co-parent them with all our love,” he added.”
““I ask that you please respect our privacy at this time as we work through this as a family.”The pair welcomed twin girls Gia James and Coco Rae in March 2017, and are also parents to daughter Arrow, 5½.”
“Image zoom Dan Reynolds and Aja Volkman | Credit: Bryan Steffy/Getty ImagesShortly after Reynolds shared the news, Volkman, who is also a musician, shared an inspirational quote on Instagram that seemingly addressed the pair’s decision to split.”
““She woke up every morning with the option of being anyone she wished,” the quote began.”
““How beautiful it was that she always chose herself.”Volkman simply decided to caption the image, “❤.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“On Friday, Volkman posted a note to Instagram in which she shared her thoughts on the decision to part ways with her husband.”


"Reynolds had previously revealed in November how his wife supported him in the fight against ankylosing spondylitis, a chronic inflammation of the joints that can cause extreme pain and, at worst, spinal fusion."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"After seven wonderful years together, my marriage to aja is over," the musician announced on Thursday
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Our children are still the most important thing in our lives and we will continue to raise them with all our love," he added
"I ask you to respect our privacy at this time, because we are a family." In March 2017, the couple welcomed their twin daughters GIA James and coco Rae, who are also the parents of their five-and-a-half-year-old daughter arrow
"Image zooming Dan Reynolds and aja Walkman | image source: Brian Steffe / Getty Images after Reynolds shared the news, Walkman, also a musician, shared an inspiring quote on instagram, which seemed to talk about their decision to break up."
"She can wake up every morning and be anyone she wants to be," began the sentence
"It's beautiful that she always chooses herself." Walkman just decided to add a title to the photo ❤ "Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"On Friday, Volkman posted a message on instagram sharing her thoughts about her decision to go separate from her husband."



Number  1245
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Wells Adams / InstagramImage zoom Credit: Wells Adams / InstagramIt was also a good chance to peek inside the home where the tree will be living — it seems they’ve got quite a cute set up!”
“Adams shared these memorable moments through Instagram videos.”
“Then, the decorating began.”
“"First Christmas tree with this one," said Hyland, who is shown with gorgeous curls.”
“In a video, Adams was quick to tell fans to “Look at our fun tree!”First, it started with picking the tree out.”
“Food.”
“According to US Weekly, the couple decided to theme their tree this year — and it’s a theme we can all stand behind.”
“After unveiling their Stranger Things-themed couples costumes for Halloween, the two went on to prove that while they’re pretty cute together on any standard day, they’re ultra-adorable around the holidays.”
“The two connected after tweeting at each other, thus proving that anyone can find love through social media.”
“Adams stayed true to the franchise, and also popped up on Bachelor in Paradise.”


"Image zooming credit: wells Adams / instagram image zoom credit: wells Adams / instagram it is also a good opportunity to peek inside the house where the tree will live - it seems that they have a pretty lovely setting!"
"Adams shared these unforgettable moments through instagram video."
"Then, the renovation began."
"The first Christmas tree with this tree," said Helan, who showed off gorgeous curly hair
In a video, Adams quickly told fans, "look at our fun tree! "First, start by picking out the trees."
"Food."
"According to us weekly, the couple decided to make their Christmas tree a theme this year - a theme we can all support," he said
"After unveiling a couple's costume with the theme of strangers for Halloween, the two continue to prove that although they are cute on any standard day, they are very cute before and after the festival."
"The two are connected after microblogging each other, proving that anyone can find love through social media."
"Adams was loyal to the film and suddenly appeared in" the Bachelor in heaven. "



Number  1246
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There’s a lot to talk about.”Image zoom Cory Wharton and daughter Ryder | Credit: Cory Wharton/InstagramWharton has been known to be a player on the long-running MTV show, hooking up with several women from the series.”
“I’ll be answering all the questions, probably in a YouTube video.”
“Cory Wharton and Cheyenne Floyd of The Challenge have revealed that they share a child, a 9-month-old daughter named Ryder.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Both TV personalities, who appeared together on The Challenge: Rivals III in 2016, announced the news on their social media pages Saturday with a family photo.”
“Image zoom Credit: Cory Wharton/Instagram“I’ve been off of social media for a while now… for many reasons.”
“Most importantly God has given me the biggest blessing in my life, my daughter Ryder K Wharton,” wrote Wharton, 26.”
““I want to say thank you Cheyenne for being such an amazing mother.”
“I look forward to co-parenting with you and giving Ryder all the love in the world.”
“I can’t wait to watch you grow up and be there for you every step of the way, love you Moochie !!”


"There's a lot to talk about." Image zooming: Corey Wharton and his daughter, Ryder credit: Corey Wharton / instagram Wharton is a well-known actor on the long-term MTV show, having sex with several women in the series
"I'll answer all the questions, probably in a YouTube video."
"Challenge" of Cory Wharton and Cheyenne Freud revealed that they share a child, a 9-month-old daughter, named Ryder
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Both TV celebrities appeared together in 2016's challenge: competitor III, and they posted the news on their social media page on Saturday with a photo of their family."
"Image scaling credit: Corey Wharton / instagram" I've been away from social media for a while There are many reasons
"Above all, God has given me the greatest blessing of my life, my daughter, Ryder K. Wharton," the 26 year old wrote
"I want to say thank you, Shane, for being a great mother."
"I look forward to raising children with you and giving Ryder the love of the world."
"I can't wait to see you grow up, every step is by your side, love you, Munch!"



Number  1247
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Roger Federer is older than me and he’s still winning everything,” she said about getting back in championship caliber shape.”
“Also at the Ted Talks event, Williams opened up her career plans post-baby.”
“Image zoom Credit: Source: Serena Williams/SnapchatAnd just days after the baby news, the sports star posted a moving love note to her unborn baby.”
““I’m happy to confirm Serena is expecting a baby this fall,” the rep shared.”
“Later that same day, Williams’ rep confirmed to PEOPLE that she and her fiancé, Reddit co-founder Alexis Ohanian, will welcome their first child in the fall.”
““20 weeks,” she announced.”
“One week ago, the mother-to-be captioned a mirror selfie with her baby bump clearly visible underneath a custom yellow La Blanca Anniversary suit.”
““Every week I just take a picture and save it and I’ve been so good about it and this was the one time I slipped, but it’s okay,” she said.”
“I was only going to wait five or six more days [to share].”But the slip-up doesn’t have her stressing about future social media posts.”
“On social media, you press the wrong button and… Thirty minutes later I missed four calls and I’m like, ‘That’s weird.’ But it was a good moment.”


"Roger Federer is older than me and he still wins everything," she said of returning to championship level form
"Also at Ted, Williams made her career plan public."
"Image zooming source: image source: Serena Williams / snapchat just a few days after the baby news release, the sports star posted a touching love letter to her unborn baby."
"I'm happy to confirm that Serena is having a baby this fall," the representative said
Later on the same day, Williams representatives confirmed that she and her fiance, Alexis Ohanian, co-founder of reddit, would have their first child in the fall
"20 weeks," she announced
"A week ago, the mother to be took a self portrait in a mirror under a custom-made yellow La Blanca anniversary suit and clearly saw her small lump."
"I only take one picture every week and save it. I've always been good at it. It's one of my slips, but it doesn't matter," she said
"I was just going to wait another five or six days." But the mistake did not put her under pressure for future social media posts
"On social media, you press the wrong button 30 minutes later, I missed four calls and said, "it's strange." But that's a good time. "



Number  1248
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here’s What to Know About Legal Sports tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“Here\u2019s what you should know the Are Betting Billions on Super Bowl LV.”
“...const FP = you make money from sports betting leading up to the Super Bowl?”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's some knowledge about legal sports, which can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. These skills are provided by some experts who are famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers. "
"Here's what you should know, they bet billions on Super Bowl Lv."
“… Const FP = did you make money from sports gambling before the super bowl? "



Number  1249
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nikki Bella and Brie Bella also serve as Executive Producers.”
“Total Bellas is produced by WWE and Bunim/Murray Productions with Gil Goldschein, Russell Jay and Farnaz Farjam Chazan serving as Executive Producers for Bunim/Murray Productions and Kevin Dunn serving as Executive Producer for WWE.”
“...has given a fourth season greenlight to its hit series Total Bellas.”
“The renewal comes as the series, which follows the lives of WWE superstars Nikki Bella and Brie Bella, finished its third season with its best numbers to date.”
“Season 3 was its highest-rated season ever among all key demos, drawing nearly 1 million total viewers per episode, up 22% from the previous season among the core P18-49 demographic, according to the network and Nielsen.”
“Sunday night premieres of Total Bellas ranked among the Top 10 programs in primetime across ad-supported cable with W18-34 and W18-49.”
“Season three also averaged more than 4MM social engagements a week, +123% higher average weekly engagements vs.”
“Season 2 (1.8MM).”
“Total Bellas currently has 1.1MM social followers, gaining +16% new followers during season three.”
“Season three of Total Bellas saw Nikki deciding to call off her high-profile wedding, Brie balancing being a new mom and a successful business woman with her sister, and Daniel Bryan’s sensational return to the WWE ring.”


"Nicky Bella and bribella are also executive producers."
"Total Bellas is produced by WWE and bunim / Murray productions, with Gil goldschein, Russell Jay and farnaz farjam Chazan as executive producer of bunim / Murray productions and Kevin Dunn as executive producer of WWE."
“… It's a green light for the fourth season of its hit series total Bellas. "
"The renewal comes as the series, which is the best number since World War superstars Niki Bella and bribella's life, ended their third season so far."
According to the network and Nielsen, the third season has the highest ratings ever, with nearly 1 million viewers per episode, up 22% from the previous season
"The premiere of total Bellas on Sunday night featured w18-34 and w18-49 ads in support of the cable prime time top 10."
"The average number of social activities in the third quarter exceeded 4 million per week, an increase of 123% compared with that in the third quarter."
"Second season (1.8 mm)."
"Total Bellas currently has 1.1 million social fans, with 16% of new fans in the third quarter."
"In the third season of total Bellas, Nikki decided to cancel her high-profile wedding, Brie and her sister became a new mother and a successful business woman, and Daniel Bryan made a sensational return to WWE."



Number  1250
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Makeup Kanako Takase Manicure Megumi Yamamoto Post Production Studio RM Editor Piers Dennis at Studio RM Colorist Jamie Noble at Studio RM Filmed at The Mark Hotel Title Design Jason Duzansky Kendall Jenner on Wild Rumors Raiding Kim s Closet and Angelina Jolie...”
“Director Charlotte Wales Fashion Editor Clare Byrne Art Direction Look Studios Production Helena Martel Seward at Lollywould Written by Jessica Joffe DP Julian Kapadia 1st AC Rachel Batashvili 2nd AC Rachel Gwozdz Key Grip Kenneth Kildee Gaffer Andrew Hubbard Set Design Nicholas des Jardins Sound Lily Bernstein Hair Rubi Jones...”
“Kendall Jenner in:N 21 dress, Dries Van Noten dress, Brother Vellies shoes, Fendi socks, and a Proenza Schouler bag.”
“.”
“Watch what happens when the highest-paid model in the world exposes her inner life—and then gets creative with a brow pen .”
“And who on earth invented this crazy career of hers?”
“Is she even awake?”
“She’d like to know where on earth she is.”


"Make up Kanako Takase manicure Megumi Yamamoto post production studio RM editor piers Dennis studio RM colorist Jamie noble studio RM shooting at Mark Hotel Title Design Jason duzansky Kendall Jenner about Crazy rumors attacking Kim's wardrobe and Angelina Jolie..."
"Director Charlotte Welsh fashion editor Claire Byrne art direction watch studio production Helena Martel Seward writes Jessica Joffe DP Julian kapadia first AC Rachel batashvili second AC Rachel gworth key hold Kenneth killetchev Andrew Hubbard set design Nicholas djadin voice Lily Bernstein hair Ruby Jones …”
"Kendall Jenner wears: n 21 dress, dries van noten dress, brother vellies shoes, Fendi socks and Proenza Schouler bag."
“.”
"Let's see what happens when the world's highest paid models expose their inner lives and create with eyebrows."
"Who on earth invented her crazy career?"
"Is she awake?"
"She wants to know where she is."



Number  1251
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That would make it more difficult to collect.”If you or someone you know is in emotional distress or suicidal crisis, please call the Lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255).”
“However, a source close to his child pornography case explained to Us on Wednesday, January 31, that Salling’s estate might not have to pay his victims because he was not sentenced before his death.”
““The autopsy was completed today and the doctor just posted the cause the cause of death asphyxia by hanging and the manner of death is suicide.”
“The case is now closed and the body is ready for pick up,” Ed Winter of the Los Angeles Coroner Office tells Us Weekly on Thursday, February 1.”
“As previously reported, the coroner confirmed to Us that the Glee alum died on Tuesday, January 30.”
“Salling was found by a riverbed in the Sunland-Tujunga neighborhood of L.A., and was pronounced dead at the scene.”
“Us confirmed that one of Salling’s family members reported him missing at 3 a.m. before his body was discovered on Tuesday.”
“The 35-year-old actor, who pleaded guilty to possession of child pornography involving a prepubescent minor in December 2017, was set to be sentenced on March 7.”
“In October, he agreed to a plea deal that included four to seven years in jail.”
“According to the court documents previously obtained by Us, Salling was also ordered to pay approximately $50,000 in restitution and register as a sex offender after his stint in jail.”


If you or someone you know has emotional distress or suicide crisis, please call lifeline 1-800-273-TALK (8255)
"However, a source close to his child pornography case explained to us on January 31 (Wednesday) that sarin's legacy may not need to pay the victim because he was not sentenced before he died."
"After the autopsy today, the doctor just posted the cause of death. The cause of death was hanging and suffocation. The way of death was suicide."
Ed winter of the Los Angeles coroner's office told weekly on Thursday, February 1: "the case is now closed and the body is ready for collection."
"As mentioned earlier, the coroner confirmed to us that the glee alum died on Tuesday, January 30."
Sarin was found near the riverbed of the Sunland Tujunga community in Los Angeles and was pronounced dead on the spot
"The United States confirmed that a family member of sarin reported that he was missing at 3 a.m. before the body was found on Tuesday."
"The 35 year old actor admitted to possession of child pornography involving pre adolescent minors in December 2017 and is due to be sentenced on March 7."
"In October, he agreed to a plea agreement that included four to seven years in prison."
"According to the court documents we had before, sarin was also ordered to pay about $50000 in compensation after being jailed and registered as a sex offender."



Number  1252
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Some interviewed for the story praised McGraw and the show for getting them the help they need, like former heroin addict Niki Dietrich.”
“...whether she was there or not Not all reports were bad though...”
“...to boost ratings...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Among Herzog s claims included what he said was the real story behind his headline making appearance on the program in 2013 in which McGraw said I ve never talked to a guest who was closer to death As viewers saw Herzog had to be carried onto set before his...”
“...sit down with the host because he was intoxicated he registered a 263 blood alcohol content on the show and admitted he had drank an entire bottle of vodka...”
“But that bottle of vodka was provided for Herzog in his dressing room by Dr. Phil producers, Herzog claimed, despite the fact that he had detoxed for two days in a hotel paid for by producers and was sober when he arrived for his scheduled taping.”
“He also alleged that he was given a Xanax to “calm his nerves” before filming.”
“Another bottle of vodka appeared in his dressing room during Herzog’s third appearance on Dr. Phil, Herzog alleged, though he said he did not drink it.”
““The Stat article does not fairly or accurately describe the methods of Dr. Phil, the TV show, or its mission to educate millions of viewers about drug and alcohol addiction.”


"Some of the people interviewed praised McGraw and the show for providing them with the help they needed, such as Nicky Dietrich, a former heroin addict."
“…… No matter whether she was present or not, all the reports were bad... "
“… To improve ratings... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Herzog's statement includes the true story behind his appearance on the front page of the show in 2013. McGraw said in the program that I never told a guest who was getting closer to death, because the audience saw Herzog had to be carried on the set, and then he..."
“…… Sit down with the host, because he was drunk, he registered 263 blood alcohol levels in the program, and admitted that he drank the whole bottle of vodka... "
"But that bottle of vodka was provided by Dr. Phil prosens in the dressing room for Herzog, who claimed that despite the fact that he had been detoxified for two days at a producer paid Hotel and that he was awake when he arrived at the scheduled recording room."
He also claimed that he had been given a tranquilizer before filming, which recently "soothed his nerves."
"When Herzog showed up on Dr. Phil for the third time, there was another bottle of vodka in his dressing room, Herzog said, but he said he didn't drink it."
"Stat's article does not fairly or accurately describe the method of the TV show Dr. Phil, nor does it describe its mission to educate millions of viewers to abstain from drugs and alcohol."



Number  1253
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“PICS: James Van Der Beek Celebrates 'Dawson's Creek' 20th Anniversary With Sweet ThrowbackRelated Gallery...”
“"Oh, and @vanderkimberly -- you’re a f*cking earth goddess rock star and I’m as in awe of you as I am in love with you," he wrote.”
“The actor took to Instagram to announce that he and his wife had welcomed baby no.”
“5 -- daughter Gwendolyn -- on Friday, June 15.”
“The couple are already parents to three daughters, Olivia, 7, Annabel Leah, 4, and Emilia, 2, as well as son Joshua, 6.”
“"Thrilled to announce we welcomed a brand new baby girl into the world Friday morning, just in time for #FathersDay ?"”
“Van Der Beek wrote.”
“These last few days as I ve enjoyed the privilege of making smoothies I know my older kids will like making my wife red raspberry leaf tea to ease her uterine contractions spending boy time with my son and getting my two year old down for a nap in the...”
“...way only I know how I ve been heart sick about something...”
“The former Dawson's Creek star then went on to criticize the Donald Trump Administration's crack down on illegal immigration with a zero-tolerance policy of separating families at the border.”


"Picture: James Vanderbilt celebrates the 20th anniversary of Dawson Creek and sweet retrospective related gallery..."
"Oh, and @ vanderkimberly - you're a damned Earth Goddess rock star, and I fear you as much as I love you," he wrote
"The actor announced on instagram that he and his wife had a second child."
"5 - daughter Gwendoline - Friday, June 15."
"The couple are already the parents of three daughters, Olivia, 7, annabellia, 4 and Emilia, 2, and their son Joshua, 6."
"I'm glad to announce that we have a new baby girl on Friday morning, just in time for father's day?"
"Van der Beek wrote."
"These days, I'm enjoying the privilege of making smoothies. I know that my older children will like to make red berry leaf tea for my wife to relieve her uterine contraction, spend childhood with my son, and let my two-year-old in Take a nap in the bathroom
“… Only I know how upset I am about something... "
"The former Dawson Creek star went on to criticize the Donald Trump Administration for its crackdown on illegal immigrants and its zero tolerance policy of separating homes at the border."



Number  1254
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Most recently he was part of the cast of WGN’s Salem, and played a recurring character on Sons of Anarchy, and voiced The Shadow on ABC’s Once Upon A Time.”
“He went on to TV where he appeared in Californication and Eastbound and Down.”
“He turned to acting when he made his film debut David Lynch’s 1997 film Lost Highway and had a small part in Jawbreaker.”
“Manson rose to fame in the ’90s as a shock rocker that combined macabre and glam rock.”
“No word on additional details of his injury or whether or not this will affect the tour.”
“Manson and his band launched his “Heaven Upside Down” tour just two days ago in Maryland.”
“Journalist Katerine Turman, who was also at the concert, tweeted that he was taken to the hospital and says that he only sustained a leg injury.”
“While doing so, the prop fell on him.”
“As seen in the video below from a concert attendee, Manson was performing and started to climb a giant set piece of two giant pistols.”
“He was taken from the stage on a stretcher and the concert was canceled.”


"Recently, he was a member of WGN's" Salem "crew, playing a recurring role in" the son of anarchy "and dubbing shadow in ABC's" before. "
"He's on TV, he's in California, he's running around."
"When he made his debut in David Lynch's 1997 movie" lost highway, "he turned to acting and played a small role in" the bone breaker. "
"Manson became famous in the '90s as a rock shock singer who combined horror rock with dazzling rock."
"There is no news about more details of his injury and whether it will affect the tour," he said
Two days ago, Manson and his band started their "earth shaking" tour in Maryland
"Journalist katerine Turman, who also attended the concert, tweeted that he was taken to the hospital and that he only had a leg injury."
"When I did that, the props fell on him."
"As you can see from the next video of concert participants, Manson is performing and starting to climb a huge fixture made up of two giant pistols."
"He was carried off the stage on a stretcher and the concert was cancelled."



Number  1255
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My friends were visiting from Italy and brought pasta.”
““I went to Stagecoach and Coachella and stopped at Chick-fil-A.”
“I fit everything.”
““You just think that’s the right thing to do.”
““I thought I have what a lot of women want but can’t get so I better stick with it,” she says.”
“...also comment on her weight asking her how she stayed so thin which felt like a compliment...”
“...girl all in my stomach all in my arms so I lost the weight and I stayed there then I became a control freak about the way I was eating and it just became the norm Mai says people would...”
“I used to be a not-healthy 130-lb.”
“I stayed at that weight because it’s what I thought I should be because I’m already small and I also lost a lot of weight since high school.”
“Everywhere you go in L.A. there is a no-carb option.”


"My friend came from Italy and brought spaghetti."
"I went to the stagecoach and cochella, and stopped at chichfira."
"I'm fit for anything."
"You just think it's the right thing to do."
"I thought I had a lot of what women wanted, but I couldn't get it, so I'd better stick to it," she said
“… He also commented on her weight and asked her how to keep so thin. It felt like a compliment... "
“… Girls are all in my stomach, all in my arms, so I lose weight, I stay there, and then I become a control freak, and it's just becoming normal about my way of eating, and Mai says, "people will..."
"I used to be an unhealthy 130 pound person."
"I always keep this weight because I think I should because I'm very small and I've lost a lot of weight since high school."
"Wherever you go in Los Angeles, there's a carbohydrate free option."



Number  1256
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“Next: He’s not exactly the royal family’s biggest fan.”
““It’s going to be weird for her.”Next: He made this odd comparison to the royal family.”
““So, I hope she likes it,” he added.”
““I mean, they are an emotionally stunted group of fundamentally flawed people doing a very silly pseudo job — that’s what she’s marrying into,” he criticized.”
“‘It’s going to be weird for her’Colbert tried to defend the younger generation of royals by calling them nice, but Oliver wasn’t completely keen on agreeing.”
“...basic sense of she might be marrying into a family that could cause her some emotional complications Next This is where his opinions get pretty harsh...”
“The royal family could cause her emotional complications Oliver argued his point about why he would not blame her if she pulled out of this at the last minute He explained I don t think you need to have just seen the pilot episode of The Crown to get a...”
““You’re British, you married an American woman.”Oliver didn’t have any advice for Harry, but he did issue a harsh warning to Markle: Run.”
“Considering his voiced opinions, he likely wouldn’t end up on the guest list to the wedding, either.”


"Check out the memo on Facebook!"
"Next: he's not exactly the biggest fan of the royal family."
"It would be strange to her." Next: he compares this strange analogy to royalty
"So I hope she likes it," he added
"I mean, they're a group of people who are emotionally retarded, with fundamental flaws, doing a very stupid fake job - that's what she's going to marry," he commented
"It would be strange to her." Colbert tried to defend the younger generation by calling them good people, but Oliver didn't quite agree
“… The basic feeling is that she may have to marry into a family, which may bring her some emotional troubles. Next, this is where his views become quite harsh... "
"The royal family may cause her emotional distress. Oliver demonstrates his view that if she quits at the last moment, why doesn't he blame her? He explains that I don't think you need to see the trial episode of crown just now to get one..."
"You're British. You married an American woman." Oliver didn't give Harry any advice, but he gave mark a stern warning: run
"Given the opinions he expressed, it's very likely that he won't be on the wedding guest list either."



Number  1257
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I feel so proper.”See video: Jon Stewart Can’t Believe Fox News Outrage Over ‘American Sniper’ Oscars ‘Snub’Meanwhile, Cumberbatch’s lips matched up perfectly with lyrics to Mark Ronson’s catchy single featuring Bruno Mars, “Uptown Funk.”Watch the video.”
““I don’t like them, though.”
“Just a regular tuxedo,” Cooper says.”
““Oh, this is a tuxedo.”
““Hey, what is this called again?” Eastwood asks Cooper.”
“A hot pocket,” Leto says in Fallon’s “Celebrity Whispers” segment that aired on Wednesday night.”
“See photos: Oscars Red Carpet Arrivals“You know what I could really go for?”
“The “Tonight Show” host did his version of “Bad Lip Reading” by filling in whispers between Chris Pratt and wife Anna Farris, “American Sniper” star Bradley Cooper and director Clint Eastwood, Benedict Cumberbatch and his wife Sophie Hunter, as well as Eddie Redmayne and Jared Leto.”
“According to Jimmy Fallon, it’s a lot of hilarious nonsense.”
“Ever wonder what Hollywood stars are whispering to each other in between poses on the red carpet?”


"I think it's appropriate." Watch the video: Jon Stewart can't believe Fox News's anger at the "cold shoulder" of the "American sniper" Oscar. Meanwhile, Campbell Bach's lips perfectly match the lyrics of mark Ronson's Ronson's recital single "the horror of the city.". "Watch the video."
"But I don't like it."
"It's just an ordinary tuxedo," Cooper said
"Oh, it's a tuxedo."
"Hey, what's that called? "Eastwood asked Cooper."
"A hot pocket," Leto said on Farren's "celebrity whispers" on Wednesday night
"Look at the pictures: Oscar red carpet is coming." do you know I can really go? "
The host of "Tonight Show" completed his own version of "misinterpretation" by whispering between Chris Platt and his wife Anna Faris, "American sniper" star Bradley Cooper and director Clint Eastwood, Benedict Cumberbatch and his wife Sophie hunt, as well as Eddie Redman and Jared Leto
"According to Jimmy Fallon, it's a lot of funny nonsense."
"Have you ever thought that Hollywood stars would whisper to each other when they pose on the red carpet?"



Number  1258
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I am determined to make 2018 amazing and I want to share things with you along the way."”
“And I am grateful for the people in my life that have been there every step of the way," Carrie wrote to her fan club members.”
“"I am grateful that it wasn't much, much worse.”
“And may we remind you that Carrie is a "Good Girl" and a woman of her word.”
“While Carrie's future plans may not be public for the time being, the singer has the fan base, family support and talents to come back bigger than ever.”
“Thanks."”
“After one follower said she was "praying for you and Carrie" to overcome any "bumps in the road," the hockey player responded with, "We've never been better.”
“And although some tabloid reports have surfaced since Carrie's accident claiming her marriage is struggling, Mike recently shut down any and all speculation on Instagram.”


"I am determined to make 2018 a wonderful year, and I want to share it with you all the way."
"I'm grateful to the people who have been with me every step of my life," Carrie said in a letter to members of the fan club
"I'm glad there's nothing worse, worse."
Allow us to remind you that Carrie is a "good girl" and a woman of her word
"Although Carrie's future plans may not be made public for the time being, the singer has the support and talent of her fans and family, and can be bigger than ever."
"Thank you."
After a follower said she "prayed for you and Carrie" to overcome any "bumps on the road," the hockey player replied, "we've never been better."
"Although some tabloids have reported that Carrie's marriage is in trouble since her accident, Mike has recently shut down all speculation on instagram."



Number  1259
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News’s insider said, “The producers took this really seriously.””
“While the new guidelines won’t stop contestants from getting at least a little drunk — most people would be if they had four drinks in two hours, which the rules allow — E!”
“(Warner Bros. later claimed there was no wrongdoing.)”
“According to a Bachelor in Paradise crew member, Olympios “seemed to go limp” during their sexual encounter in a hot tub.”
“The alcohol crackdown is likely a response to last summer’s Bachelor in Paradise sexual-misconduct scandal, in which Corinne Olympios accused fellow contestant DeMario Jackson of sexually assaulting her when she was too intoxicated to consent.”
“ABC also reportedly implemented a two-drink-per-hour rule, required contestants to log all their drinks, and brought on mental-health and wellness staff members.”
“(Not a bad idea!)”
“News, ABC enforced new alcohol-consumption guidelines on the upcoming Bachelor spinoff, such as forbidding contestants from drinking immediately before competing in any challenges.”
“According to a source who spoke with E!”
“Photo: Lorenzo Bevilaqua/ABCBilled as “a global celebration of unity and love,” ABC’s Olympics-themed The Bachelor: Winter Games will reportedly feature a Nancy Kerrigan appearance, “winter-themed challenges,” plenty of snow, and roses — but not too much booze.”


"Producers attach great importance to this," said a news insider
"Although the new guidelines don't prevent competitors from drinking at least a little, most people will have four drinks in two hours, which is allowed by the rules - E!"
(Warner Brothers later claimed that there was no misconduct.)
Olympia "seems to limp" when having sex in a hot tub, according to a member of the cast of "the Bachelor of heaven"
"The prohibition is likely to be a response to last summer's" Bachelor of heaven "sexual misconduct scandal, in which Corinne Olympus accused the same contestant, demario Jackson, of sexually assaulting her when she was too drunk to agree."
"According to reports, ABC has also implemented a rule of two drinks per hour, requiring contestants to record all drinks, and hiring mental health and health workers."
"That's a good idea!"
ABC has introduced new drinking rules at the upcoming singles trials, such as banning participants from drinking immediately before any challenge, according to news reports
"According to one and E!"
"Photo: Lorenzo bevilaqua / ABC is known as the" celebration of global unity and love. "According to reports, ABC's Olympic theme is bachelor: Nancy krigan will appear in the Winter Olympics," the challenge of winter theme, "a lot of snow and roses - but not too much wine."



Number  1260
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The $174.8 million opening weekend for “Beauty” set a record as the best domestic March launch, topping “Batman v Superman” and solidifying Disney’s status as the current dominant player in the film business.”
“Luke Evans, Kevin Kline, Josh Gad, Ewan McGregor, Stanley Tucci, Audra McDonald, Gugu Mbatha-Raw, Ian McKellen, and Emma Thompson round out the star-studded cast.”
“The cast includes Emma Watson as Belle and “Downton Abbey” alum Dan Stevens as her cursed love interest.”
“Disney spent $160 million making the movie, directed by Bill Condon.”
“Fox’s “Logan” is 2017’s second largest worldwide grosser at $597 million, followed by Warner Bros.-Legendary’s “Kong: Skull Island” at $535 million.”
“Disney-Lucasfilm’s “Rogue One: A Star Wars Story” was the most recent film to hit $1 billion worldwide.”
“Japan is the lone market left to open with an April 21 launch.”
“China is the top foreign market with $85.3 million, followed by the U.K. with $75.3 million, Brazil with $36.7 million, and South Korea with $34.3 million.”
“A similar take on Wednesday would lift the movie over the $1 billion mark.”
“The company reported that “Beauty and the Beast” had grossed $9.7 million on Tuesday to lift its worldwide total to $993.2 million with $435.9 million domestically and $557.3 million internationally.”


The box office of the premiere weekend of "beauty" was 174.8 million US dollars, setting the best domestic release record in March, surpassing "Batman V Superman" and consolidating Disney's current dominant position in the film industry
"Luke Evans, Kevin Klein, Josh Gard, Ivan McGregor, Stanley tooch, Audra MacDonald, Gugu mbata law, Ian McLaren and Emma Thompson all come together."
The cast includes Emma Watson as Bell and Downton Abbey alumnus Dan Stevens as her cursed taste
"Disney spent $160 million on this movie directed by Bill Condon."
"Fox's Logan ranked second at the global box office in 2017 with $597 million, followed by Warner Bros. - legendary's King Kong: Skull Island（ Kong:Skull Island ）And $535 million. "
Disney Lucas film company's "hooligan one: the Star Wars story" is the latest movie with a global box office of $1 billion
"Japan is the only market to go public on April 21."
"China is a world-class foreign market with us $85.3 million, followed by the UK with us $75.3 million, Brazil with us $36.7 million and South Korea with us $34.3 million."
"Wednesday's similar shooting will make the box office of the film exceed 1 billion dollars."
The company reported that the total revenue of beauty and the beast was $9.7 million on Tuesday, reaching $993.2 million worldwide, including domestic revenue of $435.9 million and international revenue of $557.3 million



Number  1261
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...present include Dave Chappelle Eugenio Derbez Ansel Elgort Jane Fonda Jodie Foster Eiza Gonzalez and Ashley Judd Leader of the pack The nominations for the Oscars are led by Guillermo Del Toro s The Shape Of Water which has 13 nods while Dunkirk directed by Christopher Nolan has eight...”
“'Because Taraji's dress was Grecian and flowy, and showed lots of skin, I wanted to make sure she was glowing and moisturized from head to toe!”
“While on the carpet Taraji appeared to throw shade at Ryan Seacrest during their interview on Sunday.”
“Accessorize this Henson kept her accessories to a minimum for the evening wearing only her rings and a simple pair of gold geometric dangle earrings Henson kept her accessories to a minimum for the evening wearing only her rings and a simple pair of gold geometric dangle earrings...”
“Turning back the clock The 47 year old actress wound back the clock looking effortlessly youthful in a sheer black gown Legs for days The actress who was once nominated for her role in The Curious Case Of Benjamin Button showed plenty of her gorgeous gams in the elegant dress...”
“The sheer material on the dress' upper half gave an unfettered view of Taraji's brassiere underneath, as well as showcasing her cleavage.”
“Taraji certainly took every available opportunity to show off her glowing limbs; her garment featured a high split, which the Empire starlet used to full effect, poking out one of her toned pins as she posed on the carpet.”
“I used Vaseline Intensive Care Cocoa Radiant Lotion – made with deep healing moisturizers and Vaseline jelly, it was the perfect choice to show off her healthy, luminous skin.'”
“...a healthy glow...”
“'You know what I mean?'”


“…… Among the attendees were Dave chapel Eugenio delbez Ansel elgott Jane Fonda Judy foster eza Gonzalez and Ashley Judd, who led the Oscar nominees, Guillermo del Toro's the shape of water had 13 nods, while Christophe Nolan's Dunkirk had eight... "
"Because taraji's skirt is Greek, elegant and has a lot of skin, I want to make sure that she shines from head to foot!"
"On the carpet, taraji seemed to cast a shadow over Ryan Seacrest when he was interviewed on Sunday
"Accessories: Hansen only wears a ring and a pair of simple gold geometric hanging earrings to minimize her accessories at night. Hansen only wears a ring and a pair of simple gold geometric hanging earrings to minimize her accessories..."
"Back in time the 47 year old actress turned back a few days and looked very young in a pure black robe. The actress, who was nominated for the role of "the wonderful case of Benjamin Button", shows off many gorgeous men in this elegant dress... "
"The transparent material in the top half of the skirt makes taraji's bra look relaxed at the bottom and shows her cleavage as well."
"Taraji, of course, takes every opportunity to show off her radiant limbs; there is a high tear in her dress, which is used by the imperial actress to give full play to her role when she poses on the carpet, revealing a colored pin."
"I use Vaseline for the cocoa lotion. It is made from deep moisturizer and vaseline jelly. It's the perfect choice to show her healthy, bright skin."
“… The light of health... "
"Do you know what I mean?"



Number  1262
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[4]MTV Generation Award [ edit ]MTV Trailblazer Award [ edit ]Multiple nominations [ edit ]Film [ edit ]The following movies received multiple nominations:Television [ edit ]The following television series received multiple nominations:”
“[3] Winners are listed first, in bold.”
“[2]Winners and nominees [ edit ]The full list of nominees was announced on May 3, 2018.”
“[2]Presenters [ edit ]The first few presenters were revealed on May 23, 2018 with the performers.”
“[1]Performers [ edit ]MTV announced the first few performers on May 23, 2018.”
“The ceremony was hosted by Tiffany Haddish.”
“It was the 27th edition of the awards and the second to jointly honor movies and television.”
“Similar to the 2016 MTV Movie Awards, the event was not aired live and was pre-recorded on June 16 prior to its June 18 broadcast date.”
“The 2018 MTV Movie & TV Awards was held on June 16, 2018, from the Barker Hangar in Santa Monica, California, U.S. and was broadcast on June 18, 2018.”


"[4] MTV generation Award [editor] MTV Pioneer Award [editor] multiple nominations [editor] film [editor] the following films won multiple non award threats: TV series [editor] the following TV series won multiple nominations:
[3] The winners are shown first in bold
"[2] the full list of winners and nominators [editors] nominators was announced on May 3, 2018."
"[2] host [editor] the first batch of hosts were announced with the performers on May 23, 2018."
"[1] performer [Edit] MTV announced the first batch of performers on May 23, 2018."
"The ceremony was presided over by Tiffany hadish."
"This is the 27th golden statue award and the second time that film and television works have been jointly commended."
"Similar to the 2016 MTV Film Awards, the event was not broadcast live, and was prerecorded on June 16 before the broadcast date of June 18."
"The 2018 MTV film and Television Awards will be held on June 16, 2018 in the Barker hangar in Santa Monica, California, and broadcast on June 18, 2018."



Number  1263
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CHECK OUT THE NEW ARRIVALS AT THE PLAYBILL STORE!”
“Spacey won Academy Awards for his performances in American Beauty and The Usual Suspects.”
“Oscar and Tony Award winner and House of Cards star Kevin Spacey is set to host the 71st annual Tony Awards, which will take place Sunday, June 11 at Radio City Music Hall.”
““I was their second choice for Usual Suspects, fourth choice for American Beauty and 15th choice to host this year's Tony Awards.”
“I think my career is definitely going in the right direction,” said Spacey in a statement.”
““Maybe I can get shortlisted to host the Oscars if everyone else turns it down.”Nominations for this year's Tonys will be announced May 2 by two performers who received nods last year: Hamilton's Christopher Jackson and She Loves Me's Jane Krakowski.”
“Read CHRISOPHER JACKSON AND JANE KRAKOWSKI TO ANNOUNCE 2017 TONY NOMINATIONS We re excited to be working with a witty and charming host who is not only a Tony winning actor and fan of live theatre he s also a president who is a true champion of the arts said...”
“Executive Producers Glenn Weiss and Ricky Kirshner...”
“He currently stars as Frank Underwood on the Netflix drama House of Cards, for which he has received a Golden Globe Award and four Emmy nominations for Outstanding Lead Actor in a Drama Series.”
“LOVE BROADWAY?”


"Go to the poster shop and see the new comer!"
"Spacey won an Oscar for her performance in American beauty and ordinary suspect."
Kevin Spacey, Oscar and Tony winner and house of cards star, will host the 71st Tony Awards ceremony, which will be held on Sunday, June 11, at the broadcast City Concert Hall
"I'm their second choice, the fourth choice for American beauties, and the 15th choice for this year's Tony Awards."
"I think my career is moving in the right direction," spacey said in a statement
"If everyone else refuses, maybe I'll be shortlisted for the Oscars." The nomination for this year's Tony Award will be announced on May 2 by two performers who were nominated last year: Christopher Jackson of Hamilton and Jane Krakowski, who loves me
"After reading Christopher Jackson and Jane Krakowski's announcement of Tony's nomination for 2017, we are very happy to work with a funny and charming host, who is not only a Tony Award winner and a fan of live drama, but also a real art champion President..."
"Executive producers Glen Weiss and rich Kirchner..."
"He is currently playing Frank Underwood in Netflix's house of cards, and has been nominated for four outstanding actor roles in the drama series for the Golden Globe and Emmy Awards."
"Love Broadway?"



Number  1264
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the video below and decide for yourself if you want to go as spooky glampire Bella Hadid for Halloween.”
“If your idea of costume makeup is wearing any makeup at all, this might be the look for you.”
“A glampire, if you will.”
“The overall effect of the film is fairly haunting, and Hadid ends up looking like a really glam vampire.”
“There’s a point where she’s wearing a hooded cloak and looking into a mirror but get this: her face is also obscured by a mirror … spooky, Bella!”
“We see her dramatically apply red lipstick, swipe on red blush, and then appear in a dream-like sequence with some funky geometric eyeliner shapes.”
“The short film uses every classic scary-movie trope: creaky doors and cawing crows, ominous organ music and flickering lights, and old-fashioned title cards that spell out the products Hadid is using.”
“Enter condiment-enthusiast Bella Hadid, who puts on some makeup in this spooky, old-fashioned Halloween-inspired film from Dior.”
“Every costume can be upgraded with a good makeup look, and some consist almost entirely of face paint.”
“Photo: Courtesy of DiorCleopatra’s bold eyeliner, Marilyn Monroe’s beauty mark, Pennywise’s entire face: If you like makeup, Halloween gives you a lot to work with.”


"Take a look at the video below and decide for yourself whether you want to dress up as the ghost of glampire Bella Hadid on Halloween."
"If your idea of make-up is make-up, then this may be your look."
"I'm a fool, if you will."
"The overall effect of the film is quite unforgettable, and Hadid looks like a very dazzling vampire in the end."
"For one thing, she was wearing a hooded cloak and looked into the mirror, but she had to understand that her face was covered by the mirror too Weird, Bella
"We saw that she painted the red lipstick in a dramatic manner, brushing her teeth on the red face, and then appeared in a dreamy sequence with some geometric Eyeliner shapes."
"This short film uses every classic horror movie metaphor: creaking doors and croaking crows, ominous organ music and flashing lights, and old-fashioned title cards with the product Hadid is using."
"Condiment lover Bella Hadid is one of them. She put on makeup in this old-fashioned Halloween Horror Movie designed by Dior."
"Every piece of clothing can be upgraded with good make-up, and some clothing is almost entirely composed of facial painting."
Photo: DiorCleopatra bold eyeliner, Marilyn Monroe's beauty, Payn's sensible face: if you love makeup, Halloween will give you lots of work.



Number  1265
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[95]In Memoriam [ edit ]No "In Memoriam" section was broadcast on television during the ceremony, so the HFPA included a slideshow on their website,[96][97] and they included the following names:[98]See also [ edit ]”
“[93] The ratings was a five percent decline from the previous ceremony's viewership of 20.02 million,[94] becoming the lowest since 2012.”
“[1] This Golden Globe Awards ceremony was produced by Dick Clark Productions in association with the Hollywood Foreign Press Association.”
“[2]Talk-show host Seth Meyers hosted the ceremony for the first time.”
“[3][4] Oprah Winfrey was announced as Cecil B. DeMille Lifetime Achievement Award honoree on December 13, 2017.”
“[5][6] The nominees were announced on December 11, 2017, by Sharon Stone, Alfre Woodard, Kristen Bell and Garrett Hedlund.”
“[7]Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri won the most awards for the evening with four, including Best Motion Picture – Drama.”
“[8] The Shape of Water and Lady Bird won two awards each.”
“[9][10] Big Little Lies, The Handmaid's Tale, and The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel were among the television shows that received multiple awards.”
“[11]Winners and nominees [ edit ]The nominees for 75th Golden Globe Awards were announced on December 11, 2017.”


"[95] in commemoration [Edit] during the ceremony, the" in commemoration "part was not shown on TV, so HFPA provided slides on its website, [96] [97], including the following names: [98] see also [Edit]"
"[93] ratings dropped 5% from 20.52 million at the last awards ceremony, [94] the lowest since 2012."
"[1] the Golden Globe Awards ceremony was jointly produced by Dick Clark production company and Hollywood Foreign Journalists Association."
"[2] talk show host Seth Meyers hosted the award ceremony for the first time."
"[3] [4] Oprah Winfrey was announced as the winner of Cecil B. DeMille lifetime achievement award on December 13, 2017."
[5] [6] the nominees were announced on December 11, 2017 by Sharon Stone, Alfred wood, Christine bell and Garrett Hedlund
【7】 Three billboards on the outskirts of ebbing, Missouri, won four of the most awards of the night, including the best film drama award
"[8] shape of water and lady bird won two awards each."
"Little lies", "maid's story" and "the great lady Messer" have won many awards
"[11] winners and nominators [editor] nominators of the 75th Golden Globe Awards were announced on December 11, 2017."



Number  1266
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Bibiana complains about Krystal being too aggressive Tia gets some one on one time with Arie where he admits that he expected her to rock today so when he saw that she was upset about the old woman screaming at her and pulling her hair he thought Huh that...”
“As she stands to leave, she tells the next woman to “have fun,” and those two words have never sounded more like a threat.”
“This one is WAY worse.”
“So remember last week when I said Becca’s shopping excursion was a terrible date?”
“(But instead Tia and Bibiana go cry together in a corner.)”
“Instead, she’s going to insult Bibiana’s mother for naming her child after a Bib, and she’s going to get her fellow wrestler to pull Tia’s hair until she gets angry.”
“The women get to learn from Little Egypt herself, and she will not have them goofing off.”
“This is the opportunity of a lifetime.”
“In their minds, this is not a date.”
“And let me tell you something about these gorgeous ladies of wrestling: They do NOT believe in laughter.”


"Bibiana complains that Krystal is too aggressive. TIA and Arie had a one-on-one relationship once. He admits that he wanted her to rock today, so when he saw that she was upset about the old woman screaming and pulling her hair, he thought, um..."
When she was ready to leave, she told the next woman, "have a good time," which never sounded like a threat
"This is worse."
"Remember last week when I said that Becca's shopping trip was a bad date?"
"But TIA and Bibiana cried together in the corner."
"On the contrary, she would insult Bibiana's mother, because she named her child by bib, and she would let her wrestling companion LATIA's hair until she was angry."
"Women themselves should learn from Little Egypt. She won't let them be lazy."
"It's a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity."
"In their opinion, it's not a date."
"Let me tell you something about these beautiful wrestling girls: they don't believe in laughter."



Number  1267
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ADVERTISEMENT”
“ADVERTISEMENTThat reckless move backfired on the young Brit when it came time to remove the improvised pubic hair.”
“While many would assume he’s always been successful with the ladies, that was not the case when he was younger.”
“During his recent appearance at the Graham Norton Show, the 35-year-old actor revealed that he went through great lengths to impress girls in order to “get lucky”.”
“Just like many others, Dornan too had a typical awkward teenager story.”
“Although one might say, his embarrassing story is more R-rated than romantic.”
“In “one of the worst stories in my locker”, Dornan recalled, “I was quite small and wasn’t hairy at all – I was 15 and looked seven.”
“On one particular day, I was in an amateur drama play and was going to a party after.”
“For my role, I had bits of a black wig glued to my face for a beard and I decided to keep it for the party so I would look older.”
“I also decided to cut up the rest of wig and glue it to my private parts just in case I got lucky“.”


"Advertising"
"That reckless act backfired on the young Englishman, because it was time to remove the impromptu pubic hair."
"Although a lot of people think he is always successful in front of women, he was not when he was young."
The 35 year old actor, who recently appeared on the Graham Norton show, revealed that in order to be "lucky", he spared no effort to impress girls
"Like many other people, Donan has a typical embarrassing teenage story."
"Although some people may say it, his embarrassing story is more R-rated than romantic."
In one of the worst stories in my locker, Donan recalls, "I'm small, not hairy at all - I'm 15, I look 7."
"One day, I went to an amateur drama, and then I went to a party."
"In order to play my part, I glued a black wig to my face and grew a beard. I decided to keep it for the party so that I would look older."
"I also decided to cut off the rest of my wig and stick it to my privacy just in case I'm lucky."



Number  1268
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...all of the backlash her pageant responses elicited from doting conservatives to disappointed liberals our reigning Miss USA has a perfectly patriotic answer That s what social media s about and that s what America s about Land of freedom of expression and home of the tweets...”
“...heralded as an outstanding role model on multiple fronts not just as a black female scientist but as a pageant beauty who insists on wearing her natural curls...”
“Kára McCullough, our new reigning Miss USA, sparked controversy during Sunday night’s crowning due to her polarizing opinions on two separate issues: feminism and health care.”
“Unlike so many of our elected politicians, McCullough’s soundbites were definitive, articulate, and to the point.”
“But it was the content of McCullough’s politics, not her delivery, that left viewers sounding off on social media well into Monday morning.”
“To recap, Miss District of Columbia became an unconventional alt-right darling by insisting that health care is a privilege, not a right.”
““I’m definitely going to say it is a privilege,” McCullough offered during the 30-second question and answer portion of the pageant.”
“As a government employee I am granted health care and I see firsthand that to have health care you need to have jobs Much to the chagrin of Twitter eggs everywhere the 25 year old McCullough has since clarified her position on health care explaining on Good Morning America that...”
“I am privileged to have health care and I do believe that it should be a right and I hope and pray moving forward that health care is a right for all worldwide But McCullough is less likely to backtrack on her other controversial opinion of the night the revelation...”
“...that she self identifies not as a feminist but as an equalist...”


“…… All her reactions in the beauty contest ranged from doting conservatives to disappointed liberals. Our ruling Miss America has a perfect patriotic answer, which is the meaning of social media, the meaning of America about the land of free speech and twitter house.... "
“…… As an outstanding example in many aspects, she is not only a black female scientist, but also a beauty pageant who insists on natural curly hair.... "
"Our new Miss America, Carla McCullough, caused controversy at the coronation on Sunday night because her views were polarized on two different issues: Feminism and health care."
"Unlike many of our elected politicians, McCullough's voice is clear, clear and to the point."
"But it's McCullough's political content, not her speech, that keeps the audience cheering on social media until Monday morning."
All in all, Miss D.C. insists that health care is a privilege, not a right, so she has become an unconventional alternative right-wing pet
"I would certainly say it's a privilege," McCullough said during the 30 second Q & a session of the beauty contest
"As a government employee, I've got health care, and I've seen with my own eyes that to get health care, you have to have a job, which annoys people who have twitter eggs everywhere. In Good Morning America, 25-year-old McCullough clarified her position on health care, explaining that... "
"I'm lucky to have health care, and I believe it should be a right. I hope and pray that health care is the right of all people in the world, but McCullough is unlikely to go back to another controversial point she made on the night of her disclosure..."
“… Her self-identity is not a feminist, but an egalitarian. "



Number  1269
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Where is her real passport?”
“Does she have any money?”
“...reveal that everything he thought he knew about his family and his life is a lie...”
“Jackson McHenry Henry Jennings Imagine if the last thing you ever said to your parents was I ve really gotta split we re in the middle of a ping pong tournament That s the story of Henry Jennings whose world comes crumbling down when Uncle Stan interrupts hockey practice to...”
“That’s one of the most grim things that can happen to a character, and an reminder of how cruel The Americans believes the universe can be.”
“Now he’s a man without a country, all because he decided to stand up for something.”
“As if that’s not tragic enough, his loved ones are surely targets of the KGB because of his actions.”
“Oleg risked his happy life for the sake of principle, and that severed him from his family forever.”
“Sure, it might be something of achievement that Oleg is still alive — even actor Costa Ronin is surprised about that — but it’s all the more disheartening to think that his life got worse the more he tried to be better.”
“He didn’t pass along Philip’s warning about the Center’s plot against Gorbachev, and now he faces a lifetime in jail because the KGB won’t trade him out.”


"Where's her real passport?"
"Is she rich?"
“… It's a lie to expose everything he knows about his family and life... "
"Jackson McHenry Henry Jennings imagine if the last thing you say to your parents is that I'm really breaking up and we're playing a table tennis game, that's the story of Henry Jennings. When Uncle Stan interrupts hockey practice, his world collapses..."
"It's one of the most terrifying things that can happen to a character, and it reminds us that Americans believe in how cruel the universe is."
"Now he's a man without a country because he's determined to stick to something."
"It seems that this is not tragic enough, because his behavior and his relatives must be targets of the KGB."
"For the sake of principle, Oleg risked a happy life, which separated him from his family forever."
"Of course, Oleg's still alive may be an achievement - even the actor Costa ronin was surprised by it - but the more he wanted to get better in his life, the more frustrating it was to think about it."
"He didn't convey Philip's warning that the center was plotting against Gorbachev, and now he faces life imprisonment because the KGB won't trade him out."



Number  1270
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“An insider previously told PEOPLE in April that Scott has been going the extra mile to be there for the mother of his child.”
“I got you,” Scott told the concertgoer.”
“The father of one, 26, helped out a fan during a set at the Rolling Loud Festival in Miami, Florida, on Saturday.”
“Scott was in the middle of a performance when a fan climbed onto the stage after the rapper invited the fan to join him.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a video of the performance, Scott can be seen helping the man onto the stage around the 18-minute mark but security guards quickly close in on the fan, with one shoving him to the floor before landing a kick.”
“The rapper wasn’t having it and shoved the guards away from the fan and helped him to his feet while the audience cheered.”
“A rep for Scott did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“After the guards left the stage, Scott lent the microphone to the fan as the latter jumped around and did his best to recite the lyrics.”
“When it was time for the fan to return to the audience, Scott helped him out by asking for the lights to be turned out and warned police officers to stay away.”


"A person familiar with the matter once told people in April this year that Scott had gone a long way for the sake of his child's mother."
"I got you," Scott told the concert audience
The father of a 26 year old helped a fan at the "loud music festival" in Miami, Florida on Saturday
"Scott is in the middle of a performance. The rapper invites his fans to join him, and one of them climbs onto the stage."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In a performance video, Scott can be seen helping the man get on the stage in about 18 minutes, but security personnel quickly approached the fan, and one of them pushed him to the floor and kicked him."
"In the absence of the rapper, push the guard away from the fan and help him stand up. The audience cheered."
"A representative of Scott didn't immediately respond to requests for comment."
After the guards left the stage, Scott lent the microphone to the fans, who jumped around trying to recite the lyrics
"When the fans came back to the audience, Scott helped him turn off the lights and warned the police not to get close."



Number  1271
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read more:Kanye and John dress up as bunnies for Easter partyChrissy Teigen trolls husband with hilarious Arthur meme...”
“Follow us on Twitter and Instagram for all of the latest celebrity gossip.”
“‘The Late Show with Stephen Colbert’ airs weeknights at 11:35pm on CBS.”
““Tumble dry, tumble dry, tumble dry low.”Phew, we’re feeling a little hot under our beige turtleneck collar.”
““Baby, my beige turtleneck is pilling, so please wash it inside out,” he continued.”
““I like that.”Thankfully, he wasn’t finished.”
“John sat down at the piano to serenade the audience with some extremely relatable lyrics (Photo: CBS)“That’s pretty sexy,” he quipped.”
““There’s no such thing as too many paper towels.” And at this point, we were wondering whether John Legend had ever been more relatable.”
““Honey, I’m running out to the Costco,” the ten-time Grammy Award-winner sang.”
“He then effortlessly crooned his way through a ditty about shopping at Costco for household supplies.”


"Read more: Kanye and John dress up as bunnies for the Easter party, and tiger's Troll husband brings funny Arthur memes..."
"Follow our latest celebrity gossip on Twitter and instagram."
"Stephen Colbert's evening show is on CBS at 11:35 PM."
"Dry, dry, dry." Bah, our Beige turtleneck is a little hot under the collar
"Baby, my beige turtleneck is pilling, so please wash it out," he continued
"I like it." Thank goodness, he's not finished yet
"John sits in front of the piano and serenades the audience with some very appropriate lyrics (photo source: CBS)" "it's sexy," he joked
"There are not so many things in the world." At this point, we want to know if John regend is more appropriate
"Honey, I'm going to Costco," sings the 10th Grammy winner
"Then he effortlessly whispered a little song about buying household goods in Costco."



Number  1272
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Almost everyone is off from work, and only one game happens at a time, so the league’s Thanksgiving games are always among the highest-rated of the season.”
“Loser: Markelle FultzOther than Super Bowl Sunday, Thanksgiving is probably the day each year when the highest percentage of Americans watch the same thing.”
“He finished the team’s 31-23 loss to the Cowboys with five catches on six targets.”
“...time imitating Michael Scott in real life has been a good decision Quinn was playing in just his third career game as an ankle sprain kept him out for most of September and all of October...”
“Quinn not only had a big punt return but also snagged a 10 yard touchdown catch the first of his career 30 yard punt return Touchdown grab The Trey Quinn Sporting News sportingnews November 22 2018 He chose to commemorate the moment with a celebration from The Office the only...”
“On Thursday, Washington receiver Trey Quinn became relevant.”
“Irrelevant until Thanksgiving, that is.”
“No Mr.”
“Irrelevant, fullback Jim Finn, caught the only touchdown pass of his career.”
“Irrelevant had scored a touchdown since 2000, when 1999’s Mr.”


"Almost everyone doesn't work and can only play one game at a time, so thanksgiving is always one of the most watched games of the season
Losers: except for Super Bowl Sunday, Thanksgiving may be the day with the highest percentage of Americans watching the same show every year
"He completed the team's 31-23 loss to the cowboys, six goals hit by five goals."
“…… In real life, it's a good decision for Quinn to imitate Michael Scott in the third game of his career. Because of a sprained ankle, he won't be able to play most of September and October... "
"Quinn not only has a big double round, but also has a 10 yard touchdown to catch up with his career's first 30 yard double round touchdown to catch up with trequine sports news sports news on November 22, 2018, he chose to commemorate this moment and celebrate the only one from the office..."
"On Thursday, the Washington operator, Trey Quinn, became involved."
"It doesn't matter before Thanksgiving."
"No, sir."
"It doesn't matter, guard Jim Finn, caught the only touchdown in his career."
"He's been scoring since 2000, when Mr. Howard was in 1999."



Number  1273
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“March 20 10 a m PST Winners announced Tuesday March 20”
“It was a tight race, but #Avalance is not to be trifled with, y’all.”
“Zimbio’s 2018 TV Couples March Madness Challenge has certainly been a doozy.”
“The match-ups will get even more intense and competitive from here on out, especially since our Elite 8 couples have such loyal fandoms.”
“Good luck to you all in your next battle of the ships!”
“Here are some highlights from the Sweet 16 round:Once Upon a Time’s Emma and Regina have proven their prowess yet again.”
“These magical moms are totally in it to win it, and their victory against Riverdale’s Cheryl and Toni has solidified them as an unstoppable force.”
“Is #SwanQueen the one to beat this year?”
“Newcomers Sara and Ava from DC’s Legends of Tomorrow took out Bellamy and Clarke from The 100.”
“In a surprising turn of events, Supergirl’s Alex and Sam ousted Pretty Little Liars’ veteran couple, Emily and Alison.”


"March 20, 10am PST, Tuesday, March 20, awards announced"
"It's a tough game, but you can't belittle the guarantee."
"Zimbio's 2018 TV lovers parade crazy challenge is undoubtedly a bad match."
"From now on, the competition will become more intense and more competitive, especially because our elite 8 couples have such loyal fans."
"Good luck in the next battleship!"
"Here are some highlights of Sweet 16: Emma and Regina from time magazine proved their strength again."
"These amazing moms are all about winning the competition. They beat Cheryl and Tony in Riverdale to make them an irresistible force."
"Is Swanger the champion of the year?"
"Tomorrow's legendary newcomers from Washington, Sarah and EVA eliminated Bellamy and Clark from the top 100."
Alex and Sam in super girl unexpectedly beat Emily and Alison in little liar



Number  1274
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The statement adds that after the incident, the department launched a “Meet Your Neighbors” community initiative to encourage neighbors to get to know one another and “address situations such as these.”This story has been updated with a statement from the Santa Monica Police Department.”
““Officers recognized the resident and the situation was quickly de-escalated with no use of force occurring.”While Rhames said the event happened this year, the press release describes it as occurring in July 2016.”
“The statement said police received “several calls” from neighbors reporting that a “black male was seen entering a residence and did not live there.”“As officers were assessing the residence, they encountered the resident at the front door,” the statement reads.”
“My problem is ... what if it was my son and he had a video game remote or something, and you thought it was a gun?”The Santa Monica Police Department released a public statement about the incident on Saturday.”
““When I opened up the wooden door, a 9 millimeter is pointed at me.”
““Here I am in my own home, alone in some basketball shorts just because someone called and said a large black man is breaking in,” Rhames said.”
“When Rhames and police questioned the woman who had allegedly made the report ― she lived across the street ― she denied ever calling, the actor said.”
“He said police told him they were responding to a 911 call from a woman who “said a large black man was breaking into the house.”Ian Lawrence via Getty Images Ving Rhames filming scenes for "Mission Impossible 6" in London.”
“The situation de-escalated after the captain recognized Rhames from their sons’ playing sports together and apologized.”
““They say, ‘Put up your hands,’ literally.”According to Rhames, he was confronted by three police officers, the captain of police and a police dog.”


The statement also said that after the incident, the police department launched a "meet your neighbors" community initiative to encourage neighbors to understand each other and "deal with similar situations.". A statement from the Santa Monica police department updated the news
"Police officers recognized the resident and the situation eased rapidly without the use of force." REMs said the incident happened this year, but the press release said it happened in July 2016
The statement said police received "several phone calls" from neighbors saying that "a black man was seen entering a residence, but he did not live there." "While assessing the residence, the police met the resident at the front door," the statement said
"My question is... If it's my son, he has a video game remote control or something, you think it's a gun? "The Santa Monica police department issued a public statement on the matter on Saturday."
"When I opened the wooden door, a 9mm bullet pointed at me."
"I'm in my own home now, alone in basketball shorts, because someone called and said a big black man had broken in," lymes said
"When REMS and the police asked about the woman who was said to be her reporter - she lives across the street - she denied having called, the actor said
He said police told him they had received a 911 call from a woman who "said a tall black man had broken into the house." Ian Lawrence filmed mission impossible 6 in London through Getty Images
"The situation eased after the captain recognized REMs, whose son was playing together, and apologized."
"They say, 'raise your hand,' literally." According to REMs, he met three policemen, a police captain and a police dog. "



Number  1275
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In an interview from his February 2018 GQ cover story posted earlier this week, the 50-year-old late night host opened up about the infamous 2013 Twitter feud with Kanye West.”
““I live for moments like that.”
“When I got in a Twitter battle with Kanye, I was so happy," Kimmel told the mag.”
“"My wife makes fun of me.”
“She's like, ‘You are so happy right now.’ I'm absolutely beaming.”
“I feel very confident in a situation like that."”
“The online war began when Kimmel did a parody sketch on his show, making fun of the rapper's BBC interview in which he claimed he was the "biggest" rock star.”
“West didn't appreciate the joke and exploded on Twitter, calling out Kimmel.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"In an interview with GQ's February 2018 cover story released earlier this week, the 50 year old late night host revealed the infamous feud between twitter and Kanye West in 2013."
"I live for a moment like this."
"I was very happy when Kanye and I were fighting on twitter," Kimmel told the magazine
"My wife made fun of me."
"She said," you're so happy now. " I'm so happy. "
"Under such circumstances, I feel very confident."
"The cyber war began when Kimmel made a parody on his show, making fun of the rapper who claimed to be the" biggest "rock star in a BBC interview."
"West didn't appreciate the joke. He tweeted and yelled at Kimmel."



Number  1276
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But thank God the worst is over.””
““There were nights I couldn’t sleep, that I prayed to God, because it’s a long process.”
““These things, when they happen to you in life, they make you realize that the most important thing isn’t what you thought it was — it’s to have faith, to be strong,” she told TV host Susana Giminez.”
““He has been brave throughout and we continue to be inspired by his courage.”Lopilato opened up about Noah’s health and the impact it had on their family in an interview on Argentinian TV last July.”
““We are so grateful to report that our son Noah has been progressing well during his treatment and the doctors are very optimistic about the future for our little boy,” Bublé told Us at the time.”
“The “Feeling Good” singer gave an update about Noah’s condition to Us last February.”
““Michael is keeping his workload light so he can spend as much time as possible” with his wife and sons.”
““This difficult time has brought them closer together and put things in perspective,” the source said.”
“A source told Us in December 2017 that Noah is “doing well” now and “Michael is ready to think about going back to work.”But the source added that the couple’s focus remains on their family.”
“(The pair also share a second son, Elias, 2.)”


"But thank goodness, the worst is over."
"Some nights I can't sleep and I pray to God because it's a long process."
"These things, when they happen in your life, make you realize that the most important thing is not what you think - it's to have faith and be strong," she told TV host Susannah jiminnes
"He was brave all the time and we continue to be inspired by his courage." In an interview with Argentine television last July, lopirato disclosed Noah's health and its impact on their family
"We are very grateful for the report that our son Noah is going well during the treatment, and the doctors are very optimistic about our little boy's future," he told us at the time
The "feel good" singer gave us an update on Noah last February
"Michael's workload has always been light so that he can spend as much time with his wife and son as possible."
"This difficult period has brought them closer and made things clear," the source said
"A source told us in December 2017 that Noah is now" doing well "and that" Michael is ready to consider going back to work. " But the source added that the couple's focus is still on their family. "
(they also have a second son, Elias, 2 years old.)



Number  1277
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the full performance above.”
“Let’s hope that next summer, things happen more slowly.”
“So a lot happened this summer.”
“In case you forgot, Beyonce gave birth to twins, “Wonder Woman” was a hit at the box office and “Dunkirk” was a movie that starred, among many other actors, Harry Styles of One Direction fame.”
““Plus, he hired Anthony Scarmooch/ who thought Reince Priebus was a total douche/ But that never paid off and Spicer got laid off/ No one in that White House gonna last long.”However, other stuff happened this summer too.”
“Also Read: Confessions of a Late-Night Writer: No, I Don't Love Making Donald Trump Jokes“Donald Trump made comments that brought him shame/ Kept saying that both sides are to blame/ After denouncing the neo-Nazis slowly, slowly,” the host sang.”
“...according to the tune...”
“The song starts off recapping a lot of the politics news that happened in just the past couple of weeks including North Korean threats of aggression and President Donald Trump s comments on the violence in Charlottesville over the weekend in which he said that both sides were to blame...”
“...the most watched video on YouTube...”
“The late night host who expresses his love of song in any way he can performed a cover of Despacito the track by Luis Fonsi featuring Daddy Yankee and Justin Bieber on the remix anyway that tied for the longest leading Billboard Hot 100 number one of 2017 and has...”


"Look at the whole show up there."
"Hopefully things will go more slowly next summer."
"So a lot of things happened this summer."
"If you forget, Beyonce gave birth to twins," Wonder Woman "is popular at the box office," Dunkirk "is a movie starring in many actors, and Harry's style is one-way famous."
"In addition, he hired Anthony scarmouch / he thought reince priebus was a complete idiot / but it never paid off, and Spicer was fired / no one in the White House can last long." However, other things happened this summer as well
The host sang: "read another: confession of a late night writer: No, I don't like to make fun of Donald Trump." Donald Trump's remarks made him feel ashamed / kept saying that both sides had a responsibility / slowly, slowly after denouncing the Neo Nazis. "
“… According to the tune... "
"This song first reviews a lot of political news in the past few weeks, including the threat of aggression from North Korea and President Donald Trump's comments on the violence in Charlottesville last weekend, in which he said that both sides should be blamed..."
“… The most watched videos on YouTube... "
"The late night host expressed his love for songs in any way. With Louis fonsey's song" despair "as the cover and the mix of Yankee dad and Justin Bieber as the leading role, he equaled the top 100 of the longest billboard hits in 2017, and has..."



Number  1278
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...on February 28 at 9 p.m.[Image via E!/Instagram.]”
“On the reading with Kristin, Henry noted:“The reading itself was really profound because her brother made a very clear connection.”
“Ahead of Hollywood Medium‘s February 28 return, the clairvoyant spoke with E!”
“News and teased some chilling moments from his sit down with The Hills alum.”
“Go on…Related: Kristin Set To Have Her Own Reality Show With Jay!”
“As you may recall, the former MTV star lost her brother Michael after he was found deceased in Utah.”
“To make matters worse, the late Mr. Cavallari’s passing was confirmed after an extensive manhunt was led by the authorities.”
“The Utah State Medical Examiner’s Office later ruled Michael’s death an accident due to hypothermia.”
“With the immense amount of tragedy surrounding Michael’s death, we aren’t surprised to learn that his alleged spirit had important messages to share with his family.”
“And I didn’t realize at the time of the reading, Kristin’s parents were actually watching the reading in the other room.”


“… 9 p.m. on February 28 [photo source: e! /Instagram。 ]“
On reading with Christine, Henry said: "reading itself is very profound, because her brother has a very clear connection."
"Before Hollywood media returned to China on February 28th, clairvoyant interviewed e!"
"As he sat with alum on the mountain, he heard some creepy news."
"Go on Related report: Christine will hold her own reality show with Jay
"You may remember that the former MTV star lost his brother Michael after he was found dead in Utah."
"To make matters worse, the death of the late Mr. Cavallari has been confirmed after a large-scale search led by the authorities."
"The Utah coroner's office later ruled that Michael's death was an accident caused by hypothermia."
"Michael's death has brought great tragedy, and we are not surprised to learn that his so-called spirit has important information to share with his family."
"And I didn't realize that Christine's parents were actually reading in another room."



Number  1279
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I could feel her.'”
“And I remember I would scribble in my journal, "I know you're there."”
“The 54-year-old Today anchor took to Instagram on Wednesday to share a heartwarming video of her partner, financier Joel Schiffman, with his arm around Haley as holds onto the lights.”
“'We are going to have the tree lighting of the family tree,' Hoda says in the background of the clip.”
“Too cute Hoda Kotb 54 took to Instagram on Wednesday to share a heartwarming video of her daughter Haley Joy counting down the lighting of their family Christmas tree Adorable Hoda s partner financier Joel Schiffman plugged in the lights prompting Haley to look at the tree in awe The...”
“...small tree is sitting on a window ledge in Hoda and Joel s New York City apartment and he is on his knee ready to plug in the lights...”
“The excited little girl tugs on the cord, possibly in an attempt to help her dad, but he pulls her close and tells her that she can't do that.”
“Haley joins her mom and dad as they count down to five.”
“The adorable tot looks amazed when the tree lights up right in front of her eyes.”
“'Wow!”


"I can feel her."
"I remember scribbling in my diary," I know you're there. "
"The 54 year old today anchor shared on instagram on Wednesday a warm video from her partner, Financier Joel Schiffman, with his arm around Haley, holding the light."
"We're going to have genealogical tree lighting," he said in the background of the clip
"The lovely Hoda Kotb 54 shared a warm video on instagram on Wednesday. Her daughter Haley joy counted the lights of the Christmas tree at home. Joel Schiffman, the partner of the lovely Hoda, put in the lights, prompting Haley to look at the Christmas tree in awe..."
“… The little tree sat on the windowsill of Hoda and Joel's New York City apartment. He knelt down to plug in the light
"The excited little girl pulled the rope, maybe to help her father, but he pulled her very close and told her she couldn't do that."
"Haley and mom count down to five."
"The lovely child looks surprised when the tree lights up in front of her eyes."
"Wow



Number  1280
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s awesome.””
“It was perfect.”Chmerkovskiy adds of Johnson, “My life has changed because of [her,] and I find myself to be the best version of myself that I’ve ever been.”
““Fifteen years later I kept my word.”
“I promised myself then that the next time I would come back to Venice was to propose to the woman I’d want to spend the rest of my life with,” Chmerkovskiy tells PEOPLE in an exclusive statement.”
““When I was 17, I visited Venice for the first time and thought it was the most romantic place in the world.”
“As for his decision to propose in the Italian city, Chmerkovskiy told PEOPLE that he’s known since he was a teenager that one day he would get down on one knee there.”
““Val came to us once he knew he was ready to pop the question and we walked him through the process and helped him design an incredible engagement ring for Jenna,” a representative from the brand tells PEOPLE, adding that the entire process took a month.”
“Image zoom Credit: Valentin Chmerkovskiy / InstagramThe ring, which was designed by Val and Jacob Arabo of Jacob & Co., is made up of a seemingly large rectangular cushion-cut diamond with a diamond halo and a pavé diamond band.”
“The DWTS star simply captioned captioned the shot, “Fiancée.” And Johnson also shared the same photo, writing “He put a ring on it #engaged.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“After proposing to Johnson in Venice, Italy on Thursday, Chmerkovskiy shared a photo of his new fiancée and the ring, which sparkled just as much as her metallic dress.”


"She's wonderful."
"It's perfect," zimmerkovsky added of Johnson. "My life has changed because of (her), and I find myself the best I've ever been."
"Fifteen years later, I kept my promise."
"I promised myself that the next time I went back to Venice, I would propose to the woman I wanted to spend the rest of my life with," zimmerkovsky told people in an exclusive statement
"When I was 17 years old, I went to Venice for the first time and thought it was the most romantic place in the world."
"As for his decision to propose in an Italian city, chimmelkovsky told people that he knew from his teens that one day he would be there on one knee."
A representative of the brand told people that the whole process took a month. "When Val knew he was going to ask this question, he came to us. We accompanied him through the whole process and helped him design an incredible engagement ring for Jenna," he said
"Image zooming credit: Valentin chmerkovskiy / instagram this ring is designed by Val and Jacob arabo of Jacobs company. It consists of a seemingly Huge Rectangular diamond, a diamond halo and a paville diamond band."
The DWTS star simply added the title "fiancee" to the photo. Johnson shared the same photo and wrote, "he's wearing a ring in the photo and engaged." Get news, feature, etc
After proposing to Johnson in Venice, Italy on Thursday, chimmelkovsky shared photos of his fiancee and the ring, which sparkles like her metal skirt



Number  1281
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kim last appeared in public at a solo concert in Seoul this month.”
“The Yonhap agency reported that Kim’s sister had received a text message from her brother shortly before his death that read: “Please let me go.”
“The star, better known as Jonghyun, was found unconscious at his home in Seoul on Monday evening in an apparent suicide, South Korean media reported.”
“SHINee were formed in 2008 by the South Korean company SM Entertainment, and belong to the genre known as K-pop – a highly visual form of Korean pop that incorporates elements of western music.”
“They went on to achieve great success in their home country, selling hundreds of thousands of albums and singles.”
“In 2011, they broke the Japanese market and went on to become one of the most successful South Korean acts in the country: the Japanese-language version of their single Replay sold more than 100,000 copies there.”
“News of Kim’s death prompted a flurry of messages on social media, with many fans voicing disbelief.”
“A Twitter account devoted to K-pop photos said: “Sending our deepest condolences to SHINee Jonghyun and those who known him well.”
“If you’re going through a hard time, please do know that you never walk alone.”
“Talk to someone and take care of yourself.”Another Twitter user wrote: “Today we lost one of the most talented artists in Korea.”


"Kim's last public appearance was a solo concert in Seoul this month."
South Korea's Yonhap news agency reported that Kim Jong Il's sister received a text message shortly before his brother died, saying: "please let me go."
The star was found unconscious at his home in Seoul on Monday night, apparently committing suicide, South Korean media reported
SHINee was founded by South Korea SM Entertainment Company in 2008, belonging to K-pop (a highly visual form of Korean pop music, integrating elements of Western Music)
"They have been a huge success in their homeland, selling hundreds of thousands of albums and singles."
"In 2011, they broke the Japanese market and became one of South Korea's most successful acts: the Japanese version of their single replay sold more than 100000 copies in Japan."
"The news of Kim Jong Il's death triggered a series of messages on social media, and many fans expressed disbelief."
"My deepest sympathy to SHINee Jonghyun and those who are familiar with him," said a twitter account dedicated to K-pop photos
"If you're going through a tough time, make sure you never walk alone."
Another tweeter wrote: "today we lost one of South Korea's most talented artists."



Number  1282
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Enemy Of The State...”
“And and that really is what I d like to say about me you know Related stories Sean Penn s Debut Novel Set To Take On Donald Trump MeToo Dylan Farrow Thanks Oprah Shonda Rhimes For Woody Allen Discussion Update Sean Penn Donald Trump Is An Enemy Of Compassion An...”
““Some people, I think, will really enjoy it, others will loathe it.”
““You know, some people are going to get this book and some people are – not going to get this book,” Penn says in the interview.”
“Does he worry people won’t get the joke?”
“Among his other actions, Honey sends a letter containing a veiled threat to a fictional president.”
“It’s about a septic tank salesman-turned-assassin who kills people with a mallet.”
“The interview is tied to the release of his first novel, Bob Honey Who Just Do Stuff, which is due Tuesday from Simon & Schuster.”
“But there are other aspects of the industry that still do it for him, like writing — which he does in longhand.”
“But I don’t have a visceral – I’m not in love with that anymore.”Maybe all he needs are some tasty waves and a cool buzz and he’ll be fine.”


"Enemies of the country..."
"This is really what I want to say about my story. You know, Sean Pan's first novel collection takes Donald Trump, meto Dylan Farrow, thanks to Oprah Shanda, Rhimes Woody Allen for discussing and updating Sean pan. Donald Trump is the enemy of compassion and..."
"I think some people will really like it, some people will hate it."
"You know, some people will get the book, some people - won't get the book," Penn said in an interview
"Is he worried that people won't understand the joke?"
"In other operations, Hani sent a letter to a fictional president with an implicit threat."
"It's about a septic tank salesman who turns into an assassin and kills with a mallet."
"This interview is related to the publication of his first novel, Bob honey who just do stuff, which will be published by Simon and Schuster on Tuesday."
"But there are other aspects of the industry that still serve him, like writing - he uses shorthand."
"But I've lost my instinct - I don't like it anymore." Maybe he just needs some delicious waves and cool buzz, and he'll be OK. "



Number  1283
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also said that even if she doesn’t have bad feelings for her, she wants nothing to do with Kim ever again.”
“‘Listen.”
“The RHOA star stopped by E!”
“Daily Pop, and she revealed that she hasn’t heard from Kim’s lawyers regarding a supposed lawsuit that she was threatened with.”
“Just in case you don’t remember what we are referring to, back in October 2017, NeNe called Kim and her daughter Brielle Bierman ‘racist trash’ after Brielle shot a video inside her house showing a bug crawling on the floor.”
“In a following interview, Kim stated that ‘I’ve hired a legal counsel at this point.”
“I don’t take this lightly.”
“It’s one thing like I said to kind of banter back and forth and had an opinion.”
“This is far beyond just having an opinion.’[media-credit name=”Source: eonline.com” align=”alignnone” width=”634″] [/media-credit]NeNe now said that she hadn’t been made aware of any lawsuit so far.”
“Every time Kim opens her mouth at least eighty percent of the time, she says a big fat lie,’ NeNe revealed.”


"She also said that even if she didn't feel bad about herself, she didn't want to have anything to do with Kim anymore."
"Listen."
"RhoA, stop by E!"
"Daily pop, she revealed that she had not heard from Kim's lawyer about a hypothetical lawsuit that she was threatened with."
"In case you don't remember what we mean, back in October 2017, after Blair filmed a video showing insects crawling on the floor at home, Nene called Kim and her daughter Blair Bilman" racist trash. "
"In a subsequent interview, king said," I've hired a legal adviser at the moment. "
"I won't take it lightly."
"It's a matter of joking back and forth like I said, and having an opinion."
"It's much more than just an opinion." eonline.com The website "align =" alignnone "width =" 634 "] [/ media credit] now says that she is not aware of any litigation so far."
"Every time Kim talks at least 80 percent, she tells a big lie," Nei revealed



Number  1284
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up here to get INSIDER's favorite stories straight to your inbox.”
“It's safe to say that fans are very invested in the new mom's relationship status — but what's most important is that her baby is healthy and that Khloe is recovering smoothly post-birth.”
“The reality star's family members have begun to post congratulations on social media.”
“Kim Kardashian West even revealed that she was by her sister's side in the delivery room.”
“"You are so strong, you made that look so easy!"”
“...she wrote on Twitter.”
“"I'm so happy I was able to return the favor of holding your leg while you pushed LOL."”
“However, fans seem more interested in whether Khloe's boyfriend Tristan Thompson, who is currently embroiled in cheating rumors, was also present for the birth.”
“The congratulations have begun to roll in for Khloe Kardashian after the birth of her first child — but the most personal message has been posted by Kim Kardashian West, who revealed that she was by her sister's side in the delivery room.”
“"I'm so happy for you!”


"Register here to send insider's favorite stories directly to your in box."
"To be sure, fans are very committed to the new mother's emotional state - but most importantly, her baby is healthy and Khloe has recovered well since she was born."
"Family members of reality TV stars have started posting congratulations on social media."
"Kim Kardashian West even revealed that she was in the delivery room with her sister."
"You're so strong, you look easy!"
“…… She tweeted
"I'm glad I can give you a leg when you push lol." “
"However, fans seem to be more interested in whether colo's boyfriend Tristan Thompson, who is currently involved in rumors of deception, was also present at the wedding."
People began to congratulate Carol Kardashian after her first child was born, but the most personal news was released by Kim Kardashian West, who revealed that she was in the delivery room with her sister
"I'm so happy for you!"



Number  1285
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““They made an effort to look cosier when a crowd built around their table.”A spokesman for David said: “David, Victoria and Brooklyn had a fantastic night together at the Awards and party.”Divorce rumours in the summer were rubbished by their reps.”
“Victoria missed out on British Womenswear Designer of the Year award at Monday’s bash.”
“The £500million couple barely exchanged words during the after party at The British Fashion Awards.”
“7 The Beckhams sat with their backs to each other during the after party7 A sullen Victoria Beckham with husband David at the awards Credit: Getty - ContributorDespite presenting a united front on the red carpet, they went their separate ways once inside The Royal Albert Hall.”
“David, 43, introduced himself to guests at the pre-ceremony dinner alongside pal Dave Gardner.”
“And his friendliness with Rita Ora, 28, in Posh’s absence, set tongues wagging.”
“Frosty Victoria, 44, looked furious during the ceremony as Becks was praised by host Jack Whitehall — even though she was the one up for an award.”
“7 David's friendliness with Rita Ora got party-goers talking Credit: Splash News7 The £500m couple presented a united front at another Fashion Awards bash Credit: Splash NewsJack joked about the football icon stealing the spotlight at the Royal Wedding in May.”
“An insider said: “You’d expect Brand Beckham to do their schmoozing together, but David had only Dave by his side as he made his big entrance.”
“...for life waddle like a duck after fall They were only seen briefly speaking to each other once in about 25 minutes before they left...”


"When a large group of people surround their tables, they try to look more comfortable." A spokesman for David said: "David, Victoria and Brooklyn had a wonderful night at the awards ceremony and the party." The summer divorce rumors were refuted by their representatives
"Victoria missed the British women's designer of the year award at the dance on Monday."
"The 500 million pound couple had little communication at the British fashion Grand Prix after party."
"The Beckhams are sitting back to back at the wedding party while Victoria and her husband David are glum at the awards ceremony. Honor: Getty contributors showed a united front on the red carpet, and they parted as soon as they entered the Royal Albert Hall. "
David, 43, and his friend Dave Gardner introduced themselves to the guests at a dinner before the ceremony
"In Bosh's absence, there was a lot of talk about his friendly attitude towards Rita ora, 28."
Frost Victoria, 44, was furious at the award ceremony, and host Jack Whitehall praised Becks, even though she was one of the winners
"7 David's friendly relationship with Rita ora has made party goers talk about the credit: splash news7, the 500 million pound couple, made a united front contribution at another fashion awards ceremony: splash newsjack joked that football idol took the spotlight at the royal wedding in May."
An insider said: "you may think that the Beckhams brand will chat together, but David is the only one around him because he makes his gate."
“…… I walk like a duck all my life, only to see that they have a brief conversation in 25 minutes before they leave... "



Number  1286
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Leon Bennett/Getty Photographs Jay EllisJay’s present Insecure gained Tv Present of the Yr (Comedy) on the ceremony.”
“Leon Bennett/Getty Pictures Dennis HaysbertThe Reverie actor is photographed on the purple carpet at Sunday’s occasion.”
“Let’s take a look at all the pink carpet style on the Sunday’s award present under:Tiffany Haddish , Angelina Basset , Omari Hardwick and Armie Hammer have been among the many stars in attendance on the occasion over the weekend.”
“Through the ceremony, Regina Corridor took the stage to current Tiffany with the Rising Star honor.”
“Whereas Armie additionally took the stage to current Omari with the Distinguished ABFF Alumni honor.”
“Leon Bennett/Getty Photographs Regina CorridorRegina Corridor introduced the Rising Star Award to Tiffany on the occasion.”
“Throughout her speech, she stated that this yr’s Rising Star Award goes to somebody who’s “humorous and frugal, everyone knows she do not go anyplace with out her coupons in hand.”Arnold Tiffany HaddishHow beautiful does Tiffany look on this Michael Costello gown?”
“Tiffany acquired the Rising Star Award on the occasion and twerked her method onto the stage.”
“She thanked Regina and stated she taught her learn how to “wash her hair with vodka.” Tiffany additionally gave a shout-out to Jordan Peele throughout her speech.”
““Jordan Peele thanks a lot for giving me that job in Keanu, which I assumed was gonna be a cartoon film once I learn the script (laughter).”


"Leon Bennett / Getty filmed Jay Ellis Jay's gift and got yr's TV gift at the ceremony."
"Leon Bennett / Getty pictures Dennis Haysbert, the dreamer, was photographed on the purple carpet on Sunday."
"Let's take a look at all the pink carpet styles at Sunday's awards: Tiffany haddish, with Angelina Bassett, Omari hadwick and Amy hammer at the event last weekend."
"Through the ceremony, Regina corridor stepped onto the stage and presented the new star honor to the current Tiffany."
"In view of the fact that Amie is also on the stage of the current Omari with the honor of outstanding alumni of abff."
"Leon Bennett / Getty photos Regina corridorregiona corridor is here to introduce Tiffany to the new star award."
In her speech, she said this year's new star award went to a "humorous and frugal person, everyone knows she won't go anywhere with a coupon in her hand." How beautiful does Arnold Tiffany hardish Tiffany look in Michael Costello's dress? "
"Tiffany won the new star award on this occasion and put her method on the stage."
She thanks Regina and says she taught her how to "wash her hair with vodka.". Tiffany also yelled at Jordan peel during the speech
"Jordan peel, thank you very much for the job in Keanu. I thought that once I learned script (laughter), that job would become a cartoon movie."



Number  1287
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But I think the fact that it’s been addressed so quickly is really promising.””
““Hopefully we’ll get to a point where this doesn’t happen in the first place, the casting never goes down where you hire the white guy who’s supposed to play an Asian character,” he said.”
““I accepted the role unaware that the character in the original comics was of mixed Asian heritage,” Skrein said in a lengthy statement Monday on Twitter.”
“It is clear that representing this character in a culturally accurate way holds significance for people and that to neglect this responsibility would continue a worrying tendency to obscure ethnic minority stories and voice in the Arts Skrein previously best known for a role in Deadpool made headlines after it...”
“...was announced on Aug 21 that he would play Major Ben Daimio a Japanese American ex Marine in the original comic book series by Mike Mignola...”
“The actor said Monday, he feels it is important to respect the character’s heritage as originally written and for that reason, he is leaving the film.”
““I have decided to step down so the role can be cast appropriately,” he said.”
““Representation of ethnic diversity is important, especially to me as I have a mixed heritage family.”
“It is our responsibility to make moral decisions in difficult times and to give voice to inclusivity RELATED STORY Hellboy casting sparks whitewashing storm It just doesn t make sense Fans and critics blasted the casting last week saying it was another example of Hollywood whitewashing a character that was...”
“...originally intended to be Asian...”


"But I think it's very promising that this issue can be solved so quickly."
"Hopefully we won't have that in the first place, and if you hire a white man to play an Asian, the cast will never go down," he said
"I accepted the character and didn't realize that the characters in the original cartoon were a mixture of Asian descent," scrien said in a long statement on twitter on Monday
"It's clear that it's important for people to express this character in a culturally accurate way, and ignoring this responsibility will continue to be a worrying trend, blurring the voice of ethnic minorities in their stories and art. Scrien was best known for playing a role in the dead pool and later making headlines..."
“…… On August 21, it was announced that he would play major Ben Demio, a former Japanese marine, in Mike Mignola's original comic series. "
"The actor said Monday that he felt it was important to respect the character's tradition and that's why he was leaving the film."
"I decided to resign so that the role could be properly arranged," he said
"The representativeness of ethnic diversity is important, especially for me, because I have a mixed heritage family."
"It's our responsibility to make moral decisions in difficult times and to voice the storm of whitewashing caused by the supporting role of the inclusive story" hell boy. ". It makes no sense at all. Last week, fans and critics attacked the film, saying it was another example of Hollywood whitewashing a role that was... "
“… Originally Asian... "



Number  1288
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Fall in Line...”
“With the ruse obviously up Fallon and Aguilera shed the costumes and continued to entertain the congregators with an acoustic rendition of the singer s Stripped single Fighter Aguilera offered up a third Tonight Show performance this time in Rockefeller Center as opposed to under it with the Liberation single...”
“Before the buskers even hit the first chorus, a throng of passersby stop and whip out their cellphones to capture the unique performance.”
“However, the disguises are pretty much for naught as, within 10 seconds into their cover of Aretha Franklin’s “Think,” it’s evident that the voice booming out of this subway performer is unmistakably Aguilera’s.”
“Aguilera wore a wig and a face-obscuring hat for the incognito performance, which has become a viral staple for the Tonight Show; previous “buskers” include Maroon 5 and U2.”
“Midway through the episode, the singer’s eighth studio LP officially arrived, as Fallon told Aguilera during the interview.”
“Christina Aguilera celebrated the release of new album Liberation by donning a disguise and busking in the New York subway alongside Jimmy Fallon on Thursday’s Tonight Show.”


"Line up..."
"With the increase of deception, Fallon and Aguilera took off their clothes and continued to entertain the audience with the original performance of the singer's stripped single" fighter ". Aguilera held the third performance tonight at Rockefeller Center this time, instead of performing with the liberation single..."
"Before the buskers could start singing, a large group of passers-by stopped and took out their mobile phones to capture this unique performance."
"However, these disguises are almost futile, because within 10 seconds of the cover of Aretha Franklin's thinking, it is clear that the sonorous voice of the subway performer is aquilela's
"Aguilera, wearing a wig and a hat to cover his face, took part in the unknown show, which has become a hot show tonight; former" buskers "include" chestnut 5 "and U2."
As Fallon told Aguilera in an interview, in the middle of the episode, the singer's eighth studio LP officially arrived
"To celebrate the release of her new album" liberation, "Christina Aguilera dressed up with Jimmy Fallon on the New York subway on Thursday's" Tonight Show. "



Number  1289
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And you know, they start doing like karate kicks and all kinds of stuff.”Barack Obama dishes on dad moves on David Letterman’s Netflix talk show | EW.com:”
““And they’re trying stuff that they can’t really pull off.”
““You’ve got to stay in the pocket because I think everybody in here knows dads who get out of the pocket,” he explains.”
““Then Sasha pulls me up, which surprises me because she always mocks my dancing, but I have dad moves.” Obama goes on to say that “staying in the pocket” is key for dads to dance without being embarrassing.”
““This was probably three or four months before he died, and Prince asks Sasha [Obama] to come up and dance, and she’s an excellent dancer,” he recalls.”
“In a teaser for the premiere of the Netflix show My Next Guest Needs No Introduction with David Letterman, former President Barack Obama discusses the time he showcased his dance moves for Prince.”


"And, you know, they started kicking like karate and all kinds of things." "Electronic warfare," Obama said on David Letterman's Netflix talk show
"They're trying something they can't do."
"You have to stay in your pocket because I think everyone here knows the dads who come out of their pockets," he explained
"Then Sasha pulled me up, which surprised me, because she always laughed at my dance, but I had dad's movements." Obama went on to say that "staying in your pocket" is the key for dads to dance without embarrassment
"It was about three or four months before he died, and prince asked Sasha to come up and dance. She was a great dancer," he recalled
"At the Netflix premiere, former President Barack Obama and David Letterman discussed when he would show the prince the dance steps. It was a joke."



Number  1290
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more of Kim's shady self, below.”
“Gaht too excited — christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) January 18, 2018We're just going to need to lie down for a little while to take this all in.”
“Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!”
“When you mess with one member of the Kardashian family, you mess with them all.”
“It looks like Lamar Odom has learned that the hard way after making some recent shady comments about ex-wife Khloe Kardashian.”
“Lamar expressed his well wishes for Khloe as she prepares to welcome her first child into the world during an appearance on the new series Mancave, which premiered on BET this week.”
“However, the retired NBA player also seemed to take some jabs at his ex.”
““I still got my shawty’s name still on me, her initials still on me,” the former Los Angeles Lakers star said on Mancave via Us Weekly.”
““But for no reason.”
“You know what I’m saying?”


"Look down at Kim's dark self."
"It's so exciting - Christina Taigen (@ christyteigen) January 18, 2018, we just need to lie down for a while to accept all this."
"Create a free profile to get unlimited exclusive videos, raffles, etc!"
"When you make trouble with a member of the Kardashian family, you break them up."
"It seems that Odom understood this after making some gloomy comments about his ex-wife, Khloe Kardashian, recently."
Lamar expressed his best wishes to Chloe in this week's premiere of the new series mankaff in bate, as she prepares to welcome her first child into the world
"However, the retired NBA player also seems to have made some attacks on his ex girlfriend."
"I still have shaugty's name on me and her initials on me," the former Los Angeles Lakers star told us weekly in mankaff
"But there's no reason."
"Do you know what I'm talking about?"



Number  1291
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Got any fun makeup ideas in mind for your Super Bowl party this year?”
“Dial down the eyeliner.”
“Looking like you didn't try too hard to look cute.”
“Here are a few makeup tricks that'll make you look extra adorable in that jersey but in a very girl-next-door, born-with-it way.”
“1.”
“Even out your skin tone using BB cream or tinted moisturizer instead of doing full foundation, for an illusion of makeup-free flawlessness.”
“Then go back in with concealer only where needed, like on your undereye circles and blemishes (makeup artists often apply concealer afterward like this because it prevents them from using more than necessary).”
“2.”
“Black can look too harsh for a Sunday afternoon; try brown or a soft neutral color instead, working the color down into your lashes so it defines your eyes without calling attention to itself.”
“What are your favorite girl-next-door makeup moves?”


"Do you have any interesting makeup ideas for this year's Super Bowl party?"
"Pull out your eyeliner."
"It looks like you're not trying to look cute."
"Here are some make-up techniques to make you look cute in that shirt, but if you wear a girl next door, it's natural."
“1.”
"To replace your skin color with BB cream or colored moisturizer instead of making a full foundation is a perfect illusion without makeup."
Then use the concealer, such as your eye circles and blemishes, where you need it. (make-up artists often use this cover, because this prevents them from overusing.
“2.”
Black looks too harsh on Sunday afternoons; try brown or a soft neutral color and apply it to your eyelashes to define your eyes without being noticed
"What's your favorite make-up for the girl next door?"



Number  1292
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Mel B also hinted that all five members of the Spice Girls have been invited.”
“The guest list will include 1,200 young people and others who have served their communities and shown strong leadership.”
“Kensington Palace said Ms Markle and Prince Harry chose American Claire Ptak to create their wedding cake, which will be lemon and elderflower.”
“They asked Ms Ptak to incorporate the "bright flavours of spring" for their 19 May wedding.”
“Ms Markle previously interviewed Ms Ptak for her lifestyle website thetig.com, which she shut down when her relationship with Prince Harry was confirmed.”
“Ms Ptak was brought up in California and previously worked for Alice Waters at Chez Panisse in Berkeley, California.”
“AdvertisementShe moved to Britain and opened her own business, running a market stall in Broadway Market, east London, before opening her own organic bakery in 2010.”
“The lemon and elderflower cake will be covered in buttercream and decorated with fresh flowers.”
“:: Queen approves wedding of 'Prince Henry and Rachel Markle'Kensington Palace said Harry and Ms Markle were "very much looking forward to sharing this cake with their wedding guests".”
“Image: Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in Birmingham this yearMs Ptak said: "I can't tell you how delighted I am to be chosen to make Prince Harry and Ms Markle's wedding cake.”


"Mel B also hinted that all five members of the spice girls were invited."
"The guest list will include 1200 young people and others who serve the community and show strong leadership."
Kensington Palace said that mackle and Prince Harry chose American Claire ptak to make the wedding cake, which will be lemon and elderberry
"They asked Ms. putak to give their wedding ceremony on May 19 a" beautiful spring atmosphere. "
Ms. markel previously interviewed Ms. putak for her lifestyle website thetig.com Website "when her relationship with Prince Harry was confirmed, she closed the website."
Ms. putak grew up in California and used to work for Alice Waters in Chez panis, Berkeley, California
She moved to the UK, started her own business, ran a market stall on Broadway in East London, and then opened her own organic bakery in 2010
"Lemon and elderberry cakes will be covered with cream and decorated with flowers."
"The queen approved the wedding of Prince Henry and Rachel markel," Kensington Palace said. Harry and Ms. markel "are looking forward to sharing this cake with wedding guests."
Photo: Prince Harry and Megan markel in Birmingham this year, Ms. putak said: "I can't tell you how happy I am to be chosen for Prince Harry and Ms. markel's wedding cake."



Number  1293
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To this day that haunts me!”She added, “We’re not bankrupt, we’re not struggling, we’re fine!””
““We’re not perfect, we have made a lot of choices financially with real estate that didn’t work out … and that just escalated into this story about financial struggles, bankruptcy.”
““I thought I was being relatable, talking about how celebrities go through financial struggles, too, we make mistakes, too,” she told PEOPLE.”
“The mother of four explained that the rumors started after she wrote her 2013 book, Spelling It Like It Is.”
“In March, Spelling cleared up reports of financial trouble after credit card company American Express sued her in January for failing to pay her outstanding balance of $37,981.97 since summer 2015.”
“The married couple owed a tax lien for $259,108.23 for unpaid state taxes from 2014, according to court documents obtained by PEOPLE in July.”
“The reality star and her husband are slapped with a tax lien by the state of California.”


"To this day, it's bothering me! She also said, "we're not broke, we're not struggling, we're fine!"
"We are not perfect. We have made a lot of financial choices about real estate, but none of them succeeded It escalates into a story of financial distress and bankruptcy. "
"I think I'm dealing with people, talking about how celebrities go through financial difficulties, and we make mistakes," she told people
"The mother of four explained that the rumor started when she wrote the book in 2013, and she spelled it like this."
"In March, Sperling clarified reports of financial problems after American Express, the credit card company, sued her in January for failing to pay the outstanding balance of $37981.97 since the summer of 2015."
"According to documents obtained by the people's court in July this year, the married couple owed $259108.23 in state taxes since 2014."
"The reality TV star and her husband were given a tax lien by the California government."



Number  1294
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the video below.”
“'”Kimmel closed his monologue with a video tribute to Rickles, showing the best moments from the comedian’s appearance on the ABC show.”
““This is not going to be our usual show tonight,” Kimmel said at the top of his monologue.”
““And I’ll tell you right up front that I’m going to cry — probably a lot, which is embarrassing.”
“But I’m not good with this sort of thing and I’m sorry — especially to those of you who came here to see the show in person, because that’s probably not what you came for.”
“But we lost someone that we and I love very much today.”Rickles died on Thursday at his home in Los Angeles at the age of 90.”
““I was fortunate enough to — not only have Don on this show as my guest — but also to become close to him and his wife Barbara, which was a lot of fun for me,” Kimmel said.”
“Kimmel described Rickles as a towering presence in Las Vegas, where Kimmel grew up, and where Rickles found his greatest success as a stand-up comic.”
“He also described the first time Rickles — who rose to fame as a frequent guest on Johnny Carson’s “Tonight Show” — appeared on “Jimmy Kimmel Live” in 2006.”
““It was so exciting,” Kimmel said.”


"Watch the video below."
"Kimmel ended his monologue with a video saluting Rickles, showing the comedian's best moment on ABC."
"It's not our regular show tonight," Kimmel said at the beginning of his monologue
"I'll tell you straight away that I'm going to cry - probably a lot, which is embarrassing."
"But I'm not very good at this kind of thing, and I'm sorry - especially those who come here to see the show in person, because that may not be your purpose."
"But today we've lost someone we and I love so much." Rix died at his home in Los Angeles on Thursday at the age of 90
"I'm lucky not only to have don on the show as my guest, but also to be close to him and his wife Barbara, which is a great pleasure for me," Kimmel said
"Kimmel describes Rickles as an outstanding presence in Las Vegas, where Kimmel grew up, and Rickles finds his greatest success as a stand up comedy."
He also described Rex's first appearance on the 2006 Jimmy Kimmel live show, a frequent guest of Johnny Carson's tonight show
"It's exciting," Kimmel said



Number  1295
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“PA Media...”
“I’m so proud of what we accomplished.”Michael Buble’s album Love is released on November 16.”
“The Canadian jazz singer’s 10th record is called Love, which is displayed as a heart emoji.”
“It will be released in November and is billed as his most romantic to date.”
“Buble, 43, admitted that he had thought he would not make another album after he and actress wife Luisana Lopilato announced in November 2016 their eldest son Noah had been diagnosed with the disease, aged three.”
“Expand Close Michael Buble returned to live performing with a sold out show in London s Hyde Park in July Isabel Infantes PA Facebook Twitter Email Whatsapp Michael Buble returned to live performing with a sold out show in London s Hyde Park in July Isabel Infantes PA He said...”
“I didn t anticipate returning to recording or performing and I was fine with that...”
““My entire world view has changed completely these last few years.”
“I wanted to spend all my time with my wife and kids.”
“That was my focus.”


"Pa media..."
Michael Buble's album love will be released on November 16
The Canadian jazz singer's tenth record, love, is in the form of heart emoticons
"The film, which will be released in November, is hailed as his most romantic work to date."
"Booble, 43, admitted that he thought he would not make another album after he and his wife, Luisana lopilato, announced in November 2016 that their eldest son Noah had been diagnosed with the disease and was three years old."
"Expand close Michael Buble performed live at Hyde Park in London in July, and the performance sold out Isabel invintes PA Facebook Twitter email WhatsApp Michael Buble performed live at Hyde Park in London in July, and the performance sold out Isabel invintes PA, he said..."
"I didn't expect to go back to recording or performing. I'm very satisfied with that..."
"My view of the world has completely changed in recent years."
"I want to spend all my time with my wife and children."
"That's my point."



Number  1296
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I also highly recommend listening to the book because it's narrated by Chip!”
“Even if you aren't a builder or a realtor or even a business owner this book is still fantastic.”
“(side bar- how funny anyone 10 years ago would have thought that Waco would be on anyone's bucket list!)”
“We have now added visiting the Magnolia empire in Waco to our bucket list.”
“My husband and Chip are basically the same person and I almost always share the same sentiment as Joanna, bless us.”
“I know we don't know them other than what we see via media but because they portray a more real version of themselves and we understand their experiences it's like we know them.”
“We were already huge fans of Fixer Upper, subscribers to Magnolia Journal and frequent Magnolia Market shoppers but now we feel an even deeper connection.”
“Not only did reading this make us feel more concrete and motivated in our decisions to pursue and continue growing our businesses, it made us realize just how unlimited our potential is as long as we work hard.”
“What I did not realize is how much we would BOTH enjoy this book.”
“I initially pre-ordered this book for my husband for his birthday as a way to hopefully help him feel less alone.”


"I highly recommend listening to this book, too, because it's told by chip!"
"Even if you're not a builder or a real estate agent, or even a business owner, this book is still great."
"(narrator - how ridiculous it was 10 years ago that someone thought Waco would be on anyone's list!"
"We've now added a visit to Waco's Mulan Empire to our list."
"My husband and chip are basically the same person, and I almost always have the same feelings as Joanna, blessing us."
"I know we don't know them except what we see through the media, but because they portray a more real self, we know their experience just as we know them."
"We've been a big fan of fixer upper, a subscriber to Magnolia journal, and a regular customer of Magnolia market, but now we feel more connected."
"Reading this article not only makes us feel more specific and motivated in our decision to pursue and continue to develop our business, but also makes us realize how unlimited our potential is as long as we work hard."
"What I didn't expect was that we would both love this book."
"I originally ordered this book for my husband's birthday, hoping to help him reduce his loneliness."



Number  1297
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’re just living in Dallas right now and moving forward with our careers.”Asked if he has a dream wedding in mind, Abasolo had the perfect response.”
““Colombia has come on to the radar recently.”The chiropractor also gave an update on their life at home together, gushing that the two are “so happy together.”“We got Copper, our dog — he’s like an angel,” he said.”
““We don’t know,” he admitted.”
“I think we would definitely enjoy doing it on national television.”RELATED VIDEO: Rachel Lindsay Reveals How Her Engagement Ring Was Partially Inspired by BeyoncéAccording to Abasolo, the two are considering having two ceremonies: one in Dallas, where the couple lives, and one in Colombia, where he is from.”
““And I think that would be the culmination of our love story, or the beginning of it.”
“...definitely be open to a televised wedding Right now we enjoy showing everybody how in love we are he said...”
“Rachel isn t much of a planner so she ll kind of deal with it as it comes along but you know right now we re just taking our time Image zoom Rachel Lindsay and Bryan Abasolo Credit Gregory Pace Shutterstock Abasolo also revealed that he and Lindsay 32 would...”
““2018, it’s gonna happen.”“The only thing is the details haven’t been worked out,” he continued.”
“We definitely want to get married this year, and that’s the plan,” Abasolo, 37, recently told Extra.”
““We haven’t set anything yet.”


"We're just living in Dallas now, continuing our business." When asked if he had a dream wedding, abasolo gave the perfect answer
"Colombia has recently attracted people's attention." The chiropractor also introduced their latest life at home, gushing that they were "so happy together." "We have Cooper, our dog - he's like an angel," he said
"We don't know," he admitted
"I think we're going to love it on national television." Related video: Rachel Lindsay revealed that her engagement ring was inspired in part by Beyonce. According to abasolo, the two are considering two ceremonies: one in Dallas, where the couple live, and the other in Colombia, where he comes from
"I think that will be the climax or the beginning of our love story."
"Now, we will definitely open our hearts to the live TV wedding. We like to show everyone how much we love each other," he said
"Rachel is not a very good planner, so she will deal with it as it comes, but you know now we are just taking our time image zooming Rachel Lindsay and Brian abasolo credit Gregory lipes shutterstock abasolo also revealed that he and Lindsay 32 will..."
"2018 is coming." "The only problem is that the details are not clear," he continued
"We're definitely going to get married this year, and that's the plan," 37 year old abasolo told extra recently
"We haven't decided yet."



Number  1298
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As recently as November, Lindsey told us on "TMZ Live" they were looking forward to rescheduling it sometime in 2021.”
“We will always remain friends and love each other immensely.”
“Subban after all -- they've called off their engagement ... and their romantic relationship, altogether.”
“The sports power couple -- who've been together since at least 2018 -- made a joint announcement Tuesday afternoon ... both posting the same photo with similar captions.”
“Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media.”
“Lindsey writes, "Over the past 3 years PK and I have had some incredible times together.”
“He is a kind, good man, and someone I respect a great deal."”
“She goes on to add, "However, after much consideration we have decided to move forward separately.”
“We ask that you please respect our privacy during this time."”
“Play video content TMZSports.comIt's crazy -- they were actually supposed to get hitched this year but postponed it due to the pandemic.”


"Just last November, Lindsay told us on TMZ live that they were looking forward to rescheduling sometime in 2021."
"We will always be friends and love each other."
"After all, they cancelled their engagement... And their romantic relationship. "
"The sports powerhouse couple - they've been together since at least 2018 - jointly announced on Tuesday afternoon... They both posted the same photos with similar titles. "
"Waiting for your permission to load instagram media."
"In the past three years, PK and I have spent some incredible time together," Lindsay wrote
"He is a kind and good man, and I respect him very much."
She added, "however, after careful consideration, we decided to move forward separately."
"In the meantime, please respect our privacy."
"Play video content" TMZSports.com It's crazy - they were supposed to get married this year, but it was delayed because of the pandemic



Number  1299
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The ensemble cast also includes two-time Emmy winner Tony Hale, Anna Chlumsky, Matt Walsh, Reid Scott, Timothy Simons, Kevin Dunn, Gary Cole and Sam Richardson.”
“Hey cancer, ‘F*ck you!’ Here’s my first post-op photo.”Veep stars Louis-Dreyfus as Selina Meyer, the former vice president and (briefly) president, who is struggling to navigate uncharted political territory.”
“Great doctors, great results, feeling happy and ready to rock after surgery.”
““Hoorah!”
“In January, she celebrated her final day of chemotherapy by sharing a video of sons Charlie and Henry lip-syncing to Michael Jackson’s “Beat It.” The following month, she posted a photo of herself after surgery with the caption.”
“Louis-Dreyfus disclosed her diagnosis last September and posted frequent updates on her progress on social media.”
“The production schedule was pushed due to star Julia Louis-Dreyfus’ cancer surgery and treatment.”
“HBO announced last September that Season 7 would be the last for the multi-Emmy-winning series.”
““Writers are now getting together, with shooting scheduled to begin this fall, and the final Season 7 airing sometime this spring,” he said.”
“HBO president of programming Casey Bloys made the announcement at TCA.”


The crew also includes two time Emmy winners Tony hale, Anna kramsky, Matt Walsh, reed Scott, Timothy Simmons, Kevin Dunn, Gary Cole and Sam Richardson
"Hey, cancer, come on! This is my first post-operative picture. "Veep stars Louis Dreyfus as Selina Meyer, a former vice president and (temporary) president who is trying to navigate the unknown political landscape."
"Great doctors, great results, happy and ready to rock after surgery."
"Wow
In January, to celebrate the last day of chemotherapy, she shared a video of her sons Charlie and Henry lip synching Michael Jackson's beat it. The next month, she posted a picture of herself after the operation, with instructions on it
"Louis Dreyfus disclosed her diagnosis in September last year and frequently posted updates on social media."
"Due to the cancer surgery and treatment of Julia Louis Dreyfus, production was delayed."
"HBO announced last September that the seventh season will be the last of the Emmy series."
"The writers are getting together now and are planning to start shooting this fall, with the seventh episode of the last season to air this spring," he said
"HBO program chairman Kathy bloys announced the news at the TCA."



Number  1300
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News.”
“"[I'm] excited to continue sharing my story because things left off right around when life was becoming hectic and now I get to finish sharing that story," the star told E!”
“She announced in June that she will star on Teen Mom 2 Season 8 with Jenelle Evans, Chelsea Houska, Kailyn Lowry and Leah Messer.”
“My StellyBelly girl  A post shared by Bri Baby (@_brianadejesus) on Jul 4, 2017 at 7:15am PDTDeJesus came to fame on the MTV series 16 & Pregnant before starring on Teen Mom 3.”
“...she wrote on Instagram following her baby shower in May.”
“"Stella, you will be loved and everybody can't wait to meet you!"”
“She announced in January that she was expecting with her then-beau, Luis, and later confirmed she was pregnant with a baby girl.”
“DeJesus is also mom to 5-year-old daughter Nova with ex-boyfriend Devoin Austin.”
“She shared the news by posting a photo of a "Welcome Baby" sheet from Osceola Regional Medical Center in Kissimmee, Fla."What a blessing," the star wrote at the time.”
“DeJesus gave birth to Stella on Sunday, and announced her daughter's arrival the same day.”


"News."
"I'm excited to continue to share my story, because when life gets busy, it's over, and now I can finish sharing this story," the star told e! "
"She announced in June that she would star in the eighth season of teen Mom 2, partnering with Janel Evans, Chelsea hosca, Kylie lorry and Leah MAYSER."
"A post that my Stella Bella girl bri baby (@ \ u brianadejesus) shared on MTV series 16 at 7:15 a.m. on July 4, 2017, became famous before she starred in" teenage mom 3. "
“… She wrote on instagram after her baby bathed in May
"Stella, you will be loved. Everyone can't wait to see you!"
"She announced in January that she was pregnant with her then boyfriend, Louis, and later confirmed that she was pregnant with a baby girl."
"DeJesus is also the mother of her five-year-old daughter Nova and ex boyfriend Devon Austin."
She shared the news by posting a "Welcome Baby" photo at the Osceola regional medical center in kisimi, Florida. "It's a blessing," the star wrote at the time
DeJesus gave birth to Stella on Sunday and announced the arrival of her daughter on the same day



Number  1301
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian, welcomed a baby girl named Chicago via a surrogatein January and her sister Khloe Kardashian is due to give birth in two months.”
“He was arrested after his concert and police claimed he "encouraged people to rush the stage" but his lawyer said video footage did not support the allegations so other charges of inciting a riot and endangering the welfare of a minor were dismissed.”
“On the same day her name was disclosed, it was revealed Stormi's father, rapper Travis Scott - real name Jacques Webster - had pleaded guilty to disorderly conduct for an incident last year at a concert in Arkansas.”
“Image: Pic: Kylie Jenner/YoutubeDuring her pregnancy there were several rumours which she chose not to address, only posting pictures on social media where her stomach could not be seen.”
“Jenner also shared an 11-minute video giving fans a peek into the last nine months, from the time she found out she was expecting until the baby's birth.”
“She said pregnancy had been the most "beautiful, empowering and life changing experience" of her life and she is "actually going to miss it".”
“Image: Pic: Kylie Jenner/YoutubeThe star has been in the spotlight since she was nine years old as part of the Jenner-Kardashian family on reality TV show Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”
“"I knew my baby would feel every stress and every emotion so I chose to do it this way for my little life and our happiness."”
“She said: "There was no gotcha moment, no big paid reveal I had planned.”
“Jenner apologised to fans for "keeping you in the dark" and said she kept the pregnancy private because she needed to "prepare for this role of a lifetime in the most positive, stress free, and healthy way I knew how".”


Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian, is expecting a baby girl named Chicago through a surrogate in January. Her sister, helo Kardashian, will give birth in two months
He was arrested after the concert, and police claimed that he "encouraged people to rush onto the stage," but his lawyer said the video did not support the charges, so other charges of inciting riots and endangering the welfare of minors were dismissed
On the same day that her name was revealed, Tommy's father, rapper Travis Scott (real name Jacques Webster), pleaded guilty to disorderly conduct at a concert in Arkansas last year
"Picture: picture: during Kelly Jenner / utu's pregnancy, there were several rumors that she chose not to publish, just posted some pictures of her belly on social media that she couldn't see."
"Jenna also shared an 11 minute video to give fans a glimpse of the past nine months, from her discovery of pregnancy to the birth of her baby."
She said pregnancy was the most "beautiful, powerful and life changing experience" of her life, and she "will actually miss it."
"Photo source: Kylie Jenner / youtube, a star who has been a member of the Jenner Kardashian family on the reality TV show" keep up with Kardashian "since she was nine years old, has been receiving much attention."
"I know my baby will feel every kind of pressure and emotion, so I choose to do it for my little life and our happiness."
"I didn't seize the moment, I didn't plan to expose," she said
Jenna apologized to fans for "keeping you in the dark" and said she kept pregnancy secret because she needed to "prepare for the role of her life in the most positive, stress free and healthy way I know."



Number  1302
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...be shared between the former spouses...”
“During the summer they will alternate physical custody of Julian on a week on week off schedule Image zoom Robin Thicke and Paula Patton at the Grammy Awards in 2014 Credit Lester Cohen WireImage Julian will also alternate weekends between his parents and expenses including fees for private school will...”
“Earlier this summer, legal documents were filed stating Julian will spend Monday through Wednesday with Thicke and Wednesday through Friday with Patton during the school year.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Baby on the Way for Robin Thicke and April Love Geary — Due on Alan’s Birthday!”
“The parents-to-be started dating in the months following Thicke’s separation from Patton in February 2014, and the couple made their first public appearance together at the Cannes Film Festival in May 2015, just over a year after they started dating.”
“Thicke, 40, is already dad to 7-year-old Julian Fuego, his son with ex-wife Paula Patton.”
“The due date is March 1st, [Robin’s late father] Alan’s birthday!”Geary shared the message alongside a photo of her sonogram, which was dated Aug. 14.”
“The 22-year-old model announced her pregnancy on Instagram in August, writing: “Robin and I are very excited to share with you all that we’re having a baby!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Already so in love with you,” she captioned the picture.”


“…… Shared by former spouse.... "
"In the summer, they will take turns monitoring Julian, week by week, week by week. Photo of JOM Robin hick and Paula button at the 2014 Grammy Awards. Lester Cohen will also take turns to arrange weekends for Julian's parents, and the fees, including those for private schools, will be... "
Earlier this summer, legal documents showed that Julian would spend Monday to Wednesday with hick and Wednesday to Friday with Barton during the school year
"Related video: Robin hick and April love Gehry's baby on the road - Alan's birthday!"
"The couple will start dating within a few months of SECCO's separation from Barton in February 2014 and make their first public appearance at Cannes Film Festival in May 2015, when they started dating for more than a year."
"Hick, 40, is the father of 7-year-old Julian Kindli. He and his ex-wife Paula button are sons."
"The due date is March 1, Alan's birthday! Geary shared the message and attached an ultrasound photo of her on August 14
In August, the 22-year-old model announced her pregnancy on instagram. She wrote, "Robin and I are very excited to share with you everything we have to have a baby!"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I love you so much already," she added a caption to the photo



Number  1303
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 2017 MTV Movie & TV Awards airs in the UK on 8th May at 8pm – only on MTV!”
“Amazing.”
“Massive musical numbers, topless Adam Devine, and the weirdest Stranger Things/Get Out crossover you could possibly imagine, it was Awards Show insanity at its finest.”
“But just because you got your fair dose of fun on-screen, doesn’t mean there wasn’t a load of loopiness happening off-screen.”
“Luckily, we were on the ground to bring you all the backstage, behind-the-scenes gossip.”
“Like these golden nuggets…The venue is hauntedSpeak to any LA local and they’ll happily tell of the city’s many, many ghost stories.”
“A lifetime of fame, fortune and famouses has led to all manner of tragedies, and so it’s unsurprising to hear many of its buildings are supposedly haunted.”
“A quick natter to any of the attendants working at The Shrine, this year’s venue for the MTV Movie & TV Awards, and you’d be regaled with all manner of ghostly stories.”
“Ghosts of actors gone past wandering the halls, and eerie noises late at night, we were ready to channel our inner Ghostbuster HARD.”
“Alas, we didn’t see, hear or even smell a thing.”


"The 2017 MTV film and Television Awards will be broadcast in the UK at 8pm on May 8 - MTV only!"
"Great."
"The huge music numbers, the topless Adam divan, and the strangest thing you can imagine / get out of cross, this is the most wonderful award ceremony."
"But just because you have a lot of fun on the screen doesn't mean there aren't a bunch of loops on the screen."
"Fortunately, we brought you all the backstage and backstage gossip on the spot."
"Like these gold nuggets This place is haunted. Talk to the local people in Los Angeles and they will happily tell many ghost stories about this city. "
"A lifetime of fame and fame leads to all kinds of tragedies, so it's not surprising to hear that many of its buildings are said to be haunted."
"At this year's MTV film and Television Awards ceremony, chat with any attendant who works in the shrine, and you will be attracted by all kinds of ghost stories."
"The ghosts of the actors are wandering in the hall, making strange sounds in the middle of the night. We are ready to try our best to guide the ghosts in our hearts."
"Well, we didn't see anything, we didn't hear anything, we didn't smell anything."



Number  1304
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...it was just some light hearted fun What do you think...”
“Pink tried the same thing with her daughter Willow Last night while you were sleeping mommy and I ate all of your Halloween candy Jimmy Kimmel told his daugher Some people found the prank mean and unfair Others however thought...”
“Channing Tatum Pink and Jimmy Kimmel did to their children recently...”
“Some of the responses are predictable but others might just surprise you h t 22words There s nothing scarier for a kid on Halloween than being told that all of their candy has been eaten So that s exactly what...”
“Scroll down to see for yourself.”
“...or as mean depending on your outlook as you d expect...”
“That s what Channing Tatum Pink Jimmy Kimmel and a whole bunch of other parents did recently for a hilarious section of the Jimmy Kimmel show which Channing has recently been guest hosting and the results are just as funny...”
“Chances are that if you told your kid you’d eaten all of their Halloween candy then they’re probably not going to be very happy about it.”


“… It's just some light fun, don't you think... "
"Last night, when you were sleeping, my mother and I ate all your Halloween candy. Pink did the same to her daughter Yangliu. Jimmy Kimmel told his daughter that some people thought the prank was mean and unfair, but others thought... "
"What did Channing Tatum pink and Jimmy Kimmel do to their children recently..."
"Some people's reactions are predictable, but others may just surprise you with 22 words. There's nothing worse than telling children that they've eaten all their candy, so it's just
Scroll down to see
“… Or, as you would expect, depending on your prospects... "
"That's what Channing Tatum pink, Jimmy Kimmel and a group of other parents recently did for the funny part of the Jimmy Kimmel show. Channing recently acted as guest host, and the result was just as interesting..."
"If you tell your kids you ate all their Halloween candy, they may not be happy."



Number  1305
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We just need more gratitude and more kindness.” See, it’s wise words like that that would make Kathie a killer Grandma!”
“It sounds like her son is already on track to creating a family of his own, but that means Kathie has to share him on holidays, including Thanksgiving this year.”
“Unfortunately, it sounds like we’re going to have to wait a bit longer, because the Today host isn’t putting any pressure on her kids Cody Gifford, 27, or Cassidy Gifford, 24, to procreate.”
““Of course I want to have grandchildren,” she told E!, but admitted she’s willing to be patient.”
““I don’t want my children to marry until they’re ready to, until they find the right person for them and then have a child that they’re ready for.”
“All in God’s timing, not mine.” Luckily, Kathie has plenty of little ones to play with in the meantime.”
““The minute I married my late husband, Frank Gifford, I became an instant grandmother,” she continued.”
““He was already a grandfather so I know what it’s like to have those little ones around, and we have babies around.”Cody, Kathie Lee, and Cassidy Gifford.”
““Cody is going to be with his girlfriend where she lives and see her family this time,” she explained.”
“We do not need any more stuff.”


"We just need more gratitude and kindness." You see, that would make Cathy a murderer, grandma
"It sounds like her son is on track to build his own family, but it means Cathy has to spend holidays with him, including Thanksgiving this year."
"Unfortunately, it sounds like we're going to have to wait for a while, because the host of today doesn't put any pressure on her child, Cody Gifford, 27, or Cassidy Gifford, 24, to have a baby."
"Of course I want to have grandchildren," she told e! But she admitted that she was willing to be patient. "
"I don't want my children to get married until they are ready to get married, until they find the right person for themselves, and then have a child they are ready to have."
"Everything is arranged by God, not by me." Fortunately, Casey has a lot of kids to play with during this period
"The moment I married my late husband Frank Gifford, I became a quick grandmother," she continued
"He's already a grandfather, so I know what it's like to have children around, and we have children around." Cody, Casey Lee and Cassidy Gifford said
"Cody is going to live with his girlfriend this time and visit her family," she explained
"We don't need more."



Number  1306
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lifetime, a go-to for sappy Christmas movies, tweeted that they were happy to welcome the Christmas Prince viewers with open arms.”
“@Johnson_DavidW pointed out that Netflix collects data on paying users, and the tweet "demonstrates that they'll use that data to ridicule specific customers publicly."”
“While it's common knowledge that while you're watching Netflix, the online streaming company is also watching you, the creepy tweet and didn't sit well with the Twittersphere.”
“If you haven't heard of A Christmas Prince, the romantic comedy is about a reporter who tries to get the inside scoop on a playboy prince while pretending to be a tutor.”
“On Sunday evening, Netflix tweeted: "To the 53 people who've watched A Christmas Prince every day for the past 18 days: Who hurt you?"”
“Chris SimsIndianapolis StarSocial media clapped back at Netflix Sunday after the online movie streaming company called out 53 people who can't stop watching a sappy Christmas comedy.”


"In my life, a person who is addicted to Christmas movies tweeted that they are happy to welcome the audience of Prince Christmas with open arms."
"@ Johnson DavidW points out that Netflix collects data from paying users, and tweets" indicate that they will use this data to publicly ridicule specific customers. "
"As you all know, when you're watching Netflix, online streaming companies are watching you, too. This creepy tweet doesn't go well with twittersphere."
"If you haven't heard of Prince Christmas, this romantic comedy is about a reporter pretending to be a tutor trying to get inside information from Prince playboy."
On Sunday night, Netflix tweeted: "to 53 people who have been watching Prince Christmas every day for the past 18 days: who hurt you?"
"On Sunday, the online movie streaming company (Netflix) summoned 53 viewers who couldn't stop watching boring Christmas comedies, and Indianapolis Star social media Chris Sims countered Netflix."



Number  1307
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The professionals will be able to really shape them and make sure you’re doing a great job in between visits.”
“Never getting them professionally done:And, while it’s nice to be able to tweeze and pluck your brows at home, stop in and get them professionally cleaned up once in awhile for a proper grooming and shaping.”
“Like all other areas of your body where hair is involved, if just one is out of place it can throw off the entire look.”
“So, that is of course why we invest in tweezers (oftentimes way too many pairs to count) to groom our brows ourselves.”
“But we all know that picking and prodding at our brows can easily go awry – which is why we’ve compiled a list of mistakes to avoid when tweezing your brows.”
“Read on below and yield your brow “weapons” with caution from now on.”
“Over-plucking:While this might be obvious, we have to say it.”
“Don’t over-pluck your brows.”
“If you’re worried that plucking that hair may be taking things too far, just don’t do it.”
“Brow hairs range in consistency (and are so much more noticeable – they’re on your face!)”


"Professionals will be able to really shape them and make sure you do well between visits."
"Never got their professional completion: and, although it's a good thing to be able to remove eyebrows at home with tweezers, occasionally they stop to let them clean up professionally for proper decoration and shaping."
"Just like the hair of other parts of your body, if one of them doesn't fit, the whole look will be thrown away."
"So that's why we have to invest in tweezers (which are usually too many to calculate) to comb our own eyebrows."
"But we all know that picking eyebrows is easy to make mistakes - that's why we need to avoid a series of mistakes when we use tweezers to clip eyebrows."
"Read on and carefully lower your forehead" weapon "from now on."
"Over picking: when this may be obvious, we have to say."
"Don't raise your eyebrows too high."
"If you're worried that pulling that hair might take things too far, don't pull it out."
"The consistency of the eyebrows is different (and more obvious - they're on your face!)"



Number  1308
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I never wanted to be a Tom Cruise type of megastar.””
““Actually, that’s all I ever wanted.”
““We all want to be involved in something that takes hold of the culture and makes people sit up and say, ‘Hey, that’s interesting,'” he said.”
“It sucks.”Hamm, who appears in this summer’s “Baby Driver,” said he would rather be part of a beloved project that touches the zeitgeist like “Mad Men” than become the world’s biggest A-lister.”
“It’s really hard.”
“Also Read: Tituss Burgess on Why He Has 'No Hopes' for His 'Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt' Character (Video)“It’s hard to be single after being together for a long time,” he said.”
“...being single...”
“It s fun it s adorable but it s the visual equivalent of masturbating there s no point other than immediate gratification The 46 year old actor who split in 2015 from Jennifer Westfeldt his partner of 18 years also said during the interview that he does not particularly enjoy...”
““The point of life is not to put dog ears on yourself and post it online for everyone to see,” Hamm said, referencing Snapchat’s popular filters.”
“Unlike many Hollywood figures, the “Mad Men” alum does not have a social media presence — and he intends to keep it that way.”


"I never wanted to be a Tom Cruise star."
"Actually, that's what I want."
"We all want to get involved in an activity that captures culture and makes people sit up and say," Hey, it's fun, "he said
"Too bad." Ham, who appeared in this summer's baby driver, said he would rather be part of a popular project that touches the spirit of the times like mad men than become the world's biggest first-line star
"It's really hard."
"Read at the same time: Titus Burgess on why he's so hard on his' indestructible Kimmie Schmidt 'character (video)" it's hard to be single after a long time together, "he said
“… Single... "
"It's fun, it's cute, but it's the visual equivalent of masturbation, and there's no other meaning than instant gratification. The 46 year old actor broke up with Jennifer Westfield in 2015, and his partner of 18 years also said in an interview that he didn't particularly like... "
"The point of life is not to put your dog's ear on and post it on the Internet for everyone to see," Ham said
"Unlike many Hollywood characters, Madman's alumni don't have social media - he intends to keep it that way."



Number  1309
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Entertainment...”
“Photo Credit: E!”
“That means KUWTK fans can most likely expect not to see Rob Kardashian, Kanye West or Scott Disick this time around.”
“Kim, who is planning this year's addition of the family tradition, revealed on the Late Late Show with James Corden that the theme of the theme of the card is "women and kids."”
“As for the family's annual Christmas card, it looks like it's women and kids only.”
“The rest of the promo video is full of holiday cheer and a mystery Santa Claus, who Kim is getting a kick out of trying to determine who's under the beard.”
“...she says with a cackle.”
“"She's gonna die when she sees my ice skating rink!"”
“Kris then shares her plan to build the same ice rink that Kim plans on building.”
“Later, after Kim accuses a wigged-out Kris Jenner of stealing her decorating ideas, says that Kim has "taken this way too seriously so I kinda wanna mess with her."”


"Entertainment..."
Image source: e! "
"It means kutek fans are not likely to see Kardashian, West or dirick
"Kim, who is planning to add family tradition this year, revealed in his evening program with James Corden that the theme of the card is" women and children. "
"As for the annual Christmas cards at home, it seems that there are only women and children."
"The rest of the promotional video is full of festive joy, and there's a mysterious Santa, and Kim is trying to determine who's under the beard, which makes him happy."
“…… She said with a giggle
"She's going to die when she sees my rink!"
"Then Chris shared her plan to build the same rink that Kim planned to build."
Later, Kim accused an exhausted Chris Jenner of stealing her decoration idea. She said Kim was "too serious, so I kind of wanted to mess with her."



Number  1310
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...recently been linked to cinematographer Michael Barrett...”
“A post shared by chris pratt (@prattprattpratt) on Nov 3, 2017 at 9:34pm PDTAn eyewitness tells Us Weekly that the Office alum snacked on a giant tub of popcorn as he watched the movie at the Arclight Hollywood with his son and a female and male friend.”
“The Guardians of the Galaxy star, 38, went to a screening of Thor: Ragnarok with his adorable son, Jack, and friends on Friday, November 3.”
“The doting dad shared a sweet snap on Saturday, November 4, of himself posing with his son and a pal as they stretched out their arms and made muscles in front of a Thor poster, captioning it as “HOLY CRAP!!”
“THOR RAGNAROK IS ABSOLUTELY AMAZING!!!”
“We just laughed our asses off!!!”
“So proud to be part of the Marvel universe.”HOLY CRAP!!”
“So proud to be part of the Marvel universe.”


“… I recently got in touch with photographer Michael Barrett... "
"Chris Pratt (@ Pratt Pratt) posted a post at 9:34 p.m. on November 3, 2017, and witnesses told us that the Office Alumni ate a large bowl of popcorn while watching a movie with Arclight Hollywood, his son and a boyfriend and girlfriend."
On Friday, November 3, the 38 year old guardian of the galaxy took his lovely son Jack and friends to watch Thor: ragnaro
On Saturday, November 4, the doting father shared a sweet picture in which he posed with his son and a friend in front of Thor's poster. They stretched out their arms and made a muscle with the words "my God!"
"Ragnaro is absolutely amazing!"
"We just laugh it off!"
"It's so proud to be a member of the miracle world." Oh, my God! "
"I'm very proud to be a member of the miracle world."



Number  1311
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There's nothing wrong with people that have four or five kids, it's just not for us.”
“I don't want more than three.”
“That being said, she has had one "consistent" craving throughout all of her pregnancies, and Decker believes it's one most women share: "Citrus.”
“Decker said that her cravings have "changed every pregnancy, so this one's even been different."”
“As for cravings?”
“We just, we had a mental plan of what to do with the children's names whether it was a girl or a boy.”
“He and I are kinda like that.”
“We've always had the same names picked out for the last four years.”
“News:We knew all of our children's names long before.”
“Apparently it's a long standing tradition in the family to be well prepared in the name department, as she told E!”


"There's nothing wrong with people with four or five children, just not for us."
"I don't want more than three."
In other words, in all her pregnancies, she has a "persistent" desire, which Dirk believes is common to most women: "citrus."
Dirk said her desire "changed every pregnancy, so this time it was even different."
"As for desire?"
"We just, we have a plan in mind, how to deal with the names of children, whether it's girls or boys."
"He and I are a bit like that."
"In the past four years, we've always been singled out for the same name."
"News: we know our children's names are from a long time ago."
"Obviously, it's a long tradition in the family to be ready in the name department because she told e!"



Number  1312
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gomez rose to fame on the Disney Channel and is an actor and singer.”
“Strength is being vulnerable.”
“So I think it was instinctual for me to perform.”
“I loved being able to make people laugh, and if anyone was sad, I didn’t like it.”
“I always tried to make people feel good, to feel something.”
“So whenever I would see my mom perform, I thought, Maybe I’ll have the chance to do that one day.”
“I would use my entire neighborhood as my stage.”
“When I started working as a child, my mom was the person in my life who helped guide me.”
“I understood that acting was a job, that I would have fun, that I would enjoy it—and that if I didn’t enjoy it anymore, that I should stop doing it.”
“I also had school to do.”


"Gomez became famous on the Disney Channel as an actor and singer."
"Strength is fragile."
"So I think acting is my instinct."
"I like to make people laugh. If someone is sad, I don't like it."
"I always try to make people feel good, to feel something."
"So whenever I see my mother's performance, I think, maybe one day I'll have a chance to do it."
"I'll use my whole neighborhood as my stage."
"When I started working as a child, my mother was the one who helped guide me in my life."
"I understand acting is a job, I will be very happy, I will enjoy it, if I no longer enjoy it, I should stop acting."
"I have to go to school."



Number  1313
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'””
“It’s kind of one of those things where you’re fighting with him on the playground, but if someone else says something, you’re like — ‘Hey, I can say that but you can’t!”
““That’s my bro you know?”
“I was just expecting…”He went on to reiterate that there are no hard feelings anymore.”
“In all honesty, we talk all the time, we’ve been talking.”
“...on the topic telling PEOPLE He s been my best friend for 18 years...”
“At the time of the alleged snub Bell shared his disappointment at not being invited with a since deleted set of tweets writing When you re not invited to the wedding the message is clear Loyalty is key ALWAYS remember where you came from Later Peck cooled off a little...”
“The former on-screen brothers have been feuding since June when Peck didn’t invite Bell to his wedding.”
““Hug me,” he wrote while captioning the photo.”
“The former Nickelodeon stars, who rose to fame with the show Drake and Josh,embraced backstage at the award show and Peck shared proof of the moment on Twitter.”


“'””
"It's a situation where you fight with him on the playground, but if someone says something, you say - 'Hey, I can say that, but you can't!"
"That's my brother, you know?"
"I'm just looking forward to..." He went on to reiterate that there is no bad feeling now
"To be honest, we've been talking, we've been talking."
"About telling people he's my best friend for 18 years..."
"When he was accused of neglecting, bell shared his disappointment that he was not invited, because he deleted a group of microblogs, which said that when you were not invited to the wedding, the message was clear, loyalty was the key, always remember where you came from, and then peck calmed down a little bit..."
"Since peck didn't invite bell to his wedding in June, the two former screen brothers have been at loggerheads."
"Hug me," he wrote as he subtitled the photo
"The two former Nickelodeon stars who became famous on Drake and Josh hugged backstage at the awards ceremony, and peck shared the proof of the moment on twitter."



Number  1314
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“Source: GettyAre you sad that the shows are ending?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyThe acronym "WAGS" stands for "Wives And Girlfriends of Sportspersons" and the shows followed these women living the high life.”
“They weren’t a fan of the shows anyway and the ratings weren’t strong enough to consider moving forward."”
“Source: GettySources told The Jasmine Brand exclusively that "There is a new top executive that’s making a lot of changes in terms of programming, especially when it comes to non-scripted projects.”
“...m like Hold up girlfriend Dominique has a whole bunch going on it may not be in the fashion world but I have a lot going on I wish they would have showed more of that...”
“Article continues below advertisement Source Getty She explained I m a fun person and I m all about women empowerment I have my own businesses and I really felt like they showed a lot of the other women with clothing lines and photo shoots and all this stuff and I”
“She told the site, The Jasmine Brand,"It was a great experience for me because it came right on time but I don’t think it really showed who I was."”
“I think there was to the head people of E!, they brought on a whole new staff of development team, and I don’t think the show fit with what they were looking for anymore so they decided to cancel it."”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyDominique explained "WAGS is canceled, the whole franchise.”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"Source: are you sad that the show is coming to an end?"
The article continues with the following advertising source: Getty acronym "wags" stands for "athletes' wives and girlfriends", and the program focuses on these women who live a noble life
"Anyway, they don't like these programs, and their ratings are not high enough to consider moving on."
"Source: gettysource told the jasmine brand exclusively," there is a new executive who has made a lot of changes in programming, especially in non script projects. "
“… I like hold up girlfriend Dominic has a lot going on, it may not be in the fashion world, but I have a lot going on, I hope they can show more... "
"The article continues with the following advertising source, Getty, who explains that I'm an interesting person, I'm all about women empowerment, I have my own business, and I really think they show me a lot of other women with clothing lines and photography and all these things."
"She told the website, jasmine brand," it's a great experience for me as it came, but I don't think it really shows who I am. "
"I think we should have a problem! They brought in a new development team, and I don't think this program meets their requirements, so they decided to cancel it. "
The article continues with the following advertising source: Getty Dominique explains that "the lottery is cancelled, the entire franchise."



Number  1315
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She has since become one of the leading voices speaking out against sexual assault in the film industry, mostly recently addressing a Women's Convention rally in Detroit on Friday.”
“She has accused him of raping her but Weinstein has repeatedly denied all claims of nonconsensual sex "unequivocally."”
“Related: Companies Scramble to Deal With Growing Harassment ComplaintsMcGowan was named in an article by The New York Times as one of the women who settled a sexual harassment suit with now-disgraced media mogul Harvey Weinstein.”
“The warrant has been entered into a national law enforcement database.”
“Police told the AP they've attempted to contact McGowan so she can appear in a Loudoun County, Virginia, court.”
“It is unclear when McGowan first learned of the warrant for her arrest.”
“The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority Police Department did not immediately respond a request for comment.”
“Related: Rose McGowan Vows to Keep Fighting Sexual Misconduct in HollywoodAfter the items allegedly tested positive for narcotics, the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority Police Department obtained a warrant for McGowan's arrest on Feb. 1, the AP reported.”
“The felony charge stems from an investigation of personal belongings left behind on a United flight arriving at Washington Dulles International Airport on Jan. 20, police said, according to The Associated Press.”
“What a load of HORSES--T," McGowan wrote.”


"Since then, she has become one of the major voices in the film industry against sexual assault, mainly in a recent speech at a women's convention rally in Detroit on Friday."
She accused him of raping her, but Weinstein repeatedly denied "unequivocally" all claims of non sexual behavior
"Related report: companies are scrambling to deal with a growing number of harassment complaints. The New York Times named Gowan in an article as one of the women who solved sexual harassment lawsuits with Harvey Weinstein, a now notorious media tycoon."
"The search warrant has been entered into the national law enforcement database."
"Police told the associated press they tried to contact McGovern so she could appear in Lawton County, Virginia."
"It's not clear when McGovern first learned of her arrest warrant."
"The Washington Metropolitan Airport Authority Police Department did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
"Related reports: according to the associated press, rose McGovern vowed to continue to fight against sexual misconduct in Hollywood. It is said that the Metropolitan Airport Authority Police Department in Washington obtained an arrest warrant for McGovern on February 1 after the drug test of these items was positive. "
Police said the felony charge stemmed from an investigation into personal belongings left on a United Airlines flight that arrived at Washington Dulles International Airport on January 20, AP reported
"What a wagon - t," McGovern wrote



Number  1316
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Criss portrays the role of Versace's murderer Andrew Cunanan, the serial killer who also murder at least five people in a three-month time frame before killing himself on July 23, 1997.”
“Stumbleupon Linkedin Comment New details about the highly anticipated The Assassination of Gianni Versace American Crime Story were dropped after the release of a new behind the scene preview...”
“In the featurette that was released by FX, the cast and producers of the second installment of the Ryan Murphy's true crime anthology revealed that they show will delve further into the murder of the legendary fashion mogul Gianni Versace.”
“According to executive producer Nina Jacobson, the show will explain why Versace's death was chosen to be featured in the TV series.”
“"For every season of American Crime Story," Jacobson stated in the video as reported by Daily Mail.”
“"What we're interested in is, what makes this an American crime - a crime that America is guilty of, not just the characters we're exploring."”
“On the other hand, actor Darren Criss believed that Versace's case can be considered as the most extensive FBI manhunt in history that ended in a disaster.”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”


Submit
Chris plays Andrew Cunanan, the serial killer who killed at least five people in three months before he committed suicide on July 23, 1997
"StumbleUpon LinkedIn commented that the new details of the much anticipated American crime story of Versace's assassination were deleted after the release of a new behind the scenes preview..."
"In the FX special, the actors and producers of the second part of Ryan Murphy's real crime collection revealed that they will further study the murder of legendary fashion tycoon Jenny Versace."
"According to executive producer Nina Jacobson, the show will explain why the death of Versace was chosen as the lead character in the series."
"Every season's American crime story," Jacobson said in the video, according to the daily mail
"We're interested in what makes this a crime for the United States - a crime committed by the United States, not just the people we're exploring."
"On the other hand, actor Darren Chris believes that the Versace case could be considered the most extensive manhunt in the history of the FBI, ending in a disaster."
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"



Number  1317
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I think I made a big, big mistake,” she answers mysteriously.”
““Why’d you keep this from us?” he asks her.”
“She needs to be with her parents 30 years from now—not us now.”Instead, she’s stuck at that time and Barry is trying to get to the bottom of it.”
““She could Marty McFly herself right out of existence.”
““Nora shouldn’t be here,” Barry tells Iris in the teaser.”
“To start, his daughter Norah Allen, nicknamed XS, has showed up at his doorstep from the future.”
“The CW series debuted its trailer for the upcoming fifth season at Comic-Con on Saturday and let’s just say Barry Allen is in for a big surprise.”
“The Flash is getting a few visitors.”


"I think I made a big mistake," she replied mysteriously
"Why are you hiding it from us? "He asked her."
"In 30 years, she needs to be with her parents, not now." Instead, she was in trouble at the time, and Barry was trying to figure out the truth
"She can let Marty macpherey fly out on her own."
"Nora shouldn't be here," Barry told iris in the trailer
"First of all, his daughter, Nora Allen, nicknamed XS, has been on his doorstep from the future."
"The CW series launched its upcoming season 5 Trailer for the first time at the comic book conference on Saturday, and we said Barry Allen would have a big surprise."
"The flash attracted some visitors."



Number  1318
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m now doing some light lifting, riding a stationary bike and putting a little.””
“I’m right on schedule.”
“I remain grateful for the amazing support that I continue to receive and for the family and friends that are assisting me.”He mentioned he is recovering from his back injury: “I recently spoke to my surgeon and he’s very pleased with how my fusion is healing.”
“I am continuing to work with my doctors, and they feel I’ve made significant progress.”
“Recently, I had been trying on my own to treat my back pain and a sleep disorder, including insomnia, but I realize now it was a mistake to do this without medical assistance.”
“News saying: “As I previously said, I received professional help to manage my medications.”
“On Monday morning, after the toxicology results were released, Woods issued a statement for E!”
“The agreement includes 12 months of probation and completed DUI education classes.”
“Last week, he got a plea deal to start a DUI diversion program.”
“Woods announced he’d undergo treatment back in June.”


"I'm going to do some light lifting now, ride a stationary bike and put a little bit on it."
"I came as planned."
"I'm still grateful for the support I continue to receive, and for the family and friends who helped me." He mentioned that he is recovering from a back injury: "I talked to my surgeon recently and he is very happy that my fusion is healing."
"I continue to work with my doctors, who feel that I have made significant progress."
"Recently, I've been trying to treat back pain and sleep disorders myself, including insomnia, but I now realize that it's wrong to do so without medical assistance."
"As I said before, I received professional help to manage my medication," the news said
"On Monday morning, after the toxicology results were released, woods issued a statement to e!"
"The agreement includes a 12-month probationary period and completed drunk driving education courses."
"Last week, he got a plea agreement to start the drunk driving transfer program."
"Woods announced that he will be treated in June."



Number  1319
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was an experience that I’ll cherish forever ❤️ pic.twitter.com/TsJDLG370u — Will Forte (@OrvilleIV) May 11, 2018”
“On behalf of our little family, thank you for all of your support.”
“As many have already heard, the show is not being brought back for a fifth season.”
“Series creator and star Will Forte later broke his silence on Twitter:Sad news yesterday.”
“Co-star January Jones announced the series’ demise on Instagram.”
“Last Man on Earth this season averaged a 0.8 demo rating and just under 2 million total weekly viewers (in Live+Same Day numbers), down a tick from Season 3 and ranking sixth in the demo out of Fox’s nine comedies.”
“The axing means that last Sunday’s finale — which ended on a cliffhanger — will now serve as a series finale.”
“It’s the end of the apocalypse as we know it: Fox has cancelled Will Forte’s doomsday satire Last Man on Earth after four seasons, TVLine has confirmed.”


"This is an experience that I will always cherish ❤ ️  pic.twitter.com/TsJDLG370u -Will forte (@ Orville IV) May 11, 2018 "
"On behalf of our small family, I thank you for your support."
"As many people have heard, it won't be replayed in season five."
Will Ford, the creator and star of the series, later broke the silence on Twitter: bad news yesterday. "
"Co Star Jones announced the end of the series on instagram in January."
"The average audience rating of this season's" the last man on earth "is 0.8, with less than 2 million viewers per week (live + number of the day), which is one percentage point lower than that of the third season and ranks sixth among Fox's nine comedies."
"It means that last Sunday's finale - which ended on a precipice - will now be the finale of a series."
"As far as we know, this is the end of the world: according to tvline, fox canceled will Ford's last man on earth after four seasons



Number  1320
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I dedicated my life to my work, and now I’m realizing that there is life, and life exists, and it’s beautiful, and I think part of that is being a parent.””
““I would love to be a dad,” he told TMZ.”
“In a sneak peek at Sunday’s episode of Total Bellas, the pro wrestlers sit down for a candid heart-to-heart — and Bella, 34, makes her position on having kids loud and clear.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I don’t think date nights could ever get old,” she begins.”
““But I think so many years down the road, to keep things exciting, kids help that in a relationship.”
“I just see the point of kids after you’ve been with someone for so long.”But Cena, 41, isn’t on the same page.”
““In a hypothetical universe say I was like, ‘Okay, we’re going to have kids.’ And we do — and you find out that wasn’t the real problem,” he says.”
““And then years from now you look at me and resent.”
“So I’m talking to you tonight and I’m trying to ask all these difficult questions, because I don’t know if you’re just upset that you’re not going to be a mom, or you have fallen out of love with me.”


"I have dedicated my life to my work. Now I realize that life exists, life exists and it is beautiful. I think part of it is to be a parent."
"I really want to be a dad," he told TMZ
"On Sunday's" total Bella, "professional wrestlers sat down and talked frankly - Bella, 34, made her stand on having children clear."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I don't think date nights get old," she began
"But I think after all these years, in order to make things exciting, children will help in love."
"I just understood what it means to be a child with someone else for so long." But senna, 41, is not on the same page
"In a hypothetical universe, I'd say, 'well, we're going to have children,'" he said And then we have - you'll find that's not the real problem. "
"And then a few years later you look at me and resent me."
"So I'm going to talk to you tonight, and I'm trying to ask all these questions, because I don't know if you're upset because you don't want to be a mom, or if you don't love me anymore."



Number  1321
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It is a great disappointment to Mr Rush the STC has chosen to smear his name and unjustifiably damage his reputation in this way,” a representative for Rush said in a statement.”
“Rush, 66, recently performed in a production of Shakespeare’s King Lear between November 2015 and January 2016 at the STC.”
“STC and Rush s representatives but has yet to receive a response...”
“RELATED Matt Lauer Allegedly Harassed Multiple Women Exposed Himself Reports The complainant has requested that their identity be withheld the STC spokeswoman reportedly said adding STC respects that request and for privacy reasons will not be making any further comments PEOPLE has reached out for further comment from both the...”
“A Sydney Theatre Company spokeswoman reportedly said that they had “received a complaint alleging that Mr Geoffrey Rush had engaged in inappropriate behavior” after his “engagement with the company had ended,” but did not elaborate on the nature of the complaint.”
“However, no response was forthcoming,” he added.”
“I also asked why this information was being withheld, and why, according to standard theatre practice the issue had not been raised with me during the production via stage management, the director, my fellow actors or anyone at management level.”
““They refused to illuminate me with the details.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““The moment I became aware of rumors of a complaint I immediately phoned and spoke to senior management at the Sydney Theatre Company asking for clarification about the details of the statement,” the Academy Award said in a statement.”


A representative of rush said in a statement: "it's very disappointing for rush that STC chooses to smear rush's name in this way and damage his reputation unreasonably."
Rush, 66, recently performed Shakespeare's King Lear at STC from November 2015 to January 2016
"Representatives of STC and rush, but no reply has yet been received..."
"It is reported that Matt Raul is suspected of harassing a number of women who reveal their identities, and the complainants request to detain their identities. According to the report, a spokesman for STC said that adding STC respects this requirement and will not make any further comments for privacy reasons. People have contacted both sides for further comments..."
According to reports, a spokesman for the Sydney Theatre Company said they had "received an allegation of misconduct" after Jeffrey rush's "relationship with the company ended," but did not elaborate on the nature of the complaint
"However, there was no response," he added
"I also asked why this information was withheld and why, according to standard theater practice, this question was not raised to me in the production process through stage management, the director, my fellow actors or any management."
"They refused to give me the details."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When I became aware of the rumours of a complaint, I immediately called the senior management of the Sydney Theatre Company to seek clarification of the details of the statement," the Academy said in a statement



Number  1322
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I'm so sorry to everyone – once again.https://t.co/69mGL9t88N — Rachel Platten (@RachelPlatten) April 17, 2018”
“The anthem is such a big deal; it’s probably the most important song for our country,” she said.”
“Many fans tweeted that she still messed up the lyrics her third time around.”
“She nervously grinned at the audience at times, at which point they chimed in to help.”
“See Video: Jimmy Kimmel Has the Perfect Excuse for His Reaction to Fergie's National AnthemHowever, she had to restart the anthem twice because she forgot the words, according to multiple media reports.”
“...before the NWSL soccer game between the Utah Royals and the Chicago Red Stars...”
“I always want to do it justice do a good job and give people the exact version they expect and they want On Saturday the 36 year old singer best known for Fight Song was set to perform The Star Spangled Banner at the Rio Tinto Stadium in Sandy Utah...”
““I always get nervous because it means so much because it is so powerful.”
““I was so nervous going into it.”
“...still feeling so embarrassed about this.”


"I'm sorry for everyone - once again httpshttp://t.co/69mGL9t88N-Rachel  Platten (@ Rachel platten) April 17, 2018 "
"It's a great song, it's probably the most important song in our country," she said
"A lot of fans said on Weibo that she messed up the lyrics for the third time."
"Sometimes she grins nervously at the audience, when they cut in to help."
"Watch the video: Jimmy Kimmel has a perfect reason to explain his reaction to Fergie's national anthem. However, according to a number of media reports, she had to restart the National Anthem twice because she forgot the lyrics. "
“… Before the nwsl football match between the Utah royals and the Chicago red stars
"I always want to do a good thing fairly, to give people an exact version of what they expect, what they want. On Saturday, the 36 year old singer, known for "fight song," will perform "the stars and stripes" at Rio Tinto stadium in sandy, Utah
"I'm always nervous because it's so powerful that it means a lot."
"I was too nervous."
“… Still embarrassed about it. "



Number  1323
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Martin then introduced Spears, a lifelong LGBTQ devotee, as" artist, fighter, and friend. "”
“Instead, she uses her platform to remind audiences around the world that intolerance is unacceptable.”
“She could be one of those stars with a huge LGBTQ following that says nothing and does nothing.”
“It's unbelievable, "said the actor."”
“Britney is a Multiplatin, Grammy Award winner pop icon.”
“"Our ally" Britney Spears – she fights for acceptance in her own way.”
“"We all have to find our own ways to fight against injustice, be it against us, LGBTQ people, immigrants or my fellow Puerto Ricans who are still without food, water and power."”
“...he told the audience...”
“...like I was a mission Gianni Versace s lover Antonio D 39 Amico and sensitize this tragic story GLAAD knows that sharing our stories accelerates acceptance and unfortunately that Life of LGBTQ people famous or not are still at risk...”
“Nine years ago when I became a dad I knew I had to come out in public it was not easy but I met GLAAD and I am so thankful that they could help me and this year I felt...”


Martin went on to introduce spears, a lifelong homosexual, as "artist, fighter and friend."
"Instead, she uses her own platform to remind audiences around the world that intolerance is unacceptable."
"She may be one of those stars with a huge LGBTQ following who say nothing and do nothing."
"It's incredible," said the actor
"Britney is a versatile, Grammy award winning pop icon."
"Our ally" Britney Spears - she's fighting for acceptance in her own way
"We all have to find our own way to fight injustice, whether it's against us, LGBTQ people, immigrants or my fellow Puerto ricans, who still don't have food, water or electricity."
“… He told the audience
“… Just as I am a task, Janey Versace's lover Antonio D 39 Amico and sensitive to this tragic story, grad knows that sharing our story speeds up acceptance. Unfortunately, the life of LGBTQ people who are known or unknown is still in danger... "
"Nine years ago, when I became a father, I knew I had to show up in public, which was not easy, but I met grad, and I really appreciate their help. This year, I feel that..."



Number  1324
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let's take a look at some of the sisters and let's not forget momanger, Kris Jenner's, best blonde moments:Kim often goes blonde, especially for specific shoots and campaigns.”
“The reality TV stars are especially fond of going blonde on the odd occasion, with the exception of model Kendell Jenner and their eldest sister Kourtney Kardashian, who seem to be quite happy with their dark locks.”
“One of the easiest, none surgical, transformations is a change of hair colour.”
“Whether it's their lips, bumps or noses, they still remain the hottest style influencers, especially 37-year-old mom of three, Kim Kardashian West who is usually spotted in outfits from hubby, Kanye West's Yeezy collection.”
“The Kardashian/Jenner clan are always changing their looks.”


"Let's see sisters, don't forget momange, Chris Jenner's best blonde moment: gold often turns blonde, especially in certain shooting and activities."
"In addition to model Kendall Jenner and their elder sister Courtney Kardashian, reality TV stars especially like to turn blonde on strange occasions. They seem to be quite satisfied with their dark hair."
"One of the simplest, non-surgical changes is to change the color of your hair."
"Whether it's lips, bumps or noses, they are still the most popular fashion influencers, especially Kim Kardashian West, the 37 year old mother of three, who usually wears Kanye West's yeezy hubby collection."
"The Kardashian / Jenner family is always changing their looks."



Number  1325
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...kids...”
“It gives me confidence in our relationship knowing that he truly wants to be with me and he took this huge risk to make it happen And both agreed that they were very excited about marriage and starting a family in fact Luyendyk Jr said he wants two to four...”
““Things are moving pretty quickly and everything’s been great.”The couple also admitted that they have yet to watch their season finale — including the painfully raw footage of Luyendyk Jr. ending things with Kufrin.”
““We’re in our condo now and we just bought a new house,” Burnham said on The View.”
“Kufrin is engaged once again, this time after wrapping production on The Bachelorette (her season premieres Monday on ABC), and Luyendyk Jr. and Burnham have moved in together in his hometown of Scottsdale, Arizona.”
“Image zoom Arie Luyendyk Jr. and Lauren Burnham on The BachelorSince then, all three parties involved have moved on.”
“He ultimately decided to break things off with Kufrin, 28, to pursue a relationship with Burnham — and proposed to her on live television during the two-hour After the Final Rose special on March 6.”
“Less than two months after proposing to finalist Becca Kufrin, Luyendyk Jr. realized he was still in love with his runner-up, Burnham.”
“...season of The Bachelor.”
“Luyendyk Jr., 36, and Burnham, 26, were at the epicenter of the most recent (and most controversial!)”


“… The kids
"It made me confident in our relationship because I knew he really wanted to be with me, and he did it at great risk, and both agreed that they were very excited about marriage and family. In fact, little luyandick said he wanted two or four..."
"Things are going very fast and everything is fine." The couple also admitted that they haven't seen the end of their season - including the raw footage of young luyandick and kufrin ending their relationship in agony
"We're living in an apartment now, and we've just bought a new house," Burnham said from the observation deck
"Kuflynn is engaged again, this time after completing the production of" Bachelor "(she premieres on ABC this season on Monday), young luyandick and Burnham have moved to his hometown of Scottsdale, Arizona."
"The single photos of little Ali luyandik and Lauren Burnham are continuing."
"He finally decided to break up with 28 year old kuflin, continue his relationship with Burnham - and propose to her live on TV two hours after the rose special ended on March 6."
"Less than two months after proposing to finalist Becca Coughlin, little luyandick realized that he still loved runner up Burnham."
Singles Day
Little luyandik, 36, and Burnham, 26, were the epicenters of the latest (and most controversial) earthquake



Number  1326
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: RCA Records“Beautiful Trauma” follows the release of “What About Us” and “Revenge,” Pink’s headline-grabbing duet with Eminem.”
“Though the following S&M scene is tame compared to everything Madonna did in the early ’90s, it’s clear that Pink knows how to work that Bettie Page wig.”
“(Nice twirl, Tatum!)”
“After giving Tatum the finishing touch with a swipe of her bright red lipstick, Pink slips into an old-school gangster costume for some cheeky choreography.”
“Then they challenge gender norms: Pink is thrilled to see her husband wearing her clothing in the closet.”
“Around one minute and 15 seconds in, the couple breaks up the hell of relationship monotony with a thrilling dance routine (think more La La Land than, say, Magic Mike).”
“But hey, at least this guy has moves!”
“In her new music video for “Beautiful Trauma,” Pink plays the not-so-perfect, pill-popping ’50s housewife to Tatum’s lazy, flask-loving husband.”
“— and fans can thank Pink for proving that once again.”
“There’s something about pop divas that drives Channing Tatum to dance in drag — remember his performance as Beyoncé on Lip Sync Battle?”


Credit for image zooming: RCA's "beautiful trauma" follows the release of "how are we" and "revenge," a duet between Pinker and Eminem
"Although the following S & M scene looks dull compared to what Madonna did in the early 1990s, it's clear that pink knows how to use Betty Page's wig."
"Good turn, Tatum!"
"After painting her bright red lipstick, Tatum was dressed up as a Gangster Costume of an old school team and made some have no shame to dance."
"Then they challenged gender norms: pink was excited to see her husband in the closet wearing her clothes."
"About a minute and 15 seconds later, the couple broke the hellish monotony of their relationship with a thrilling dance (think of Los Angeles, not magic Mike)
"But hey, at least this guy has action!"
In her new music video for beautiful trauma, Pinker plays an imperfect 1950s housewife and Tatum's lazy, flask loving husband
"Fans can thank pink for proving it again."
"There's something about pop diva that drives Channing Tatum to dance in the drag - remember when he played Beyonce in the mouth fight?"



Number  1327
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...than the military set pieces...”
“But again it s how creatively and artistically you choose to tell a story Also Read NBC Shakes Up Fall Schedule This Is Us Back to Tuesdays Chicago Fire Moves to Thursdays THE BRAVE Then there s The Brave which also promises that it ll be more about the people...”
“They’re cheating on people.”
“They are sleeping with people….”
““Folks in the military, like my brother, like these characters, are human beings.”
“Kyle Jarrow, writer and executive producer on “Valor,” said he was inspired to create a military show because his brother served in the 173rd Airborne, which meant he got a closer look at how that kind of lifestyle affected people.”
“Meanwhile, her colleague Gallo (played by Matt Barr) is in a relationship with another woman who works on the base, but isn’t allowed to interact with her.”
“While the conflicts of the pilot episode revolve around a botched mission and what exactly went wrong, protagonist Nora (played by Christina Ochoa) is dealing with the consequences of her PTSD, going back to flying after a month away and her growing dependence on prescription drugs.”
“Compared to “SEAL Team” and “The Brave,” it’s also specifically female-driven, character-focused and plays to more soapy sensibilities.”
“Also Read: CW 2017-18 Schedule: 'Jane The Virgin' Banished to Fridays, 'Valor' Will Follow 'Supergirl'“VALOR”“Valor” is the CW’s first military drama.”


“… More important than military set pieces... "
"But it's also how you creatively and artistically chose to tell a story and read NBC's shocking fall schedule. This is where we go back to Tuesday, Chicago Fire moved to Thursday, brave, and then brave, promising it will be more about the people..."
"They're cheating people."
"They're sleeping with people..."
"People in the army, like my brother, like these people, are people."
Kyle Jarrow, the writer and executive producer of bravery, said he was inspired to create a military exercise because his brother served in the 173th airborne, which means he has a better understanding of how this lifestyle affects people
"At the same time, her colleague Gallo (Matt Barr) has sex with another woman who works at the base, but is not allowed to associate with her."
"Although the conflict in the pilot episode revolves around a poor mission and what's wrong, the protagonist Nora (played by Christina Ochoa) is dealing with the consequences of her post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD). When she returns to the plane one month after leaving, she becomes more and more dependent on prescriptions."
"Compared with the seals and the brave, it's also driven by women, character centered, and shows more soap opera emotion."
"Also read: CW 2017-18 schedule: 'Virgin Mary' is banished to Friday, 'valiant' will follow 'Supergirl', and 'valiant' is CW's first military drama."



Number  1328
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Under no circumstances did I bite Beyoncé and if I did it would’ve been a love bite.””
“Predator star quickly shut down the accusations on March 26, tweeting, “Y’all are funny.”
“The Love & Basketball star opened up in a new interview about the rumors that she was the actress who bit Beyoncé’s face at a party in December 2017.”
““I think it’s the most absurd thing I’ve ever been involved with,” Lathan, 46, said in her June 2018 cover story for Health magazine.”
““Thank God I’ve been in this business for 20 years and have had so many rumors about me.”
“They used to devastate me in my 20s but in order to survive in this business you just have to let it roll The Affair star insisted that she would never have the audacity to do such a thing to Queen Bey 36 because she is just one of the...”
“Formation singer s many fans...”
““I adore Beyoncé,” she added.”
““I would never do anything malicious like that — to her, or to anyone.”
“It’s so bizarre.”


"In any case, I didn't bite Beyonce. If I did, it was a bite of love."
Predator star quickly closed the charges on March 26, saying on its microblog, "you're all funny."
"The love and basketball star revealed in a new interview that she was the actress who bit Beyonce's face at a party in December 2017."
"I think it's the most ridiculous thing I've ever been involved in," Latan, 46, said in a cover story for health magazine in June 2018
"Thank goodness, I've been in this business for 20 years, and there are so many rumors about me."
"When I was in my 20s, they made me collapse, but in order to survive in this industry, you just need to let it go. The extramarital star insisted that she would never have the courage to do such a thing to Queen Bei 36, because she was just one of them..."
"He has a lot of fans..."
"I adore Beyonce," she added
"I would never do that kind of malicious thing - to her, or to anyone."
"It's weird."



Number  1329
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“PHOTOS: Best Dressed Celebs: February 2018Related Gallery...”
“Phillip Faraone/Getty ImagesMeanwhile, for those non-single ladies, let the world know you're taken like Paris Hilton did with her red heart-shaped Sara Battaglia bag.”
“Take a note of Margot Robbie's flowy dress that mixed a soft pale pink flower print with a touch of ruffles.”
“A great option for a first date is a subtle floral print!”
“One color for Mom, one color for you and another for whoever else tags along!”
“The Big Little Lies star and her daughter, Ava Phillippe, show you that coordinating outfits are a great way to spend a holiday that is all about love.”
“Gotham/GC ImagesReese Witherspoon has the perfect mother-daughter ensemble for a special V-Day date with your family.”
“Pair the delicate dress with an oversized matching blazer to keep things sensual yet sophisticated.”
“Not brave enough to show some skin?”
“Dare to be sexy in a red satin slip with a lace hemline and strappy heels.”


"Photo: best dressed celebrity: February 2018 related galleries..."
"Phillip faraone / Getty Images meanwhile, for non single women, let the world know that you are as accepted as Paris Hilton with her red heart-shaped Sara Battaglia bag."
"Notice Margot Robbie's elegant dress, which is a combination of soft pink floral print and light ruffles."
"The best choice for a first date is a fine print!"
"One color for mom, one color for you, another color for others!"
"The big lie star and her daughter, EVA Phillip, show you that coordinating clothes is a great way to spend a holiday full of love."
"Gotham / GC imagesreese withspoon has the perfect mother daughter ensemble for a special Valentine's day with your family."
"Match the exquisite dress with the oversized matching suit to keep sexy and exquisite."
"Don't you have the courage to show your skin?"
"It's sexy to wear a red satin slipper with lace hem and lace up heels."



Number  1330
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A few people yelled ‘Ariana' from the line and she turned and smiled at them and waved.”
“...shared an eyewitness account of the two at the park:Ariana and Pete were in the front row and he got out first and then turned to her and held out his hand to help her up.”
“While many were baffled at the relationship between Grande and Davidson at first, the couple has done everything in their power to make the world take them seriously.”
“That isn’t surprising considering how quickly these two moved from friends to romantic partners.”
“So, it sounds like Davidson is, in fact, Grande’s type.”
“And humor, of course.”
“She always likes the tattoos.”
“Here’s what McCurdy had to say:Tattoos!”
“Kevork Djansezian/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesKrause also took the opportunity to ask McCurdy what Grande finds appealing in a guy and whether Davidson fits the mold.”
“From what I know of her, he seems like exactly a good person for her.”


"A few people were shouting 'Ariana' in the line, and she turned to smile and wave to them."
“… The witness who shared the two people's description of the park at the scene said: "Ariana and Pete are sitting in the front row. He gets out of the car first, then turns to her and reaches out to help her up."
"Although a lot of people were initially confused about the relationship between grand and Davidson, the couple did their best to get the world to take them seriously."
"It's not surprising considering how fast these two people are going from friends to romantic partners."
"So, it sounds like Davidson is, in fact, the type of grand."
"And humor, of course."
"She always likes tattoos."
"Mccordy has to do this: tattoos!"
"Kevork djansezian / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images Krause also took this opportunity to ask McCurdy Grande what a man is attractive to and whether Davidson is suitable for this model."
"As far as I know, he is a good man to her."



Number  1331
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Winfrey, 63, previously told PEOPLE that she was standing in the film’s press line at Disney’s D23 expo in July when her castmate told her that she’s expecting.”
““If anyone is going to announce big news about your private life, Oprah Winfrey is the person,” said Kaling.”
“WATCH: Pregnant Mindy Kaling Debuts Baby Bump — & Says “The Mindy Project” Will Tackle “Mom Shaming”The mother-to-be also addressed the fact that it was none other than Oprah Winfrey who confirmed the baby news.”
“Then in October, Kaling confirmed to Ellen DeGeneres that she will be welcoming a baby girl.”
“Later that same month, Kaling debuted her baby bump for the first time at the Television Critics Association panel for her show.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“At the time, an insider told PEOPLE that the star “just started telling her friends that she’s pregnant, but she’s not telling anyone — not even close friends — who the father is.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Sources confirmed to PEOPLE in July that the A Wrinkle in Time star is expecting her first child.”
“!’ #themindyproject #laterbaby,” Kaling captioned her photo.”
“‘Exsqueeze me, sir?!?”


Winfrey, 63, once told people that she stood in the press box of the movie at the Disney D23 World Expo in July, and her peers told her that she was looking forward to the movie
"If someone wants to make a big announcement about your private life, Oprah Winfrey is that person," Carlin said
Mindy Carlin, who first reported on the baby boom, said the Mindy project would solve the problem of "mother's humiliation" and the fact that it was Oprah Winfrey who confirmed the baby's news
"Then in October, Karin confirmed to Ellen DeGeneres that she would have a baby girl."
Later in the same month, Karin showed her little lump for the first time on the TV Review Association's program
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
At the time, a person familiar with the matter told people that the star "just started telling her friends that she was pregnant, but she didn't tell anyone - even close friends - who her father was." do you want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"In July, a source confirmed to people that the" wrinkle "star in time will have her first child."
"! Carlin added a caption to her photo:" baby, our little project is at the back. "
"Squeeze me, sir?"



Number  1332
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[10][1]Shakira – vocals, composer, producerAntonio Rayo Gibo – composer, producerA.C. – co-producerKevin ADG – co-producerChan "El Genio" (Rude Boyz) – producerDave Clauss – mixing engineer, recording engineerAdam Ayan – mastering engineerCarlos Hernández Carbonell – recording engineerCharts [ edit ]Certifications [ edit ]Release history [ edit ]”
“The music video for the song garnered media attention due to the appearance of her current partner Gerard Piqué and became her twenty-first Vevo Certified video (collaborations included).”
“The song was released as the fifth single to anticipate Shakira's eleventh studio album El Dorado on 7 April 2017, by Ace Entertainment and Sony Music Latin.”
“The song was written by Shakira and Rayito who also produced the song along the co production of Rude Boyz Kevin ADG and A C 1 2 3 4 5 Background and release edit She teased the song hours prior its release sending personalized postcards to a few fans where...”
“...she appears climbing a tree...”
“She stated in them: "[I'm] very happy to share with all of you my new single 'Me enamoré.'”
“This song narrates a moment in my life when I was so in love that I was literally climbing trees".”
“[5]Composition [ edit ]"Me Enamoré" tells the story of when she fell in love with her current partner Gerard Piqué, whom she met in 2010 on the set of the music video for "Waka Waka (This Time For Africa)", the official song of the 2010 FIFA World Cup.”
“[3]Music video [ edit ]The "Me Enamoré" official lyric video was released via Shakira's Vevo the day of the release of the song.”
“Directed by James Zwadlo, it features the Spanish-language words along watercolor painted images, presumably for the non-Spanish speaking people to understand the song.”


"[10] [1] Shakira - voice, composer, producer lantono Leo GIBO - composer, producer a.c. - co producer Kevin ADG - co producer" El Genio "- producer Duff Klaus - Mixing Engineer, recording engineer Adam Ayan - proficient engineer Carlos Hern á ndez Carbonell – recording engineer chart [Edit] certification [Edit] release history [Edit] "
"The music video of this song has attracted media attention due to the appearance of her current partner Gerald pique, and has become her 21st VEVO certified video (including cooperative works)
"This song is the fifth single released by ACE entertainment and Sony Latin music on April 7, 2017, and Shakira is expected to release her 11th studio album El Dorado."
"This song was written by Shakira and Leito, who also produced the song by rude boy Kevin ADG and a C12 345 background and release editor. She joked about sending personalized postcards to some fans a few hours before the release of the song. There..."
“… She seems to be climbing a tree... "
"It's a pleasure to share with you my new single," she said in the letter
"This song tells of a moment in my life when I was in love and climbing a tree."
"[5] composer [editor]" my lover "tells the story of her falling in love with her current partner Gerald pikui, whom she met in 2010 on the music video set of the official FIFA World Cup Song" wakawaka "(this time for Africa)
"[3] Music Video [editor] the official lyrics video of my lover was released through Shakira's VEVO on the day of song release."
Directed by James zwadro, it features Spanish words and watercolor images, probably to make the song accessible to people in non Spanish speaking countries



Number  1333
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know what you think in the comments!”
“Who do you want to see play Lois Lane?”
“The Man of Steel will also be joined by Lois Lane, marking the power couple’s DCTV crossover debut.”
“Hoechlin made his first appearance as Clark Kent in season two of Supergirl as Kara Danvers legendary cousin.”
“After being featured in four episodes of the series, Hoechlin will put back on his cape as we wait to see who will be cast to play Lois Lane.”
“The CW recently set the dates for the annual crossover, with this year’s storyline heading to Gotham City, a place previously off-limits to The CW.”
“The crossover will start with The Flash on Sunday, December 9.”
“Arrow will continue the story on Monday, December 10, before it all comes to an end in Supergirl on Tuesday, December 11.”
“DC’s Legends of Tomorrow is sitting out of this year’s event, and Black Lightning has yet to establish any firm links with the Arrowverse.”
“Season 3 saw Supergirl stop Reign and the other Worldkillers’ threat to humanity and our planet, and in the process, Kara was shocked to find her mother Alura alive and living in a salvaged Argo City that survived the destruction of Krypton.”


"Let us know what you think in the comments!"
"Who do you want to see play Lois Lane?"
"Iron man will also join Lewis lane, marking the debut of the power couple's DCTV crossover."
"Hodglin made his debut as Clark Kent in Super Girl Season 2, playing the legendary cousin of Carla Danvers."
"After the four episodes of the series, hodglin will put on his cloak again, and we'll see who will play Lois Lane."
"CW has recently set a date for the annual crossover, and this year's story will go to Gotham, which was previously banned by CW."
"Crossover vehicles will start with flashing lights on Sunday, December 9."
"Arrow will continue the story on December 10 (Monday) until December 11 (Tuesday) in" super girl. "
"Washington's legend of tomorrow has been excluded from this year's event, and blacklightning has not yet established any solid connection with arrowherse."
"The third season saw the threat of Supergirl's cessation of domination and other world killers to human beings and our planet. In the process, Kara was shocked to find that her mother arula was still alive, living in a salvaged Argo city and surviving the destruction of krypton."



Number  1334
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We have seen it in quite a lot of methods on a number of celebs, formally making it a development to observe.”
“Since then, the white wrap coat has made an influence on superstar road fashion.”
“In line with Meghan’s ensemble, white is a go-to hue regardless of the time of yr, and everybody, together with celebrities, agrees.”
“Shortly after, Line the Label’s website crashed because the world rushed to get the Fits actress’ outerwear.”
“She wore a white wrap coat from the Canadian model, Line the Label, an emerald P.A.R.O.S.H gown and nude pumps from Aquazzura.”
“In honor of her engagement, the bride-to-be appeared at Kensington Palace arm-in-arm with Prince Harry to pose for his or her official pictures.”


"We've seen this in a lot of celebrities, and officially, it's an observational development."
"Since then, the white wrap coat has had an impact on the superstar's road fashion."
"In line with Megan's ensemble, white is a popular hue that everyone and celebrities agree to at any time of the year."
"Soon after, the line website collapsed as the world rushed to buy the right jacket for the actress."
"She's wearing a Canadian model's white coat, trademark lines, an emerald p.a.r.o.s.h dress and aquazzura's nude heels."
"To commemorate the engagement, the bride to be appeared hand in hand with Prince Harry at Kensington Palace, posing for his or her official photo."



Number  1335
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tyra Banks Rocks Sparkly Nude Bodysuit With Studded Sandals on BET Awards Red CarpetJanelle Monae Makes a Colorful Arrival on the BET Awards Red CarpetWildest Looks From BET Awards Over the Years You Have to See to Believe...”
“Want more?”
“Watch on FN2 Chainz CREDIT: Rex ShutterstockSee more best-dressed celebrities on the 2018 BET Awards red carpet.”
“His shoes were quite the sight, too, rocking a pair of Gucci black and brown leather stud-embellished Curtis Formal Quentin loafers with metal bee detail.”
“The hitmaker completed the ensemble with chains, rings and bracelets and large sunglasses.”
“CREDIT: Rex ShutterstockMeanwhile rapper 2 Chainz had on one of the most striking numbers among the men, looking sharp in a double-breasted Gucci suit featuring the luxury brand’s interlocking G print.”
“Ne-Yo wears Gucci sneakers.”
“CREDIT: Rex ShutterstockTyra Banks embraced a head-to-toe nude look that included bead embellishments on her jumpsuit and PVC sandals with stud details.”
“The singer-songwriter had on a yellow suit teamed with silver Gucci sneakersJanelle Monae wearing a rainbow dress.”
“The always-dapper Ne-Yo didn’t play things safe with his look, either.”


"Tyra Banks is wearing a shiny nude jumpsuit and studded sandals on the red carpet of the lottery. Janelle monae shows her colorful style on the red carpet of the lottery. You have to see the wildest shape of the lottery in recent years to believe it..."
"Want more?"
"Follow FN2 chainz CREDIT:Rex Shutterstock See more best dressed celebrities on the red carpet of the 2018 BET Awards. "
"His shoes are also very eye-catching, shaking a pair of Gucci black brown leather studs decorated Curtis formal Quentin casual shoes, with metal bee details on them."
"The killer completed the ensemble with chains, rings, bracelets and sunglasses."
Photo source: Rex rapper 2 chainz looks neat in a double breasted Gucci suit with luxury brand chain g print, one of the most eye-catching figures among men
"Ne yo wears Gucci sneakers."
"Credit: Rex Tara banks's head to toe nudity, including beads on jumpsuits and PVC sandals with stud details."
"The singer songwriter wore a yellow suit and silver Gucci sneakers, and Janel Monet wore a rainbow skirt."
"Nie you, who has always been natural and unrestrained, did not use her appearance to ensure the safety of things."



Number  1336
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Every move Markle makes right now receives an incredible amount of scrutiny, and this hand-holding rebuff merely is one more of those profoundly analyzed details.”
“The new Duke and Duchess of Sussex appear quite affectionate towards each other in their body language.”
“Meghan Markle experienced a roller coaster this week as the newlywed continued to navigate her new life with Prince Harry in the British Royal Family.”
“Recently the Inquisitr reported that Meghan Markle took over a royal duty for Queen Elizabeth II later this year when the Queen will step back from responsibilities in the Queen s Young Leaders program and Markle will join her husband Prince Harry in welcoming the young leaders in the program...”
“...to Buckingham Palace...”
“Earlier this week, according to an Express report, the 36-year-old Duchess of Sussex joined the Duke of Sussex and the Queen at Buckingham Palace for the Queen’s Young Leader Awards.”
“Markle hit the ground running with her royal engagements after her mid-May royal wedding, and by the looks of their fun giggles at recent events, she and Queen Elizabeth II get along famously.”
“However, the major faux pas that the new Duchess committed at the Queen’s Young Leader awards that made headlines was her crossing her legs over her knees instead of using the so-called “Duchess Slant,” which involves crossing her legs at the ankles instead of the knees.”
“If that wasn’t enough, though, now another supposed break in royal protocol has come to light.”
“Markle attempted to reach for Prince Harry’s hand as they walked behind the Queen.”


"Every move that markel is making now is subject to incredible scrutiny, and this hand-in-hand rejection is just one more of these deeply analyzed details."
"The new Duke and Duchess of Sussex are quite friendly to each other in body language."
"Megan markel went through a roller coaster this week, and the newlyweds continued to roam in the new life of the British royal family and Prince Harry."
"Recently, prosecutors reported that Megan markel took over the Royal duties of Queen Elizabeth II later this year. At that time, the queen will withdraw from the Queen's youth leadership program, and markel will join her husband Prince Harry in welcoming the youth leaders in the program..."
“… To Buckingham Palace... "
"Earlier this week, according to the express, the 36 year old Duchess of Sussex joined the Duke and queen of Sussex in the Queen's Youth Leadership Award at Buckingham Palace."
"After the royal wedding in mid May, Marcel's royal engagement was a big hit. Judging from their laughter at recent events, she and Queen Elizabeth II got along very well."
"However, one big mistake that the new Duchess made at the Queen's youth leadership award made headlines was that she crossed her legs on her knees instead of using the so-called" Duchess slanted legs, "that is, her legs crossed over her ankles instead of her knees."
"But if that's not enough, now another incident that is considered a violation of Royal etiquette has come to light."
"As they walked behind the queen, markel tried to reach for Prince Harry's hand."



Number  1337
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’re really changing people’s lives.””
““Some of the transformations are still absolutely incredible,” says Nassif.”
“Terry Dubrow and Paul Nassif to give her equally large butt implants.”
““When she came in I thought, ‘Why would someone want to do this to their body and have something so heavy on the front of their chest that could damage them?’ ” Nassif, 55, tells PEOPLE.”
““I still ponder what gets in people’s minds and souls, why they do the things they do.”
“Her breasts stuck out about two feet.”
“That means her butt would be more like a cartoon character because it would have to stick out two feet.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Nassif says butt implants can result in issues, even when they aren’t extremely large.”
““There can be malposition or a functional problem, and there’s risk of infection or breakdown of the skin,” he explains.”
““Something that big, if you put it in there, it’s going to cause a problem.”


"We're really changing people's lives."
"Some of the changes are still absolutely unbelievable," nasif said
"Terry dubro and Paul nasif did the same hip implant for her."
"When she came in, I thought," why would someone do this to their body, with something so heavy on their chest, which might hurt themselves? "Nasif, 55, told people."
"I'm still thinking about what people get in their minds and souls, why they do what they do."
"Her chest protruded about two feet."
"It means her butt will be more like a cartoon character because it has to stick out two feet." Get news, feature, etc
"Hip implants can cause problems, even if they're not very large," nasif said
"There may be dislocation or functional problems, as well as the risk of infection or skin rupture," he explained
"If you put such a big thing in it, there will be problems."



Number  1338
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know by stopping by the comments’ section below.”
“Are you ready for your Miss USA-inspired beautiful skin?”
“The are zillions of products targeted at making your skin beautiful and flawless, just think about it: toners, cleansers, face masks, sunscreens, moisturizers, creams and more.”
“All these products promise to make your skin brighter and blemish-free as they feature all kinds of magical transforming properties at very expensive costs, of course.”
“After a typical morning routine, women have at least four to five layers of products on their skin, and this is not a surprising thing these days.”
“Once you add up all the ingredients from these products’ compositions, you would be very surprised by how many substances and chemicals you put on your face.”
“According to Miss USA, Kara McCullough, it’s time to dial it back and use simpler products.”
“The contest winner and scientist is very aware of all the things that she puts on her skin and face.”
““I’m usually a naturalista when it comes to skin care.”
“I do believe in a getting a thorough cleansing every now and then, like a good facial,” she admitted during an interview with E!”


"Please visit the comments section below to let us know."
"Are you ready for the beauty of Miss America?"
"Countless products are designed to make your skin beautiful. Think of it: toner, cleansing milk, facial mask, sunscreen, moisturizing cream, face cream and so on."
"All of these products promise to make your skin brighter and flawless, because they have all kinds of magical transformation properties, and of course they are very expensive."
"After a typical morning routine, it's not surprising that women have at least four or five layers of product on their skin."
"Once you add up all the ingredients in these products, you'll be surprised at how much substance and chemicals you put on your face."
"According to Miss America Carla McCullough, it's time to call back and use simpler products."
"The winner of this competition and the scientist are very aware of everything on his face and skin."
"When it comes to skin care, I'm usually a naturalist."
She's accepting "E!"



Number  1339
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The follow-up to Infinity War will be released on May 3, 2019.”
“Meanwhile, there will be a bit of wait to see how that cliffhanger will be resolved.”
“One more link for you: Marvel movies ranked by how much money they made.”
“And here EW explains that Infinity Wars post-credits scene, while Anthony Breznican gives some background about the surprise keeper of the Soul Stone.”
“This weekend, Fox’s Deadpool star Ryan Reynolds sent congratulations to the Marvel team with this tongue-in-cheek tweet:Meanwhile, Infinity Wars stars Chadwick Boseman, Samuel L. Jackson, Tom Holland went on Jimmy Kimmel Live to read some Mean Tweets.”
“The numbers put Disney past the billion dollar mark in annual ticket sales faster than any other studio in history.”
“Not only that, but the Avengers sequel has raked in $382.7 million internationally bringing its global tally to $640.9 million — that’s more than halfway to a billion dollars in less than a week of ticket sales.”
“Infinity War has deliveredan estimated $258.2 million domestically to beat Star Wars: The Force Awakens for the U.S. opening weekend record.”
“'Infinity War' blows past 'Star Wars: The Force Awakens' for $640.9 million globally in less than a weekAvengers: Infinity War type MovieIt’s official: Avengers: Infinity War has exceeded expectations to deliver the biggest box office opening of all time.”


"A subsequent version of infinite war will be released on May 3, 2019."
"At the same time, people will wait and see how this suspense will be solved."
"Here's another link: how much are miracle movies ranked, and their income."
"Here, EW explains the scene after the Infinite War, and Anthony breznikon gives some background about the guardian of the soul stone."
"This weekend, fox's dead ball star Ryan Reynolds congratulated Marvel on Twitter: meanwhile, the stars of Infinite War, such as Chadwick Bosman, Samuel L. Jackson and Tom Holland, read some caustic tweets on Jimi Kimmel's live broadcast
"These figures make Disney's annual box office break through the billion dollar mark, faster than any studio in history."
"Not only that, the avenger sequel made $382.7 million internationally, bringing its global box office to $640.9 million - more than half of $1 billion in less than a week."
"The limitless war made $258.2 million at the box office in the United States, beating the U.S. weekend premiere record set by Star Wars: the awakening of the force."
"In less than a week," the endless war "beat" Star Wars: the awakening of the force "and" Avenger: the endless war "with a global box office of $640.9 million. The film was officially released: Avenger: the endless war exceeded people's expectations, creating the biggest box office opening ever."



Number  1340
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I plan on continuing to magnify this issue.”
“Johnson also plans to speak out on behalf of other nonviolent, first-time offenders.”
“Great meeting with @KimKardashian today, talked about prison reform and sentencing.”
“A week later, President Trump commuted Johnson’s life sentence.”
“And I was amazed, too.”A call to Ivanka Trump, the president’s daughter and adviser, eventually led to a May 30 Oval Office meeting where Kardashian West pleaded for clemency on behalf of Johnson.”
“And everyone was amazed.”
““I started reading everything that I could about her.”
““As soon as I found out who she was, I started getting every magazine I could find,” she said.”
“Nathan Congleton/TODAYJohnson admitted that she had no idea who Kardashian West was when she first learned the television star had started championing her cause.”
“Kim Kardashian West and Alice Johnson embrace after recalling the journey that led to Johnson's commutation from a life sentence in prison.”


"I'm going to continue to magnify the problem."
Johnson also plans to speak on behalf of other nonviolent first offenders
"It was a great meeting with @ Kim Kardashian today to discuss prison reform and sentencing."
"A week later, President trump commuted Johnson's life sentence."
"I'm surprised, too." Calling Ivanka trump, the president's daughter and adviser, led to the Oval Office meeting on May 30, when Kardashian West asked for leniency on behalf of Johnson
"Everyone was surprised."
"I began to read everything I could about her."
"As soon as I found out who she was, I started getting every magazine I could find," she said
"Nathan congleton / Johnson today admitted that when she first learned that the TV star was supporting her career, she had no idea who Kardashian West was."
"Kim Kardashian West and Alice Johnson embrace after recalling the journey that led to Johnson's commutation from life imprisonment."



Number  1341
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out more of our exclusive interview with the Golden Globe winner:”
“Harding also remembers being at the Olympics and thinking, "Holy crap."”
“Tonya Harding says the Olympics have changed since she competed all those years ago.”
“"Wow, I'm so glad I'm not competing against them now," Harding says of the Olympic figure skaters, noting that the "point system" has changed.”
“"I was all about doing the triple axel or the triple-triple, and now you can do the triple-triple and still get the same points that you would for the triple axel.”
“So, why do the triple axel?"”
“Harding was the first American woman to successfully do a triple axel in a competition, and recalls the moment she knew she landed the move.”
“"I was like, 'Yes!”
“I did this!'"”
“...she says.”


"See more of our exclusive interviews with golden globe winners:
Harding remembers that at the Olympics, he would think, "oh my God."
"Tonia Harding said the Olympics have changed since she took part in them many years ago."
"Wow, I'm glad I'm not competing with them now," Harding said of Olympic figure skaters. "The point system has changed
"I used to do three axes or three axes. Now you can do three axes and get the same score as three axes."
"So, why use triaxial?"
Harding is the first American woman to successfully complete a three-axis action in a competition. She recalls the moment when she knew she had completed the action
"I said," yes! "
"I did it!" “”
“…… She said



Number  1342
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Mike Coppola / Staff / Getty Images]”
“Kendall tucked her see-through pants into a pair of beige heeled Yeezy ankle boots, which Kim Kardashian has also been spotted doing recently.”
“So, Kendall Jenner wore see-through pants to the airport https://t.co/dIngwhOmCS pic.twitter.com/IlAl7QkiOz — Who What Wear (@WhoWhatWear) May 19, 2017Style evolution.”
“...mustard colored tote bag and covered her eyes with oversized black aviators...”
“...always been an OG TBT A post shared by Kendall kendalljenner on May 18 2017 at 9 20am PDT Kendall Jenner teases her saucy lingerie as she lands in Nice for Cannes Film Festival appearance https t co gF2R2SMPKV Daily Mail Celebrity DailyMailCeleb May 19 2017 She carried a bright...”
“The model made her way to a car waiting upon her arrival before heading off to the luxury 5-star Eden Roc Hotel in Antibes.”
“Kendall was flying to Nice for the annual Cannes Film Festival, according to Daily Mail.”
“She also appeared to have gone without makeup for her travels.”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashians model seems to have gotten her inspiration from her older sister, Kim Kardashian, who is often wearing revealing clothing and daring ensembles.”
“Kendall is one of the highest-earning supermodels in the world and is the face of multiple reputable brands.”


"[Mike Coppola / staff / Getty pictures]
"Kendall tucked his transparent pants into a pair of yeezy ankle boots with beige heels, and Kim Kardashian was recently found doing it."
"So Kendall Jenner went to the airport in transparent pants https://t.co/dIngwhOmCSpic.twitter.com/IlAl7QkiOz-Who  What wear (@ whowhatwear) May 19, 2017 style evolution. "
“… Mustard colored handbag, covering her eyes with a large black pilot... "
“… Forever is a post shared by og TBT Kendall Jenner at 9:20 am on May 18, 2017. Kendall Jenner teased her sexy underwear because she landed at nice Cannes Film Festival and appeared in the daily mail celebrity Daily Mail celeb on May 19, 2017. She carried a bright... "
"The model arrived at a car waiting for her before arriving at the luxury five-star Eden Rock Hotel in Antibes."
Kendall was flying to nice for the annual Cannes Film Festival, the Daily Mail reported
"She doesn't seem to have makeup when she travels," she said
"Keeping up with Kardashian's model seems to be inspired by her sister Kim Kardashian, who often wears revealing clothes and bold ensembles."
"Kendall is one of the highest earning supermodels in the world and the spokesperson of many well-known brands."



Number  1343
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#TrueHappiness, welcome to Earth Son!” added Cannon, 36.”
“No matter how hard the world may hit you, God always reminds us of our purpose!”
“The night before Easter, admirably friendly exes Mariah Carey and Nick Cannon reunited to celebrate with their 5-year-old twins, Monroe and Moroccan.”
“The “Emotions” singer took to Instagram to post a sweet snap of the family decorating Easter eggs .”
“In the adorable photo, the family of four sits around a kitchen table dying eggs in all sorts of pastel colors for Easter.”
““Easter with #demkids,” she shared with her followers.”
““#moments #rocandroe #easter #family @nickcannon.”Looks like the pop-megastar is trying to change the nickname of her growing twins to #demkids, who have been referred to by fans as #dembabies since their birth in 2012.”
“The duo were married in April of 2008 but the “Honey” singer filed for divorce December of 2014.”
“Carey and Cannon’s Easter celebration just a week after the “Glitter” actress announced she had split from backup dancer, Bryan Tanka after a year of dating.”
“According to TMZ, Tanaka felt “disrespected” when Carey and Cannon, 36, attended the Nickelodeon Kids’ Choice Awards with their children on March 11.”


"True happiness, welcome to the son of the earth! "Cannon added, 36."
"No matter how hard the world hits you, God always reminds us of our goal!"
The night before Easter, very friendly ex girlfriends Maria Carey and Nick Cannon were reunited with their 5-year-old twins Monroe and Moroccans to celebrate
The "emotional" singer posted a sweet snapshot of the family decorating Easter eggs on instagram
"In this lovely picture, a family of four is sitting around the dining table, preparing colorful eggs for Easter."
She shared with her followers "Easter with demkuid"
It seems that the pop star is trying to change the nickname of his growing twins to "demkids", which has been called "dembabies" by fans since they were born in 2012
The two married in April 2008, but the "dear" singer filed for divorce in December 2014
Kelly's and cannon's Easter celebrations come just a week after the "shining" actress broke up a year after she announced her date with dance partner Brian Tanka
"Tanaka felt" disrespected "on March 11 when Kelly and cannon, 36, took their children to the Nickelodeon children's Choice Award, TMZ reported



Number  1344
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““And all the shopping we will get to do — if that’s her thing, of course!”Just a week into 2018, Role revealed on Instagram Wise had popped the question while the couple were celebrating his birthday in Atlanta.”
“Image zoom Credit: Jennyd“The one thing I’m excited the most for is to be able to have a little mini ‘us’ to watch grow up into a beautiful and strong woman,” says Role.”
“The consultant, 33, got engaged to her analyst boyfriend Chris Wise, 31, in January after dating for nearly a year.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
““Her middle name will be named after my grams who passed — Myra.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Image zoom Credit: JennydImage zoom Credit: Jennyd“I wish my grandmother was here because she would’ve been so excited,” says Role about her late grandmother, who appeared on season three of Lifetime’s hit reality show (produced by Kinetic Content).”
“The couple also already have a name picked out for their baby: Isabella.”
““I will be the first one to give my mom and dad a little girl, and I can’t wait to do so many mom-and-daughter things!”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I was so excited to find out that I’m having a girl,” she tells PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Married at First Sight Alum Sam Role Reveals the Sex — and Name — of Her BabyIt’ll be a girl for Married at First Sight alum Sam Role and her fiancé Chris Wise.”


"And everything we're going to buy - if that's her business, of course! "Just a week ago in 2018, the character revealed on instagram wise raised the question as the couple celebrated their birthday in Atlanta."
"The credit for image zooming: Janet" role said: "one of the most exciting things for me is to have a little" we "to watch myself grow into a beautiful and strong woman."
The 33 year old consultant was engaged to his 31 year old analyst boyfriend Chris wise in January after nearly a year of dating
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Her middle name will be Myra, who passed the exam." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"Image scaling credit: jennyd image scaling credit: jennyd" I wish my grandmother was here because she would be so excited, "she said of her late grandmother, who appeared on season 3 life's hit reality show (produced by kinetic energy content)
"The couple have also chosen a name for their child: Isabella."
"I will be the first to give birth to a little girl for my parents. I can't wait to do so many things for my mother and daughter!"! Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When I found out I had a girl, I was very excited," she told people exclusive
"The alum Sam character of love at first sight reveals the gender and name of her child. It's going to be a love at first sight alum Sam character and her fiance Chris wise married girl



Number  1345
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I've got a bit of nerves but that's all right because we're confident."”
“"I'm really excited and I think that I'm really lucky because not many people get to sing at such a special event," he said.”
“...being grown for the wedding AFP Getty Images Members of the Household Calvary ready for inspection in the Regimental Square during a facility to see The Household Cavalry Mounted Regiment preparations for the forthcoming Royal Wedding at Hyde Park Barracks PA A general view of Windsor Castle Getty Images The...”
“...the wedding PA Police officers prepare road closures outside Windsor Castle AP The royal kitchen at Windsor Castle where preparations are underway for the reception banquet after the wedding PA Alice Laughton Project Manager at Mission Invertebrate inspects plants at the Royal Parks Nursery in Hyde Park where flowers are...”
“...the Ascot Landau carriage at the Royal Mews at Buckingham Palace PA School children in uniform wave Union Flags outside Windsor Castle Reuters James Vivian Director of Music at St George s Chapel in Windsor directs the St George s Chapel Choir during a rehearsal before evensong and ahead of...”
“PA 4 year old George high fives an armed police officer in Windsor a Jeremy Selwyn Philip Barnard Brown Senior Coachman at the Buckingham Palace Mews leads a Windsor Grey one of the four horses that will pull the carriage at the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle past...”
“...the streets of Windsor Jeremy Selwyn Souvenirs featuring Prince Harry and Meghan Markle are displayed in a Windsor gift shop Getty Images Kensington Palace update with the news that the Prince of Wales will accompany Meghan Markle down the aisle at her wedding to Prince Harry...”
“...painter Jagjot Singh Rubal touches up his painting of Prince Harry L and Meghan Markle ahead of their royal wedding AFP Getty Images A cardboard cut out of Britain s Queen Elizabeth stands behind Union flags on the crowd control barriers near Windsor Castle Reuters Royal fans camp out on...”
“Palace PA A Jaguar convertible with a Union Flag paint scheme and life size cardboard cut outs of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle is parked in Windsor Reuters Royal fans wave flags from the window of a Marks and Spencer store above a banner referring to the wedding Reuters Indian...”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle s Royal Wedding Preparations 1 54 Prince Harry and Meghan Markle s Royal Wedding Preparations Claire Ptak owner of Violet Bakery in Hackney east London puts finishing touches to the cake for the wedding of Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in the kitchens at Buckingham...”


"I'm a little nervous, but it doesn't matter because we're confident."
"I'm really excited and I think I'm really lucky because not many people can sing at such a special event," he said
“… Growing up for the wedding photo by AFP Getty family members see the family cavalry regiment preparing to visit Windsor Castle in Hyde Park Barracks during the inspection at regiment square
“… Wedding PA Police Prepare roads outside Windsor Castle to close AP Windsor Castle's royal kitchen, where they are preparing for the wedding banquet. After the wedding, the invertebrate project manager of PA Alice Laughton mission inspected the plants in the Royal Park Nursery in Hyde Park, where there were flowers... "
“…… Ascot Landau carriage at Buckingham Palace Royal Church - Pennsylvanian school children dressed in the United wave flag outside Windsor Castle (Reuters) - James Vivian, music director of St. George's Church in Windsor, conducted the choir of St. George's church before the evening song rehearsal... "
"Dad, 4-year-old George hever, an armed police officer in Windsor, a senior coachman in Buckingham Palace, Jeremy selwin Philip Barnard brown, is holding a Windsor grey horse. This is one of the four horses pulling the cart at the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel..."
“…… Jeremy Selwyn, a Windsor gift shop on the streets of Windsor, has displayed pictures of Getty, a souvenir with the theme of Prince Harry and Megan markel. The latest news at Kensington Palace is that the prince of Wales will accompany Megan markel on the aisle at his wedding with Prince Harry... "
“…… Painter jargett Singh Rubal embellishes his painting before Prince Harry L and Megan markel's royal wedding. Getty Images by Agence France Presse Queen Elizabeth cuts cardboard behind the United Nations Flag on the crowd control barrier near Windsor Castle, Reuters "the Royal fan camp is..."
"Palace pa a Jaguar convertible is parked at Windsor Reuters. Royal fans wave a flag from the window of a department store in marks and Spencer. There is a flag on it that says the Reuters Indian of the wedding..."
"Prince Harry and Megan Marcel's royal wedding preparation154 Prince Harry and Megan Marcel's royal wedding preparationclaire putak, the owner of Hackney's violet bakery in East London, makes the final touch up for Prince Harry and Megan Marcel's wedding omelet in the kitchen of Buckingham Palace..."



Number  1346
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Still, Nikki and Brie’s close friend Shawna assures her this is very normal, as she was “all cool and calm” until her actual wedding day.”
““Let them eat cake!”Despite all the previous celebrating, Nikki finally confesses that the Paris getaway hasn’t really felt like a bachelorette party…until now.”
““This is, like, I’m in heaven,” Nikki happily notes to her friends while sipping on champagne.”
“Decked out in lavish ball gowns and masks, Nikki and her guests are totally in awe when they witness how Brie has transformed their chateau.”
“In this clip from Sunday’s all-new Total Bellas, the mother of one successfully pulls together a masquerade ball in Paris for her twin.”
“Nikki Bella has finally gotten into the bachelorette spirit and it’s all thanks to Brie Bella.”


Nevertheless, Shauna, a close friend of Nikki and Bree, assured her that this was normal because she was "calm and calm" before she really got married
"Let them eat the cake! "Despite all the previous celebrations, Nikki finally admitted that a trip to Paris doesn't feel like a bachelor party Until now. "
"It's like, I'm in heaven," Nikki said cheerfully to his friends as he sipped the champagne
"Wearing luxurious ball dresses and masks, Nicky and her guests were awed when they saw how Bree had transformed their castle."
"In this video of Sunday's new" total Bella, "the mother of a child successfully hosts a masquerade ball for her twins in Paris
"Nicky Bella has finally entered the spirit of singleness, thanks to bribella for all this."



Number  1347
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Come And Get It artist revealed her kidney transplant via social media on Thursday morning.”
“...low profile in flat black slip on shoes after a series of high glamour red carpet appearances for New York Fashion Week...”
“Soon after her 127m followers showered her with notes wishing her well.”
“Several asked tough questions while others offered their own stories.”
“The attention may have been too much for the Fetish hit maker as she was seen with her head down when running errands in New York City on Saturday.”
“Not in the mood for a close up Selena Gomez kept her head down as she was seen in New York City on Saturday Staying warm The Good For You singer looked stylish in a black tank top with a black and white plaid wool coat The Good For You...”
“...singer looked stylish in a black tank top with a black and white plaid wool coat...”
“The heels were left at home in favor of a pair of black Puma sneakers that went up her ankle.”
“Gomez's hair appeared still wet as it was pulled back into a ponytail and she had on sunglasses as a bodyguard followed.”
“Always with someone The ex of Justin Bieber had a bodyguard in a plaid shirt behind her In a rush Gomez s hair appeared still wet as it was pulled back into a ponytail and she had on sunglasses as a bodyguard followed On the go lady The Heart Wants...”


"The" come and go "artist revealed her kidney transplant operation through social media on Thursday morning."
“… After a series of high glamour red carpet shows in New York Fashion Week, I'm wearing black flat shoes in a low profile
"Soon after, her 127 million followers poured their blessings on her."
"Some people ask sharp questions, others tell their own stories."
"People may have paid too much attention to the fetishist star because people saw her head down while running errands in New York last Saturday."
"I'm not in the mood to feature Selena Gomez keeping her head down because she was seen keeping warm in New York City on Saturday. The good for you singer looks fashionable in a black vest and a black and White Checkered wool jacket. The good for you..."
“… The singer is wearing a black vest and a black-and-white checked wool coat. She looks very fashionable. "
"High heels were left at home and replaced by a pair of black puma sneakers that went all the way to her ankles."
"Gomez's hair was pulled back into her ponytail and looked wet. A bodyguard followed her. She was wearing sunglasses."
"Justin Bieber's ex girlfriend always has a bodyguard in a plaid shirt scurrying behind her. Gomez's hair is still wet because it's pulled back into her ponytail. She's wearing sunglasses, and a bodyguard follows her favorite lady..."



Number  1348
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Using their remarkable physiques as marketing tools, proving to customers that their products work, it’s no wonder their business is thriving.”
“Aside from their frequent cameos and appearances in the ring, Haas and Gayda run and operate their own nutrition store in Texas called Custom Muscle Nutrition and Smoothies.”
“While she was hesitant at first, not wanting to get involved with a co-worker early in her career, eventually she caved and accepted an invitation to hang out Rhodes.”
“She first met Cody Rhodes through her job.”
“She worked her way up from a news reporter to anchor and eventually became an announcer for the WWE.”
“Since their Vegas marriage, Michaels and Curci have been living a happily married life with two childrenBrandi Rhodes – Cody Rhodes Before becoming the female wrestler known as Eden Stiles, Brandi Rhodes was pursuing a career in broadcast journalism.”
“In 1999, the couple eloped to Las Vegas and promptly got married.”
“Michaels spotted Nitro Girl and knew he wanted to be with her, despite his reputation as one of the most desirable heartthrobs in all of wrestling.”
“Rebecca Curci – Sean Michaels Prior to tying the knot with WWE legend Sean Michaels, Rebecca Curci was a wrestler in her own right, taking the wrestling alias Nitro Girl.”
“Punk and Lee now reside in Chicago, so we figure their house will be full of little wrestlers soon enough!”


"Using their extraordinary physique as a marketing tool to prove to customers that their products work, no wonder their business is booming."
In addition to frequent guest appearances and appearances in the ring, Haas and Gaida also run their own nutrition shop in Texas, called "custom Muscle Nutrition and smoothie."
"Although she hesitated at first and didn't want to associate with colleagues at the beginning of her career, she finally gave in and accepted the invitation to associate with Rhodes."
"She first met Cody Rhodes because of her work."
"She went all the way from journalist to anchor, and eventually became an announcer of WWE."
"Since they got married in Vegas, Michael and Cauchy have been happily married. They have two children, brandy Rhodes - Cody Rhodes. Brandy Rhodes was engaged in broadcasting journalism before becoming a female wrestler known as Eden stiles."
In 1999, the couple eloped to Las Vegas and soon married
"Michael found the girl and knew he wanted to be with her, even though he was one of the most popular people in wrestling."
"Rebecca Cauchy - before Sean Michaels got married to WWE legend Sean Michaels, Rebecca Cauchy was a wrestler herself and took the nickname nitro girl."
"Punk and Lee are living in Chicago now, so we expect their family will soon be full of young wrestlers!"



Number  1349
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They were part of our party, part of our show.”
“Here I felt they were part of it.”
“I m really trying to get people together As a bonus Stamos longtime friends and frequent if unofficial bandmates the iconic multi platinum selling music legends The Beach Boys will join him in the nation s capitol as both performers and the recipients of the fifth annual A CAPITOL FOURTH”
“It just takes so much energy to block all the negativity.”
“It’s a time to be kind and graceful to people.”
““It took me longer than it should’ve, but I knew that I would be a family and be contributing to this country, and holding onto the morals and the values that my parents had, that I like to think of the world having.”
““I always knew it was going to be like this,” he explained.”
““[But] so far, it’s been a dream, and when I look at him, I feel like I’ve been thinking about that face for a long time.”Stamos said that fatherhood has been everything that he expected it would be, and it’s deepened his connection to his country.”
““It was Mother’s Day and Caitlin’s birthday, so we went down to Laguna [Beach], and it was the first time we didn’t have a nanny — that was rough!” he laughed.”
“And PBS just sent this really cute onesie that says ‘Future Host,’ and all this patriotic stuff.”It’ll be baby Stamos’ first cross-country excursion, coming on the heels of a slightly not-so-smooth local road trip, Stamos admitted.”


"They're part of our party, part of our performance."
"Here I feel like they are part of it."
"I really want to bring people together as a reward for Stamos' long-term friends and regular if the unofficial band partner, the iconic multi platinum selling music legend beach boy, will join him at the U.S. Capitol as two performers and the fifth Capitol fourth prize winner."
"It just takes so much energy to stop all the negative emotions."
"It's time to be nice to people."
"It took me longer than I should, but I knew I would become a family, contribute to this country, uphold the morality and values my parents had, and I like to imagine the world."
"I always knew that would be the case," he explained
"(but) so far, it's a dream, and when I look at him, I feel like I've been thinking about that face for a long time." Stamos said that being a father is everything he expected, which has deepened his connection with the country
"It was mother's day and Caitlin's birthday, so we went to Laguna (Beach) and for the first time we didn't have a babysitter - it was so hard! "He laughed."
"The American public broadcasting corporation has just sent a lovely list with the words" future master "and all the patriotic things." Stamos admits it will be baby Stamos' first cross-country trip, followed by a slightly less smooth local road trip



Number  1350
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.26732673267326734
Correct number is  243
Total number is  909
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
